TWENTY THOUSAND LEAGUES UNDER THE SEA by JULES VERNE


PART ONE

CHAPTER I

A SHIFTING REEF

The year 1866 was signalised by a remarkable incident, a mysterious
and puzzling phenomenon, which doubtless no one has yet forgotten.
Not to mention rumours which agitated the maritime population
and excited the public mind, even in the interior of continents,
seafaring men were particularly excited.  Merchants, common sailors,
captains of vessels, skippers, both of Europe and America,
naval officers of all countries, and the Governments of several States
on the two continents, were deeply interested in the matter.

For some time past vessels had been met by "an enormous thing,"
a long object, spindle-shaped, occasionally phosphorescent,
and infinitely larger and more rapid in its movements than a whale.

The facts relating to this apparition (entered in various log-books)
agreed in most respects as to the shape of the object or creature in question,
the untiring rapidity of its movements, its surprising power of locomotion,
and the peculiar life with which it seemed endowed.  If it was a whale,
it surpassed in size all those hitherto classified in science.
Taking into consideration the mean of observations made at divers times--
rejecting the timid estimate of those who assigned to this object
a length of two hundred feet, equally with the exaggerated opinions
which set it down as a mile in width and three in length--we might fairly
conclude that this mysterious being surpassed greatly all dimensions
admitted by the learned ones of the day, if it existed at all.
And that it DID exist was an undeniable fact; and, with that tendency
which disposes the human mind in favour of the marvellous, we can understand
the excitement produced in the entire world by this supernatural apparition.
As to classing it in the list of fables, the idea was out of the question.

On the 20th of July, 1866, the steamer Governor Higginson,
of the Calcutta and Burnach Steam Navigation Company, had met
this moving mass five miles off the east coast of Australia.
Captain Baker thought at first that he was in the presence of an
unknown sandbank; he even prepared to determine its exact position
when two columns of water, projected by the mysterious object,
shot with a hissing noise a hundred and fifty feet up into the air.
Now, unless the sandbank had been submitted to the intermittent
eruption of a geyser, the Governor Higginson had to do neither
more nor less than with an aquatic mammal, unknown till then,
which threw up from its blow-holes columns of water mixed with
air and vapour.

Similar facts were observed on the 23rd of July in the same year,
in the Pacific Ocean, by the Columbus, of the West India
and Pacific Steam Navigation Company.  But this extraordinary
creature could transport itself from one place to another
with surprising velocity; as, in an interval of three days,
the Governor Higginson and the Columbus had observed it at
two different points of the chart, separated by a distance
of more than seven hundred nautical leagues.

Fifteen days later, two thousand miles farther off, the Helvetia,
of the Compagnie-Nationale, and the Shannon, of the Royal
Mail Steamship Company, sailing to windward in that portion
of the Atlantic lying between the United States and Europe,
respectively signalled the monster to each other in 42@ 15' N. lat.
and 60@ 35' W. long.  In these simultaneous observations they
thought themselves justified in estimating the minimum length
of the mammal at more than three hundred and fifty feet,
as the Shannon and Helvetia were of smaller dimensions than it,
though they measured three hundred feet over all.

Now the largest whales, those which frequent those parts of the sea round
the Aleutian, Kulammak, and Umgullich islands, have never exceeded the length
of sixty yards, if they attain that.

In every place of great resort the monster was the fashion.
They sang of it in the cafes, ridiculed it in the papers, and represented
it on the stage.  All kinds of stories were circulated regarding it.
There appeared in the papers caricatures of every gigantic and
imaginary creature, from the white whale, the terrible "Moby Dick"
of sub-arctic regions, to the immense kraken, whose tentacles could entangle
a ship of five hundred tons and hurry it into the abyss of the ocean.
The legends of ancient times were even revived.

Then burst forth the unending argument between the believers and the
unbelievers in the societies of the wise and the scientific journals.
"The question of the monster" inflamed all minds.  Editors of
scientific journals, quarrelling with believers in the supernatural,
spilled seas of ink during this memorable campaign, some even drawing blood;
for from the sea-serpent they came to direct personalities.

During the first months of the year 1867 the question seemed buried,
never to revive, when new facts were brought before the public.
It was then no longer a scientific problem to be solved, but a real
danger seriously to be avoided.  The question took quite another shape.
The monster became a small island, a rock, a reef, but a reef of indefinite
and shifting proportions.

On the 5th of March, 1867, the Moravian, of the Montreal Ocean Company,
finding herself during the night in 27@ 30' lat.  and 72@ 15' long., struck
on her starboard quarter a rock, marked in no chart for that part of the sea.
Under the combined efforts of the wind and its four hundred horse power,
it was going at the rate of thirteen knots.  Had it not been for the superior
strength of the hull of the Moravian, she would have been broken by the shock
and gone down with the 237 passengers she was bringing home from Canada.

The accident happened about five o'clock in the morning, as the day
was breaking.  The officers of the quarter-deck hurried to the after-part
of the vessel.  They examined the sea with the most careful attention.
They saw nothing but a strong eddy about three cables' length distant,
as if the surface had been violently agitated.  The bearings of the place were
taken exactly, and the Moravian continued its route without apparent damage.
Had it struck on a submerged rock, or on an enormous wreck?  They could
not tell; but, on examination of the ship's bottom when undergoing repairs,
it was found that part of her keel was broken.

This fact, so grave in itself, might perhaps have been forgotten
like many others if, three weeks after, it had not been re-enacted
under similar circumstances.  But, thanks to the nationality of
the victim of the shock, thanks to the reputation of the company to
which the vessel belonged, the circumstance became extensively circulated.

The 13th of April, 1867, the sea being beautiful, the breeze favourable,
the Scotia, of the Cunard Company's line, found herself in 15@ 12' long.
and 45@ 37' lat.  She was going at the speed of thirteen knots and a half.

At seventeen minutes past four in the afternoon, whilst the passengers were
assembled at lunch in the great saloon, a slight shock was felt on the hull
of the Scotia, on her quarter, a little aft of the port-paddle.

The Scotia had not struck, but she had been struck, and seemingly
by something rather sharp and penetrating than blunt.
The shock had been so slight that no one had been alarmed,
had it not been for the shouts of the carpenter's watch,
who rushed on to the bridge, exclaiming, "We are sinking! we
are sinking!"  At first the passengers were much frightened,
but Captain Anderson hastened to reassure them.  The danger could
not be imminent.  The Scotia, divided into seven compartments
by strong partitions, could brave with impunity any leak.
Captain Anderson went down immediately into the hold.
He found that the sea was pouring into the fifth compartment;
and the rapidity of the influx proved that the force of the water
was considerable.  Fortunately this compartment did not hold
the boilers, or the fires would have been immediately extinguished.
Captain Anderson ordered the engines to be stopped at once,
and one of the men went down to ascertain the extent of the injury.
Some minutes afterwards they discovered the existence of a
large hole, two yards in diameter, in the ship's bottom.
Such a leak could not be stopped; and the Scotia, her paddles
half submerged, was obliged to continue her course.  She was then
three hundred miles from Cape Clear, and, after three days' delay,
which caused great uneasiness in Liverpool, she entered the basin
of the company.

The engineers visited the Scotia, which was put in dry dock.
They could scarcely believe it possible; at two yards and a half below
water-mark was a regular rent, in the form of an isosceles triangle.
The broken place in the iron plates was so perfectly defined
that it could not have been more neatly done by a punch.
It was clear, then, that the instrument producing the perforation
was not of a common stamp and, after having been driven with
prodigious strength, and piercing an iron plate 1 3/8 inches thick,
had withdrawn itself by a backward motion.

Such was the last fact, which resulted in exciting once more the torrent
of public opinion.  From this moment all unlucky casualties which could
not be otherwise accounted for were put down to the monster.

Upon this imaginary creature rested the responsibility of all
these shipwrecks, which unfortunately were considerable;
for of three thousand ships whose loss was annually recorded
at Lloyd's, the number of sailing and steam-ships supposed
to be totally lost, from the absence of all news, amounted to
not less than two hundred!

Now, it was the "monster" who, justly or unjustly, was accused
of their disappearance, and, thanks to it, communication between
the different continents became more and more dangerous.
The public demanded sharply that the seas should at any price be
relieved from this formidable cetacean.  [1]

[1] Member of the whale family.



CHAPTER II

PRO AND CON

At the period when these events took place, I had just returned
from a scientific research in the disagreeable territory
of Nebraska, in the United States.  In virtue of my office
as Assistant Professor in the Museum of Natural History in Paris,
the French Government had attached me to that expedition.
After six months in Nebraska, I arrived in New York towards
the end of March, laden with a precious collection.
My departure for France was fixed for the first days in May.
Meanwhile I was occupying myself in classifying my mineralogical,
botanical, and zoological riches, when the accident happened
to the Scotia.

I was perfectly up in the subject which was the question of the day.
How could I be otherwise?  I had read and reread all the American
and European papers without being any nearer a conclusion.
This mystery puzzled me.  Under the impossibility of forming
an opinion, I jumped from one extreme to the other.
That there really was something could not be doubted,
and the incredulous were invited to put their finger on the wound
of the Scotia.

On my arrival at New York the question was at its height.
The theory of the floating island, and the unapproachable sandbank,
supported by minds little competent to form a judgment, was abandoned.
And, indeed, unless this shoal had a machine in its stomach,
how could it change its position with such astonishing rapidity?

From the same cause, the idea of a floating hull of an enormous
wreck was given up.

There remained, then, only two possible solutions of the question,
which created two distinct parties:  on one side, those who were
for a monster of colossal strength; on the other, those who were
for a submarine vessel of enormous motive power.

But this last theory, plausible as it was, could not stand against
inquiries made in both worlds.  That a private gentleman should have
such a machine at his command was not likely.  Where, when, and how
was it built? and how could its construction have been kept secret?
Certainly a Government might possess such a destructive machine.
And in these disastrous times, when the ingenuity of man has
multiplied the power of weapons of war, it was possible that,
without the knowledge of others, a State might try to work such
a formidable engine.

But the idea of a war machine fell before the declaration of Governments.
As public interest was in question, and transatlantic communications
suffered, their veracity could not be doubted.  But how admit that
the construction of this submarine boat had escaped the public eye?
For a private gentleman to keep the secret under such circumstances would
be very difficult, and for a State whose every act is persistently watched
by powerful rivals, certainly impossible.

Upon my arrival in New York several persons did me
the honour of consulting me on the phenomenon in question.
I had published in France a work in quarto, in two volumes,
entitled Mysteries of the Great Submarine Grounds.  This book,
highly approved of in the learned world, gained for me a special
reputation in this rather obscure branch of Natural History.
My advice was asked.  As long as I could deny the reality
of the fact, I confined myself to a decided negative.
But soon, finding myself driven into a corner, I was
obliged to explain myself point by point.  I discussed
the question in all its forms, politically and scientifically;
and I give here an extract from a carefully-studied article
which I published in the number of the 30th of April.
It ran as follows:

"After examining one by one the different theories, rejecting all
other suggestions, it becomes necessary to admit the existence
of a marine animal of enormous power.

"The great depths of the ocean are entirely unknown to us.
Soundings cannot reach them.  What passes in those remote depths--
what beings live, or can live, twelve or fifteen miles beneath
the surface of the waters--what is the organisation of these animals,
we can scarcely conjecture.  However, the solution of the problem
submitted to me may modify the form of the dilemma.  Either we do know
all the varieties of beings which people our planet, or we do not.
If we do NOT know them all--if Nature has still secrets in the deeps
for us, nothing is more conformable to reason than to admit the existence
of fishes, or cetaceans of other kinds, or even of new species,
of an organisation formed to inhabit the strata inaccessible to soundings,
and which an accident of some sort has brought at long intervals
to the upper level of the ocean.

"If, on the contrary, we DO know all living kinds, we must
necessarily seek for the animal in question amongst those marine
beings already classed; and, in that case, I should be disposed
to admit the existence of a gigantic narwhal.

"The common narwhal, or unicorn of the sea, often attains
a length of sixty feet.  Increase its size fivefold or tenfold,
give it strength proportionate to its size, lengthen its
destructive weapons, and you obtain the animal required.
It will have the proportions determined by the officers
of the Shannon, the instrument required by the perforation
of the Scotia, and the power necessary to pierce the hull
of the steamer.

"Indeed, the narwhal is armed with a sort of ivory sword,
a halberd, according to the expression of certain naturalists.
The principal tusk has the hardness of steel.  Some of these tusks
have been found buried in the bodies of whales, which the unicorn
always attacks with success.  Others have been drawn out,
not without trouble, from the bottoms of ships, which they
had pierced through and through, as a gimlet pierces a barrel.
The Museum of the Faculty of Medicine of Paris possesses one
of these defensive weapons, two yards and a quarter in length,
and fifteen inches in diameter at the base.

"Very well! suppose this weapon to be six times stronger and the animal
ten times more powerful; launch it at the rate of twenty miles an hour,
and you obtain a shock capable of producing the catastrophe required.
Until further information, therefore, I shall maintain it to be
a sea-unicorn of colossal dimensions, armed not with a halberd,
but with a real spur, as the armoured frigates, or the `rams' of war,
whose massiveness and motive power it would possess at the same time.
Thus may this puzzling phenomenon be explained, unless there be something over
and above all that one has ever conjectured, seen, perceived, or experienced;
which is just within the bounds of possibility."

These last words were cowardly on my part; but, up to a certain point,
I wished to shelter my dignity as professor, and not give
too much cause for laughter to the Americans, who laugh well
when they do laugh.  I reserved for myself a way of escape.
In effect, however, I admitted the existence of the "monster."
My article was warmly discussed, which procured it a high reputation.
It rallied round it a certain number of partisans.  The solution
it proposed gave, at least, full liberty to the imagination.
The human mind delights in grand conceptions of supernatural beings.
And the sea is precisely their best vehicle, the only medium
through which these giants (against which terrestrial animals,
such as elephants or rhinoceroses, are as nothing) can be produced
or developed.

The industrial and commercial papers treated the question chiefly from this
point of view.  The Shipping and Mercantile Gazette, the Lloyd's List,
the Packet-Boat, and the Maritime and Colonial Review, all papers devoted
to insurance companies which threatened to raise their rates of premium,
were unanimous on this point.  Public opinion had been pronounced.
The United States were the first in the field; and in New York they
made preparations for an expedition destined to pursue this narwhal.
A frigate of great speed, the Abraham Lincoln, was put in commission
as soon as possible.  The arsenals were opened to Commander Farragut,
who hastened the arming of his frigate; but, as it always happens,
the moment it was decided to pursue the monster, the monster did not appear.
For two months no one heard it spoken of.  No ship met with it.
It seemed as if this unicorn knew of the plots weaving around it.
It had been so much talked of, even through the Atlantic cable, that jesters
pretended that this slender fly had stopped a telegram on its passage and was
making the most of it.

So when the frigate had been armed for a long campaign, and provided with
formidable fishing apparatus, no one could tell what course to pursue.
Impatience grew apace, when, on the 2nd of July, they learned that a
steamer of the line of San Francisco, from California to Shanghai,
had seen the animal three weeks before in the North Pacific Ocean.
The excitement caused by this news was extreme.  The ship was revictualled
and well stocked with coal.

Three hours before the Abraham Lincoln left Brooklyn pier,
I received a letter worded as follows:

To M. ARONNAX, Professor in the Museum of Paris, Fifth Avenue Hotel, New York.

SIR,--If you will consent to join the Abraham Lincoln
in this expedition, the Government of the United States
will with pleasure see France represented in the enterprise.
Commander Farragut has a cabin at your disposal.

Very cordially yours, J.B. HOBSON, Secretary of Marine.



CHAPTER III

I FORM MY RESOLUTION

Three seconds before the arrival of J. B. Hobson's letter I no more thought
of pursuing the unicorn than of attempting the passage of the North Sea.
Three seconds after reading the letter of the honourable Secretary of Marine,
I felt that my true vocation, the sole end of my life, was to chase this
disturbing monster and purge it from the world.

But I had just returned from a fatiguing journey, weary and longing
for repose.  I aspired to nothing more than again seeing my country,
my friends, my little lodging by the Jardin des Plantes,
my dear and precious collections--but nothing could keep me back!
I forgot all--fatigue, friends and collections--and accepted without
hesitation the offer of the American Government.

"Besides," thought I, "all roads lead back to Europe; and the unicorn
may be amiable enough to hurry me towards the coast of France.
This worthy animal may allow itself to be caught in the seas of Europe
(for my particular benefit), and I will not bring back less than half
a yard of his ivory halberd to the Museum of Natural History."
But in the meanwhile I must seek this narwhal in the North
Pacific Ocean, which, to return to France, was taking the road
to the antipodes.

"Conseil," I called in an impatient voice.

Conseil was my servant, a true, devoted Flemish boy, who had accompanied
me in all my travels.  I liked him, and he returned the liking well.
He was quiet by nature, regular from principle, zealous from habit,
evincing little disturbance at the different surprises of life,
very quick with his hands, and apt at any service required of him;
and, despite his name, never giving advice--even when asked for it.

Conseil had followed me for the last ten years wherever science led.
Never once did he complain of the length or fatigue of a journey,
never make an objection to pack his portmanteau for whatever
country it might be, or however far away, whether China or Congo.
Besides all this, he had good health, which defied all sickness,
and solid muscles, but no nerves; good morals are understood.
This boy was thirty years old, and his age to that of his master
as fifteen to twenty.  May I be excused for saying that I was
forty years old?

But Conseil had one fault:  he was ceremonious to a degree,
and would never speak to me but in the third person,
which was sometimes provoking.

"Conseil," said I again, beginning with feverish hands to make
preparations for my departure.

Certainly I was sure of this devoted boy.  As a rule, I never asked
him if it were convenient for him or not to follow me in my travels;
but this time the expedition in question might be prolonged,
and the enterprise might be hazardous in pursuit of an animal capable
of sinking a frigate as easily as a nutshell.  Here there was matter
for reflection even to the most impassive man in the world.
What would Conseil say?

"Conseil," I called a third time.

Conseil appeared.

"Did you call, sir?" said he, entering.

"Yes, my boy; make preparations for me and yourself too.
We leave in two hours."

"As you please, sir," replied Conseil, quietly.

"Not an instant to lose; lock in my trunk all travelling utensils,
coats, shirts, and stockings--without counting, as many as you can,
and make haste."

"And your collections, sir?" observed Conseil.

"They will keep them at the hotel."

"We are not returning to Paris, then?" said Conseil.

"Oh! certainly," I answered, evasively, "by making a curve."

"Will the curve please you, sir?"

"Oh! it will be nothing; not quite so direct a road, that is all.
We take our passage in the Abraham, Lincoln."

"As you think proper, sir," coolly replied Conseil.

"You see, my friend, it has to do with the monster--
the famous narwhal.  We are going to purge it from the seas.
A glorious mission, but a dangerous one!  We cannot tell
where we may go; these animals can be very capricious.
But we will go whether or no; we have got a captain who
is pretty wide-awake."

Our luggage was transported to the deck of the frigate immediately.
I hastened on board and asked for Commander Farragut.
One of the sailors conducted me to the poop, where I found myself
in the presence of a good-looking officer, who held out his
hand to me.

"Monsieur Pierre Aronnax?" said he.

"Himself," replied I. "Commander Farragut?"

"You are welcome, Professor; your cabin is ready for you."

I bowed, and desired to be conducted to the cabin destined for me.

The Abraham Lincoln had been well chosen and equipped
for her new destination.  She was a frigate of great speed,
fitted with high-pressure engines which admitted a pressure
of seven atmospheres.  Under this the Abraham Lincoln attained
the mean speed of nearly eighteen knots and a third an hour--
a considerable speed, but, nevertheless, insufficient to grapple
with this gigantic cetacean.

The interior arrangements of the frigate corresponded to its
nautical qualities.  I was well satisfied with my cabin,
which was in the after part, opening upon the gunroom.

"We shall be well off here," said I to Conseil.

"As well, by your honour's leave, as a hermit-crab in the shell
of a whelk," said Conseil.

I left Conseil to stow our trunks conveniently away, and remounted
the poop in order to survey the preparations for departure.

At that moment Commander Farragut was ordering the last moorings
to be cast loose which held the Abraham Lincoln to the pier
of Brooklyn.  So in a quarter of an hour, perhaps less,
the frigate would have sailed without me.  I should have missed
this extraordinary, supernatural, and incredible expedition,
the recital of which may well meet with some suspicion.

But Commander Farragut would not lose a day nor an hour
in scouring the seas in which the animal had been sighted.
He sent for the engineer.

"Is the steam full on?" asked he.

"Yes, sir," replied the engineer.

"Go ahead," cried Commander Farragut.



CHAPTER IV

NED LAND

Captain Farragut was a good seaman, worthy of the frigate he commanded.
His vessel and he were one.  He was the soul of it.  On the question
of the monster there was no doubt in his mind, and he would not allow
the existence of the animal to be disputed on board.  He believed in it,
as certain good women believe in the leviathan--by faith, not by reason.
The monster did exist, and he had sworn to rid the seas of it.  Either Captain
Farragut would kill the narwhal, or the narwhal would kill the captain.
There was no third course.

The officers on board shared the opinion of their chief.
They were ever chatting, discussing, and calculating the various
chances of a meeting, watching narrowly the vast surface of the ocean.
More than one took up his quarters voluntarily in the cross-trees,
who would have cursed such a berth under any other circumstances.
As long as the sun described its daily course, the rigging was
crowded with sailors, whose feet were burnt to such an extent by
the heat of the deck as to render it unbearable; still the Abraham
Lincoln had not yet breasted the suspected waters of the Pacific.
As to the ship's company, they desired nothing better than to meet
the unicorn, to harpoon it, hoist it on board, and despatch it.
They watched the sea with eager attention.

Besides, Captain Farragut had spoken of a certain sum of two thousand dollars,
set apart for whoever should first sight the monster, were he cabin-boy,
common seaman, or officer.

I leave you to judge how eyes were used on board the Abraham Lincoln.

For my own part I was not behind the others, and, left to no one my share
of daily observations.  The frigate might have been called the Argus,
for a hundred reasons.  Only one amongst us, Conseil, seemed to protest
by his indifference against the question which so interested us all,
and seemed to be out of keeping with the general enthusiasm on board.

I have said that Captain Farragut had carefully provided his
ship with every apparatus for catching the gigantic cetacean.
No whaler had ever been better armed.  We possessed every
known engine, from the harpoon thrown by the hand to the barbed
arrows of the blunderbuss, and the explosive balls of the duck-gun.
On the forecastle lay the perfection of a breech-loading gun,
very thick at the breech, and very narrow in the bore,
the model of which had been in the Exhibition of 1867.
This precious weapon of American origin could throw with ease
a conical projectile of nine pounds to a mean distance
of ten miles.

Thus the Abraham Lincoln wanted for no means of destruction; and, what was
better still she had on board Ned Land, the prince of harpooners.

Ned Land was a Canadian, with an uncommon quickness of hand, and who knew
no equal in his dangerous occupation.  Skill, coolness, audacity, and cunning
he possessed in a superior degree, and it must be a cunning whale to escape
the stroke of his harpoon.

Ned Land was about forty years of age; he was a tall man
(more than six feet high), strongly built, grave and taciturn,
occasionally violent, and very passionate when contradicted.
His person attracted attention, but above all the boldness
of his look, which gave a singular expression to his face.

Who calls himself Canadian calls himself French; and, little communicative
as Ned Land was, I must admit that he took a certain liking for me.
My nationality drew him to me, no doubt.  It was an opportunity for him
to talk, and for me to hear, that old language of Rabelais, which is still
in use in some Canadian provinces.  The harpooner's family was originally
from Quebec, and was already a tribe of hardy fishermen when this town
belonged to France.

Little by little, Ned Land acquired a taste for chatting, and I
loved to hear the recital of his adventures in the polar seas.
He related his fishing, and his combats, with natural poetry
of expression; his recital took the form of an epic poem,
and I seemed to be listening to a Canadian Homer singing the Iliad
of the regions of the North.

I am portraying this hardy companion as I really knew him.
We are old friends now, united in that unchangeable friendship
which is born and cemented amidst extreme dangers.  Ah, brave Ned!
I ask no more than to live a hundred years longer, that I may have more
time to dwell the longer on your memory.

Now, what was Ned Land's opinion upon the question of the marine monster?
I must admit that he did not believe in the unicorn, and was
the only one on board who did not share that universal conviction.
He even avoided the subject, which I one day thought it my duty
to press upon him.  One magnificent evening, the 30th July (that is
to say, three weeks after our departure), the frigate was abreast
of Cape Blanc, thirty miles to leeward of the coast of Patagonia.
We had crossed the tropic of Capricorn, and the Straits of Magellan
opened less than seven hundred miles to the south.  Before eight
days were over the Abraham Lincoln would be ploughing the waters
of the Pacific.

Seated on the poop, Ned Land and I were chatting of one thing
and another as we looked at this mysterious sea, whose great
depths had up to this time been inaccessible to the eye of man.
I naturally led up the conversation to the giant unicorn, and examined
the various chances of success or failure of the expedition.
But, seeing that Ned Land let me speak without saying too much himself,
I pressed him more closely.

"Well, Ned," said I, "is it possible that you are not convinced
of the existence of this cetacean that we are following?
Have you any particular reason for being so incredulous?"

The harpooner looked at me fixedly for some moments
before answering, struck his broad forehead with his hand
(a habit of his), as if to collect himself, and said at last,
"Perhaps I have, Mr. Aronnax."

"But, Ned, you, a whaler by profession, familiarised with all
the great marine mammalia--YOU ought to be the last to doubt
under such circumstances!"

"That is just what deceives you, Professor," replied Ned.
"As a whaler I have followed many a cetacean, harpooned a great number,
and killed several; but, however strong or well-armed they may
have been, neither their tails nor their weapons would have been
able even to scratch the iron plates of a steamer."

"But, Ned, they tell of ships which the teeth of the narwhal
have pierced through and through."

"Wooden ships--that is possible," replied the Canadian,
"but I have never seen it done; and, until further proof,
I deny that whales, cetaceans, or sea-unicorns could ever produce
the effect you describe."

"Well, Ned, I repeat it with a conviction resting on the logic of facts.
I believe in the existence of a mammal power fully organised, belonging to
the branch of vertebrata, like the whales, the cachalots, or the dolphins,
and furnished with a horn of defence of great penetrating power."

"Hum!" said the harpooner, shaking his head with the air of a man
who would not be convinced.

"Notice one thing, my worthy Canadian," I resumed.
"If such an animal is in existence, if it inhabits the depths
of the ocean, if it frequents the strata lying miles below
the surface of the water, it must necessarily possess an
organisation the strength of which would defy all comparison."

"And why this powerful organisation?" demanded Ned.

"Because it requires incalculable strength to keep one's self
in these strata and resist their pressure.  Listen to me.
Let us admit that the pressure of the atmosphere is represented
by the weight of a column of water thirty-two feet high.
In reality the column of water would be shorter, as we are
speaking of sea water, the density of which is greater than
that of fresh water.  Very well, when you dive, Ned, as many
times 32 feet of water as there are above you, so many times
does your body bear a pressure equal to that of the atmosphere,
that is to say, 15 lb.  for each square inch of its surface.
It follows, then, that at 320 feet this pressure equals
that of 10 atmospheres, of 100 atmospheres at 3,200 feet,
and of 1,000 atmospheres at 32,000 feet, that is, about 6 miles;
which is equivalent to saying that if you could attain this
depth in the ocean, each square three-eighths of an inch
of the surface of your body would bear a pressure of 5,600 lb.
Ah! my brave Ned, do you know how many square inches you carry on
the surface of your body?"

"I have no idea, Mr. Aronnax."

"About 6,500; and as in reality the atmospheric pressure is about 15 lb.
to the square inch, your 6,500 square inches bear at this moment a pressure
of 97,500 lb."

"Without my perceiving it?"

"Without your perceiving it.  And if you are not crushed by
such a pressure, it is because the air penetrates the interior
of your body with equal pressure.  Hence perfect equilibrium
between the interior and exterior pressure, which thus neutralise
each other, and which allows you to bear it without inconvenience.
But in the water it is another thing."

"Yes, I understand," replied Ned, becoming more attentive;
"because the water surrounds me, but does not penetrate."

"Precisely, Ned:  so that at 32 feet beneath the surface of the sea you would
undergo a pressure of 97,500 lb.; at 320 feet, ten times that pressure;
at 3,200 feet, a hundred times that pressure; lastly, at 32,000 feet,
a thousand times that pressure would be 97,500,000 lb.--that is to say,
that you would be flattened as if you had been drawn from the plates of
a hydraulic machine!"

"The devil!" exclaimed Ned.

"Very well, my worthy harpooner, if some vertebrate, several hundred
yards long, and large in proportion, can maintain itself in such depths--
of those whose surface is represented by millions of square inches, that is
by tens of millions of pounds, we must estimate the pressure they undergo.
Consider, then, what must be the resistance of their bony structure,
and the strength of their organisation to withstand such pressure!"

"Why!" exclaimed Ned Land, "they must be made of iron plates
eight inches thick, like the armoured frigates."

"As you say, Ned.  And think what destruction such a mass would cause,
if hurled with the speed of an express train against the hull of a vessel."

"Yes--certainly--perhaps," replied the Canadian, shaken by these figures,
but not yet willing to give in.

"Well, have I convinced you?"

"You have convinced me of one thing, sir, which is that,
if such animals do exist at the bottom of the seas, they must
necessarily be as strong as you say."

"But if they do not exist, mine obstinate harpooner, how explain
the accident to the Scotia?"



CHAPTER V

AT A VENTURE

The voyage of the Abraham Lincoln was for a long time marked
by no special incident.  But one circumstance happened which showed
the wonderful dexterity of Ned Land, and proved what confidence
we might place in him.

The 30th of June, the frigate spoke some American whalers,
from whom we learned that they knew nothing about the narwhal.
But one of them, the captain of the Monroe, knowing that Ned Land had
shipped on board the Abraham Lincoln, begged for his help in chasing
a whale they had in sight.  Commander Farragut, desirous of seeing
Ned Land at work, gave him permission to go on board the Monroe.
And fate served our Canadian so well that, instead of one whale,
he harpooned two with a double blow, striking one straight to the heart,
and catching the other after some minutes' pursuit.

Decidedly, if the monster ever had to do with Ned Land's harpoon,
I would not bet in its favour.

The frigate skirted the south-east coast of America with great rapidity.
The 3rd of July we were at the opening of the Straits of Magellan, level with
Cape Vierges.  But Commander Farragut would not take a tortuous passage,
but doubled Cape Horn.

The ship's crew agreed with him.  And certainly it was possible
that they might meet the narwhal in this narrow pass.
Many of the sailors affirmed that the monster could not pass there,
"that he was too big for that!"

The 6th of July, about three o'clock in the afternoon, the Abraham Lincoln,
at fifteen miles to the south, doubled the solitary island,
this lost rock at the extremity of the American continent, to which
some Dutch sailors gave the name of their native town, Cape Horn.
The course was taken towards the north-west, and the next day the screw
of the frigate was at last beating the waters of the Pacific.

"Keep your eyes open!" called out the sailors.

And they were opened widely.  Both eyes and glasses, a little dazzled,
it is true, by the prospect of two thousand dollars, had not
an instant's repose.

I myself, for whom money had no charms, was not the least
attentive on board.  Giving but few minutes to my meals,
but a few hours to sleep, indifferent to either rain or sunshine,
I did not leave the poop of the vessel.  Now leaning on the netting
of the forecastle, now on the taffrail, I devoured with eagerness
the soft foam which whitened the sea as far as the eye could reach;
and how often have I shared the emotion of the majority of the crew,
when some capricious whale raised its black back above the waves!
The poop of the vessel was crowded on a moment.  The cabins
poured forth a torrent of sailors and officers, each with heaving
breast and troubled eye watching the course of the cetacean.
I looked and looked till I was nearly blind, whilst Conseil kept
repeating in a calm voice:

"If, sir, you would not squint so much, you would see better!"

But vain excitement!  The Abraham Lincoln checked its speed and made
for the animal signalled, a simple whale, or common cachalot,
which soon disappeared amidst a storm of abuse.

But the weather was good.  The voyage was being accomplished under
the most favourable auspices.  It was then the bad season in Australia,
the July of that zone corresponding to our January in Europe,
but the sea was beautiful and easily scanned round a vast circumference.

The 20th of July, the tropic of Capricorn was cut by 105d of longitude,
and the 27th of the same month we crossed the Equator on the 110th meridian.
This passed, the frigate took a more decided westerly direction,
and scoured the central waters of the Pacific.  Commander Farragut thought,
and with reason, that it was better to remain in deep water, and keep
clear of continents or islands, which the beast itself seemed to shun
(perhaps because there was not enough water for him! suggested
the greater part of the crew). The frigate passed at some distance from
the Marquesas and the Sandwich Islands, crossed the tropic of Cancer,
and made for the China Seas.  We were on the theatre of the last diversions
of the monster:  and, to say truth, we no longer LIVED on board.
The entire ship's crew were undergoing a nervous excitement, of which I
can give no idea:  they could not eat, they could not sleep--twenty times
a day, a misconception or an optical illusion of some sailor seated
on the taffrail, would cause dreadful perspirations, and these emotions,
twenty times repeated, kept us in a state of excitement so violent that a
reaction was unavoidable.

And truly, reaction soon showed itself.  For three months,
during which a day seemed an age, the Abraham Lincoln furrowed
all the waters of the Northern Pacific, running at whales,
making sharp deviations from her course, veering suddenly
from one tack to another, stopping suddenly, putting on steam,
and backing ever and anon at the risk of deranging her machinery,
and not one point of the Japanese or American coast
was left unexplored.

The warmest partisans of the enterprise now became its most
ardent detractors.  Reaction mounted from the crew to the captain himself,
and certainly, had it not been for the resolute determination on the part
of Captain Farragut, the frigate would have headed due southward.
This useless search could not last much longer.  The Abraham Lincoln
had nothing to reproach herself with, she had done her best to succeed.
Never had an American ship's crew shown more zeal or patience;
its failure could not be placed to their charge--there remained nothing
but to return.

This was represented to the commander.  The sailors could
not hide their discontent, and the service suffered.
I will not say there was a mutiny on board, but after a reasonable
period of obstinacy, Captain Farragut (as Columbus did)
asked for three days' patience.  If in three days the monster did
not appear, the man at the helm should give three turns of the wheel,
and the Abraham Lincoln would make for the European seas.

This promise was made on the 2nd of November.  It had the effect of
rallying the ship's crew.  The ocean was watched with renewed attention.
Each one wished for a last glance in which to sum up his remembrance.
Glasses were used with feverish activity.  It was a grand defiance
given to the giant narwhal, and he could scarcely fail to answer
the summons and "appear."

Two days passed, the steam was at half pressure; a thousand
schemes were tried to attract the attention and stimulate
the apathy of the animal in case it should be met in those parts.
Large quantities of bacon were trailed in the wake of the ship,
to the great satisfaction (I must say) of the sharks.
Small craft radiated in all directions round the Abraham Lincoln
as she lay to, and did not leave a spot of the sea unexplored.
But the night of the 4th of November arrived without the unveiling of
this submarine mystery.

The next day, the 5th of November, at twelve, the delay would
(morally speaking) expire; after that time, Commander Farragut,
faithful to his promise, was to turn the course to the south-east
and abandon for ever the northern regions of the Pacific.

The frigate was then in 31@ 15' N. lat.  and 136@ 42' E. long.
The coast of Japan still remained less than two hundred miles to leeward.
Night was approaching.  They had just struck eight bells;
large clouds veiled the face of the moon, then in its first quarter.
The sea undulated peaceably under the stern of the vessel.

At that moment I was leaning forward on the starboard netting.
Conseil, standing near me, was looking straight before him.
The crew, perched in the ratlines, examined the horizon which
contracted and darkened by degrees.  Officers with their night
glasses scoured the growing darkness:  sometimes the ocean sparkled
under the rays of the moon, which darted between two clouds,
then all trace of light was lost in the darkness.

In looking at Conseil, I could see he was undergoing a little
of the general influence.  At least I thought so.  Perhaps for
the first time his nerves vibrated to a sentiment of curiosity.

"Come, Conseil," said I, "this is the last chance of pocketing
the two thousand dollars."

"May I be permitted to say, sir," replied Conseil, "that I never reckoned
on getting the prize; and, had the government of the Union offered a hundred
thousand dollars, it would have been none the poorer."

"You are right, Conseil.  It is a foolish affair after all, and one upon
which we entered too lightly.  What time lost, what useless emotions!
We should have been back in France six months ago."

"In your little room, sir," replied Conseil, "and in your museum, sir; and I
should have already classed all your fossils, sir.  And the Babiroussa would
have been installed in its cage in the Jardin des Plantes, and have drawn
all the curious people of the capital!"

"As you say, Conseil.  I fancy we shall run a fair chance of being
laughed at for our pains."

"That's tolerably certain," replied Conseil, quietly; "I think
they will make fun of you, sir.  And, must I say it----?"

"Go on, my good friend."

"Well, sir, you will only get your deserts."

"Indeed!"

"When one has the honour of being a savant as you are, sir, one should
not expose one's self to----"

Conseil had not time to finish his compliment.
In the midst of general silence a voice had just been heard.
It was the voice of Ned Land shouting:

"Look out there!  The very thing we are looking for--
on our weather beam!"



CHAPTER VI

AT FULL STEAM

At this cry the whole ship's crew hurried towards the harpooner--
commander, officers, masters, sailors, cabin boys; even the engineers
left their engines, and the stokers their furnaces.

The order to stop her had been given, and the frigate now simply went
on by her own momentum.  The darkness was then profound, and, however good
the Canadian's eyes were, I asked myself how he had managed to see,
and what he had been able to see.  My heart beat as if it would break.
But Ned Land was not mistaken, and we all perceived the object
he pointed to.  At two cables' length from the Abraham Lincoln,
on the starboard quarter, the sea seemed to be illuminated all over.
It was not a mere phosphoric phenomenon.  The monster emerged some fathoms
from the water, and then threw out that very intense but mysterious
light mentioned in the report of several captains.  This magnificent
irradiation must have been produced by an agent of great SHINING power.
The luminous part traced on the sea an immense oval, much elongated,
the centre of which condensed a burning heat, whose overpowering brilliancy
died out by successive gradations.

"It is only a massing of phosphoric particles," cried one of the officers.

"No, sir, certainly not," I replied.  "That brightness is of an
essentially electrical nature.  Besides, see, see! it moves;
it is moving forwards, backwards; it is darting towards us!"

A general cry arose from the frigate.

"Silence!" said the captain.  "Up with the helm, reverse the engines."

The steam was shut off, and the Abraham Lincoln, beating to port,
described a semicircle.

"Right the helm, go ahead," cried the captain.

These orders were executed, and the frigate moved rapidly
from the burning light.

I was mistaken.  She tried to sheer off, but the supernatural
animal approached with a velocity double her own.

We gasped for breath.  Stupefaction more than fear made us dumb
and motionless.  The animal gained on us, sporting with the waves.
It made the round of the frigate, which was then making fourteen knots,
and enveloped it with its electric rings like luminous dust.

Then it moved away two or three miles, leaving a phosphorescent track,
like those volumes of steam that the express trains leave behind.
All at once from the dark line of the horizon whither it retired
to gain its momentum, the monster rushed suddenly towards the Abraham
Lincoln with alarming rapidity, stopped suddenly about twenty feet
from the hull, and died out--not diving under the water, for its
brilliancy did not abate--but suddenly, and as if the source of this
brilliant emanation was exhausted.  Then it reappeared on the other
side of the vessel, as if it had turned and slid under the hull.
Any moment a collision might have occurred which would have been fatal
to us.  However, I was astonished at the manoeuvres of the frigate.
She fled and did not attack.

On the captain's face, generally so impassive, was an expression
of unaccountable astonishment.

"Mr. Aronnax," he said, "I do not know with what formidable
being I have to deal, and I will not imprudently risk my
frigate in the midst of this darkness.  Besides, how attack
this unknown thing, how defend one's self from it?
Wait for daylight, and the scene will change."

"You have no further doubt, captain, of the nature of the animal?"

"No, sir; it is evidently a gigantic narwhal, and an electric one."

"Perhaps," added I, "one can only approach it with a torpedo."

"Undoubtedly," replied the captain, "if it possesses such
dreadful power, it is the most terrible animal that ever was created.
That is why, sir, I must be on my guard."

The crew were on their feet all night.  No one thought of sleep.
The Abraham Lincoln, not being able to struggle with such velocity,
had moderated its pace, and sailed at half speed.  For its part,
the narwhal, imitating the frigate, let the waves rock it at will,
and seemed decided not to leave the scene of the struggle.
Towards midnight, however, it disappeared, or, to use a more
appropriate term, it "died out" like a large glow-worm. Had it fled?
One could only fear, not hope it.  But at seven minutes to one o'clock
in the morning a deafening whistling was heard, like that produced
by a body of water rushing with great violence.

The captain, Ned Land, and I were then on the poop, eagerly peering
through the profound darkness.

"Ned Land," asked the commander, "you have often heard the roaring of whales?"

"Often, sir; but never such whales the sight of which brought me
in two thousand dollars.  If I can only approach within four harpoons'
length of it!"

"But to approach it," said the commander, "I ought to put a whaler
at your disposal?"

"Certainly, sir."

"That will be trifling with the lives of my men."

"And mine too," simply said the harpooner.

Towards two o'clock in the morning, the burning light reappeared,
not less intense, about five miles to windward of the Abraham Lincoln.
Notwithstanding the distance, and the noise of the wind and sea,
one heard distinctly the loud strokes of the animal's tail,
and even its panting breath.  It seemed that, at the moment
that the enormous narwhal had come to take breath at the surface
of the water, the air was engulfed in its lungs, like the steam
in the vast cylinders of a machine of two thousand horse-power.

"Hum!" thought I, "a whale with the strength of a cavalry regiment
would be a pretty whale!"

We were on the qui vive till daylight, and prepared for the combat.
The fishing implements were laid along the hammock nettings.
The second lieutenant loaded the blunder busses, which could throw harpoons
to the distance of a mile, and long duck-guns, with explosive bullets,
which inflicted mortal wounds even to the most terrible animals.
Ned Land contented himself with sharpening his harpoon--a terrible weapon
in his hands.

At six o'clock day began to break; and, with the first glimmer
of light, the electric light of the narwhal disappeared.
At seven o'clock the day was sufficiently advanced, but a very thick sea
fog obscured our view, and the best spy glasses could not pierce it.
That caused disappointment and anger.

I climbed the mizzen-mast. Some officers were already perched
on the mast-heads. At eight o'clock the fog lay heavily
on the waves, and its thick scrolls rose little by little.
The horizon grew wider and clearer at the same time.
Suddenly, just as on the day before, Ned Land's voice was heard:

"The thing itself on the port quarter!" cried the harpooner.

Every eye was turned towards the point indicated.  There, a mile and a half
from the frigate, a long blackish body emerged a yard above the waves.
Its tail, violently agitated, produced a considerable eddy.
Never did a tail beat the sea with such violence.  An immense track,
of dazzling whiteness, marked the passage of the animal, and described
a long curve.

The frigate approached the cetacean.  I examined it thoroughly.

The reports of the Shannon and of the Helvetia had rather
exaggerated its size, and I estimated its length at
only two hundred and fifty feet.  As to its dimensions,
I could only conjecture them to be admirably proportioned.
While I watched this phenomenon, two jets of steam and water
were ejected from its vents, and rose to the height of 120 feet;
thus I ascertained its way of breathing.  I concluded definitely
that it belonged to the vertebrate branch, class mammalia.

The crew waited impatiently for their chief's orders.  The latter,
after having observed the animal attentively, called the engineer.
The engineer ran to him.

"Sir," said the commander, "you have steam up?"

"Yes, sir," answered the engineer.

"Well, make up your fires and put on all steam."

Three hurrahs greeted this order.  The time for the struggle had arrived.
Some moments after, the two funnels of the frigate vomited torrents of
black smoke, and the bridge quaked under the trembling of the boilers.

The Abraham Lincoln, propelled by her wonderful screw,
went straight at the animal.  The latter allowed it to come
within half a cable's length; then, as if disdaining to dive,
it took a little turn, and stopped a short distance off.

This pursuit lasted nearly three-quarters of an hour,
without the frigate gaining two yards on the cetacean.
It was quite evident that at that rate we should never come
up with it.

"Well, Mr. Land," asked the captain, "do you advise me to put
the boats out to sea?"

"No, sir," replied Ned Land; "because we shall not take that beast easily."

"What shall we do then?"

"Put on more steam if you can, sir.  With your leave, I mean to post
myself under the bowsprit, and, if we get within harpooning distance,
I shall throw my harpoon."

"Go, Ned," said the captain.  "Engineer, put on more pressure."

Ned Land went to his post.  The fires were increased, the screw revolved
forty-three times a minute, and the steam poured out of the valves.
We heaved the log, and calculated that the Abraham Lincoln was going
at the rate of 18 1/2 miles an hour.

But the accursed animal swam at the same speed.

For a whole hour the frigate kept up this pace, without gaining six feet.
It was humiliating for one of the swiftest sailers in the American navy.
A stubborn anger seized the crew; the sailors abused the monster, who,
as before, disdained to answer them; the captain no longer contented himself
with twisting his beard--he gnawed it.

The engineer was called again.

"You have turned full steam on?"

"Yes, sir," replied the engineer.

The speed of the Abraham Lincoln increased.  Its masts trembled
down to their stepping holes, and the clouds of smoke could hardly
find way out of the narrow funnels.

They heaved the log a second time.

"Well?" asked the captain of the man at the wheel.

"Nineteen miles and three-tenths, sir."

"Clap on more steam."

The engineer obeyed.  The manometer showed ten degrees.
But the cetacean grew warm itself, no doubt; for without
straining itself, it made 19 3/10 miles.

What a pursuit!  No, I cannot describe the emotion that vibrated through me.
Ned Land kept his post, harpoon in hand.  Several times the animal let us
gain upon it.--"We shall catch it! we shall catch it!" cried the Canadian.
But just as he was going to strike, the cetacean stole away with a rapidity
that could not be estimated at less than thirty miles an hour, and even during
our maximum of speed, it bullied the frigate, going round and round it.
A cry of fury broke from everyone!

At noon we were no further advanced than at eight o'clock in the morning.

The captain then decided to take more direct means.

"Ah!" said he, "that animal goes quicker than the Abraham Lincoln.
Very well! we will see whether it will escape these conical bullets.
Send your men to the forecastle, sir."

The forecastle gun was immediately loaded and slewed round.
But the shot passed some feet above the cetacean, which was half
a mile off.

"Another, more to the right," cried the commander, "and five
dollars to whoever will hit that infernal beast."

An old gunner with a grey beard--that I can see now--with steady
eye and grave face, went up to the gun and took a long aim.
A loud report was heard, with which were mingled the cheers
of the crew.

The bullet did its work; it hit the animal, and, sliding off
the rounded surface, was lost in two miles depth of sea.

The chase began again, and the captain, leaning towards me, said:

"I will pursue that beast till my frigate bursts up."

"Yes," answered I; "and you will be quite right to do it."

I wished the beast would exhaust itself, and not be insensible
to fatigue like a steam engine.  But it was of no use.
Hours passed, without its showing any signs of exhaustion.

However, it must be said in praise of the Abraham Lincoln that she
struggled on indefatigably.  I cannot reckon the distance she made
under three hundred miles during this unlucky day, November the 6th.
But night came on, and overshadowed the rough ocean.

Now I thought our expedition was at an end, and that we should
never again see the extraordinary animal.  I was mistaken.
At ten minutes to eleven in the evening, the electric light
reappeared three miles to windward of the frigate, as pure,
as intense as during the preceding night.

The narwhal seemed motionless; perhaps, tired with its day's work,
it slept, letting itself float with the undulation of the waves.
Now was a chance of which the captain resolved to take advantage.

He gave his orders.  The Abraham Lincoln kept up half steam,
and advanced cautiously so as not to awake its adversary.
It is no rare thing to meet in the middle of the ocean whales
so sound asleep that they can be successfully attacked,
and Ned Land had harpooned more than one during its sleep.
The Canadian went to take his place again under the bowsprit.

The frigate approached noiselessly, stopped at two cables'
lengths from the animal, and following its track.
No one breathed; a deep silence reigned on the bridge.
We were not a hundred feet from the burning focus, the light of
which increased and dazzled our eyes.

At this moment, leaning on the forecastle bulwark, I saw below me Ned
Land grappling the martingale in one hand, brandishing his terrible
harpoon in the other, scarcely twenty feet from the motionless animal.
Suddenly his arm straightened, and the harpoon was thrown; I heard
the sonorous stroke of the weapon, which seemed to have struck a hard body.
The electric light went out suddenly, and two enormous waterspouts
broke over the bridge of the frigate, rushing like a torrent from stem
to stern, overthrowing men, and breaking the lashings of the spars.
A fearful shock followed, and, thrown over the rail without having
time to stop myself, I fell into the sea.



CHAPTER VII

AN UNKNOWN SPECIES OF WHALE

This unexpected fall so stunned me that I have no
clear recollection of my sensations at the time.
I was at first drawn down to a depth of about twenty feet.
I am a good swimmer (though without pretending to rival
Byron or Edgar Poe, who were masters of the art),
and in that plunge I did not lose my presence of mind.
Two vigorous strokes brought me to the surface of the water.
My first care was to look for the frigate.  Had the crew
seen me disappear?  Had the Abraham Lincoln veered round?
Would the captain put out a boat?  Might I hope to be saved?

The darkness was intense.  I caught a glimpse of a black mass disappearing in
the east, its beacon lights dying out in the distance.  It was the frigate!
I was lost.

"Help, help!"  I shouted, swimming towards the Abraham Lincoln in desperation.

My clothes encumbered me; they seemed glued to my body,
and paralysed my movements.

I was sinking!  I was suffocating!

"Help!"

This was my last cry.  My mouth filled with water;
I struggled against being drawn down the abyss.
Suddenly my clothes were seized by a strong hand, and I
felt myself quickly drawn up to the surface of the sea;
and I heard, yes, I heard these words pronounced in my ear:

"If master would be so good as to lean on my shoulder,
master would swim with much greater ease."

I seized with one hand my faithful Conseil's arm.

"Is it you?" said I, "you?"

"Myself," answered Conseil; "and waiting master's orders."

"That shock threw you as well as me into the sea?"

"No; but, being in my master's service, I followed him."

The worthy fellow thought that was but natural.

"And the frigate?"  I asked.

"The frigate?" replied Conseil, turning on his back;
"I think that master had better not count too much on her."

"You think so?"

"I say that, at the time I threw myself into the sea, I heard the men
at the wheel say, `The screw and the rudder are broken.'

"Broken?"

"Yes, broken by the monster's teeth.  It is the only injury
the Abraham Lincoln has sustained.  But it is a bad look-out for us--
she no longer answers her helm."

"Then we are lost!"

"Perhaps so," calmly answered Conseil.  "However, we have still several
hours before us, and one can do a good deal in some hours."

Conseil's imperturbable coolness set me up again.
I swam more vigorously; but, cramped by my clothes, which stuck
to me like a leaden weight, I felt great difficulty in bearing up.
Conseil saw this.

"Will master let me make a slit?" said he; and, slipping an open knife
under my clothes, he ripped them up from top to bottom very rapidly.
Then he cleverly slipped them off me, while I swam for both of us.

Then I did the same for Conseil, and we continued to swim near
to each other.

Nevertheless, our situation was no less terrible.
Perhaps our disappearance had not been noticed; and, if it
had been, the frigate could not tack, being without its helm.
Conseil argued on this supposition, and laid his plans accordingly.
This quiet boy was perfectly self-possessed. We then decided that,
as our only chance of safety was being picked up by the Abraham
Lincoln's boats, we ought to manage so as to wait for them
as long as possible.  I resolved then to husband our strength,
so that both should not be exhausted at the same time;
and this is how we managed:  while one of us lay on our back,
quite still, with arms crossed, and legs stretched out,
the other would swim and push the other on in front.
This towing business did not last more than ten minutes each;
and relieving each other thus, we could swim on for some hours,
perhaps till day-break. Poor chance! but hope is so firmly
rooted in the heart of man!  Moreover, there were two of us.
Indeed I declare (though it may seem improbable)
if I sought to destroy all hope--if I wished to despair,
I could not.

The collision of the frigate with the cetacean had
occurred about eleven o'clock in the evening before.
I reckoned then we should have eight hours to swim before sunrise,
an operation quite practicable if we relieved each other.
The sea, very calm, was in our favour.  Sometimes I tried
to pierce the intense darkness that was only dispelled
by the phosphorescence caused by our movements.
I watched the luminous waves that broke over my hand,
whose mirror-like surface was spotted with silvery rings.
One might have said that we were in a bath of quicksilver.

Near one o'clock in the morning, I was seized with dreadful fatigue.
My limbs stiffened under the strain of violent cramp.  Conseil was
obliged to keep me up, and our preservation devolved on him alone.
I heard the poor boy pant; his breathing became short and hurried.
I found that he could not keep up much longer.

"Leave me! leave me!"  I said to him.

"Leave my master?  Never!" replied he.  "I would drown first."

Just then the moon appeared through the fringes of a
thick cloud that the wind was driving to the east.
The surface of the sea glittered with its rays.
This kindly light reanimated us.  My head got better again.
I looked at all points of the horizon.  I saw the frigate!
She was five miles from us, and looked like a dark mass,
hardly discernible.  But no boats!

I would have cried out.  But what good would it have been at such a distance!
My swollen lips could utter no sounds.  Conseil could articulate some words,
and I heard him repeat at intervals, "Help! help!"

Our movements were suspended for an instant; we listened.
It might be only a singing in the ear, but it seemed to me
as if a cry answered the cry from Conseil.

"Did you hear?"  I murmured.

"Yes!  Yes!"

And Conseil gave one more despairing cry.

This time there was no mistake!  A human voice responded to ours!
Was it the voice of another unfortunate creature, abandoned in the middle
of the ocean, some other victim of the shock sustained by the vessel?
Or rather was it a boat from the frigate, that was hailing us in the darkness?

Conseil made a last effort, and, leaning on my shoulder, while I struck
out in a desperate effort, he raised himself half out of the water,
then fell back exhausted.

"What did you see?"

"I saw----" murmured he; "I saw--but do not talk--reserve all your strength!"

What had he seen?  Then, I know not why, the thought
of the monster came into my head for the first time!
But that voice!  The time is past for Jonahs to take refuge
in whales' bellies!  However, Conseil was towing me again.
He raised his head sometimes, looked before us, and uttered a cry
of recognition, which was responded to by a voice that came nearer
and nearer.  I scarcely heard it.  My strength was exhausted;
my fingers stiffened; my hand afforded me support no longer;
my mouth, convulsively opening, filled with salt water.
Cold crept over me.  I raised my head for the last time,
then I sank.

At this moment a hard body struck me.  I clung to it:
then I felt that I was being drawn up, that I was brought to
the surface of the water, that my chest collapsed--I fainted.

It is certain that I soon came to, thanks to the vigorous rubbings
that I received.  I half opened my eyes.

"Conseil!"  I murmured.

"Does master call me?" asked Conseil.

Just then, by the waning light of the moon which was sinking
down to the horizon, I saw a face which was not Conseil's
and which I immediately recognised.

"Ned!"  I cried.

"The same, sir, who is seeking his prize!" replied the Canadian.

"Were you thrown into the sea by the shock to the frigate?"

"Yes, Professor; but more fortunate than you, I was able to find
a footing almost directly upon a floating island."

"An island?"

"Or, more correctly speaking, on our gigantic narwhal."

"Explain yourself, Ned!"

"Only I soon found out why my harpoon had not entered its skin
and was blunted."

"Why, Ned, why?"

"Because, Professor, that beast is made of sheet iron."

The Canadian's last words produced a sudden revolution in my brain.
I wriggled myself quickly to the top of the being, or object,
half out of the water, which served us for a refuge.  I kicked it.
It was evidently a hard, impenetrable body, and not the soft substance
that forms the bodies of the great marine mammalia.  But this hard
body might be a bony covering, like that of the antediluvian animals;
and I should be free to class this monster among amphibious reptiles,
such as tortoises or alligators.

Well, no! the blackish back that supported me was smooth,
polished, without scales.  The blow produced a metallic sound;
and, incredible though it may be, it seemed, I might say,
as if it was made of riveted plates.

There was no doubt about it!  This monster, this natural
phenomenon that had puzzled the learned world, and over thrown
and misled the imagination of seamen of both hemispheres,
it must be owned was a still more astonishing phenomenon,
inasmuch as it was a simply human construction.

We had no time to lose, however.  We were lying upon the back of a
sort of submarine boat, which appeared (as far as I could judge)
like a huge fish of steel.  Ned Land's mind was made up on this point.
Conseil and I could only agree with him.

Just then a bubbling began at the back of this strange thing
(which was evidently propelled by a screw), and it began to move.
We had only just time to seize hold of the upper part,
which rose about seven feet out of the water, and happily its speed
was not great.

"As long as it sails horizontally," muttered Ned Land,
"I do not mind; but, if it takes a fancy to dive, I would
not give two straws for my life."

The Canadian might have said still less.  It became really necessary to
communicate with the beings, whatever they were, shut up inside the machine.
I searched all over the outside for an aperture, a panel, or a manhole,
to use a technical expression; but the lines of the iron rivets,
solidly driven into the joints of the iron plates, were clear and uniform.
Besides, the moon disappeared then, and left us in total darkness.

At last this long night passed.  My indistinct remembrance
prevents my describing all the impressions it made.
I can only recall one circumstance.  During some lulls of
the wind and sea, I fancied I heard several times vague sounds,
a sort of fugitive harmony produced by words of command.
What was, then, the mystery of this submarine craft,
of which the whole world vainly sought an explanation?
What kind of beings existed in this strange boat?
What mechanical agent caused its prodigious speed?

Daybreak appeared.  The morning mists surrounded us,
but they soon cleared off.  I was about to examine the hull,
which formed on deck a kind of horizontal platform, when I felt
it gradually sinking.

"Oh! confound it!" cried Ned Land, kicking the resounding plate.
"Open, you inhospitable rascals!"

Happily the sinking movement ceased.  Suddenly a noise, like iron
works violently pushed aside, came from the interior of the boat.
One iron plate was moved, a man appeared, uttered an odd cry,
and disappeared immediately.

Some moments after, eight strong men, with masked faces, appeared noiselessly,
and drew us down into their formidable machine.



CHAPTER VIII

MOBILIS IN MOBILI

This forcible abduction, so roughly carried out, was accomplished with
the rapidity of lightning.  I shivered all over.  Whom had we to deal with?
No doubt some new sort of pirates, who explored the sea in their own way.
Hardly had the narrow panel closed upon me, when I was enveloped in darkness.
My eyes, dazzled with the outer light, could distinguish nothing.
I felt my naked feet cling to the rungs of an iron ladder.  Ned Land
and Conseil, firmly seized, followed me.  At the bottom of the ladder,
a door opened, and shut after us immediately with a bang.

We were alone.  Where, I could not say, hardly imagine.
All was black, and such a dense black that, after some minutes,
my eyes had not been able to discern even the faintest glimmer.

Meanwhile, Ned Land, furious at these proceedings, gave free
vent to his indignation.

"Confound it!" cried he, "here are people who come up to the
Scotch for hospitality.  They only just miss being cannibals.
I should not be surprised at it, but I declare that they shall
not eat me without my protesting."

"Calm yourself, friend Ned, calm yourself," replied Conseil, quietly.
"Do not cry out before you are hurt.  We are not quite done for yet."

"Not quite," sharply replied the Canadian, "but pretty near,
at all events.  Things look black.  Happily, my bowie knife
I have still, and I can always see well enough to use it.
The first of these pirates who lays a hand on me----"

"Do not excite yourself, Ned," I said to the harpooner, "and do not compromise
us by useless violence.  Who knows that they will not listen to us?
Let us rather try to find out where we are."

I groped about.  In five steps I came to an iron wall,
made of plates bolted together.  Then turning back I struck
against a wooden table, near which were ranged several stools.
The boards of this prison were concealed under a thick mat,
which deadened the noise of the feet.  The bare walls
revealed no trace of window or door.  Conseil, going round
the reverse way, met me, and we went back to the middle
of the cabin, which measured about twenty feet by ten.
As to its height, Ned Land, in spite of his own great height,
could not measure it.

Half an hour had already passed without our situation being bettered,
when the dense darkness suddenly gave way to extreme light.
Our prison was suddenly lighted, that is to say, it became filled
with a luminous matter, so strong that I could not bear it at first.
In its whiteness and intensity I recognised that electric light which played
round the submarine boat like a magnificent phenomenon of phosphorescence.
After shutting my eyes involuntarily, I opened them, and saw that this
luminous agent came from a half globe, unpolished, placed in the roof
of the cabin.

"At last one can see," cried Ned Land, who, knife in hand,
stood on the defensive.

"Yes," said I; "but we are still in the dark about ourselves."

"Let master have patience," said the imperturbable Conseil.

The sudden lighting of the cabin enabled me to examine it minutely.
It only contained a table and five stools.  The invisible
door might be hermetically sealed.  No noise was heard.
All seemed dead in the interior of this boat.  Did it move, did it
float on the surface of the ocean, or did it dive into its depths?
I could not guess.

A noise of bolts was now heard, the door opened, and two men appeared.

One was short, very muscular, broad-shouldered, with robust limbs,
strong head, an abundance of black hair, thick moustache,
a quick penetrating look, and the vivacity which characterises
the population of Southern France.

The second stranger merits a more detailed description.  I made out
his prevailing qualities directly:  self-confidence--because his head
was well set on his shoulders, and his black eyes looked around with
cold assurance; calmness--for his skin, rather pale, showed his coolness
of blood; energy--evinced by the rapid contraction of his lofty brows;
and courage--because his deep breathing denoted great power of lungs.

Whether this person was thirty-five or fifty years of age,
I could not say.  He was tall, had a large forehead,
straight nose, a clearly cut mouth, beautiful teeth, with fine
taper hands, indicative of a highly nervous temperament.
This man was certainly the most admirable specimen I had ever met.
One particular feature was his eyes, rather far from each other,
and which could take in nearly a quarter of the horizon at once.

This faculty--(I verified it later)--gave him a range of vision far superior
to Ned Land's. When this stranger fixed upon an object, his eyebrows met,
his large eyelids closed around so as to contract the range of his vision,
and he looked as if he magnified the objects lessened by distance, as if
he pierced those sheets of water so opaque to our eyes, and as if he read
the very depths of the seas.

The two strangers, with caps made from the fur of the sea otter,
and shod with sea boots of seal's skin, were dressed in clothes
of a particular texture, which allowed free movement of the limbs.
The taller of the two, evidently the chief on board, examined us
with great attention, without saying a word; then, turning to
his companion, talked with him in an unknown tongue.
It was a sonorous, harmonious, and flexible dialect, the vowels
seeming to admit of very varied accentuation.

The other replied by a shake of the head, and added two or three perfectly
incomprehensible words.  Then he seemed to question me by a look.

I replied in good French that I did not know his language;
but he seemed not to understand me, and my situation
became more embarrassing.

"If master were to tell our story," said Conseil, "perhaps these gentlemen
may understand some words."

I began to tell our adventures, articulating each syllable clearly,
and without omitting one single detail.  I announced our names and rank,
introducing in person Professor Aronnax, his servant Conseil,
and master Ned Land, the harpooner.

The man with the soft calm eyes listened to me quietly,
even politely, and with extreme attention; but nothing in
his countenance indicated that he had understood my story.
When I finished, he said not a word.

There remained one resource, to speak English.
Perhaps they would know this almost universal language.
I knew it--as well as the German language--well enough to read
it fluently, but not to speak it correctly.  But, anyhow, we must
make ourselves understood.

"Go on in your turn," I said to the harpooner; "speak your best
Anglo-Saxon, and try to do better than I."

Ned did not beg off, and recommenced our story.

To his great disgust, the harpooner did not seem to have made
himself more intelligible than I had.  Our visitors did not stir.
They evidently understood neither the language of England
nor of France.

Very much embarrassed, after having vainly exhausted our speaking resources,
I knew not what part to take, when Conseil said:

"If master will permit me, I will relate it in German."

But in spite of the elegant terms and good accent
of the narrator, the German language had no success.
At last, nonplussed, I tried to remember my first lessons,
and to narrate our adventures in Latin, but with no better success.
This last attempt being of no avail, the two strangers exchanged
some words in their unknown language, and retired.

The door shut.

"It is an infamous shame," cried Ned Land, who broke out for the
twentieth time.  "We speak to those rogues in French, English, German,
and Latin, and not one of them has the politeness to answer!"

"Calm yourself," I said to the impetuous Ned; "anger will do no good."

"But do you see, Professor," replied our irascible companion,
"that we shall absolutely die of hunger in this iron cage?"

"Bah!" said Conseil, philosophically; "we can hold out some time yet."

"My friends," I said, "we must not despair.  We have been worse
off than this.  Do me the favour to wait a little before forming
an opinion upon the commander and crew of this boat."

"My opinion is formed," replied Ned Land, sharply.  "They are rascals."

"Good! and from what country?"

"From the land of rogues!"

"My brave Ned, that country is not clearly indicated on the map of the world;
but I admit that the nationality of the two strangers is hard to determine.
Neither English, French, nor German, that is quite certain.  However, I am
inclined to think that the commander and his companion were born in
low latitudes.  There is southern blood in them.  But I cannot decide by
their appearance whether they are Spaniards, Turks, Arabians, or Indians.
As to their language, it is quite incomprehensible."

"There is the disadvantage of not knowing all languages," said Conseil,
"or the disadvantage of not having one universal language."

As he said these words, the door opened.  A steward entered.
He brought us clothes, coats and trousers, made of a stuff I did not know.
I hastened to dress myself, and my companions followed my example.
During that time, the steward--dumb, perhaps deaf--had arranged the table,
and laid three plates.

"This is something like!" said Conseil.

"Bah!" said the angry harpooner, "what do you suppose they eat here?
Tortoise liver, filleted shark, and beef steaks from seadogs."

"We shall see," said Conseil.

The dishes, of bell metal, were placed on the table, and we took
our places.  Undoubtedly we had to do with civilised people,
and, had it not been for the electric light which flooded us,
I could have fancied I was in the dining-room of the Adelphi
Hotel at Liverpool, or at the Grand Hotel in Paris.
I must say, however, that there was neither bread nor wine.
The water was fresh and clear, but it was water and did not suit
Ned Land's taste.  Amongst the dishes which were brought to us,
I recognised several fish delicately dressed; but of some,
although excellent, I could give no opinion, neither could I tell
to what kingdom they belonged, whether animal or vegetable.
As to the dinner-service, it was elegant, and in perfect taste.
Each utensil--spoon, fork, knife, plate--had a letter engraved on it,
with a motto above it, of which this is an exact facsimile:


MOBILIS IN MOBILI N

The letter N was no doubt the initial of the name of the enigmatical
person who commanded at the bottom of the seas.

Ned and Conseil did not reflect much.  They devoured the food,
and I did likewise.  I was, besides, reassured as to our fate;
and it seemed evident that our hosts would not let us die of want.

However, everything has an end, everything passes away,
even the hunger of people who have not eaten for fifteen hours.
Our appetites satisfied, we felt overcome with sleep.

"Faith!  I shall sleep well," said Conseil.

"So shall I," replied Ned Land.

My two companions stretched themselves on the cabin carpet,
and were soon sound asleep.  For my own part, too many thoughts
crowded my brain, too many insoluble questions pressed upon me,
too many fancies kept my eyes half open.  Where were we?
What strange power carried us on?  I felt--or rather fancied I felt--
the machine sinking down to the lowest beds of the sea.
Dreadful nightmares beset me; I saw in these mysterious asylums
a world of unknown animals, amongst which this submarine boat seemed
to be of the same kind, living, moving, and formidable as they.
Then my brain grew calmer, my imagination wandered into
vague unconsciousness, and I soon fell into a deep sleep.



CHAPTER IX

NED LAND'S TEMPERS

How long we slept I do not know; but our sleep must have lasted long,
for it rested us completely from our fatigues.  I woke first.
My companions had not moved, and were still stretched in their corner.

Hardly roused from my somewhat hard couch, I felt my brain freed,
my mind clear.  I then began an attentive examination of our cell.
Nothing was changed inside.  The prison was still a prison--
the prisoners, prisoners.  However, the steward, during our sleep,
had cleared the table.  I breathed with difficulty.  The heavy air
seemed to oppress my lungs.  Although the cell was large, we had
evidently consumed a great part of the oxygen that it contained.
Indeed, each man consumes, in one hour, the oxygen contained in more
than 176 pints of air, and this air, charged (as then) with a nearly
equal quantity of carbonic acid, becomes unbreathable.

It became necessary to renew the atmosphere of our prison, and no doubt
the whole in the submarine boat.  That gave rise to a question in my mind.
How would the commander of this floating dwelling-place proceed?
Would he obtain air by chemical means, in getting by heat the oxygen contained
in chlorate of potash, and in absorbing carbonic acid by caustic potash?
Or--a more convenient, economical, and consequently more probable alternative--
would he be satisfied to rise and take breath at the surface of the water,
like a whale, and so renew for twenty-four hours the atmospheric provision?

In fact, I was already obliged to increase my respirations to eke
out of this cell the little oxygen it contained, when suddenly I was
refreshed by a current of pure air, and perfumed with saline emanations.
It was an invigorating sea breeze, charged with iodine.  I opened my
mouth wide, and my lungs saturated themselves with fresh particles.

At the same time I felt the boat rolling.  The iron-plated monster
had evidently just risen to the surface of the ocean to breathe,
after the fashion of whales.  I found out from that the mode
of ventilating the boat.

When I had inhaled this air freely, I sought the conduit pipe,
which conveyed to us the beneficial whiff, and I was not long in finding it.
Above the door was a ventilator, through which volumes of fresh air
renewed the impoverished atmosphere of the cell.

I was making my observations, when Ned and Conseil awoke almost
at the same time, under the influence of this reviving air.
They rubbed their eyes, stretched themselves, and were on their feet
in an instant.

"Did master sleep well?" asked Conseil, with his usual politeness.

"Very well, my brave boy.  And you, Mr. Land?"

"Soundly, Professor.  But, I don't know if I am right or not,
there seems to be a sea breeze!"

A seaman could not be mistaken, and I told the Canadian all that had passed
during his sleep.

"Good!" said he.  "That accounts for those roarings we heard,
when the supposed narwhal sighted the Abraham Lincoln."

"Quite so, Master Land; it was taking breath."

"Only, Mr. Aronnax, I have no idea what o'clock it is,
unless it is dinner-time."

"Dinner-time! my good fellow?  Say rather breakfast-time, for we
certainly have begun another day."

"So," said Conseil, "we have slept twenty-four hours?"

"That is my opinion."

"I will not contradict you," replied Ned Land.  "But, dinner or breakfast,
the steward will be welcome, whichever he brings."

"Master Land, we must conform to the rules on board, and I suppose
our appetites are in advance of the dinner hour."

"That is just like you, friend Conseil," said Ned, impatiently.
"You are never out of temper, always calm; you would return thanks
before grace, and die of hunger rather than complain!"

Time was getting on, and we were fearfully hungry; and this
time the steward did not appear.  It was rather too long
to leave us, if they really had good intentions towards us.
Ned Land, tormented by the cravings of hunger, got still
more angry; and, notwithstanding his promise, I dreaded an
explosion when he found himself with one of the crew.

For two hours more Ned Land's temper increased; he cried, he shouted,
but in vain.  The walls were deaf.  There was no sound to be heard
in the boat; all was still as death.  It did not move, for I should have
felt the trembling motion of the hull under the influence of the screw.
Plunged in the depths of the waters, it belonged no longer to earth:
this silence was dreadful.

I felt terrified, Conseil was calm, Ned Land roared.

Just then a noise was heard outside.  Steps sounded on the metal flags.
The locks were turned, the door opened, and the steward appeared.

Before I could rush forward to stop him, the Canadian had thrown him down,
and held him by the throat.  The steward was choking under the grip
of his powerful hand.

Conseil was already trying to unclasp the harpooner's hand from
his half-suffocated victim, and I was going to fly to the rescue,
when suddenly I was nailed to the spot by hearing these words in French:

"Be quiet, Master Land; and you, Professor, will you be so good
as to listen to me?"



CHAPTER X

THE MAN OF THE SEAS

It was the commander of the vessel who thus spoke.

At these words, Ned Land rose suddenly.  The steward,
nearly strangled, tottered out on a sign from his master.
But such was the power of the commander on board, that not
a gesture betrayed the resentment which this man must have felt
towards the Canadian.  Conseil interested in spite of himself,
I stupefied, awaited in silence the result of this scene.

The commander, leaning against the corner of a table with his arms folded,
scanned us with profound attention.  Did he hesitate to speak?
Did he regret the words which he had just spoken in French?
One might almost think so.

After some moments of silence, which not one of us dreamed
of breaking, "Gentlemen," said he, in a calm and penetrating voice,
"I speak French, English, German, and Latin equally well.
I could, therefore, have answered you at our first interview, but I
wished to know you first, then to reflect.  The story told by each one,
entirely agreeing in the main points, convinced me of your identity.
I know now that chance has brought before me M. Pierre Aronnax,
Professor of Natural History at the Museum of Paris, entrusted with
a scientific mission abroad, Conseil, his servant, and Ned Land,
of Canadian origin, harpooner on board the frigate Abraham Lincoln
of the navy of the United States of America."

I bowed assent.  It was not a question that the commander put to me.
Therefore there was no answer to be made.  This man expressed himself
with perfect ease, without any accent.  His sentences were well turned,
his words clear, and his fluency of speech remarkable.  Yet, I did not
recognise in him a fellow-countryman.

He continued the conversation in these terms:

"You have doubtless thought, sir, that I have delayed long in paying
you this second visit.  The reason is that, your identity recognised,
I wished to weigh maturely what part to act towards you.
I have hesitated much.  Most annoying circumstances have brought you
into the presence of a man who has broken all the ties of humanity.
You have come to trouble my existence."

"Unintentionally!" said I.

"Unintentionally?" replied the stranger, raising his voice a little.
"Was it unintentionally that the Abraham Lincoln pursued me all over
the seas?  Was it unintentionally that you took passage in this frigate?
Was it unintentionally that your cannon-balls rebounded off the plating
of my vessel?  Was it unintentionally that Mr. Ned Land struck me
with his harpoon?"

I detected a restrained irritation in these words.
But to these recriminations I had a very natural answer to make,
and I made it.

"Sir," said I, "no doubt you are ignorant of the discussions
which have taken place concerning you in America and Europe.
You do not know that divers accidents, caused by collisions with your
submarine machine, have excited public feeling in the two continents.
I omit the theories without number by which it was sought
to explain that of which you alone possess the secret.
But you must understand that, in pursuing you over the high
seas of the Pacific, the Abraham Lincoln believed itself to be
chasing some powerful sea-monster, of which it was necessary
to rid the ocean at any price."

A half-smile curled the lips of the commander:  then, in a calmer tone:

"M. Aronnax," he replied, "dare you affirm that your frigate
would not as soon have pursued and cannonaded a submarine boat
as a monster?"

This question embarrassed me, for certainly Captain Farragut might
not have hesitated.  He might have thought it his duty to destroy
a contrivance of this kind, as he would a gigantic narwhal.

"You understand then, sir," continued the stranger, "that I
have the right to treat you as enemies?"

I answered nothing, purposely.  For what good would it be to discuss
such a proposition, when force could destroy the best arguments?

"I have hesitated some time," continued the commander; "nothing obliged
me to show you hospitality.  If I chose to separate myself from you,
I should have no interest in seeing you again; I could place you
upon the deck of this vessel which has served you as a refuge,
I could sink beneath the waters, and forget that you had ever existed.
Would not that be my right?"

"It might be the right of a savage," I answered, "but not
that of a civilised man."

"Professor," replied the commander, quickly, "I am not what you
call a civilised man!  I have done with society entirely,
for reasons which I alone have the right of appreciating.
I do not, therefore, obey its laws, and I desire you never to allude
to them before me again!"

This was said plainly.  A flash of anger and disdain kindled in the eyes of
the Unknown, and I had a glimpse of a terrible past in the life of this man.
Not only had he put himself beyond the pale of human laws, but he had made
himself independent of them, free in the strictest acceptation of the word,
quite beyond their reach!  Who then would dare to pursue him at the bottom of
the sea, when, on its surface, he defied all attempts made against him?

What vessel could resist the shock of his submarine monitor?
What cuirass, however thick, could withstand the blows of his spur?
No man could demand from him an account of his actions;
God, if he believed in one--his conscience, if he had one--
were the sole judges to whom he was answerable.

These reflections crossed my mind rapidly, whilst the stranger
personage was silent, absorbed, and as if wrapped up in himself.
I regarded him with fear mingled with interest, as, doubtless,
OEdiphus regarded the Sphinx.

After rather a long silence, the commander resumed the conversation.

"I have hesitated," said he, "but I have thought that my interest might
be reconciled with that pity to which every human being has a right.
You will remain on board my vessel, since fate has cast you there.
You will be free; and, in exchange for this liberty, I shall only impose one
single condition.  Your word of honour to submit to it will suffice."

"Speak, sir," I answered.  "I suppose this condition is one which a man
of honour may accept?"

"Yes, sir; it is this:  It is possible that certain events,
unforeseen, may oblige me to consign you to your cabins for some hours
or some days, as the case may be.  As I desire never to use violence,
I expect from you, more than all the others, a passive obedience.
In thus acting, I take all the responsibility:  I acquit you entirely,
for I make it an impossibility for you to see what ought not to be seen.
Do you accept this condition?"

Then things took place on board which, to say the least,
were singular, and which ought not to be seen by people
who were not placed beyond the pale of social laws.
Amongst the surprises which the future was preparing for me,
this might not be the least.

"We accept," I answered; "only I will ask your permission, sir, to address
one question to you--one only."

"Speak, sir."

"You said that we should be free on board."

"Entirely."

"I ask you, then, what you mean by this liberty?"

"Just the liberty to go, to come, to see, to observe even all
that passes here save under rare circumstances--the liberty,
in short, which we enjoy ourselves, my companions and I."

It was evident that we did not understand one another.

"Pardon me, sir," I resumed, "but this liberty is only what every
prisoner has of pacing his prison.  It cannot suffice us."

"It must suffice you, however."

"What! we must renounce for ever seeing our country, our friends,
our relations again?"

"Yes, sir.  But to renounce that unendurable worldly yoke which men
believe to be liberty is not perhaps so painful as you think."

"Well," exclaimed Ned Land, "never will I give my word of honour
not to try to escape."

"I did not ask you for your word of honour, Master Land,"
answered the commander, coldly.

"Sir," I replied, beginning to get angry in spite of my self,
"you abuse your situation towards us; it is cruelty."

"No, sir, it is clemency.  You are my prisoners of war.  I keep you,
when I could, by a word, plunge you into the depths of the ocean.
You attacked me.  You came to surprise a secret which no man
in the world must penetrate--the secret of my whole existence.
And you think that I am going to send you back to that world which must
know me no more?  Never!  In retaining you, it is not you whom I guard--
it is myself."

These words indicated a resolution taken on the part of the commander,
against which no arguments would prevail.

"So, sir," I rejoined, "you give us simply the choice between life and death?"

"Simply."

"My friends," said I, "to a question thus put, there is nothing to answer.
But no word of honour binds us to the master of this vessel."

"None, sir," answered the Unknown.

Then, in a gentler tone, he continued:

"Now, permit me to finish what I have to say to you.  I know you,
M. Aronnax.  You and your companions will not, perhaps, have so much
to complain of in the chance which has bound you to my fate.
You will find amongst the books which are my favourite study the work
which you have published on `the depths of the sea.'  I have often read it.
You have carried out your work as far as terrestrial science permitted you.
But you do not know all--you have not seen all.  Let me tell you then,
Professor, that you will not regret the time passed on board my vessel.
You are going to visit the land of marvels."

These words of the commander had a great effect upon me.  I cannot deny it.
My weak point was touched; and I forgot, for a moment, that the contemplation
of these sublime subjects was not worth the loss of liberty.
Besides, I trusted to the future to decide this grave question.
So I contented myself with saying:

"By what name ought I to address you?"

"Sir," replied the commander, "I am nothing to you but Captain Nemo;
and you and your companions are nothing to me but the passengers
of the Nautilus."

Captain Nemo called.  A steward appeared.  The captain gave him
his orders in that strange language which I did not understand.
Then, turning towards the Canadian and Conseil:

"A repast awaits you in your cabin," said he.  "Be so good
as to follow this man.

"And now, M. Aronnax, our breakfast is ready.  Permit me to lead the way."

"I am at your service, Captain."

I followed Captain Nemo; and as soon as I had passed through the door,
I found myself in a kind of passage lighted by electricity,
similar to the waist of a ship.  After we had proceeded a dozen yards,
a second door opened before me.

I then entered a dining-room, decorated and furnished
in severe taste.  High oaken sideboards, inlaid with ebony,
stood at the two extremities of the room, and upon their shelves
glittered china, porcelain, and glass of inestimable value.
The plate on the table sparkled in the rays which the luminous
ceiling shed around, while the light was tempered and softened
by exquisite paintings.

In the centre of the room was a table richly laid out.
Captain Nemo indicated the place I was to occupy.

The breakfast consisted of a certain number of dishes,
the contents of which were furnished by the sea alone;
and I was ignorant of the nature and mode of preparation
of some of them.  I acknowledged that they were good, but they
had a peculiar flavour, which I easily became accustomed to.
These different aliments appeared to me to be rich in phosphorus,
and I thought they must have a marine origin.

Captain Nemo looked at me.  I asked him no questions, but he guessed
my thoughts, and answered of his own accord the questions which I
was burning to address to him.

"The greater part of these dishes are unknown to you,"
he said to me.  "However, you may partake of them without fear.
They are wholesome and nourishing.  For a long time I have
renounced the food of the earth, and I am never ill now.
My crew, who are healthy, are fed on the same food."

"So," said I, "all these eatables are the produce of the sea?"

"Yes, Professor, the sea supplies all my wants.  Sometimes I cast
my nets in tow, and I draw them in ready to break.  Sometimes I
hunt in the midst of this element, which appears to be inaccessible
to man, and quarry the game which dwells in my submarine forests.
My flocks, like those of Neptune's old shepherds, graze fearlessly
in the immense prairies of the ocean.  I have a vast property there,
which I cultivate myself, and which is always sown by the hand
of the Creator of all things."

"I can understand perfectly, sir, that your nets furnish excellent fish
for your table; I can understand also that you hunt aquatic game in your
submarine forests; but I cannot understand at all how a particle of meat,
no matter how small, can figure in your bill of fare."

"This, which you believe to be meat, Professor, is nothing else than
fillet of turtle.  Here are also some dolphins' livers, which you
take to be ragout of pork.  My cook is a clever fellow,
who excels in dressing these various products of the ocean.
Taste all these dishes.  Here is a preserve of sea-cucumber,
which a Malay would declare to be unrivalled in the world;
here is a cream, of which the milk has been furnished by
the cetacea, and the sugar by the great fucus of the North Sea;
and, lastly, permit me to offer you some preserve of anemones,
which is equal to that of the most delicious fruits."

I tasted, more from curiosity than as a connoisseur, whilst Captain
Nemo enchanted me with his extraordinary stories.

"You like the sea, Captain?"

"Yes; I love it!  The sea is everything.  It covers seven tenths
of the terrestrial globe.  Its breath is pure and healthy.
It is an immense desert, where man is never lonely,
for he feels life stirring on all sides.  The sea is only
the embodiment of a supernatural and wonderful existence.
It is nothing but love and emotion; it is the `Living Infinite,'
as one of your poets has said.  In fact, Professor, Nature manifests
herself in it by her three kingdoms--mineral, vegetable, and animal.
The sea is the vast reservoir of Nature.  The globe began with sea,
so to speak; and who knows if it will not end with it?
In it is supreme tranquillity.  The sea does not belong to despots.
Upon its surface men can still exercise unjust laws, fight, tear one
another to pieces, and be carried away with terrestrial horrors.
But at thirty feet below its level, their reign ceases,
their influence is quenched, and their power disappears.
Ah! sir, live--live in the bosom of the waters!
There only is independence!  There I recognise no masters!
There I am free!"

Captain Nemo suddenly became silent in the midst of
this enthusiasm, by which he was quite carried away.
For a few moments he paced up and down, much agitated.
Then he became more calm, regained his accustomed coldness
of expression, and turning towards me:

"Now, Professor," said he, "if you wish to go over the Nautilus,
I am at your service."

Captain Nemo rose.  I followed him.  A double door, contrived at the back
of the dining-room, opened, and I entered a room equal in dimensions
to that which I had just quitted.

It was a library.  High pieces of furniture, of black violet
ebony inlaid with brass, supported upon their wide shelves
a great number of books uniformly bound.  They followed the shape
of the room, terminating at the lower part in huge divans,
covered with brown leather, which were curved, to afford
the greatest comfort.  Light movable desks, made to slide in
and out at will, allowed one to rest one's book while reading.
In the centre stood an immense table, covered with pamphlets,
amongst which were some newspapers, already of old date.
The electric light flooded everything; it was shed from four
unpolished globes half sunk in the volutes of the ceiling.
I looked with real admiration at this room, so ingeniously fitted up,
and I could scarcely believe my eyes.

"Captain Nemo," said I to my host, who had just thrown himself
on one of the divans, "this is a library which would do honour
to more than one of the continental palaces, and I am absolutely
astounded when I consider that it can follow you to the bottom
of the seas."

"Where could one find greater solitude or silence, Professor?"
replied Captain Nemo.  "Did your study in the Museum afford you
such perfect quiet?"

"No, sir; and I must confess that it is a very poor one after yours.
You must have six or seven thousand volumes here."

"Twelve thousand, M. Aronnax.  These are the only ties which bind
me to the earth.  But I had done with the world on the day
when my Nautilus plunged for the first time beneath the waters.
That day I bought my last volumes, my last pamphlets, my last papers,
and from that time I wish to think that men no longer think or write.
These books, Professor, are at your service besides, and you can make use
of them freely."

I thanked Captain Nemo, and went up to the shelves of the library.
Works on science, morals, and literature abounded in every language;
but I did not see one single work on political economy; that subject
appeared to be strictly proscribed.  Strange to say, all these books
were irregularly arranged, in whatever language they were written;
and this medley proved that the Captain of the Nautilus must have read
indiscriminately the books which he took up by chance.

"Sir," said I to the Captain, "I thank you for having placed
this library at my disposal.  It contains treasures of science,
and I shall profit by them."

"This room is not only a library," said Captain Nemo,
"it is also a smoking-room."

"A smoking-room!" I cried.  "Then one may smoke on board?"

"Certainly."

"Then, sir, I am forced to believe that you have kept up
a communication with Havannah."

"Not any," answered the Captain.  "Accept this cigar,
M. Aronnax; and, though it does not come from Havannah,
you will be pleased with it, if you are a connoisseur."

I took the cigar which was offered me; its shape recalled
the London ones, but it seemed to be made of leaves of gold.
I lighted it at a little brazier, which was supported upon an
elegant bronze stem, and drew the first whiffs with the delight
of a lover of smoking who has not smoked for two days.

"It is excellent, but it is not tobacco."

"No!" answered the Captain, "this tobacco comes neither from Havannah
nor from the East.  It is a kind of sea-weed, rich in nicotine,
with which the sea provides me, but somewhat sparingly."

At that moment Captain Nemo opened a door which stood opposite
to that by which I had entered the library, and I passed into
an immense drawing-room splendidly lighted.

It was a vast, four-sided room, thirty feet long, eighteen wide,
and fifteen high.  A luminous ceiling, decorated with light arabesques,
shed a soft clear light over all the marvels accumulated in this museum.
For it was in fact a museum, in which an intelligent and prodigal hand
had gathered all the treasures of nature and art, with the artistic
confusion which distinguishes a painter's studio.

{several sentences are missing here in the omnibus edition}

Thirty first-rate pictures, uniformly framed, separated by bright drapery,
ornamented the walls, which were hung with tapestry of severe design.
I saw works of great value, the greater part of which I had admired in the
special collections of Europe, and in the exhibitions of paintings.

Some admirable statues in marble and bronze, after the finest antique models,
stood upon pedestals in the corners of this magnificent museum.
Amazement, as the Captain of the Nautilus had predicted, had already
begun to take possession of me.

"Professor," said this strange man, "you must excuse the unceremonious
way in which I receive you, and the disorder of this room."

"Sir," I answered, "without seeking to know who you are,
I recognise in you an artist."

"An amateur, nothing more, sir.  Formerly I loved to collect
these beautiful works created by the hand of man.
I sought them greedily, and ferreted them out indefatigably,
and I have been able to bring together some objects of great value.
These are my last souvenirs of that world which is dead to me.
In my eyes, your modern artists are already old; they have two or
three thousand years of existence; I confound them in my own mind.
Masters have no age."

{4 paragraphs seem to be missing from this omnibus text here they
have to do with musical composers, a piano, and a brief revery
on the part of Nemo}

Under elegant glass cases, fixed by copper rivets, were classed
and labelled the most precious productions of the sea
which had ever been presented to the eye of a naturalist.
My delight as a professor may be conceived.

{2 long paragraphs seem to be missing from this omnibus here}

Apart, in separate compartments, were spread out chaplets of pearls
of the greatest beauty, which reflected the electric light in little
sparks of fire; pink pearls, torn from the pinna-marina of the Red Sea;
green pearls, yellow, blue, and black pearls, the curious productions
of the divers molluscs of every ocean, and certain mussels of the water
courses of the North; lastly, several specimens of inestimable value.
Some of these pearls were larger than a pigeon's egg, and were worth millions.

{this para has been altered the last sentence reworded}

Therefore, to estimate the value of this collection was simply impossible.
Captain Nemo must have expended millions in the acquirement of these
various specimens, and I was thinking what source he could have drawn from,
to have been able thus to gratify his fancy for collecting, when I was
interrupted by these words:

"You are examining my shells, Professor?  Unquestionably they must be
interesting to a naturalist; but for me they have a far greater charm,
for I have collected them all with my own hand, and there is not a sea
on the face of the globe which has escaped my researches."

"I can understand, Captain, the delight of wandering about in the midst
of such riches.  You are one of those who have collected their
treasures themselves.  No museum in Europe possesses such a collection
of the produce of the ocean.  But if I exhaust all my admiration
upon it, I shall have none left for the vessel which carries it.
I do not wish to pry into your secrets:  but I must confess
that this Nautilus, with the motive power which is confined in it,
the contrivances which enable it to be worked, the powerful agent
which propels it, all excite my curiosity to the highest pitch.
I see suspended on the walls of this room instruments of whose use
I am ignorant."

"You will find these same instruments in my own room, Professor,
where I shall have much pleasure in explaining their use to you.
But first come and inspect the cabin which is set apart for your own use.
You must see how you will be accommodated on board the Nautilus."

I followed Captain Nemo who, by one of the doors opening
from each panel of the drawing-room, regained the waist.
He conducted me towards the bow, and there I found, not a cabin,
but an elegant room, with a bed, dressing-table, and several other
pieces of excellent furniture.

I could only thank my host.

"Your room adjoins mine," said he, opening a door, "and mine
opens into the drawing-room that we have just quitted."

I entered the Captain's room:  it had a severe, almost a monkish aspect.
A small iron bedstead, a table, some articles for the toilet; the whole
lighted by a skylight.  No comforts, the strictest necessaries only.

Captain Nemo pointed to a seat.

"Be so good as to sit down," he said.  I seated myself,
and he began thus:



CHAPTER XI

ALL BY ELECTRICITY

"Sir," said Captain Nemo, showing me the instruments hanging on the walls
of his room, "here are the contrivances required for the navigation of
the Nautilus.  Here, as in the drawing-room, I have them always under my eyes,
and they indicate my position and exact direction in the middle of the ocean.
Some are known to you, such as the thermometer, which gives the internal
temperature of the Nautilus; the barometer, which indicates the weight
of the air and foretells the changes of the weather; the hygrometer,
which marks the dryness of the atmosphere; the storm-glass, the contents
of which, by decomposing, announce the approach of tempests; the compass,
which guides my course; the sextant, which shows the latitude by the altitude
of the sun; chronometers, by which I calculate the longitude; and glasses
for day and night, which I use to examine the points of the horizon,
when the Nautilus rises to the surface of the waves."

"These are the usual nautical instruments," I replied,
"and I know the use of them.  But these others, no doubt,
answer to the particular requirements of the Nautilus.
This dial with movable needle is a manometer, is it not?"

"It is actually a manometer.  But by communication with the water,
whose external pressure it indicates, it gives our depth at the same time."

"And these other instruments, the use of which I cannot guess?"

"Here, Professor, I ought to give you some explanations.
Will you be kind enough to listen to me?"

He was silent for a few moments, then he said:

"There is a powerful agent, obedient, rapid, easy, which conforms to
every use, and reigns supreme on board my vessel.  Everything is done by means
of it.  It lights, warms it, and is the soul of my mechanical apparatus.
This agent is electricity."

"Electricity?"  I cried in surprise.

"Yes, sir."

"Nevertheless, Captain, you possess an extreme rapidity of movement,
which does not agree well with the power of electricity.
Until now, its dynamic force has remained under restraint, and has
only been able to produce a small amount of power."

"Professor," said Captain Nemo, "my electricity is not everybody's.
You know what sea-water is composed of.  In a thousand grammes
are found 96 1/2 per cent.  of water, and about 2 2/3 per cent.
of chloride of sodium; then, in a smaller quantity, chlorides of
magnesium and of potassium, bromide of magnesium, sulphate of magnesia,
sulphate and carbonate of lime.  You see, then, that chloride
of sodium forms a large part of it.  So it is this sodium that I
extract from the sea-water, and of which I compose my ingredients.
I owe all to the ocean; it produces electricity, and electricity
gives heat, light, motion, and, in a word, life to the Nautilus."

"But not the air you breathe?"

"Oh!  I could manufacture the air necessary for my consumption, but it
is useless, because I go up to the surface of the water when I please.
However, if electricity does not furnish me with air to breathe, it works
at least the powerful pumps that are stored in spacious reservoirs,
and which enable me to prolong at need, and as long as I will, my stay
in the depths of the sea.  It gives a uniform and unintermittent light,
which the sun does not.  Now look at this clock; it is electrical,
and goes with a regularity that defies the best chronometers.
I have divided it into twenty-four hours, like the Italian clocks,
because for me there is neither night nor day, sun nor moon, but only
that factitious light that I take with me to the bottom of the sea.
Look! just now, it is ten o'clock in the morning."

"Exactly."

"Another application of electricity.  This dial hanging in front of us
indicates the speed of the Nautilus.  An electric thread puts it in
communication with the screw, and the needle indicates the real speed.
Look! now we are spinning along with a uniform speed of fifteen
miles an hour."

"It is marvelous!  And I see, Captain, you were right to make use
of this agent that takes the place of wind, water, and steam."

"We have not finished, M. Aronnax," said Captain Nemo, rising.
"If you will allow me, we will examine the stern of the Nautilus."

Really, I knew already the anterior part of this submarine boat,
of which this is the exact division, starting from the ship's head:
the dining-room, five yards long, separated from the library
by a water-tight partition; the library, five yards long;
the large drawing-room, ten yards long, separated from the Captain's
room by a second water-tight partition; the said room, five yards
in length; mine, two and a half yards; and, lastly a reservoir
of air, seven and a half yards, that extended to the bows.
Total length thirty five yards, or one hundred and five feet.
The partitions had doors that were shut hermetically by means of
india-rubber instruments, and they ensured the safety of the Nautilus
in case of a leak.

I followed Captain Nemo through the waist, and arrived at the centre
of the boat.  There was a sort of well that opened between two partitions.
An iron ladder, fastened with an iron hook to the partition, led to
the upper end.  I asked the Captain what the ladder was used for.

"It leads to the small boat," he said.

"What! have you a boat?"  I exclaimed, in surprise.

"Of course; an excellent vessel, light and insubmersible,
that serves either as a fishing or as a pleasure boat."

"But then, when you wish to embark, you are obliged to come to the surface
of the water?"

"Not at all.  This boat is attached to the upper part of
the hull of the Nautilus, and occupies a cavity made for it.
It is decked, quite water-tight, and held together by solid bolts.
This ladder leads to a man-hole made in the hull of the Nautilus,
that corresponds with a similar hole made in the side of the boat.
By this double opening I get into the small vessel.  They shut the one
belonging to the Nautilus; I shut the other by means of screw pressure.
I undo the bolts, and the little boat goes up to the surface of the sea
with prodigious rapidity.  I then open the panel of the bridge,
carefully shut till then; I mast it, hoist my sail, take my oars,
and I'm off."

"But how do you get back on board?"

"I do not come back, M. Aronnax; the Nautilus comes to me."

"By your orders?"

"By my orders.  An electric thread connects us.  I telegraph to it,
and that is enough."

"Really," I said, astonished at these marvels, "nothing can
be more simple."

After having passed by the cage of the staircase that led to the platform,
I saw a cabin six feet long, in which Conseil and Ned Land,
enchanted with their repast, were devouring it with avidity.
Then a door opened into a kitchen nine feet long, situated between
the large store-rooms. There electricity, better than gas itself,
did all the cooking.  The streams under the furnaces gave out to the
sponges of platina a heat which was regularly kept up and distributed.
They also heated a distilling apparatus, which, by evaporation,
furnished excellent drinkable water.  Near this kitchen was a bathroom
comfortably furnished, with hot and cold water taps.

Next to the kitchen was the berth-room of the vessel, sixteen feet long.
But the door was shut, and I could not see the management of it,
which might have given me an idea of the number of men employed on
board the Nautilus.

At the bottom was a fourth partition that separated this
office from the engine-room. A door opened, and I found myself
in the compartment where Captain Nemo--certainly an engineer
of a very high order--had arranged his locomotive machinery.
This engine-room, clearly lighted, did not measure less than
sixty-five feet in length.  It was divided into two parts;
the first contained the materials for producing electricity,
and the second the machinery that connected it with the screw.
I examined it with great interest, in order to understand the
machinery of the Nautilus.

"You see," said the Captain, "I use Bunsen's contrivances,
not Ruhmkorff's. Those would not have been powerful enough.
Bunsen's are fewer in number, but strong and large, which experience
proves to be the best.  The electricity produced passes forward,
where it works, by electro-magnets of great size, on a system of levers
and cog-wheels that transmit the movement to the axle of the screw.
This one, the diameter of which is nineteen feet, and the thread
twenty-three feet, performs about 120 revolutions in a second."

"And you get then?"

"A speed of fifty miles an hour."

"I have seen the Nautilus manoeuvre before the Abraham Lincoln,
and I have my own ideas as to its speed.  But this is not enough.
We must see where we go.  We must be able to direct it to the right,
to the left, above, below.  How do you get to the great depths,
where you find an increasing resistance, which is rated by hundreds
of atmospheres?  How do you return to the surface of the ocean?
And how do you maintain yourselves in the requisite medium?
Am I asking too much?"

"Not at all, Professor," replied the Captain, with some hesitation;
"since you may never leave this submarine boat.  Come into the saloon,
it is our usual study, and there you will learn all you want to know
about the Nautilus."



CHAPTER XII

SOME FIGURES

A moment after we were seated on a divan in the saloon smoking.
The Captain showed me a sketch that gave the plan, section, and elevation
of the Nautilus.  Then he began his description in these words:

"Here, M. Aronnax, are the several dimensions of the boat
you are in.  It is an elongated cylinder with conical ends.
It is very like a cigar in shape, a shape already adopted
in London in several constructions of the same sort.
The length of this cylinder, from stem to stern, is exactly
232 feet, and its maximum breadth is twenty-six feet.
It is not built quite like your long-voyage steamers,
but its lines are sufficiently long, and its curves
prolonged enough, to allow the water to slide off easily,
and oppose no obstacle to its passage.  These two dimensions
enable you to obtain by a simple calculation the surface and
cubic contents of the Nautilus.  Its area measures 6,032 feet;
and its contents about 1,500 cubic yards; that is to say,
when completely immersed it displaces 50,000 feet of water,
or weighs 1,500 tons.

"When I made the plans for this submarine vessel, I meant that nine-tenths
should be submerged:  consequently it ought only to displace nine-tenths
of its bulk, that is to say, only to weigh that number of tons.
I ought not, therefore, to have exceeded that weight, constructing it on
the aforesaid dimensions.

"The Nautilus is composed of two hulls, one inside, the other outside,
joined by T-shaped irons, which render it very strong.  Indeed, owing to
this cellular arrangement it resists like a block, as if it were solid.
Its sides cannot yield; it coheres spontaneously, and not by the closeness
of its rivets; and its perfect union of the materials enables it to defy
the roughest seas.

"These two hulls are composed of steel plates, whose density is
from .7 to .8 that of water.  The first is not less than two inches
and a half thick and weighs 394 tons.  The second envelope, the keel,
twenty inches high and ten thick, weighs only sixty-two tons.
The engine, the ballast, the several accessories and apparatus
appendages, the partitions and bulkheads, weigh 961.62 tons.
Do you follow all this?"

"I do."

"Then, when the Nautilus is afloat under these circumstances,
one-tenth is out of the water.  Now, if I have made reservoirs
of a size equal to this tenth, or capable of holding 150 tons,
and if I fill them with water, the boat, weighing then 1,507 tons,
will be completely immersed.  That would happen, Professor.
These reservoirs are in the lower part of the Nautilus.
I turn on taps and they fill, and the vessel sinks that had just
been level with the surface."

"Well, Captain, but now we come to the real difficulty.
I can understand your rising to the surface; but, diving below
the surface, does not your submarine contrivance encounter a pressure,
and consequently undergo an upward thrust of one atmosphere
for every thirty feet of water, just about fifteen pounds
per square inch?"

"Just so, sir."

"Then, unless you quite fill the Nautilus, I do not see how you
can draw it down to those depths."

"Professor, you must not confound statics with dynamics or you will be
exposed to grave errors.  There is very little labour spent in attaining
the lower regions of the ocean, for all bodies have a tendency to sink.
When I wanted to find out the necessary increase of weight required
to sink the Nautilus, I had only to calculate the reduction of volume
that sea-water acquires according to the depth."

"That is evident."

"Now, if water is not absolutely incompressible, it is at least capable
of very slight compression.  Indeed, after the most recent calculations this
reduction is only .000436 of an atmosphere for each thirty feet of depth.
If we want to sink 3,000 feet, I should keep account of the reduction of bulk
under a pressure equal to that of a column of water of a thousand feet.
The calculation is easily verified.  Now, I have supplementary
reservoirs capable of holding a hundred tons.  Therefore I can sink
to a considerable depth.  When I wish to rise to the level of the sea,
I only let off the water, and empty all the reservoirs if I want the Nautilus
to emerge from the tenth part of her total capacity."

I had nothing to object to these reasonings.

"I admit your calculations, Captain," I replied; "I should be
wrong to dispute them since daily experience confirms them;
but I foresee a real difficulty in the way."

"What, sir?"

"When you are about 1,000 feet deep, the walls of the Nautilus
bear a pressure of 100 atmospheres.  If, then, just now you were
to empty the supplementary reservoirs, to lighten the vessel,
and to go up to the surface, the pumps must overcome the pressure
of 100 atmospheres, which is 1,500 lbs.  per square inch.
From that a power----"

"That electricity alone can give," said the Captain, hastily.
"I repeat, sir, that the dynamic power of my engines is almost infinite.
The pumps of the Nautilus have an enormous power, as you must have observed
when their jets of water burst like a torrent upon the Abraham Lincoln.
Besides, I use subsidiary reservoirs only to attain a mean depth of 750
to 1,000 fathoms, and that with a view of managing my machines.
Also, when I have a mind to visit the depths of the ocean five or six mlles
below the surface, I make use of slower but not less infallible means."

"What are they, Captain?"

"That involves my telling you how the Nautilus is worked."

"I am impatient to learn."

"To steer this boat to starboard or port, to turn, in a word,
following a horizontal plan, I use an ordinary rudder fixed on the back
of the stern-post, and with one wheel and some tackle to steer by.
But I can also make the Nautilus rise and sink, and sink and rise,
by a vertical movement by means of two inclined planes fastened to its sides,
opposite the centre of flotation, planes that move in every direction,
and that are worked by powerful levers from the interior.
If the planes are kept parallel with the boat, it moves horizontally.
If slanted, the Nautilus, according to this inclination, and under
the influence of the screw, either sinks diagonally or rises diagonally
as it suits me.  And even if I wish to rise more quickly to the surface,
I ship the screw, and the pressure of the water causes the Nautilus
to rise vertically like a balloon filled with hydrogen."

"Bravo, Captain!  But how can the steersman follow the route
in the middle of the waters?"

"The steersman is placed in a glazed box, that is raised about the hull
of the Nautilus, and furnished with lenses."

"Are these lenses capable of resisting such pressure?"

"Perfectly.  Glass, which breaks at a blow, is, nevertheless, capable of
offering considerable resistance.  During some experiments of fishing
by electric light in 1864 in the Northern Seas, we saw plates less
than a third of an inch thick resist a pressure of sixteen atmospheres.
Now, the glass that I use is not less than thirty times thicker."

"Granted.  But, after all, in order to see, the light must exceed
the darkness, and in the midst of the darkness in the water,
how can you see?"

"Behind the steersman's cage is placed a powerful electric reflector,
the rays from which light up the sea for half a mile in front."

"Ah! bravo, bravo, Captain!  Now I can account for this
phosphorescence in the supposed narwhal that puzzled us so.
I now ask you if the boarding of the Nautilus and of the Scotia,
that has made such a noise, has been the result of a chance rencontre?"

"Quite accidental, sir.  I was sailing only one fathom
below the surface of the water when the shock came.
It had no bad result."

"None, sir.  But now, about your rencontre with the Abraham Lincoln?"

"Professor, I am sorry for one of the best vessels in the American navy;
but they attacked me, and I was bound to defend myself.
I contented myself, however, with putting the frigate hors de combat;
she will not have any difficulty in getting repaired at the next port."

"Ah, Commander! your Nautilus is certainly a marvellous boat."

"Yes, Professor; and I love it as if it were part of myself.
If danger threatens one of your vessels on the ocean,
the first impression is the feeling of an abyss above and below.
On the Nautilus men's hearts never fail them.  No defects
to be afraid of, for the double shell is as firm as iron;
no rigging to attend to; no sails for the wind to carry away;
no boilers to burst; no fire to fear, for the vessel is made
of iron, not of wood; no coal to run short, for electricity
is the only mechanical agent; no collision to fear, for it
alone swims in deep water; no tempest to brave, for when it
dives below the water it reaches absolute tranquillity.
There, sir! that is the perfection of vessels!  And if it is true
that the engineer has more confidence in the vessel than the builder,
and the builder than the captain himself, you understand
the trust I repose in my Nautilus; for I am at once captain,
builder, and engineer."

"But how could you construct this wonderful Nautilus in secret?"

"Each separate portion, M. Aronnax, was brought from different
parts of the globe."

"But these parts had to be put together and arranged?"

"Professor, I had set up my workshops upon a desert island in the ocean.
There my workmen, that is to say, the brave men that I instructed
and educated, and myself have put together our Nautilus.  Then, when the work
was finished, fire destroyed all trace of our proceedings on this island,
that I could have jumped over if I had liked."

"Then the cost of this vessel is great?"

"M. Aronnax, an iron vessel costs L145 per ton.  Now the Nautilus weighed
1,500. It came therefore to L67,500, and L80,000 more for fitting it up,
and about L200,000, with the works of art and the collections it contains."

"One last question, Captain Nemo."

"Ask it, Professor."

"You are rich?"

"Immensely rich, sir; and I could, without missing it,
pay the national debt of France."

I stared at the singular person who spoke thus.  Was he playing
upon my credulity?  The future would decide that.



CHAPTER XIII

THE BLACK RIVER

The portion of the terrestrial globe which is covered by
water is estimated at upwards of eighty millions of acres.
This fluid mass comprises two billions two hundred and fifty
millions of cubic miles, forming a spherical body of a diameter
of sixty leagues, the weight of which would be three quintillions
of tons.  To comprehend the meaning of these figures,
it is necessary to observe that a quintillion is to a billion
as a billion is to unity; in other words, there are as many
billions in a quintillion as there are units in a billion.
This mass of fluid is equal to about the quantity of water
which would be discharged by all the rivers of the earth in
forty thousand years.

During the geological epochs the ocean originally prevailed everywhere.
Then by degrees, in the silurian period, the tops of the mountains began
to appear, the islands emerged, then disappeared in partial deluges,
reappeared, became settled, formed continents, till at length the earth
became geographically arranged, as we see in the present day.
The solid had wrested from the liquid thirty-seven million six hundred
and fifty-seven square miles, equal to twelve billions nine hundred
and sixty millions of acres.

The shape of continents allows us to divide the waters into five
great portions:  the Arctic or Frozen Ocean, the Antarctic,
or Frozen Ocean, the Indian, the Atlantic, and the Pacific Oceans.

The Pacific Ocean extends from north to south between the two
Polar Circles, and from east to west between Asia and America,
over an extent of 145 degrees of longitude.  It is the quietest of seas;
its currents are broad and slow, it has medium tides, and abundant rain.
Such was the ocean that my fate destined me first to travel over under
these strange conditions.

"Sir," said Captain Nemo, "we will, if you please,
take our bearings and fix the starting-point of this voyage.
It is a quarter to twelve; I will go up again to the surface."

The Captain pressed an electric clock three times.
The pumps began to drive the water from the tanks; the needle
of the manometer marked by a different pressure the ascent
of the Nautilus, then it stopped.

"We have arrived," said the Captain.

I went to the central staircase which opened on to the platform,
clambered up the iron steps, and found myself on the upper part
of the Nautilus.

The platform was only three feet out of water.  The front
and back of the Nautilus was of that spindle-shape which caused
it justly to be compared to a cigar.  I noticed that its
iron plates, slightly overlaying each other, resembled the shell
which clothes the bodies of our large terrestrial reptiles.
It explained to me how natural it was, in spite of all glasses,
that this boat should have been taken for a marine animal.

Toward the middle of the platform the longboat, half buried
in the hull of the vessel, formed a slight excrescence.
Fore and aft rose two cages of medium height with inclined sides,
and partly closed by thick lenticular glasses; one destined for
the steersman who directed the Nautilus, the other containing a
brilliant lantern to give light on the road.

The sea was beautiful, the sky pure.  Scarcely could
the long vehicle feel the broad undulations of the ocean.
A light breeze from the east rippled the surface of the waters.
The horizon, free from fog, made observation easy.
Nothing was in sight.  Not a quicksand, not an island.
A vast desert.

Captain Nemo, by the help of his sextant, took the altitude
of the sun, which ought also to give the latitude.
He waited for some moments till its disc touched the horizon.
Whilst taking observations not a muscle moved, the instrument
could not have been more motionless in a hand of marble.

"Twelve o'clock, sir," said he.  "When you like----"

I cast a last look upon the sea, slightly yellowed by the Japanese coast,
and descended to the saloon.

"And now, sir, I leave you to your studies," added the Captain;
"our course is E.N.E., our depth is twenty-six fathoms.
Here are maps on a large scale by which you may follow it.
The saloon is at your disposal, and, with your permission,
I will retire."  Captain Nemo bowed, and I remained alone,
lost in thoughts all bearing on the commander of the Nautilus.

For a whole hour was I deep in these reflections,
seeking to pierce this mystery so interesting to me.
Then my eyes fell upon the vast planisphere spread upon the table,
and I placed my finger on the very spot where the given latitude
and longitude crossed.

The sea has its large rivers like the continents.  They are
special currents known by their temperature and their colour.
The most remarkable of these is known by the name of the Gulf Stream.
Science has decided on the globe the direction of five principal currents:
one in the North Atlantic, a second in the South, a third in the North
Pacific, a fourth in the South, and a fifth in the Southern Indian Ocean.
It is even probable that a sixth current existed at one time or another
in the Northern Indian Ocean, when the Caspian and Aral Seas formed but
one vast sheet of water.

At this point indicated on the planisphere one of these currents
was rolling, the Kuro-Scivo of the Japanese, the Black River, which,
leaving the Gulf of Bengal, where it is warmed by the perpendicular
rays of a tropical sun, crosses the Straits of Malacca along the coast
of Asia, turns into the North Pacific to the Aleutian Islands,
carrying with it trunks of camphor-trees and other indigenous productions,
and edging the waves of the ocean with the pure indigo of its warm water.
It was this current that the Nautilus was to follow.  I followed
it with my eye; saw it lose itself in the vastness of the Pacific,
and felt myself drawn with it, when Ned Land and Conseil appeared at
the door of the saloon.

My two brave companions remained petrified at the sight of the wonders
spread before them.

"Where are we, where are we?" exclaimed the Canadian.
"In the museum at Quebec?"

"My friends," I answered, making a sign for them to enter,
"you are not in Canada, but on board the Nautilus, fifty yards
below the level of the sea."

"But, M. Aronnax," said Ned Land, "can you tell me how many men
there are on board?  Ten, twenty, fifty, a hundred?"

"I cannot answer you, Mr. Land; it is better to abandon for a
time all idea of seizing the Nautilus or escaping from it.
This ship is a masterpiece of modern industry, and I should be
sorry not to have seen it.  Many people would accept the situation
forced upon us, if only to move amongst such wonders.
So be quiet and let us try and see what passes around us."

"See!" exclaimed the harpooner, "but we can see nothing in this iron prison!
We are walking--we are sailing--blindly."

Ned Land had scarcely pronounced these words when all was suddenly darkness.
The luminous ceiling was gone, and so rapidly that my eyes received
a painful impression.

We remained mute, not stirring, and not knowing what surprise awaited us,
whether agreeable or disagreeable.  A sliding noise was heard:
one would have said that panels were working at the sides of the Nautilus.

"It is the end of the end!" said Ned Land.

Suddenly light broke at each side of the saloon, through two oblong openings.
The liquid mass appeared vividly lit up by the electric gleam.  Two crystal
plates separated us from the sea.  At first I trembled at the thought that
this frail partition might break, but strong bands of copper bound them,
giving an almost infinite power of resistance.

The sea was distinctly visible for a mile all round the Nautilus.
What a spectacle!  What pen can describe it?  Who could paint
the effects of the light through those transparent sheets of water,
and the softness of the successive gradations from the lower
to the superior strata of the ocean?

We know the transparency of the sea and that its clearness is far
beyond that of rock-water. The mineral and organic substances
which it holds in suspension heightens its transparency.
In certain parts of the ocean at the Antilles, under seventy-five
fathoms of water, can be seen with surprising clearness a bed
of sand.  The penetrating power of the solar rays does not
seem to cease for a depth of one hundred and fifty fathoms.
But in this middle fluid travelled over by the Nautilus,
the electric brightness was produced even in the bosom of the waves.
It was no longer luminous water, but liquid light.

On each side a window opened into this unexplored abyss.
The obscurity of the saloon showed to advantage the brightness outside,
and we looked out as if this pure crystal had been the glass of
an immense aquarium.

"You wished to see, friend Ned; well, you see now."

"Curious! curious!" muttered the Canadian, who, forgetting his
ill-temper, seemed to submit to some irresistible attraction;
"and one would come further than this to admire such a sight!"

"Ah!" thought I to myself, "I understand the life of this man;
he has made a world apart for himself, in which he treasures all
his greatest wonders."

For two whole hours an aquatic army escorted the Nautilus.
During their games, their bounds, while rivalling each other
in beauty, brightness, and velocity, I distinguished the green labre;
the banded mullet, marked by a double line of black; the round-tailed goby,
of a white colour, with violet spots on the back; the Japanese scombrus,
a beautiful mackerel of these seas, with a blue body and silvery head;
the brilliant azurors, whose name alone defies description;
some banded spares, with variegated fins of blue and yellow;
the woodcocks of the seas, some specimens of which attain a yard in length;
Japanese salamanders, spider lampreys, serpents six feet long,
with eyes small and lively, and a huge mouth bristling with teeth;
with many other species.

Our imagination was kept at its height, interjections followed quickly
on each other.  Ned named the fish, and Conseil classed them.
I was in ecstasies with the vivacity of their movements and the
beauty of their forms.  Never had it been given to me to surprise
these animals, alive and at liberty, in their natural element.
I will not mention all the varieties which passed before my dazzled eyes,
all the collection of the seas of China and Japan.  These fish,
more numerous than the birds of the air, came, attracted, no doubt,
by the brilliant focus of the electric light.

Suddenly there was daylight in the saloon, the iron panels closed again,
and the enchanting vision disappeared.  But for a long time I dreamt on,
till my eyes fell on the instruments hanging on the partition.
The compass still showed the course to be E.N.E., the manometer
indicated a pressure of five atmospheres, equivalent to a depth
of twenty five fathoms, and the electric log gave a speed of fifteen
miles an hour.  I expected Captain Nemo, but he did not appear.
The clock marked the hour of five.

Ned Land and Conseil returned to their cabin, and I retired to my chamber.
My dinner was ready.  It was composed of turtle soup made of the
most delicate hawks bills, of a surmullet served with puff paste
(the liver of which, prepared by itself, was most delicious), and fillets
of the emperor-holocanthus, the savour of which seemed to me superior
even to salmon.

I passed the evening reading, writing, and thinking.
Then sleep overpowered me, and I stretched myself on my couch
of zostera, and slept profoundly, whilst the Nautilus was gliding
rapidly through the current of the Black River.



CHAPTER XIV

A NOTE OF INVITATION

The next day was the 9th of November.  I awoke after a long
sleep of twelve hours.  Conseil came, according to custom,
to know "how I passed the night," and to offer his services.
He had left his friend the Canadian sleeping like a man who
had never done anything else all his life.  I let the worthy
fellow chatter as he pleased, without caring to answer him.
I was preoccupied by the absence of the Captain during our sitting
of the day before, and hoping to see him to-day.

As soon as I was dressed I went into the saloon.  It was deserted.
I plunged into the study of the shell treasures hidden behind the glasses.

The whole day passed without my being honoured by a visit from Captain Nemo.
The panels of the saloon did not open.  Perhaps they did not wish us to tire
of these beautiful things.

The course of the Nautilus was E.N.E., her speed twelve knots,
the depth below the surface between twenty-five and thirty fathoms.

The next day, 10th of November, the same desertion,
the same solitude.  I did not see one of the ship's crew:
Ned and Conseil spent the greater part of the day with me.
They were astonished at the puzzling absence of the Captain.
Was this singular man ill?--had he altered his intentions with
regard to us?

After all, as Conseil said, we enjoyed perfect liberty, we were delicately
and abundantly fed.  Our host kept to his terms of the treaty.
We could not complain, and, indeed, the singularity of our fate reserved
such wonderful compensation for us that we had no right to accuse
it as yet.

That day I commenced the journal of these adventures which has enabled
me to relate them with more scrupulous exactitude and minute detail.

11th November, early in the morning.  The fresh air spreading
over the interior of the Nautilus told me that we had come
to the surface of the ocean to renew our supply of oxygen.
I directed my steps to the central staircase, and mounted the platform.

It was six o'clock, the weather was cloudy, the sea grey, but calm.
Scarcely a billow.  Captain Nemo, whom I hoped to meet, would he be there?
I saw no one but the steersman imprisoned in his glass cage.
Seated upon the projection formed by the hull of the pinnace,
I inhaled the salt breeze with delight.

By degrees the fog disappeared under the action of the sun's rays,
the radiant orb rose from behind the eastern horizon.
The sea flamed under its glance like a train of gunpowder.
The clouds scattered in the heights were coloured with lively tints
of beautiful shades, and numerous "mare's tails," which betokened
wind for that day.  But what was wind to this Nautilus,
which tempests could not frighten!

I was admiring this joyous rising of the sun, so gay,
and so life-giving, when I heard steps approaching the platform.
I was prepared to salute Captain Nemo, but it was his second
(whom I had already seen on the Captain's first visit) who appeared.
He advanced on the platform, not seeming to see me.
With his powerful glass to his eye, he scanned every point
of the horizon with great attention.  This examination over,
he approached the panel and pronounced a sentence in exactly
these terms.  I have remembered it, for every morning
it was repeated under exactly the same conditions.
It was thus worded:

"Nautron respoc lorni virch."

What it meant I could not say.

These words pronounced, the second descended.  I thought that
the Nautilus was about to return to its submarine navigation.
I regained the panel and returned to my chamber.

Five days sped thus, without any change in our situation.  Every morning I
mounted the platform.  The same phrase was pronounced by the same individual.
But Captain Nemo did not appear.

I had made up my mind that I should never see him again,
when, on the 16th November, on returning to my room with Ned
and Conseil, I found upon my table a note addressed to me.
I opened it impatiently.  It was written in a bold, clear hand,
the characters rather pointed, recalling the German type.
The note was worded as follows:


TO PROFESSOR ARONNAX, On board the Nautilus.  16th of November, 1867.

Captain Nemo invites Professor Aronnax to a hunting-party, which will
take place to-morrow morning in the forests of the Island of Crespo.
He hopes that nothing will prevent the Professor from being present,
and he will with pleasure see him joined by his companions.

CAPTAIN NEMO, Commander of the Nautilus.


"A hunt!" exclaimed Ned.

"And in the forests of the Island of Crespo!" added Conseil.

"Oh! then the gentleman is going on terra firma?" replied Ned Land.

"That seems to me to be clearly indicated," said I,
reading the letter once more.

"Well, we must accept," said the Canadian.  "But once more on dry ground,
we shall know what to do.  Indeed, I shall not be sorry to eat a piece
of fresh venison."

Without seeking to reconcile what was contradictory between Captain
Nemo's manifest aversion to islands and continents, and his invitation
to hunt in a forest, I contented myself with replying:

"Let us first see where the Island of Crespo is."

I consulted the planisphere, and in 32@ 40' N. lat.
and 157@ 50' W. long., I found a small island, recognised in 1801
by Captain Crespo, and marked in the ancient Spanish maps
as Rocca de la Plata, the meaning of which is The Silver Rock.
We were then about eighteen hundred miles from our starting-point,
and the course of the Nautilus, a little changed, was bringing
it back towards the southeast.

I showed this little rock, lost in the midst of the North Pacific,
to my companions.

"If Captain Nemo does sometimes go on dry ground," said I,
"he at least chooses desert islands."

Ned Land shrugged his shoulders without speaking, and Conseil
and he left me.

After supper, which was served by the steward, mute and impassive,
I went to bed, not without some anxiety.

The next morning, the 17th of November, on awakening, I felt
that the Nautilus was perfectly still.  I dressed quickly
and entered the saloon.

Captain Nemo was there, waiting for me.  He rose, bowed,
and asked me if it was convenient for me to accompany him.
As he made no allusion to his absence during the last eight days,
I did not mention it, and simply answered that my companions and
myself were ready to follow him.

We entered the dining-room, where breakfast was served.

"M. Aronnax," said the Captain, "pray, share my breakfast without ceremony;
we will chat as we eat.  For, though I promised you a walk in the forest,
I did not undertake to find hotels there.  So breakfast as a man who will most
likely not have his dinner till very late."

I did honour to the repast.  It was composed of several kinds of fish,
and slices of sea-cucumber, and different sorts of seaweed.
Our drink consisted of pure water, to which the Captain added
some drops of a fermented liquor, extracted by the Kamschatcha
method from a seaweed known under the name of Rhodomenia palmata.
Captain Nemo ate at first without saying a word.  Then he began:

"Sir, when I proposed to you to hunt in my submarine forest of Crespo,
you evidently thought me mad.  Sir, you should never judge lightly
of any man."

"But Captain, believe me----"

"Be kind enough to listen, and you will then see whether you
have any cause to accuse me of folly and contradiction."

"I listen."

"You know as well as I do, Professor, that man can live under water,
providing he carries with him a sufficient supply of breathable air.
In submarine works, the workman, clad in an impervious dress,
with his head in a metal helmet, receives air from above by means
of forcing pumps and regulators."

"That is a diving apparatus," said I.

"Just so, but under these conditions the man is not at liberty;
he is attached to the pump which sends him air through an
india-rubber tube, and if we were obliged to be thus held
to the Nautilus, we could not go far."

"And the means of getting free?"  I asked.

"It is to use the Rouquayrol apparatus, invented by two of your
own countrymen, which I have brought to perfection for my own use,
and which will allow you to risk yourself under these new
physiological conditions without any organ whatever suffering.
It consists of a reservoir of thick iron plates, in which I store
the air under a pressure of fifty atmospheres.  This reservoir is
fixed on the back by means of braces, like a soldier's knapsack.
Its upper part forms a box in which the air is kept by means of
a bellows, and therefore cannot escape unless at its normal tension.
In the Rouquayrol apparatus such as we use, two india rubber pipes
leave this box and join a sort of tent which holds the nose and mouth;
one is to introduce fresh air, the other to let out the foul, and the tongue
closes one or the other according to the wants of the respirator.
But I, in encountering great pressures at the bottom of the sea,
was obliged to shut my head, like that of a diver in a ball of copper;
and it is to this ball of copper that the two pipes, the inspirator and
the expirator, open."

"Perfectly, Captain Nemo; but the air that you carry with you
must soon be used; when it only contains fifteen per cent.
of oxygen it is no longer fit to breathe."

"Right!  But I told you, M. Aronnax, that the pumps of the Nautilus allow
me to store the air under considerable pressure, and on those conditions
the reservoir of the apparatus can furnish breathable air for nine
or ten hours."

"I have no further objections to make," I answered.
"I will only ask you one thing, Captain--how can you light your
road at the bottom of the sea?"

"With the Ruhmkorff apparatus, M. Aronnax; one is carried on the back,
the other is fastened to the waist.  It is composed of a Bunsen pile,
which I do not work with bichromate of potash, but with sodium.
A wire is introduced which collects the electricity produced, and directs
it towards a particularly made lantern.  In this lantern is a spiral glass
which contains a small quantity of carbonic gas.  When the apparatus is at
work this gas becomes luminous, giving out a white and continuous light.
Thus provided, I can breathe and I can see."

"Captain Nemo, to all my objections you make such crushing answers that I
dare no longer doubt.  But, if I am forced to admit the Rouquayrol
and Ruhmkorff apparatus, I must be allowed some reservations with regard
to the gun I am to carry."

"But it is not a gun for powder," answered the Captain.

"Then it is an air-gun."

"Doubtless!  How would you have me manufacture gun powder on board,
without either saltpetre, sulphur, or charcoal?"

"Besides," I added, "to fire under water in a medium eight
hundred and fifty-five times denser than the air, we must
conquer very considerable resistance."

"That would be no difficulty.  There exist guns, according to Fulton,
perfected in England by Philip Coles and Burley, in France by Furcy,
and in Italy by Landi, which are furnished with a peculiar
system of closing, which can fire under these conditions.
But I repeat, having no powder, I use air under great pressure,
which the pumps of the Nautilus furnish abundantly."

"But this air must be rapidly used?"

"Well, have I not my Rouquayrol reservoir, which can furnish it at need?
A tap is all that is required.  Besides M. Aronnax, you must see
yourself that, during our submarine hunt, we can spend but little air
and but few balls."

"But it seems to me that in this twilight, and in the midst of this fluid,
which is very dense compared with the atmosphere, shots could not go far,
nor easily prove mortal."

"Sir, on the contrary, with this gun every blow is mortal;
and, however lightly the animal is touched, it falls as if struck
by a thunderbolt."

"Why?"

"Because the balls sent by this gun are not ordinary balls, but little
cases of glass.  These glass cases are covered with a case of steel,
and weighted with a pellet of lead; they are real Leyden bottles,
into which the electricity is forced to a very high tension.
With the slightest shock they are discharged, and the animal,
however strong it may be, falls dead.  I must tell you that these
cases are size number four, and that the charge for an ordinary gun
would be ten."

"I will argue no longer," I replied, rising from the table.
"I have nothing left me but to take my gun.  At all events,
I will go where you go."

Captain Nemo then led me aft; and in passing before Ned's and
Conseil's cabin, I called my two companions, who followed promptly.
We then came to a cell near the machinery-room, in which we put
on our walking-dress.



CHAPTER XV

A WALK ON THE BOTTOM OF THE SEA

This cell was, to speak correctly, the arsenal and wardrobe of the Nautilus.
A dozen diving apparatuses hung from the partition waiting our use.

Ned Land, on seeing them, showed evident repugnance to dress
himself in one.

"But, my worthy Ned, the forests of the Island of Crespo are nothing
but submarine forests."

"Good!" said the disappointed harpooner, who saw his dreams
of fresh meat fade away.  "And you, M. Aronnax, are you going
to dress yourself in those clothes?"

"There is no alternative, Master Ned."

"As you please, sir," replied the harpooner, shrugging his shoulders;
"but, as for me, unless I am forced, I will never get into one."

"No one will force you, Master Ned," said Captain Nemo.

"Is Conseil going to risk it?" asked Ned.

"I follow my master wherever he goes," replied Conseil.

At the Captain's call two of the ship's crew came to help us dress
in these heavy and impervious clothes, made of india-rubber without seam,
and constructed expressly to resist considerable pressure.
One would have thought it a suit of armour, both supple and resisting.
This suit formed trousers and waistcoat.  The trousers were
finished off with thick boots, weighted with heavy leaden soles.
The texture of the waistcoat was held together by bands of copper,
which crossed the chest, protecting it from the great pressure
of the water, and leaving the lungs free to act; the sleeves ended
in gloves, which in no way restrained the movement of the hands.
There was a vast difference noticeable between these consummate
apparatuses and the old cork breastplates, jackets, and other
contrivances in vogue during the eighteenth century.

Captain Nemo and one of his companions (a sort of Hercules,
who must have possessed great strength), Conseil and myself
were soon enveloped in the dresses.  There remained nothing
more to be done but to enclose our heads in the metal box.
But, before proceeding to this operation, I asked the Captain's
permission to examine the guns.

One of the Nautilus men gave me a simple gun, the butt end
of which, made of steel, hollow in the centre, was rather large.
It served as a reservoir for compressed air, which a valve,
worked by a spring, allowed to escape into a metal tube.
A box of projectiles in a groove in the thickness of the butt
end contained about twenty of these electric balls, which,
by means of a spring, were forced into the barrel of the gun.
As soon as one shot was fired, another was ready.

"Captain Nemo," said I, "this arm is perfect, and easily handled:
I only ask to be allowed to try it.  But how shall we gain the bottom
of the sea?"

"At this moment, Professor, the Nautilus is stranded in five fathoms,
and we have nothing to do but to start."

"But how shall we get off?"

"You shall see."

Captain Nemo thrust his head into the helmet, Conseil and I did the same,
not without hearing an ironical "Good sport!" from the Canadian.
The upper part of our dress terminated in a copper collar upon which
was screwed the metal helmet.  Three holes, protected by thick glass,
allowed us to see in all directions, by simply turning our head
in the interior of the head-dress. As soon as it was in position,
the Rouquayrol apparatus on our backs began to act; and, for my part,
I could breathe with ease.

With the Ruhmkorff lamp hanging from my belt, and the gun in my hand,
I was ready to set out.  But to speak the truth, imprisoned in
these heavy garments, and glued to the deck by my leaden soles,
it was impossible for me to take a step.

But this state of things was provided for.  I felt myself being
pushed into a little room contiguous to the wardrobe room.
My companions followed, towed along in the same way.  I heard
a water-tight door, furnished with stopper plates, close upon us,
and we were wrapped in profound darkness.

After some minutes, a loud hissing was heard.  I felt the cold
mount from my feet to my chest.  Evidently from some part of the
vessel they had, by means of a tap, given entrance to the water,
which was invading us, and with which the room was soon filled.
A second door cut in the side of the Nautilus then opened.
We saw a faint light.  In another instant our feet trod the bottom
of the sea.

And now, how can I retrace the impression left upon me by that walk
under the waters?  Words are impotent to relate such wonders!
Captain Nemo walked in front, his companion followed some steps behind.
Conseil and I remained near each other, as if an exchange of words
had been possible through our metallic cases.  I no longer felt
the weight of my clothing, or of my shoes, of my reservoir of air,
or my thick helmet, in the midst of which my head rattled like an almond
in its shell.

The light, which lit the soil thirty feet below the surface of
the ocean, astonished me by its power.  The solar rays shone through
the watery mass easily, and dissipated all colour, and I clearly
distinguished objects at a distance of a hundred and fifty yards.
Beyond that the tints darkened into fine gradations of ultramarine,
and faded into vague obscurity.  Truly this water which surrounded
me was but another air denser than the terrestrial atmosphere,
but almost as transparent.  Above me was the calm surface of the sea.
We were walking on fine, even sand, not wrinkled, as on a flat shore,
which retains the impression of the billows.  This dazzling carpet,
really a reflector, repelled the rays of the sun with wonderful intensity,
which accounted for the vibration which penetrated every atom of liquid.
Shall I be believed when I say that, at the depth of thirty feet,
I could see as if I was in broad daylight?

For a quarter of an hour I trod on this sand, sown with the impalpable
dust of shells.  The hull of the Nautilus, resembling a long shoal,
disappeared by degrees; but its lantern, when darkness should overtake us
in the waters, would help to guide us on board by its distinct rays.

Soon forms of objects outlined in the distance were discernible.
I recognised magnificent rocks, hung with a tapestry of zoophytes
of the most beautiful kind, and I was at first struck by the peculiar
effect of this medium.

It was then ten in the morning; the rays of the sun struck the surface
of the waves at rather an oblique angle, and at the touch of their light,
decomposed by refraction as through a prism, flowers, rocks, plants, shells,
and polypi were shaded at the edges by the seven solar colours.
It was marvellous, a feast for the eyes, this complication of coloured tints,
a perfect kaleidoscope of green, yellow, orange, violet, indigo, and blue;
in one word, the whole palette of an enthusiastic colourist!
Why could I not communicate to Conseil the lively sensations which were
mounting to my brain, and rival him in expressions of admiration?
For aught I knew, Captain Nemo and his companion might be able to exchange
thoughts by means of signs previously agreed upon.  So, for want of better,
I talked to myself; I declaimed in the copper box which covered my head,
thereby expending more air in vain words than was perhaps wise.

Various kinds of isis, clusters of pure tuft-coral, prickly fungi,
and anemones formed a brilliant garden of flowers, decked with their
collarettes of blue tentacles, sea-stars studding the sandy bottom.
It was a real grief to me to crush under my feet the brilliant
specimens of molluscs which strewed the ground by thousands,
of hammerheads, donaciae (veritable bounding shells), of staircases,
and red helmet-shells, angel-wings, and many others produced by this
inexhaustible ocean.  But we were bound to walk, so we went on,
whilst above our heads waved medusae whose umbrellas of opal
or rose-pink, escalloped with a band of blue, sheltered us from
the rays of the sun and fiery pelagiae, which, in the darkness,
would have strewn our path with phosphorescent light.

All these wonders I saw in the space of a quarter of a mile,
scarcely stopping, and following Captain Nemo, who beckoned me on
by signs.  Soon the nature of the soil changed; to the sandy plain
succeeded an extent of slimy mud which the Americans call "ooze,"
composed of equal parts of silicious and calcareous shells.  We then
travelled over a plain of seaweed of wild and luxuriant vegetation.
This sward was of close texture, and soft to the feet,
and rivalled the softest carpet woven by the hand of man.
But whilst verdure was spread at our feet, it did not abandon our heads.
A light network of marine plants, of that inexhaustible family
of seaweeds of which more than two thousand kinds are known,
grew on the surface of the water.

I noticed that the green plants kept nearer the top of the sea,
whilst the red were at a greater depth, leaving to the black
or brown the care of forming gardens and parterres in the remote
beds of the ocean.

We had quitted the Nautilus about an hour and a half.
It was near noon; I knew by the perpendicularity of the sun's rays,
which were no longer refracted.  The magical colours disappeared
by degrees, and the shades of emerald and sapphire were effaced.
We walked with a regular step, which rang upon the ground with
astonishing intensity; the slightest noise was transmitted with a
quickness to which the ear is unaccustomed on the earth; indeed, water is
a better conductor of sound than air, in the ratio of four to one.
At this period the earth sloped downwards; the light took a uniform tint.
We were at a depth of a hundred and five yards and twenty inches,
undergoing a pressure of six atmospheres.

At this depth I could still see the rays of the sun, though feebly;
to their intense brilliancy had succeeded a reddish twilight, the lowest
state between day and night; but we could still see well enough;
it was not necessary to resort to the Ruhmkorff apparatus as yet.
At this moment Captain Nemo stopped; he waited till I joined him,
and then pointed to an obscure mass, looming in the shadow,
at a short distance.

"It is the forest of the Island of Crespo," thought I;
and I was not mistaken.



CHAPTER XVI

A SUBMARINE FOREST

We had at last arrived on the borders of this forest,
doubtless one of the finest of Captain Nemo's immense domains.
He looked upon it as his own, and considered he had the same right
over it that the first men had in the first days of the world.
And, indeed, who would have disputed with him the possession
of this submarine property?  What other hardier pioneer would come,
hatchet in hand, to cut down the dark copses?

This forest was composed of large tree-plants; and the moment we
penetrated under its vast arcades, I was struck by the singular
position of their branches--a position I had not yet observed.

Not an herb which carpeted the ground, not a branch which clothed
the trees, was either broken or bent, nor did they extend horizontally;
all stretched up to the surface of the ocean.  Not a filament, not a ribbon,
however thin they might be, but kept as straight as a rod of iron.
The fuci and llianas grew in rigid perpendicular lines, due to the density
of the element which had produced them.  Motionless yet, when bent
to one side by the hand, they directly resumed their former position.
Truly it was the region of perpendicularity!

I soon accustomed myself to this fantastic position,
as well as to the comparative darkness which surrounded us.
The soil of the forest seemed covered with sharp blocks,
difficult to avoid.  The submarine flora struck me as being
very perfect, and richer even than it would have been in the arctic
or tropical zones, where these productions are not so plentiful.
But for some minutes I involuntarily confounded the genera,
taking animals for plants; and who would not have been mistaken?
The fauna and the flora are too closely allied in this submarine world.

These plants are self-propagated, and the principle of their
existence is in the water, which upholds and nourishes them.
The greater number, instead of leaves, shoot forth blades
of capricious shapes, comprised within a scale of colours pink,
carmine, green, olive, fawn, and brown.

"Curious anomaly, fantastic element!" said an ingenious naturalist,
"in which the animal kingdom blossoms, and the vegetable does not!"

In about an hour Captain Nemo gave the signal to halt; I, for my part,
was not sorry, and we stretched ourselves under an arbour of alariae,
the long thin blades of which stood up like arrows.

This short rest seemed delicious to me; there was nothing
wanting but the charm of conversation; but, impossible to speak,
impossible to answer, I only put my great copper head to Conseil's.
I saw the worthy fellow's eyes glistening with delight, and, to show
his satisfaction, he shook himself in his breastplate of air,
in the most comical way in the world.

After four hours of this walking, I was surprised not to find
myself dreadfully hungry.  How to account for this state
of the stomach I could not tell.  But instead I felt an
insurmountable desire to sleep, which happens to all divers.
And my eyes soon closed behind the thick glasses, and I fell into
a heavy slumber, which the movement alone had prevented before.
Captain Nemo and his robust companion, stretched in the clear crystal,
set us the example.

How long I remained buried in this drowsiness I cannot judge,
but, when I woke, the sun seemed sinking towards the horizon.
Captain Nemo had already risen, and I was beginning to stretch
my limbs, when an unexpected apparition brought me briskly
to my feet.

A few steps off, a monstrous sea-spider, about thirty-eight inches
high, was watching me with squinting eyes, ready to spring upon me.
Though my diver's dress was thick enough to defend me from
the bite of this animal, I could not help shuddering with horror.
Conseil and the sailor of the Nautilus awoke at this moment.
Captain Nemo pointed out the hideous crustacean, which a blow
from the butt end of the gun knocked over, and I saw the horrible
claws of the monster writhe in terrible convulsions.
This incident reminded me that other animals more to be feared
might haunt these obscure depths, against whose attacks my
diving-dress would not protect me.  I had never thought of it before,
but I now resolved to be upon my guard.  Indeed, I thought
that this halt would mark the termination of our walk;
but I was mistaken, for, instead of returning to the Nautilus,
Captain Nemo continued his bold excursion.  The ground was still
on the incline, its declivity seemed to be getting greater,
and to be leading us to greater depths.  It must have been
about three o'clock when we reached a narrow valley, between high
perpendicular walls, situated about seventy-five fathoms deep.
Thanks to the perfection of our apparatus, we were forty-five
fathoms below the limit which nature seems to have imposed on man
as to his submarine excursions.

I say seventy-five fathoms, though I had no instrument by which to
judge the distance.  But I knew that even in the clearest waters
the solar rays could not penetrate further.  And accordingly
the darkness deepened.  At ten paces not an object was visible.
I was groping my way, when I suddenly saw a brilliant white light.
Captain Nemo had just put his electric apparatus into use;
his companion did the same, and Conseil and I followed their example.
By turning a screw I established a communication between the wire
and the spiral glass, and the sea, lit by our four lanterns,
was illuminated for a circle of thirty-six yards.

As we walked I thought the light of our Ruhmkorff apparatus
could not fail to draw some inhabitant from its dark couch.
But if they did approach us, they at least kept at
a respectful distance from the hunters.  Several times
I saw Captain Nemo stop, put his gun to his shoulder,
and after some moments drop it and walk on.  At last,
after about four hours, this marvellous excursion came to an end.
A wall of superb rocks, in an imposing mass, rose before us,
a heap of gigantic blocks, an enormous, steep granite shore,
forming dark grottos, but which presented no practicable slope;
it was the prop of the Island of Crespo.  It was the earth!
Captain Nemo stopped suddenly.  A gesture of his brought us all
to a halt; and, however desirous I might be to scale the wall,
I was obliged to stop.  Here ended Captain Nemo's domains.
And he would not go beyond them.  Further on was a portion of the
globe he might not trample upon.

The return began.  Captain Nemo had returned to the head of his little band,
directing their course without hesitation.  I thought we were not following
the same road to return to the Nautilus.  The new road was very steep,
and consequently very painful.  We approached the surface of the sea rapidly.
But this return to the upper strata was not so sudden as to cause relief
from the pressure too rapidly, which might have produced serious disorder
in our organisation, and brought on internal lesions, so fatal to divers.
Very soon light reappeared and grew, and, the sun being low on the horizon,
the refraction edged the different objects with a spectral ring.
At ten yards and a half deep, we walked amidst a shoal of little fishes
of all kinds, more numerous than the birds of the air, and also more agile;
but no aquatic game worthy of a shot had as yet met our gaze, when at
that moment I saw the Captain shoulder his gun quickly, and follow
a moving object into the shrubs.  He fired; I heard a slight hissing,
and a creature fell stunned at some distance from us.  It was a magnificent
sea-otter, an enhydrus, the only exclusively marine quadruped.
This otter was five feet long, and must have been very valuable.
Its skin, chestnut-brown above and silvery underneath, would have made one
of those beautiful furs so sought after in the Russian and Chinese markets:
the fineness and the lustre of its coat would certainly fetch L80.
I admired this curious mammal, with its rounded head ornamented with
short ears, its round eyes, and white whiskers like those of a cat,
with webbed feet and nails, and tufted tail.  This precious animal,
hunted and tracked by fishermen, has now become very rare, and taken refuge
chiefly in the northern parts of the Pacific, or probably its race would
soon become extinct.

Captain Nemo's companion took the beast, threw it over his shoulder, and we
continued our journey.  For one hour a plain of sand lay stretched before us.
Sometimes it rose to within two yards and some inches of the surface of
the water.  I then saw our image clearly reflected, drawn inversely, and above
us appeared an identical group reflecting our movements and our actions;
in a word, like us in every point, except that they walked with their heads
downward and their feet in the air.

Another effect I noticed, which was the passage of thick clouds which formed
and vanished rapidly; but on reflection I understood that these seeming
clouds were due to the varying thickness of the reeds at the bottom,
and I could even see the fleecy foam which their broken tops multiplied
on the water, and the shadows of large birds passing above our heads,
whose rapid flight I could discern on the surface of the sea.

On this occasion I was witness to one of the finest gun
shots which ever made the nerves of a hunter thrill.
A large bird of great breadth of wing, clearly visible, approached,
hovering over us.  Captain Nemo's companion shouldered his gun
and fired, when it was only a few yards above the waves.
The creature fell stunned, and the force of its fall
brought it within the reach of dexterous hunter's grasp.
It was an albatross of the finest kind.

Our march had not been interrupted by this incident.
For two hours we followed these sandy plains, then fields of algae
very disagreeable to cross.  Candidly, I could do no more when I
saw a glimmer of light, which, for a half mile, broke the
darkness of the waters.  It was the lantern of the Nautilus.
Before twenty minutes were over we should be on board,
and I should be able to breathe with ease, for it seemed
that my reservoir supplied air very deficient in oxygen.
But I did not reckon on an accidental meeting which delayed our
arrival for some time.

I had remained some steps behind, when I presently saw Captain
Nemo coming hurriedly towards me.  With his strong hand he bent
me to the ground, his companion doing the same to Conseil.
At first I knew not what to think of this sudden attack, but I
was soon reassured by seeing the Captain lie down beside me,
and remain immovable.

I was stretched on the ground, just under the shelter of a bush
of algae, when, raising my head, I saw some enormous mass,
casting phosphorescent gleams, pass blusteringly by.

My blood froze in my veins as I recognised two formidable
sharks which threatened us.  It was a couple of tintoreas,
terrible creatures, with enormous tails and a dull glassy stare,
the phosphorescent matter ejected from holes pierced around the muzzle.
Monstrous brutes! which would crush a whole man in their iron jaws.
I did not know whether Conseil stopped to classify them; for my part,
I noticed their silver bellies, and their huge mouths bristling
with teeth, from a very unscientific point of view, and more as a
possible victim than as a naturalist.

Happily the voracious creatures do not see well.  They passed without
seeing us, brushing us with their brownish fins, and we escaped by a miracle
from a danger certainly greater than meeting a tiger full-face in the forest.
Half an hour after, guided by the electric light we reached the Nautilus.
The outside door had been left open, and Captain Nemo closed it
as soon as we had entered the first cell.  He then pressed a knob.
I heard the pumps working in the midst of the vessel, I felt the water
sinking from around me, and in a few moments the cell was entirely empty.
The inside door then opened, and we entered the vestry.

There our diving-dress was taken off, not without some trouble, and,
fairly worn out from want of food and sleep, I returned to my room,
in great wonder at this surprising excursion at the bottom of the sea.



CHAPTER XVII

FOUR THOUSAND LEAGUES UNDER THE PACIFIC

The next morning, the 18th of November, I had quite recovered from
my fatigues of the day before, and I went up on to the platform,
just as the second lieutenant was uttering his daily phrase.

I was admiring the magnificent aspect of the ocean when Captain
Nemo appeared.  He did not seem to be aware of my presence,
and began a series of astronomical observations.
Then, when he had finished, he went and leant on the cage
of the watch-light, and gazed abstractedly on the ocean.
In the meantime, a number of the sailors of the Nautilus,
all strong and healthy men, had come up onto the platform.
They came to draw up the nets that had been laid all night.
These sailors were evidently of different nations,
although the European type was visible in all of them.
I recognised some unmistakable Irishmen, Frenchmen, some Sclaves,
and a Greek, or a Candiote.  They were civil, and only used that odd
language among themselves, the origin of which I could not guess,
neither could I question them.

The nets were hauled in.  They were a large kind of "chaluts," like those
on the Normandy coasts, great pockets that the waves and a chain fixed
in the smaller meshes kept open.  These pockets, drawn by iron poles,
swept through the water, and gathered in everything in their way.
That day they brought up curious specimens from those productive coasts.

I reckoned that the haul had brought in more than nine hundredweight of fish.
It was a fine haul, but not to be wondered at.  Indeed, the nets are let
down for several hours, and enclose in their meshes an infinite variety.
We had no lack of excellent food, and the rapidity of the Nautilus
and the attraction of the electric light could always renew our supply.
These several productions of the sea were immediately lowered through the
panel to the steward's room, some to be eaten fresh, and others pickled.

The fishing ended, the provision of air renewed, I thought
that the Nautilus was about to continue its submarine excursion,
and was preparing to return to my room, when, without further preamble,
the Captain turned to me, saying:

"Professor, is not this ocean gifted with real life?  It has its
tempers and its gentle moods.  Yesterday it slept as we did, and now it
has woke after a quiet night.  Look!" he continued, "it wakes under
the caresses of the sun.  It is going to renew its diurnal existence.
It is an interesting study to watch the play of its organisation.
It has a pulse, arteries, spasms; and I agree with the learned Maury,
who discovered in it a circulation as real as the circulation of
blood in animals.

"Yes, the ocean has indeed circulation, and to promote it, the Creator
has caused things to multiply in it--caloric, salt, and animalculae."

When Captain Nemo spoke thus, he seemed altogether changed,
and aroused an extraordinary emotion in me.

"Also," he added, "true existence is there; and I can imagine
the foundations of nautical towns, clusters of submarine houses,
which, like the Nautilus, would ascend every morning to breathe
at the surface of the water, free towns, independent cities.
Yet who knows whether some despot----"

Captain Nemo finished his sentence with a violent gesture.
Then, addressing me as if to chase away some sorrowful thought:

"M. Aronnax," he asked.  "do you know the depth of the ocean?"

"I only know, Captain, what the principal soundings have taught us."

"Could you tell me them, so that I can suit them to my purpose?"

"These are some," I replied, "that I remember.  If I am not mistaken,
a depth of 8,000 yards has been found in the North Atlantic,
and 2,500 yards in the Mediterranean.  The most remarkable soundings
have been made in the South Atlantic, near the thirty-fifth parallel,
and they gave 12,000 yards, 14,000 yards, and 15,000 yards.
To sum up all, it is reckoned that if the bottom of the sea were levelled,
its mean depth would be about one and three-quarter leagues."

"Well, Professor," replied the Captain, "we shall show you better
than that I hope.  As to the mean depth of this part of the Pacific,
I tell you it is only 4,000 yards."

Having said this, Captain Nemo went towards the panel,
and disappeared down the ladder.  I followed him, and went into
the large drawing-room. The screw was immediately put in motion,
and the log gave twenty miles an hour.

During the days and weeks that passed, Captain Nemo
was very sparing of his visits.  I seldom saw him.
The lieutenant pricked the ship's course regularly on the chart,
so I could always tell exactly the route of the Nautilus.

Nearly every day, for some time, the panels of the drawing-room were opened,
and we were never tired of penetrating the mysteries of the submarine world.

The general direction of the Nautilus was south-east, and it kept between 100
and 150 yards of depth.  One day, however, I do not know why, being drawn
diagonally by means of the inclined planes, it touched the bed of the sea.
The thermometer indicated a temperature of 4.25 (cent.): a temperature that at
this depth seemed common to all latitudes.

At three o'clock in the morning of the 26th of November the Nautilus
crossed the tropic of Cancer at 172@ long.  On 27th instant it
sighted the Sandwich Islands, where Cook died, February 14, 1779.
We had then gone 4,860 leagues from our starting-point. In the morning,
when I went on the platform, I saw two miles to windward,
Hawaii, the largest of the seven islands that form the group.
I saw clearly the cultivated ranges, and the several mountain-chains
that run parallel with the side, and the volcanoes that overtop
Mouna-Rea, which rise 5,000 yards above the level of the sea.
Besides other things the nets brought up, were several flabellariae
and graceful polypi, that are peculiar to that part of the ocean.
The direction of the Nautilus was still to the south-east. It crossed
the equator December 1, in 142@ long.; and on the 4th of the same month,
after crossing rapidly and without anything in particular occurring,
we sighted the Marquesas group.  I saw, three miles off, Martin's peak
in Nouka-Hiva, the largest of the group that belongs to France.
I only saw the woody mountains against the horizon, because Captain Nemo
did not wish to bring the ship to the wind.  There the nets brought up
beautiful specimens of fish:  some with azure fins and tails like gold,
the flesh of which is unrivalled; some nearly destitute of scales,
but of exquisite flavour; others, with bony jaws, and yellow-tinged
gills, as good as bonitos; all fish that would be of use to us.
After leaving these charming islands protected by the French flag,
from the 4th to the 11th of December the Nautilus sailed over about
2,000 miles.

During the daytime of the 11th of December I was busy reading
in the large drawing-room. Ned Land and Conseil watched the luminous
water through the half-open panels.  The Nautilus was immovable.
While its reservoirs were filled, it kept at a depth of 1,000 yards,
a region rarely visited in the ocean, and in which large fish
were seldom seen.

I was then reading a charming book by Jean Mace, The Slaves of the Stomach,
and I was learning some valuable lessons from it, when Conseil interrupted me.

"Will master come here a moment?" he said, in a curious voice.

"What is the matter, Conseil?"

"I want master to look."

I rose, went, and leaned on my elbows before the panes and watched.

In a full electric light, an enormous black mass, quite immovable,
was suspended in the midst of the waters.  I watched it attentively,
seeking to find out the nature of this gigantic cetacean.
But a sudden thought crossed my mind.  "A vessel!"
I said, half aloud.

"Yes," replied the Canadian, "a disabled ship that has sunk perpendicularly."

Ned Land was right; we were close to a vessel of which the tattered
shrouds still hung from their chains.  The keel seemed to be
in good order, and it had been wrecked at most some few hours.
Three stumps of masts, broken off about two feet above the bridge,
showed that the vessel had had to sacrifice its masts.  But, lying on
its side, it had filled, and it was heeling over to port.
This skeleton of what it had once been was a sad spectacle as it lay
lost under the waves, but sadder still was the sight of the bridge,
where some corpses, bound with ropes, were still lying.
I counted five--four men, one of whom was standing at the helm,
and a woman standing by the poop, holding an infant in her arms.
She was quite young.  I could distinguish her features, which the water
had not decomposed, by the brilliant light from the Nautilus.
In one despairing effort, she had raised her infant above her head--
poor little thing!--whose arms encircled its mother's neck.
The attitude of the four sailors was frightful, distorted as they
were by their convulsive movements, whilst making a last effort
to free themselves from the cords that bound them to the vessel.
The steersman alone, calm, with a grave, clear face, his grey hair
glued to his forehead, and his hand clutching the wheel of the helm,
seemed even then to be guiding the three broken masts through the depths
of the ocean.

What a scene!  We were dumb; our hearts beat fast before this shipwreck,
taken as it were from life and photographed in its last moments.
And I saw already, coming towards it with hungry eyes, enormous sharks,
attracted by the human flesh.

However, the Nautilus, turning, went round the submerged vessel,
and in one instant I read on the stern--"The Florida, Sunderland."



CHAPTER XVIII

VANIKORO

This terrible spectacle was the forerunner of the series of maritime
catastrophes that the Nautilus was destined to meet with in its route.
As long as it went through more frequented waters, we often saw
the hulls of shipwrecked vessels that were rotting in the depths,
and deeper down cannons, bullets, anchors, chains, and a thousand
other iron materials eaten up by rust.  However, on the 11th of
December we sighted the Pomotou Islands, the old "dangerous group"
of Bougainville, that extend over a space of 500 leagues at
E.S.E. to W.N.W., from the Island Ducie to that of Lazareff.
This group covers an area of 370 square leagues, and it is formed
of sixty groups of islands, among which the Gambier group is remarkable,
over which France exercises sway.  These are coral islands,
slowly raised, but continuous, created by the daily work of polypi.
Then this new island will be joined later on to the neighboring groups,
and a fifth continent will stretch from New Zealand and New Caledonia,
and from thence to the Marquesas.

One day, when I was suggesting this theory to Captain Nemo,
he replied coldly:

"The earth does not want new continents, but new men."

{5 paragraphs have been stripped from this edition}

On 15th of December, we left to the east the bewitching group
of the Societies and the graceful Tahiti, queen of the Pacific.
I saw in the morning, some miles to the windward, the elevated
summits of the island.  These waters furnished our table
with excellent fish, mackerel, bonitos, and some varieties
of a sea-serpent.

On the 25th of December the Nautilus sailed into the midst of the
New Hebrides, discovered by Quiros in 1606, and that Bougainville
explored in 1768, and to which Cook gave its present name in 1773.
This group is composed principally of nine large islands, that form
a band of 120 leagues N.N.S. to S.S.W., between 15@ and 2@ S. lat.,
and 164@ and 168@ long.  We passed tolerably near to the Island of Aurou,
that at noon looked like a mass of green woods, surmounted by a peak
of great height.

That day being Christmas Day, Ned Land seemed to regret sorely
the non-celebration of "Christmas," the family fete of which
Protestants are so fond.  I had not seen Captain Nemo for a week,
when, on the morning of the 27th, he came into the large drawing-room,
always seeming as if he had seen you five minutes before.
I was busily tracing the route of the Nautilus on the planisphere.
The Captain came up to me, put his finger on one spot on the chart,
and said this single word.

"Vanikoro."

The effect was magical!  It was the name of the islands on which La
Perouse had been lost!  I rose suddenly.

"The Nautilus has brought us to Vanikoro?"  I asked.

"Yes, Professor," said the Captain.

"And I can visit the celebrated islands where the Boussole
and the Astrolabe struck?"

"If you like, Professor."

"When shall we be there?"

"We are there now."

Followed by Captain Nemo, I went up on to the platform,
and greedily scanned the horizon.

To the N.E. two volcanic islands emerged of unequal size,
surrounded by a coral reef that measured forty miles in circumference.
We were close to Vanikoro, really the one to which Dumont d'Urville
gave the name of Isle de la Recherche, and exactly facing the little
harbour of Vanou, situated in 16@ 4' S. lat., and 164@ 32' E. long.
The earth seemed covered with verdure from the shore to the summits
in the interior, that were crowned by Mount Kapogo, 476 feet high.
The Nautilus, having passed the outer belt of rocks by a narrow strait,
found itself among breakers where the sea was from thirty to forty
fathoms deep.  Under the verdant shade of some mangroves I perceived
some savages, who appeared greatly surprised at our approach.
In the long black body, moving between wind and water, did they not see
some formidable cetacean that they regarded with suspicion?

Just then Captain Nemo asked me what I knew about the wreck of La Perouse.

"Only what everyone knows, Captain," I replied.

"And could you tell me what everyone knows about it?"
he inquired, ironically.

"Easily."

I related to him all that the last works of Dumont d'Urville had made known--
works from which the following is a brief account.

La Perouse, and his second, Captain de Langle, were sent
by Louis XVI, in 1785, on a voyage of circumnavigation.
They embarked in the corvettes Boussole and the Astrolabe,
neither of which were again heard of.  In 1791, the French
Government, justly uneasy as to the fate of these two sloops,
manned two large merchantmen, the Recherche and the Esperance,
which left Brest the 28th of September under the command
of Bruni d'Entrecasteaux.

Two months after, they learned from Bowen, commander of the Albemarle,
that the debris of shipwrecked vessels had been seen on the coasts
of New Georgia.  But D'Entrecasteaux, ignoring this communication--
rather uncertain, besides--directed his course towards the Admiralty Islands,
mentioned in a report of Captain Hunter's as being the place where La
Perouse was wrecked.

They sought in vain.  The Esperance and the Recherche passed before Vanikoro
without stopping there, and, in fact, this voyage was most disastrous,
as it cost D'Entrecasteaux his life, and those of two of his lieutenants,
besides several of his crew.

Captain Dillon, a shrewd old Pacific sailor, was the first to find
unmistakable traces of the wrecks.  On the 15th of May, 1824, his vessel,
the St. Patrick, passed close to Tikopia, one of the New Hebrides.
There a Lascar came alongside in a canoe, sold him the handle of a sword
in silver that bore the print of characters engraved on the hilt.
The Lascar pretended that six years before, during a stay at Vanikoro,
he had seen two Europeans that belonged to some vessels that had run
aground on the reefs some years ago.

Dillon guessed that he meant La Perouse, whose disappearance had
troubled the whole world.  He tried to get on to Vanikoro, where,
according to the Lascar, he would find numerous debris of the wreck,
but winds and tides prevented him.

Dillon returned to Calcutta.  There he interested the Asiatic Society
and the Indian Company in his discovery.  A vessel, to which was given
the name of the Recherche, was put at his disposal, and he set out,
23rd January, 1827, accompanied by a French agent.

The Recherche, after touching at several points in the Pacific,
cast anchor before Vanikoro, 7th July, 1827, in that same harbour
of Vanou where the Nautilus was at this time.

There it collected numerous relics of the wreck--
iron utensils, anchors, pulley-strops, swivel-guns, an 18 lb.
shot, fragments of astronomical instruments, a piece of crown work,
and a bronze clock, bearing this inscription--"Bazin m'a fait,"
the mark of the foundry of the arsenal at Brest about 1785.
There could be no further doubt.

Dillon, having made all inquiries, stayed in the unlucky place till October.
Then he quitted Vanikoro, and directed his course towards New Zealand;
put into Calcutta, 7th April, 1828, and returned to France, where he was
warmly welcomed by Charles X.

But at the same time, without knowing Dillon's movements,
Dumont d'Urville had already set out to find the scene of the wreck.
And they had learned from a whaler that some medals and a cross of St. Louis
had been found in the hands of some savages of Louisiade and New Caledonia.
Dumont d'Urville, commander of the Astrolabe, had then sailed,
and two months after Dillon had left Vanikoro he put into Hobart Town.
There he learned the results of Dillon's inquiries, and found that a certain
James Hobbs, second lieutenant of the Union of Calcutta, after landing
on an island situated 8@ 18' S. lat., and 156@ 30' E. long., had seen
some iron bars and red stuffs used by the natives of these parts.
Dumont d'Urville, much perplexed, and not knowing how to credit the reports
of low-class journals, decided to follow Dillon's track.

On the 10th of February, 1828, the Astrolabe appeared off Tikopia,
and took as guide and interpreter a deserter found on the island;
made his way to Vanikoro, sighted it on the 12th inst., lay among
the reefs until the 14th, and not until the 20th did he cast anchor
within the barrier in the harbour of Vanou.

On the 23rd, several officers went round the island and brought
back some unimportant trifles.  The natives, adopting a system
of denials and evasions, refused to take them to the unlucky place.
This ambiguous conduct led them to believe that the natives had
ill-treated the castaways, and indeed they seemed to fear that Dumont
d'Urville had come to avenge La Perouse and his unfortunate crew.

However, on the 26th, appeased by some presents, and understanding that they
had no reprisals to fear, they led M. Jacquireot to the scene of the wreck.

There, in three or four fathoms of water, between the reefs
of Pacou and Vanou, lay anchors, cannons, pigs of lead and iron,
embedded in the limy concretions.  The large boat and the whaler
belonging to the Astrolabe were sent to this place, and, not without
some difficulty, their crews hauled up an anchor weighing 1,800
lbs., a brass gun, some pigs of iron, and two copper swivel-guns.

Dumont d'Urville, questioning the natives, learned too that La Perouse,
after losing both his vessels on the reefs of this island,
had constructed a smaller boat, only to be lost a second time.
Where, no one knew.

But the French Government, fearing that Dumont d'Urville was
not acquainted with Dillon's movements, had sent the sloop
Bayonnaise, commanded by Legoarant de Tromelin, to Vanikoro,
which had been stationed on the west coast of America.
The Bayonnaise cast her anchor before Vanikoro some months
after the departure of the Astrolabe, but found no new document;
but stated that the savages had respected the monument to La Perouse.
That is the substance of what I told Captain Nemo.

"So," he said, "no one knows now where the third vessel perished
that was constructed by the castaways on the island of Vanikoro?"

"No one knows."

Captain Nemo said nothing, but signed to me to follow him into
the large saloon.  The Nautilus sank several yards below the waves,
and the panels were opened.

I hastened to the aperture, and under the crustations of coral,
covered with fungi, I recognised certain debris that the drags had
not been able to tear up--iron stirrups, anchors, cannons, bullets,
capstan fittings, the stem of a ship, all objects clearly proving
the wreck of some vessel, and now carpeted with living flowers.
While I was looking on this desolate scene, Captain Nemo said,
in a sad voice:

{this above para was edited}

"Commander La Perouse set out 7th December, 1785, with his vessels
La Boussole and the Astrolabe.  He first cast anchor at Botany Bay,
visited the Friendly Isles, New Caledonia, then directed his course
towards Santa Cruz, and put into Namouka, one of the Hapai group.
Then his vessels struck on the unknown reefs of Vanikoro.
The Boussole, which went first, ran aground on the southerly coast.
The Astrolabe went to its help, and ran aground too.  The first vessel
was destroyed almost immediately.  The second, stranded under the wind,
resisted some days.  The natives made the castaways welcome.
They installed themselves in the island, and constructed a smaller boat
with the debris of the two large ones.  Some sailors stayed willingly
at Vanikoro; the others, weak and ill, set out with La Perouse.
They directed their course towards the Solomon Islands, and there perished,
with everything, on the westerly coast of the chief island of the group,
between Capes Deception and Satisfaction."

"How do you know that?"

"By this, that I found on the spot where was the last wreck."

Captain Nemo showed me a tin-plate box, stamped with the French arms,
and corroded by the salt water.  He opened it, and I saw a bundle of papers,
yellow but still readable.

They were the instructions of the naval minister to Commander La Perouse,
annotated in the margin in Louis XVI's handwriting.

"Ah! it is a fine death for a sailor!" said Captain Nemo, at last.
"A coral tomb makes a quiet grave; and I trust that I and my comrades
will find no other."



CHAPTER XIX

TORRES STRAITS

During the night of the 27th or 28th of December,
the Nautilus left the shores of Vanikoro with great speed.
Her course was south-westerly, and in three days she had gone
over the 750 leagues that separated it from La Perouse's group
and the south-east point of Papua.

Early on the 1st of January, 1863, Conseil joined me on the platform.

"Master, will you permit me to wish you a happy New Year?"

"What!  Conseil; exactly as if I was at Paris in my study
at the Jardin des Plantes?  Well, I accept your good wishes,
and thank you for them.  Only, I will ask you what you mean
by a `Happy New Year' under our circumstances?  Do you mean
the year that will bring us to the end of our imprisonment,
or the year that sees us continue this strange voyage?"

"Really, I do not know how to answer, master.  We are sure to see
curious things, and for the last two months we have not had time
for dullness.  The last marvel is always the most astonishing;
and, if we continue this progression, I do not know how it will end.
It is my opinion that we shall never again see the like.
I think then, with no offence to master, that a happy year would be
one in which we could see everything."

On 2nd January we had made 11,340 miles, or 5,250
French leagues, since our starting-point in the Japan Seas.
Before the ship's head stretched the dangerous shores
of the coral sea, on the north-east coast of Australia.
Our boat lay along some miles from the redoubtable bank
on which Cook's vessel was lost, 10th June, 1770.  The boat
in which Cook was struck on a rock, and, if it did not sink,
it was owing to a piece of coral that was broken by the shock,
and fixed itself in the broken keel.

I had wished to visit the reef, 360 leagues long, against which the sea,
always rough, broke with great violence, with a noise like thunder.
But just then the inclined planes drew the Nautilus down to a great depth,
and I could see nothing of the high coral walls.  I had to content
myself with the different specimens of fish brought up by the nets.
I remarked, among others, some germons, a species of mackerel as large
as a tunny, with bluish sides, and striped with transverse bands,
that disappear with the animal's life.  These fish followed us in shoals,
and furnished us with very delicate food.  We took also a large number
of giltheads, about one and a half inches long, tasting like dorys;
and flying fire-fish like submarine swallows, which, in dark nights,
light alternately the air and water with their phosphorescent light.{2
sentences missing here}

Two days after crossing the coral sea, 4th January, we sighted
the Papuan coasts.  On this occasion, Captain Nemo informed me that his
intention was to get into the Indian Ocean by the Strait of Torres.
His communication ended there.

The Torres Straits are nearly thirty-four leagues wide; but they are
obstructed by an innumerable quantity of islands, islets, breakers,
and rocks, that make its navigation almost impracticable;
so that Captain Nemo took all needful precautions to cross them.
The Nautilus, floating betwixt wind and water, went at a moderate pace.
Her screw, like a cetacean's tail, beat the waves slowly.

Profiting by this, I and my two companions went up on to the
deserted platform.  Before us was the steersman's cage, and I expected
that Captain Nemo was there directing the course of the Nautilus.
I had before me the excellent charts of the Straits of Torres, and I
consulted them attentively.  Round the Nautilus the sea dashed furiously.
The course of the waves, that went from south-east to north-west at
the rate of two and a half miles, broke on the coral that showed itself
here and there.

"This is a bad sea!" remarked Ned Land.

"Detestable indeed, and one that does not suit a boat like the Nautilus."

"The Captain must be very sure of his route, for I see there pieces of coral
that would do for its keel if it only touched them slightly."

Indeed the situation was dangerous, but the Nautilus seemed to slide
like magic off these rocks.  It did not follow the routes of the
Astrolabe and the Zelee exactly, for they proved fatal to Dumont
d'Urville. It bore more northwards, coasted the Islands of Murray,
and came back to the south-west towards Cumberland Passage.
I thought it was going to pass it by, when, going back to north-west,
it went through a large quantity of islands and islets little known,
towards the Island Sound and Canal Mauvais.

I wondered if Captain Nemo, foolishly imprudent, would steer his
vessel into that pass where Dumont d'Urville's two corvettes touched;
when, swerving again, and cutting straight through to the west,
he steered for the Island of Gilboa.

It was then three in the afternoon.  The tide began to recede,
being quite full.  The Nautilus approached the island, that I
still saw, with its remarkable border of screw-pines. He stood off
it at about two miles distant.  Suddenly a shock overthrew me.
The Nautilus just touched a rock, and stayed immovable,
laying lightly to port side.

When I rose, I perceived Captain Nemo and his lieutenant on the platform.
They were examining the situation of the vessel, and exchanging words in
their incomprehensible dialect.

She was situated thus:  Two miles, on the starboard side,
appeared Gilboa, stretching from north to west like an immense arm.
Towards the south and east some coral showed itself, left by the ebb.
We had run aground, and in one of those seas where the tides
are middling--a sorry matter for the floating of the Nautilus.
However, the vessel had not suffered, for her keel was solidly joined.
But, if she could neither glide off nor move, she ran the risk
of being for ever fastened to these rocks, and then Captain Nemo's
submarine vessel would be done for.

I was reflecting thus, when the Captain, cool and calm,
always master of himself, approached me.

"An accident?"  I asked.

"No; an incident."

"But an incident that will oblige you perhaps to become an inhabitant
of this land from which you flee?"

Captain Nemo looked at me curiously, and made a negative gesture, as much
as to say that nothing would force him to set foot on terra firma again.
Then he said:

"Besides, M. Aronnax, the Nautilus is not lost; it will
carry you yet into the midst of the marvels of the ocean.
Our voyage is only begun, and I do not wish to be deprived so soon
of the honour of your company."

"However, Captain Nemo," I replied, without noticing the ironical
turn of his phrase, "the Nautilus ran aground in open sea.
Now the tides are not strong in the Pacific; and, if you cannot
lighten the Nautilus, I do not see how it will be reinflated."

"The tides are not strong in the Pacific:  you are right there,
Professor; but in Torres Straits one finds still a difference
of a yard and a half between the level of high and low seas.
To-day is 4th January, and in five days the moon will be full.
Now, I shall be very much astonished if that satellite does
not raise these masses of water sufficiently, and render me
a service that I should be indebted to her for."

Having said this, Captain Nemo, followed by his lieutenant,
redescended to the interior of the Nautilus.  As to the vessel,
it moved not, and was immovable, as if the coralline polypi had
already walled it up with their in destructible cement.

"Well, sir?" said Ned Land, who came up to me after the departure
of the Captain.

"Well, friend Ned, we will wait patiently for the tide on the 9th instant;
for it appears that the moon will have the goodness to put it off again."

"Really?"

"Really."

"And this Captain is not going to cast anchor at all since the tide
will suffice?" said Conseil, simply.

The Canadian looked at Conseil, then shrugged his shoulders.

"Sir, you may believe me when I tell you that this piece of iron will navigate
neither on nor under the sea again; it is only fit to be sold for its weight.
I think, therefore, that the time has come to part company with Captain Nemo."

"Friend Ned, I do not despair of this stout Nautilus, as you do;
and in four days we shall know what to hold to on the Pacific tides.
Besides, flight might be possible if we were in sight of the English
or Provencal coast; but on the Papuan shores, it is another thing;
and it will be time enough to come to that extremity if the Nautilus
does not recover itself again, which I look upon as a grave event."

"But do they know, at least, how to act circumspectly?  There is an island;
on that island there are trees; under those trees, terrestrial animals,
bearers of cutlets and roast beef, to which I would willingly give a trial."

"In this, friend Ned is right," said Conseil, "and I agree with him.
Could not master obtain permission from his friend Captain Nemo to put us
on land, if only so as not to lose the habit of treading on the solid parts
of our planet?"

"I can ask him, but he will refuse."

"Will master risk it?" asked Conseil, "and we shall know how to rely
upon the Captain's amiability."

To my great surprise, Captain Nemo gave me the permission I asked for,
and he gave it very agreeably, without even exacting from me a promise
to return to the vessel; but flight across New Guinea might be
very perilous, and I should not have counselled Ned Land to attempt it.
Better to be a prisoner on board the Nautilus than to fall into the hands
of the natives.

At eight o'clock, armed with guns and hatchets, we got off the Nautilus.
The sea was pretty calm; a slight breeze blew on land.
Conseil and I rowing, we sped along quickly, and Ned steered
in the straight passage that the breakers left between them.
The boat was well handled, and moved rapidly.

Ned Land could not restrain his joy.  He was like a prisoner that had escaped
from prison, and knew not that it was necessary to re-enter it.

"Meat!  We are going to eat some meat; and what meat!" he replied.
"Real game! no, bread, indeed."

"I do not say that fish is not good; we must not abuse it;
but a piece of fresh venison, grilled on live coals,
will agreeably vary our ordinary course."

"Glutton!" said Conseil, "he makes my mouth water."

"It remains to be seen," I said, "if these forests are full of game,
and if the game is not such as will hunt the hunter himself."

"Well said, M. Aronnax," replied the Canadian, whose teeth seemed
sharpened like the edge of a hatchet; "but I will eat tiger--
loin of tiger--if there is no other quadruped on this island."

"Friend Ned is uneasy about it," said Conseil.

"Whatever it may be," continued Ned Land, "every animal with four
paws without feathers, or with two paws without feathers,
will be saluted by my first shot."

"Very well!  Master Land's imprudences are beginning."

"Never fear, M. Aronnax," replied the Canadian; "I do not want
twenty-five minutes to offer you a dish, of my sort."

At half-past eight the Nautilus boat ran softly aground
on a heavy sand, after having happily passed the coral reef
that surrounds the Island of Gilboa.



CHAPTER XX

A FEW DAYS ON LAND

I was much impressed on touching land.  Ned Land tried
the soil with his feet, as if to take possession of it.
However, it was only two months before that we had become,
according to Captain Nemo, "passengers on board the Nautilus,"
but, in reality, prisoners of its commander.

In a few minutes we were within musket-shot of the coast.
The whole horizon was hidden behind a beautiful curtain of forests.
Enormous trees, the trunks of which attained a height of 200 feet,
were tied to each other by garlands of bindweed, real natural
hammocks, which a light breeze rocked.  They were mimosas,
figs, hibisci, and palm trees, mingled together in profusion;
and under the shelter of their verdant vault grew orchids,
leguminous plants, and ferns.

But, without noticing all these beautiful specimens of Papuan flora,
the Canadian abandoned the agreeable for the useful.
He discovered a coco-tree, beat down some of the fruit, broke them,
and we drunk the milk and ate the nut with a satisfaction that
protested against the ordinary food on the Nautilus.

"Excellent!" said Ned Land.

"Exquisite!" replied Conseil.

"And I do not think," said the Canadian, "that he would object
to our introducing a cargo of coco-nuts on board."

"I do not think he would, but he would not taste them."

"So much the worse for him," said Conseil.

"And so much the better for us," replied Ned Land.
"There will be more for us."

"One word only, Master Land," I said to the harpooner, who was
beginning to ravage another coco-nut tree.  "Coco-nuts are good things,
but before filling the canoe with them it would be wise to reconnoitre
and see if the island does not produce some substance not less useful.
Fresh vegetables would be welcome on board the Nautilus."

"Master is right," replied Conseil; "and I propose to reserve three places
in our vessel, one for fruits, the other for vegetables, and the third
for the venison, of which I have not yet seen the smallest specimen."

"Conseil, we must not despair," said the Canadian.

"Let us continue," I returned, "and lie in wait.  Although the island
seems uninhabited, it might still contain some individuals that would
be less hard than we on the nature of game."

"Ho! ho!" said Ned Land, moving his jaws significantly.

"Well, Ned!" said Conseil.

"My word!" returned the Canadian, "I begin to understand
the charms of anthropophagy."

"Ned!  Ned! what are you saying?  You, a man-eater? I should
not feel safe with you, especially as I share your cabin.
I might perhaps wake one day to find myself half devoured."

"Friend Conseil, I like you much, but not enough to eat you unnecessarily."

"I would not trust you," replied Conseil.  "But enough.
We must absolutely bring down some game to satisfy this cannibal,
or else one of these fine mornings, master will find only pieces
of his servant to serve him."

While we were talking thus, we were penetrating the sombre arches
of the forest, and for two hours we surveyed it in all directions.

Chance rewarded our search for eatable vegetables,
and one of the most useful products of the tropical zones
furnished us with precious food that we missed on board.
I would speak of the bread-fruit tree, very abundant in the island
of Gilboa; and I remarked chiefly the variety destitute of seeds,
which bears in Malaya the name of "rima."

Ned Land knew these fruits well.  He had already eaten many during his
numerous voyages, and he knew how to prepare the eatable substance.
Moreover, the sight of them excited him, and he could contain
himself no longer.

"Master," he said, "I shall die if I do not taste a little
of this bread-fruit pie."

"Taste it, friend Ned--taste it as you want.  We are here
to make experiments--make them."

"It won't take long," said the Canadian.

And, provided with a lentil, he lighted a fire of dead wood that
crackled joyously.  During this time, Conseil and I chose the best
fruits of the bread-fruit. Some had not then attained a sufficient
degree of maturity; and their thick skin covered a white but rather
fibrous pulp.  Others, the greater number yellow and gelatinous,
waited only to be picked.

These fruits enclosed no kernel.  Conseil brought a dozen to Ned Land,
who placed them on a coal fire, after having cut them in thick slices,
and while doing this repeating:

"You will see, master, how good this bread is.
More so when one has been deprived of it so long.
It is not even bread," added he, "but a delicate pastry.
You have eaten none, master?"

"No, Ned."

"Very well, prepare yourself for a juicy thing.  If you do not come for more,
I am no longer the king of harpooners."

After some minutes, the part of the fruits that was exposed to the fire
was completely roasted.  The interior looked like a white pasty,
a sort of soft crumb, the flavour of which was like that of an artichoke.

It must be confessed this bread was excellent, and I ate of it
with great relish.

"What time is it now?" asked the Canadian.

"Two o'clock at least," replied Conseil.

"How time flies on firm ground!" sighed Ned Land.

"Let us be off," replied Conseil.

We returned through the forest, and completed our collection by a raid
upon the cabbage-palms, that we gathered from the tops of the trees,
little beans that I recognised as the "abrou" of the Malays, and yams
of a superior quality.

We were loaded when we reached the boat.  But Ned Land did not
find his provisions sufficient.  Fate, however, favoured us.
Just as we were pushing off, he perceived several trees,
from twenty-five to thirty feet high, a species of palm-tree.

At last, at five o'clock in the evening, loaded with our riches,
we quitted the shore, and half an hour after we hailed the Nautilus.
No one appeared on our arrival.  The enormous iron-plated cylinder
seemed deserted.  The provisions embarked, I descended to my chamber,
and after supper slept soundly.

The next day, 6th January, nothing new on board.
Not a sound inside, not a sign of life.  The boat rested
along the edge, in the same place in which we had left it.
We resolved to return to the island.  Ned Land hoped to be
more fortunate than on the day before with regard to the hunt,
and wished to visit another part of the forest.

At dawn we set off.  The boat, carried on by the waves that flowed to shore,
reached the island in a few minutes.

We landed, and, thinking that it was better to give in to the Canadian,
we followed Ned Land, whose long limbs threatened to distance us.
He wound up the coast towards the west:  then, fording some torrents,
he gained the high plain that was bordered with admirable forests.
Some kingfishers were rambling along the water-courses, but they would
not let themselves be approached.  Their circumspection proved to me
that these birds knew what to expect from bipeds of our species, and I
concluded that, if the island was not inhabited, at least human beings
occasionally frequented it.

After crossing a rather large prairie, we arrived at the skirts of a little
wood that was enlivened by the songs and flight of a large number of birds.

"There are only birds," said Conseil.

"But they are eatable," replied the harpooner.

"I do not agree with you, friend Ned, for I see only parrots there."

"Friend Conseil," said Ned, gravely, "the parrot is like pheasant
to those who have nothing else."

"And," I added, "this bird, suitably prepared, is worth knife and fork."

Indeed, under the thick foliage of this wood, a world of parrots
were flying from branch to branch, only needing a careful
education to speak the human language.  For the moment, they were
chattering with parrots of all colours, and grave cockatoos,
who seemed to meditate upon some philosophical problem,
whilst brilliant red lories passed like a piece of bunting carried
away by the breeze, papuans, with the finest azure colours,
and in all a variety of winged things most charming to behold,
but few eatable.

However, a bird peculiar to these lands, and which has never passed
the limits of the Arrow and Papuan islands, was wanting in this collection.
But fortune reserved it for me before long.

After passing through a moderately thick copse, we found a plain
obstructed with bushes.  I saw then those magnificent birds,
the disposition of whose long feathers obliges them to fly against
the wind.  Their undulating flight, graceful aerial curves,
and the shading of their colours, attracted and charmed one's looks.
I had no trouble in recognising them.

"Birds of paradise!"  I exclaimed.

The Malays, who carry on a great trade in these birds with the Chinese,
have several means that we could not employ for taking them.
Sometimes they put snares on the top of high trees that the birds
of paradise prefer to frequent.  Sometimes they catch them with a
viscous birdlime that paralyses their movements.  They even go so far
as to poison the fountains that the birds generally drink from.
But we were obliged to fire at them during flight, which gave us few
chances to bring them down; and, indeed, we vainly exhausted one
half our ammunition.

About eleven o'clock in the morning, the first range of mountains that form
the centre of the island was traversed, and we had killed nothing.
Hunger drove us on.  The hunters had relied on the products of the chase,
and they were wrong.  Happily Conseil, to his great surprise,
made a double shot and secured breakfast.  He brought down a white pigeon
and a wood-pigeon, which, cleverly plucked and suspended from a skewer,
was roasted before a red fire of dead wood.  While these interesting
birds were cooking, Ned prepared the fruit of the bread-tree. Then
the wood-pigeons were devoured to the bones, and declared excellent.
The nutmeg, with which they are in the habit of stuffing their crops,
flavours their flesh and renders it delicious eating.

"Now, Ned, what do you miss now?"

"Some four-footed game, M. Aronnax.  All these pigeons are only
side-dishes and trifles; and until I have killed an animal
with cutlets I shall not be content."

"Nor I, Ned, if I do not catch a bird of paradise."

"Let us continue hunting," replied Conseil.  "Let us go towards the sea.
We have arrived at the first declivities of the mountains, and I think we had
better regain the region of forests."

That was sensible advice, and was followed out.
After walking for one hour we had attained a forest of
sago-trees. Some inoffensive serpents glided away from us.
The birds of paradise fled at our approach, and truly I despaired
of getting near one when Conseil, who was walking in front,
suddenly bent down, uttered a triumphal cry, and came back to me
bringing a magnificent specimen.

"Ah! bravo, Conseil!"

"Master is very good."

"No, my boy; you have made an excellent stroke.
Take one of these living birds, and carry it in your hand."

"If master will examine it, he will see that I have not deserved great merit."

"Why, Conseil?"

"Because this bird is as drunk as a quail."

"Drunk!"

"Yes, sir; drunk with the nutmegs that it devoured under
the nutmeg-tree, under which I found it.  See, friend Ned,
see the monstrous effects of intemperance!"

"By Jove!" exclaimed the Canadian, "because I have drunk gin for two months,
you must needs reproach me!"

However, I examined the curious bird.  Conseil was right.
The bird, drunk with the juice, was quite powerless.  It could
not fly; it could hardly walk.

This bird belonged to the most beautiful of the eight species
that are found in Papua and in the neighbouring islands.
It was the "large emerald bird, the most rare kind."
It measured three feet in length.  Its head was comparatively small,
its eyes placed near the opening of the beak, and also small.
But the shades of colour were beautiful, having a yellow beak,
brown feet and claws, nut-coloured wings with purple tips,
pale yellow at the back of the neck and head, and emerald
colour at the throat, chestnut on the breast and belly.
Two horned, downy nets rose from below the tail, that prolonged
the long light feathers of admirable fineness, and they
completed the whole of this marvellous bird, that the natives
have poetically named the "bird of the sun."

But if my wishes were satisfied by the possession of the bird
of paradise, the Canadian's were not yet.  Happily, about two
o'clock, Ned Land brought down a magnificent hog; from the brood
of those the natives call "bari-outang." The animal came in time
for us to procure real quadruped meat, and he was well received.
Ned Land was very proud of his shot.  The hog, hit by the electric ball,
fell stone dead.  The Canadian skinned and cleaned it properly,
after having taken half a dozen cutlets, destined to furnish us
with a grilled repast in the evening.  Then the hunt was resumed,
which was still more marked by Ned and Conseil's exploits.

Indeed, the two friends, beating the bushes, roused a herd
of kangaroos that fled and bounded along on their elastic paws.
But these animals did not take to flight so rapidly but what
the electric capsule could stop their course.

"Ah, Professor!" cried Ned Land, who was carried away by the
delights of the chase, "what excellent game, and stewed, too!
What a supply for the Nautilus!  Two! three! five down!
And to think that we shall eat that flesh, and that the idiots on
board shall not have a crumb!"

I think that, in the excess of his joy, the Canadian,
if he had not talked so much, would have killed them all.
But he contented himself with a single dozen of these
interesting marsupians.  These animals were small.
They were a species of those "kangaroo rabbits" that live
habitually in the hollows of trees, and whose speed is extreme;
but they are moderately fat, and furnish, at least, estimable food.
We were very satisfied with the results of the hunt.
Happy Ned proposed to return to this enchanting island the next day,
for he wished to depopulate it of all the eatable quadrupeds.
But he had reckoned without his host.

At six o'clock in the evening we had regained the shore;
our boat was moored to the usual place.  The Nautilus, like a
long rock, emerged from the waves two miles from the beach.
Ned Land, without waiting, occupied himself about the important
dinner business.  He understood all about cooking well.
The "bari-outang," grilled on the coals, soon scented the air with
a delicious odour.

Indeed, the dinner was excellent.  Two wood-pigeons
completed this extraordinary menu.  The sago pasty,
the artocarpus bread, some mangoes, half a dozen pineapples,
and the liquor fermented from some coco-nuts, overjoyed us.
I even think that my worthy companions' ideas had not all
the plainness desirable.

"Suppose we do not return to the Nautilus this evening?" said Conseil.

"Suppose we never return?" added Ned Land.

Just then a stone fell at our feet and cut short the harpooner's proposition.



CHAPTER XXI

CAPTAIN NEMO'S THUNDERBOLT

We looked at the edge of the forest without rising,
my hand stopping in the action of putting it to my mouth,
Ned Land's completing its office.

"Stones do not fall from the sky," remarked Conseil, "or they
would merit the name aerolites."

A second stone, carefully aimed, that made a savoury pigeon's leg
fall from Conseil's hand, gave still more weight to his observation.
We all three arose, shouldered our guns, and were ready to reply
to any attack.

"Are they apes?" cried Ned Land.

"Very nearly--they are savages."

"To the boat!"  I said, hurrying to the sea.

It was indeed necessary to beat a retreat, for about twenty natives
armed with bows and slings appeared on the skirts of a copse that masked
the horizon to the right, hardly a hundred steps from us.

Our boat was moored about sixty feet from us.  The savages
approached us, not running, but making hostile demonstrations.
Stones and arrows fell thickly.

Ned Land had not wished to leave his provisions; and, in spite of his
imminent danger, his pig on one side and kangaroos on the other,
he went tolerably fast.  In two minutes we were on the shore.
To load the boat with provisions and arms, to push it out
to sea, and ship the oars, was the work of an instant.
We had not gone two cable-lengths, when a hundred savages,
howling and gesticulating, entered the water up to their waists.
I watched to see if their apparition would attract some men from
the Nautilus on to the platform.  But no.  The enormous machine,
lying off, was absolutely deserted.

Twenty minutes later we were on board.  The panels were open.
After making the boat fast, we entered into the interior
of the Nautilus.

I descended to the drawing-room, from whence I heard some chords.
Captain Nemo was there, bending over his organ, and plunged in
a musical ecstasy.

"Captain!"

He did not hear me.

"Captain!"  I said, touching his hand.

He shuddered, and, turning round, said, "Ah! it is you, Professor?
Well, have you had a good hunt, have you botanised successfully?"

"Yes Captain; but we have unfortunately brought a troop of bipeds,
whose vicinity troubles me."

"What bipeds?"

"Savages."

"Savages!" he echoed, ironically.  "So you are astonished, Professor,
at having set foot on a strange land and finding savages?
Savages! where are there not any?  Besides, are they worse than others,
these whom you call savages?"

"But Captain----"

"How many have you counted?"

"A hundred at least."

"M. Aronnax," replied Captain Nemo, placing his fingers on the organ stops,
"when all the natives of Papua are assembled on this shore, the Nautilus
will have nothing to fear from their attacks."

The Captain's fingers were then running over the keys of
the instrument, and I remarked that he touched only the black keys,
which gave his melodies an essentially Scotch character.
Soon he had forgotten my presence, and had plunged into a reverie
that I did not disturb.  I went up again on to the platform:
night had already fallen; for, in this low latitude,
the sun sets rapidly and without twilight.  I could only see
the island indistinctly; but the numerous fires, lighted on
the beach, showed that the natives did not think of leaving it.
I was alone for several hours, sometimes thinking of the natives--
but without any dread of them, for the imperturbable
confidence of the Captain was catching--sometimes forgetting
them to admire the splendours of the night in the tropics.
My remembrances went to France in the train of those zodiacal
stars that would shine in some hours' time.  The moon shone in
the midst of the constellations of the zenith.

The night slipped away without any mischance, the islanders
frightened no doubt at the sight of a monster aground in the bay.
The panels were open, and would have offered an easy access
to the interior of the Nautilus.

At six o'clock in the morning of the 8th January I went up
on to the platform.  The dawn was breaking.  The island soon
showed itself through the dissipating fogs, first the shore,
then the summits.

The natives were there, more numerous than on the day before--
five or six hundred perhaps--some of them, profiting by the low water,
had come on to the coral, at less than two cable-lengths from the Nautilus.
I distinguished them easily; they were true Papuans, with athletic figures,
men of good race, large high foreheads, large, but not broad and flat,
and white teeth.  Their woolly hair, with a reddish tinge, showed off on their
black shining bodies like those of the Nubians.  From the lobes of their ears,
cut and distended, hung chaplets of bones.  Most of these savages were naked.
Amongst them, I remarked some women, dressed from the hips to knees
in quite a crinoline of herbs, that sustained a vegetable waistband.
Some chiefs had ornamented their necks with a crescent and collars
of glass beads, red and white; nearly all were armed with bows, arrows,
and shields and carried on their shoulders a sort of net containing
those round stones which they cast from their slings with great skill.
One of these chiefs, rather near to the Nautilus, examined it attentively.
He was, perhaps, a "mado" of high rank, for he was draped in a mat of
banana-leaves, notched round the edges, and set off with brilliant colours.

I could easily have knocked down this native, who was within a short length;
but I thought that it was better to wait for real hostile demonstrations.
Between Europeans and savages, it is proper for the Europeans to parry
sharply, not to attack.

During low water the natives roamed about near the Nautilus,
but were not troublesome; I heard them frequently repeat the word
"Assai," and by their gestures I understood that they invited me
to go on land, an invitation that I declined.

So that, on that day, the boat did not push off, to the great displeasure
of Master Land, who could not complete his provisions.

This adroit Canadian employed his time in preparing the viands
and meat that he had brought off the island.  As for the savages,
they returned to the shore about eleven o'clock in the morning,
as soon as the coral tops began to disappear under the rising tide;
but I saw their numbers had increased considerably on the shore.
Probably they came from the neighbouring islands, or very likely
from Papua.  However, I had not seen a single native canoe.
Having nothing better to do, I thought of dragging these beautiful
limpid waters, under which I saw a profusion of shells, zoophytes,
and marine plants.  Moreover, it was the last day that the Nautilus
would pass in these parts, if it float in open sea the next day,
according to Captain Nemo's promise.

I therefore called Conseil, who brought me a little light drag,
very like those for the oyster fishery.  Now to work!
For two hours we fished unceasingly, but without bringing up
any rarities.  The drag was filled with midas-ears, harps, melames,
and particularly the most beautiful hammers I have ever seen.
We also brought up some sea-slugs, pearl-oysters, and a dozen little
turtles that were reserved for the pantry on board.

But just when I expected it least, I put my hand on a wonder,
I might say a natural deformity, very rarely met with.
Conseil was just dragging, and his net came up filled with
divers ordinary shells, when, all at once, he saw me plunge
my arm quickly into the net, to draw out a shell, and heard me
utter a cry.

"What is the matter, sir?" he asked in surprise.
"Has master been bitten?"

"No, my boy; but I would willingly have given a finger for my discovery."

"What discovery?"

"This shell," I said, holding up the object of my triumph.

"It is simply an olive porphyry."  {genus species missing}

"Yes, Conseil; but, instead of being rolled from right to left,
this olive turns from left to right."

"Is it possible?"

"Yes, my boy; it is a left shell."

Shells are all right-handed, with rare exceptions; and, when by chance
their spiral is left, amateurs are ready to pay their weight in gold.

Conseil and I were absorbed in the contemplation of our treasure,
and I was promising myself to enrich the museum with it,
when a stone unfortunately thrown by a native struck against,
and broke, the precious object in Conseil's hand.
I uttered a cry of despair!  Conseil took up his gun, and aimed
at a savage who was poising his sling at ten yards from him.
I would have stopped him, but his blow took effect and broke
the bracelet of amulets which encircled the arm of the savage.

"Conseil!" cried I. "Conseil!"

"Well, sir! do you not see that the cannibal has commenced the attack?"

"A shell is not worth the life of a man," said I.

"Ah! the scoundrel!" cried Conseil; "I would rather he had
broken my shoulder!"

Conseil was in earnest, but I was not of his opinion.  However, the situation
had changed some minutes before, and we had not perceived.  A score of canoes
surrounded the Nautilus.  These canoes, scooped out of the trunk of a tree,
long, narrow, well adapted for speed, were balanced by means of a long
bamboo pole, which floated on the water.  They were managed by skilful,
half-naked paddlers, and I watched their advance with some uneasiness.
It was evident that these Papuans had already had dealings with the Europeans
and knew their ships.  But this long iron cylinder anchored in the bay,
without masts or chimneys, what could they think of it?  Nothing good, for at
first they kept at a respectful distance.  However, seeing it motionless,
by degrees they took courage, and sought to familiarise themselves with it.
Now this familiarity was precisely what it was necessary to avoid.
Our arms, which were noiseless, could only produce a moderate effect
on the savages, who have little respect for aught but blustering things.
The thunderbolt without the reverberations of thunder would frighten man
but little, though the danger lies in the lightning, not in the noise.

At this moment the canoes approached the Nautilus, and a shower
of arrows alighted on her.

I went down to the saloon, but found no one there.  I ventured
to knock at the door that opened into the Captain's room.
"Come in," was the answer.

I entered, and found Captain Nemo deep in algebraical calculations
of _x_ and other quantities.

"I am disturbing you," said I, for courtesy's sake.

"That is true, M. Aronnax," replied the Captain; "but I think
you have serious reasons for wishing to see me?"

"Very grave ones; the natives are surrounding us in their canoes,
and in a few minutes we shall certainly be attacked by many
hundreds of savages."

"Ah!," said Captain Nemo quietly, "they are come with their canoes?"

"Yes, sir."

"Well, sir, we must close the hatches."

"Exactly, and I came to say to you----"

"Nothing can be more simple," said Captain Nemo.  And, pressing an
electric button, he transmitted an order to the ship's crew.

"It is all done, sir," said he, after some moments.
"The pinnace is ready, and the hatches are closed.
You do not fear, I imagine, that these gentlemen could stave in
walls on which the balls of your frigate have had no effect?"

"No, Captain; but a danger still exists."

"What is that, sir?"

"It is that to-morrow, at about this hour, we must open the hatches
to renew the air of the Nautilus.  Now, if, at this moment,
the Papuans should occupy the platform, I do not see how you
could prevent them from entering."

"Then, sir, you suppose that they will board us?"

"I am certain of it."

"Well, sir, let them come.  I see no reason for hindering them.
After all, these Papuans are poor creatures, and I am unwilling
that my visit to the island should cost the life of a single one
of these wretches."

Upon that I was going away; But Captain Nemo detained me,
and asked me to sit down by him.  He questioned me with interest
about our excursions on shore, and our hunting; and seemed not
to understand the craving for meat that possessed the Canadian.
Then the conversation turned on various subjects, and, without being
more communicative, Captain Nemo showed himself more amiable.

Amongst other things, we happened to speak of the situation
of the Nautilus, run aground in exactly the same spot
in this strait where Dumont d'Urville was nearly lost.
Apropos of this:

"This D'Urville was one of your great sailors," said the Captain
to me, "one of your most intelligent navigators.  He is the Captain
Cook of you Frenchmen.  Unfortunate man of science, after having
braved the icebergs of the South Pole, the coral reefs of Oceania,
the cannibals of the Pacific, to perish miserably in a railway train!
If this energetic man could have reflected during the last moments
of his life, what must have been uppermost in his last thoughts,
do you suppose?"

So speaking, Captain Nemo seemed moved, and his emotion
gave me a better opinion of him.  Then, chart in hand,
we reviewed the travels of the French navigator, his voyages
of circumnavigation, his double detention at the South Pole,
which led to the discovery of Adelaide and Louis Philippe,
and fixing the hydrographical bearings of the principal
islands of Oceania.

"That which your D'Urville has done on the surface of the seas," said Captain
Nemo, "that have I done under them, and more easily, more completely than he.
The Astrolabe and the Zelee, incessantly tossed about by the hurricane,
could not be worth the Nautilus, quiet repository of labour that she is,
truly motionless in the midst of the waters.

"To-morrow," added the Captain, rising, "to-morrow, at twenty
minutes to three p.m., the Nautilus shall float, and leave
the Strait of Torres uninjured."

Having curtly pronounced these words, Captain Nemo bowed slightly.
This was to dismiss me, and I went back to my room.

There I found Conseil, who wished to know the result of my interview
with the Captain.

"My boy," said I, "when I feigned to believe that his Nautilus
was threatened by the natives of Papua, the Captain answered
me very sarcastically.  I have but one thing to say to you:
Have confidence in him, and go to sleep in peace."

"Have you no need of my services, sir?"

"No, my friend.  What is Ned Land doing?"

"If you will excuse me, sir," answered Conseil, "friend Ned is busy
making a kangaroo-pie which will be a marvel."

I remained alone and went to bed, but slept indifferently.  I heard the noise
of the savages, who stamped on the platform, uttering deafening cries.
The night passed thus, without disturbing the ordinary repose of the crew.
The presence of these cannibals affected them no more than the soldiers of a
masked battery care for the ants that crawl over its front.

At six in the morning I rose.  The hatches had not been opened.
The inner air was not renewed, but the reservoirs, filled ready
for any emergency, were now resorted to, and discharged several
cubic feet of oxygen into the exhausted atmosphere of the Nautilus.

I worked in my room till noon, without having seen Captain Nemo,
even for an instant.  On board no preparations for departure were visible.

I waited still some time, then went into the large saloon.
The clock marked half-past two.  In ten minutes it would be
high-tide: and, if Captain Nemo had not made a rash promise,
the Nautilus would be immediately detached.  If not, many months
would pass ere she could leave her bed of coral.

However, some warning vibrations began to be felt in the vessel.
I heard the keel grating against the rough calcareous bottom of
the coral reef.

At five-and-twenty minutes to three, Captain Nemo appeared in the saloon.

"We are going to start," said he.

"Ah!" replied I.

"I have given the order to open the hatches."

"And the Papuans?"

"The Papuans?" answered Captain Nemo, slightly shrugging his shoulders.

"Will they not come inside the Nautilus?"

"How?"

"Only by leaping over the hatches you have opened."

"M. Aronnax," quietly answered Captain Nemo, "they will not enter
the hatches of the Nautilus in that way, even if they were open."

I looked at the Captain.

"You do not understand?" said he.

"Hardly."

"Well, come and you will see."

I directed my steps towards the central staircase.  There Ned
Land and Conseil were slyly watching some of the ship's crew,
who were opening the hatches, while cries of rage and fearful
vociferations resounded outside.

The port lids were pulled down outside.  Twenty horrible faces appeared.
But the first native who placed his hand on the stair-rail, struck from behind
by some invisible force, I know not what, fled, uttering the most fearful
cries and making the wildest contortions.

Ten of his companions followed him.  They met with the same fate.

Conseil was in ecstasy.  Ned Land, carried away by his violent instincts,
rushed on to the staircase.  But the moment he seized the rail with
both hands, he, in his turn, was overthrown.

"I am struck by a thunderbolt," cried he, with an oath.

This explained all.  It was no rail; but a metallic cable
charged with electricity from the deck communicating with
the platform.  Whoever touched it felt a powerful shock--
and this shock would have been mortal if Captain Nemo had
discharged into the conductor the whole force of the current.
It might truly be said that between his assailants and himself
he had stretched a network of electricity which none could
pass with impunity.

Meanwhile, the exasperated Papuans had beaten a retreat paralysed
with terror.  As for us, half laughing, we consoled and rubbed
the unfortunate Ned Land, who swore like one possessed.

But at this moment the Nautilus, raised by the last waves of the tide,
quitted her coral bed exactly at the fortieth minute fixed by
the Captain.  Her screw swept the waters slowly and majestically.
Her speed increased gradually, and, sailing on the surface of the ocean,
she quitted safe and sound the dangerous passes of the Straits of Torres.



CHAPTER XXII

"AEGRI SOMNIA"

The following day 10th January, the Nautilus continued her
course between two seas, but with such remarkable speed that I
could not estimate it at less than thirty-five miles an hour.
The rapidity of her screw was such that I could neither follow
nor count its revolutions.  When I reflected that this marvellous
electric agent, after having afforded motion, heat, and light
to the Nautilus, still protected her from outward attack,
and transformed her into an ark of safety which no profane
hand might touch without being thunderstricken, my admiration
was unbounded, and from the structure it extended to the engineer
who had called it into existence.

Our course was directed to the west, and on the 11th of January we doubled
Cape Wessel, situation in 135@ long.  and 10@ S. lat., which forms
the east point of the Gulf of Carpentaria.  The reefs were still numerous,
but more equalised, and marked on the chart with extreme precision.
The Nautilus easily avoided the breakers of Money to port and the Victoria
reefs to starboard, placed at 130@ long.  and on the 10th parallel,
which we strictly followed.

On the 13th of January, Captain Nemo arrived in the Sea of Timor,
and recognised the island of that name in 122@ long.

From this point the direction of the Nautilus inclined towards
the south-west. Her head was set for the Indian Ocean.
Where would the fancy of Captain Nemo carry us next?
Would he return to the coast of Asia or would he approach
again the shores of Europe?  Improbable conjectures both,
to a man who fled from inhabited continents.  Then would
he descend to the south?  Was he going to double the Cape
of Good Hope, then Cape Horn, and finally go as far as the
Antarctic pole?  Would he come back at last to the Pacific,
where his Nautilus could sail free and independently?
Time would show.

After having skirted the sands of Cartier, of Hibernia, Seringapatam,
and Scott, last efforts of the solid against the liquid element,
on the 14th of January we lost sight of land altogether.
The speed of the Nautilus was considerably abated, and with
irregular course she sometimes swam in the bosom of the waters,
sometimes floated on their surface.

During this period of the voyage, Captain Nemo made some interesting
experiments on the varied temperature of the sea, in different beds.
Under ordinary conditions these observations are made by means of
rather complicated instruments, and with somewhat doubtful results,
by means of thermometrical sounding-leads, the glasses often breaking
under the pressure of the water, or an apparatus grounded on
the variations of the resistance of metals to the electric currents.
Results so obtained could not be correctly calculated.  On the contrary,
Captain Nemo went himself to test the temperature in the depths of the sea,
and his thermometer, placed in communication with the different sheets
of water, gave him the required degree immediately and accurately.

It was thus that, either by overloading her reservoirs or by descending
obliquely by means of her inclined planes, the Nautilus successively attained
the depth of three, four, five, seven, nine, and ten thousand yards,
and the definite result of this experience was that the sea preserved
an average temperature of four degrees and a half at a depth of five
thousand fathoms under all latitudes.

On the 16th of January, the Nautilus seemed becalmed
only a few yards beneath the surface of the waves.
Her electric apparatus remained inactive and her motionless
screw left her to drift at the mercy of the currents.
I supposed that the crew was occupied with interior repairs,
rendered necessary by the violence of the mechanical movements
of the machine.

My companions and I then witnessed a curious spectacle.
The hatches of the saloon were open, and, as the beacon light
of the Nautilus was not in action, a dim obscurity reigned
in the midst of the waters.  I observed the state of the sea,
under these conditions, and the largest fish appeared to me
no more than scarcely defined shadows, when the Nautilus
found herself suddenly transported into full light.
I thought at first that the beacon had been lighted,
and was casting its electric radiance into the liquid mass.
I was mistaken, and after a rapid survey perceived my error.

The Nautilus floated in the midst of a phosphorescent bed which,
in this obscurity, became quite dazzling.  It was produced
by myriads of luminous animalculae, whose brilliancy was
increased as they glided over the metallic hull of the vessel.
I was surprised by lightning in the midst of these luminous sheets,
as though they bad been rivulets of lead melted in an ardent
furnace or metallic masses brought to a white heat, so that,
by force of contrast, certain portions of light appeared to cast
a shade in the midst of the general ignition, from which all
shade seemed banished.  No; this was not the calm irradiation
of our ordinary lightning.  There was unusual life and vigour:
this was truly living light!

In reality, it was an infinite agglomeration of coloured infusoria,
of veritable globules of jelly, provided with a threadlike tentacle,
and of which as many as twenty-five thousand have been counted in less
than two cubic half-inches of water.

During several hours the Nautilus floated in these brilliant waves,
and our admiration increased as we watched the marine monsters
disporting themselves like salamanders.  I saw there in the midst
of this fire that burns not the swift and elegant porpoise
(the indefatigable clown of the ocean), and some swordfish
ten feet long, those prophetic heralds of the hurricane whose
formidable sword would now and then strike the glass of the saloon.
Then appeared the smaller fish, the balista, the leaping mackerel,
wolf-thorn-tails, and a hundred others which striped the luminous
atmosphere as they swam.  This dazzling spectacle was enchanting!
Perhaps some atmospheric condition increased the intensity of
this phenomenon.  Perhaps some storm agitated the surface of the waves.
But at this depth of some yards, the Nautilus was unmoved by its fury
and reposed peacefully in still water.

So we progressed, incessantly charmed by some new marvel.
The days passed rapidly away, and I took no account of them.
Ned, according to habit, tried to vary the diet on board.
Like snails, we were fixed to our shells, and I declare it is easy
to lead a snail's life.

Thus this life seemed easy and natural, and we thought no longer
of the life we led on land; but something happened to recall us
to the strangeness of our situation.

On the 18th of January, the Nautilus was in 105@ long.
and 15@ S. lat.  The weather was threatening, the sea rough
and rolling.  There was a strong east wind.  The barometer,
which had been going down for some days, foreboded a coming storm.
I went up on to the platform just as the second lieutenant
was taking the measure of the horary angles, and waited,
according to habit till the daily phrase was said.  But on this day
it was exchanged for another phrase not less incomprehensible.
Almost directly, I saw Captain Nemo appear with a glass, looking
towards the horizon.

For some minutes he was immovable, without taking his eye off
the point of observation.  Then he lowered his glass and exchanged
a few words with his lieutenant.  The latter seemed to be
a victim to some emotion that he tried in vain to repress.
Captain Nemo, having more command over himself, was cool.
He seemed, too, to be making some objections to which the lieutenant
replied by formal assurances.  At least I concluded so by the
difference of their tones and gestures.  For myself, I had looked
carefully in the direction indicated without seeing anything.
The sky and water were lost in the clear line of the horizon.

However, Captain Nemo walked from one end of the platform
to the other, without looking at me, perhaps without seeing me.
His step was firm, but less regular than usual.
He stopped sometimes, crossed his arms, and observed the sea.
What could he be looking for on that immense expanse?

The Nautilus was then some hundreds of miles from the nearest coast.

The lieutenant had taken up the glass and examined the horizon steadfastly,
going and coming, stamping his foot and showing more nervous agitation than
his superior officer.  Besides, this mystery must necessarily be solved,
and before long; for, upon an order from Captain Nemo, the engine,
increasing its propelling power, made the screw turn more rapidly.

Just then the lieutenant drew the Captain's attention again.
The latter stopped walking and directed his glass towards
the place indicated.  He looked long.  I felt very much puzzled,
and descended to the drawing-room, and took out an excellent
telescope that I generally used.  Then, leaning on the cage
of the watch-light that jutted out from the front of the platform,
set myself to look over all the line of the sky and sea.

But my eye was no sooner applied to the glass than it was quickly
snatched out of my hands.

I turned round.  Captain Nemo was before me, but I did not know him.
His face was transfigured.  His eyes flashed sullenly; his teeth were set;
his stiff body, clenched fists, and head shrunk between his shoulders,
betrayed the violent agitation that pervaded his whole frame.
He did not move.  My glass, fallen from his hands, had rolled at his feet.

Had I unwittingly provoked this fit of anger?  Did this incomprehensible
person imagine that I had discovered some forbidden secret?
No; I was not the object of this hatred, for he was not looking at me;
his eye was steadily fixed upon the impenetrable point of the horizon.
At last Captain Nemo recovered himself.  His agitation subsided.
He addressed some words in a foreign language to his lieutenant,
then turned to me.  "M. Aronnax," he said, in rather an imperious tone,
"I require you to keep one of the conditions that bind you to me."

"What is it, Captain?"

"You must be confined, with your companions, until I think fit
to release you."

"You are the master," I replied, looking steadily at him.
"But may I ask you one question?"

"None, sir."

There was no resisting this imperious command, it would have been useless.
I went down to the cabin occupied by Ned Land and Conseil, and told them
the Captain's determination.  You may judge how this communication was
received by the Canadian.

But there was not time for altercation.  Four of the crew waited
at the door, and conducted us to that cell where we had passed
our first night on board the Nautilus.

Ned Land would have remonstrated, but the door was shut upon him.

"Will master tell me what this means?" asked Conseil.

I told my companions what had passed.  They were as much astonished as I,
and equally at a loss how to account for it.

Meanwhile, I was absorbed in my own reflections, and could think
of nothing but the strange fear depicted in the Captain's countenance.
I was utterly at a loss to account for it, when my cogitations were
disturbed by these words from Ned Land:

"Hallo! breakfast is ready."

And indeed the table was laid.  Evidently Captain Nemo had given this order
at the same time that he had hastened the speed of the Nautilus.

"Will master permit me to make a recommendation?" asked Conseil.

"Yes, my boy."

"Well, it is that master breakfasts.  It is prudent, for we do not know
what may happen."

"You are right, Conseil."

"Unfortunately," said Ned Land, "they have only given us the ship's fare."

"Friend Ned," asked Conseil, "what would you have said if the breakfast
had been entirely forgotten?"

This argument cut short the harpooner's recriminations.

We sat down to table.  The meal was eaten in silence.

Just then the luminous globe that lighted the cell went out, and left us
in total darkness.  Ned Land was soon asleep, and what astonished me was
that Conseil went off into a heavy slumber.  I was thinking what could have
caused his irresistible drowsiness, when I felt my brain becoming stupefied.
In spite of my efforts to keep my eyes open, they would close.
A painful suspicion seized me.  Evidently soporific substances had been
mixed with the food we had just taken.  Imprisonment was not enough
to conceal Captain Nemo's projects from us, sleep was more necessary.
I then heard the panels shut.  The undulations of the sea, which caused
a slight rolling motion, ceased.  Had the Nautilus quitted the surface
of the ocean?  Had it gone back to the motionless bed of water?
I tried to resist sleep.  It was impossible.  My breathing grew weak.
I felt a mortal cold freeze my stiffened and half-paralysed limbs.
My eye lids, like leaden caps, fell over my eyes.  I could not raise them;
a morbid sleep, full of hallucinations, bereft me of my being.
Then the visions disappeared, and left me in complete insensibility.



CHAPTER XXIII

THE CORAL KINGDOM

The next day I woke with my head singularly clear.
To my great surprise, I was in my own room.  My companions,
no doubt, had been reinstated in their cabin, without having
perceived it any more than I. Of what had passed during the night
they were as ignorant as I was, and to penetrate this mystery I
only reckoned upon the chances of the future.

I then thought of quitting my room.  Was I free again or a prisoner?
Quite free.  I opened the door, went to the half-deck, went up
the central stairs.  The panels, shut the evening before, were open.
I went on to the platform.

Ned Land and Conseil waited there for me.  I questioned them;
they knew nothing.  Lost in a heavy sleep in which they had
been totally unconscious, they had been astonished at finding
themselves in their cabin.

As for the Nautilus, it seemed quiet and mysterious as ever.
It floated on the surface of the waves at a moderate pace.
Nothing seemed changed on board.

The second lieutenant then came on to the platform, and gave
the usual order below.

As for Captain Nemo, he did not appear.

Of the people on board, I only saw the impassive steward,
who served me with his usual dumb regularity.

About two o'clock, I was in the drawing-room, busied in arranging
my notes, when the Captain opened the door and appeared.  I bowed.
He made a slight inclination in return, without speaking.
I resumed my work, hoping that he would perhaps give me some
explanation of the events of the preceding night.  He made none.
I looked at him.  He seemed fatigued; his heavy eyes had not
been refreshed by sleep; his face looked very sorrowful.
He walked to and fro, sat down and got up again, took a
chance book, put it down, consulted his instruments without
taking his habitual notes, and seemed restless and uneasy.
At last, he came up to me, and said:

"Are you a doctor, M. Aronnax?"

I so little expected such a question that I stared some time
at him without answering.

"Are you a doctor?" he repeated.  "Several of your colleagues
have studied medicine."

"Well," said I, "I am a doctor and resident surgeon to the hospital.
I practised several years before entering the museum."

"Very well, sir."

My answer had evidently satisfied the Captain.  But, not knowing
what he would say next, I waited for other questions, reserving my
answers according to circumstances.

"M. Aronnax, will you consent to prescribe for one of my men?" be asked.

"Is he ill?"

"Yes."

"I am ready to follow you."

"Come, then."

I own my heart beat, I do not know why.  I saw certain connection
between the illness of one of the crew and the events of the day before;
and this mystery interested me at least as much as the sick man.

Captain Nemo conducted me to the poop of the Nautilus,
and took me into a cabin situated near the sailors' quarters.

There, on a bed, lay a man about forty years of age, with a resolute
expression of countenance, a true type of an Anglo-Saxon.

I leant over him.  He was not only ill, he was wounded.
His head, swathed in bandages covered with blood, lay on a pillow.
I undid the bandages, and the wounded man looked at me with his large
eyes and gave no sign of pain as I did it.  It was a horrible wound.
The skull, shattered by some deadly weapon, left the brain exposed,
which was much injured.  Clots of blood had formed in the bruised
and broken mass, in colour like the dregs of wine.

There was both contusion and suffusion of the brain.  His breathing
was slow, and some spasmodic movements of the muscles agitated his face.
I felt his pulse.  It was intermittent.  The extremities of the body
were growing cold already, and I saw death must inevitably ensue.
After dressing the unfortunate man's wounds, I readjusted the bandages
on his head, and turned to Captain Nemo.

"What caused this wound?"  I asked.

"What does it signify?" he replied, evasively.  "A shock has
broken one of the levers of the engine, which struck myself.
But your opinion as to his state?"

I hesitated before giving it.

"You may speak," said the Captain.  "This man does not understand French."

I gave a last look at the wounded man.

"He will be dead in two hours."

"Can nothing save him?"

"Nothing."

Captain Nemo's hand contracted, and some tears glistened in his eyes,
which I thought incapable of shedding any.

For some moments I still watched the dying man, whose life ebbed slowly.
His pallor increased under the electric light that was shed over
his death-bed. I looked at his intelligent forehead, furrowed with
premature wrinkles, produced probably by misfortune and sorrow.
I tried to learn the secret of his life from the last words that
escaped his lips.

"You can go now, M. Aronnax," said the Captain.

I left him in the dying man's cabin, and returned to my
room much affected by this scene.  During the whole day,
I was haunted by uncomfortable suspicions, and at night
I slept badly, and between my broken dreams I fancied I
heard distant sighs like the notes of a funeral psalm.
Were they the prayers of the dead, murmured in that language
that I could not understand?

The next morning I went on to the bridge.  Captain Nemo was there before me.
As soon as he perceived me he came to me.

"Professor, will it be convenient to you to make a submarine excursion to-day?"

"With my companions?"  I asked.

"If they like."

"We obey your orders, Captain."

"Will you be so good then as to put on your cork jackets?"

It was not a question of dead or dying.  I rejoined Ned Land
and Conseil, and told them of Captain Nemo's proposition.
Conseil hastened to accept it, and this time the Canadian seemed
quite willing to follow our example.

It was eight o'clock in the morning.  At half-past eight we were equipped
for this new excursion, and provided with two contrivances for light
and breathing.  The double door was open; and, accompanied by Captain Nemo,
who was followed by a dozen of the crew, we set foot, at a depth of about
thirty feet, on the solid bottom on which the Nautilus rested.

A slight declivity ended in an uneven bottom, at fifteen fathoms depth.
This bottom differed entirely from the one I had visited on my first excursion
under the waters of the Pacific Ocean.  Here, there was no fine sand,
no submarine prairies, no sea-forest. I immediately recognised that
marvellous region in which, on that day, the Captain did the honours to us.
It was the coral kingdom.

The light produced a thousand charming varieties, playing in
the midst of the branches that were so vividly coloured.
I seemed to see the membraneous and cylindrical tubes tremble
beneath the undulation of the waters.  I was tempted to gather
their fresh petals, ornamented with delicate tentacles,
some just blown, the others budding, while a small fish,
swimming swiftly, touched them slightly, like flights of birds.
But if my hand approached these living flowers, these animated,
sensitive plants, the whole colony took alarm.  The white petals
re-entered their red cases, the flowers faded as I looked,
and the bush changed into a block of stony knobs.

Chance had thrown me just by the most precious specimens of the zoophyte.
This coral was more valuable than that found in the Mediterranean,
on the coasts of France, Italy and Barbary.  Its tints justified
the poetical names of "Flower of Blood," and "Froth of Blood,"
that trade has given to its most beautiful productions.
Coral is sold for L20 per ounce; and in this place the watery beds would
make the fortunes of a company of coral-divers. This precious matter,
often confused with other polypi, formed then the inextricable plots
called "macciota," and on which I noticed several beautiful specimens
of pink coral.

{opening sentence missing} Real petrified thickets, long joints
of fantastic architecture, were disclosed before us.
Captain Nemo placed himself under a dark gallery, where by
a slight declivity we reached a depth of a hundred yards.
The light from our lamps produced sometimes magical effects,
following the rough outlines of the natural arches and pendants
disposed like lustres, that were tipped with points of fire.

At last, after walking two hours, we had attained a depth
of about three hundred yards, that is to say, the extreme limit
on which coral begins to form.  But there was no isolated bush,
nor modest brushwood, at the bottom of lofty trees.
It was an immense forest of large mineral vegetations,
enormous petrified trees, united by garlands of elegant
sea-bindweed, all adorned with clouds and reflections.
We passed freely under their high branches, lost in the shade
of the waves.

Captain Nemo had stopped.  I and my companions halted, and, turning round,
I saw his men were forming a semi-circle round their chief.
Watching attentively, I observed that four of them carried on their
shoulders an object of an oblong shape.

We occupied, in this place, the centre of a vast glade
surrounded by the lofty foliage of the submarine forest.
Our lamps threw over this place a sort of clear twilight
that singularly elongated the shadows on the ground.
At the end of the glade the darkness increased, and was only relieved
by little sparks reflected by the points of coral.

Ned Land and Conseil were near me.  We watched,
and I thought I was going to witness a strange scene.
On observing the ground, I saw that it was raised in certain
places by slight excrescences encrusted with limy deposits,
and disposed with a regularity that betrayed the hand of man.

In the midst of the glade, on a pedestal of rocks roughly
piled up, stood a cross of coral that extended its long arms
that one might have thought were made of petrified blood.
Upon a sign from Captain Nemo one of the men advanced;
and at some feet from the cross he began to dig a hole with
a pickaxe that he took from his belt.  I understood all!
This glade was a cemetery, this hole a tomb, this oblong
object the body of the man who had died in the night!
The Captain and his men had come to bury their companion in this
general resting-place, at the bottom of this inaccessible ocean!

The grave was being dug slowly; the fish fled on all sides while their
retreat was being thus disturbed; I heard the strokes of the pickaxe,
which sparkled when it hit upon some flint lost at the bottom of the waters.
The hole was soon large and deep enough to receive the body.
Then the bearers approached; the body, enveloped in a tissue of white linen,
was lowered into the damp grave.  Captain Nemo, with his arms crossed
on his breast, and all the friends of him who had loved them,
knelt in prayer.

The grave was then filled in with the rubbish taken from the ground,
which formed a slight mound.  When this was done, Captain Nemo
and his men rose; then, approaching the grave, they knelt again,
and all extended their hands in sign of a last adieu.
Then the funeral procession returned to the Nautilus,
passing under the arches of the forest, in the midst
of thickets, along the coral bushes, and still on the ascent.
At last the light of the ship appeared, and its luminous track
guided us to the Nautilus.  At one o'clock we had returned.

As soon as I had changed my clothes I went up on to the platform,
and, a prey to conflicting emotions, I sat down near the binnacle.
Captain Nemo joined me.  I rose and said to him:

"So, as I said he would, this man died in the night?"

"Yes, M. Aronnax."

"And he rests now, near his companions, in the coral cemetery?"

"Yes, forgotten by all else, but not by us.  We dug the grave,
and the polypi undertake to seal our dead for eternity."
And, burying his face quickly in his hands, he tried in vain to
suppress a sob.  Then he added:  "Our peaceful cemetery is there,
some hundred feet below the surface of the waves."

"Your dead sleep quietly, at least, Captain, out of the reach of sharks."

"Yes, sir, of sharks and men," gravely replied the Captain.



PART TWO



CHAPTER I

THE INDIAN OCEAN

We now come to the second part of our journey under the sea.
The first ended with the moving scene in the coral cemetery which left
such a deep impression on my mind.  Thus, in the midst of this great sea,
Captain Nemo's life was passing, even to his grave, which he had
prepared in one of its deepest abysses.  There, not one of the ocean's
monsters could trouble the last sleep of the crew of the Nautilus,
of those friends riveted to each other in death as in life.
"Nor any man, either," had added the Captain.  Still the same fierce,
implacable defiance towards human society!

I could no longer content myself with the theory which satisfied Conseil.

That worthy fellow persisted in seeing in the Commander of
the Nautilus one of those unknown servants who return mankind
contempt for indifference.  For him, he was a misunderstood
genius who, tired of earth's deceptions, had taken refuge in this
inaccessible medium, where he might follow his instincts freely.
To my mind, this explains but one side of Captain Nemo's character.
Indeed, the mystery of that last night during which we had been
chained in prison, the sleep, and the precaution so violently
taken by the Captain of snatching from my eyes the glass I
had raised to sweep the horizon, the mortal wound of the man,
due to an unaccountable shock of the Nautilus, all put me on a
new track.  No; Captain Nemo was not satisfied with shunning man.
His formidable apparatus not only suited his instinct of freedom,
but perhaps also the design of some terrible retaliation.

At this moment nothing is clear to me; I catch but a glimpse
of light amidst all the darkness, and I must confine myself
to writing as events shall dictate.

That day, the 24th of January, 1868, at noon, the second officer came to take
the altitude of the sun.  I mounted the platform, lit a cigar, and watched
the operation.  It seemed to me that the man did not understand French;
for several times I made remarks in a loud voice, which must have drawn
from him some involuntary sign of attention, if he had understood them;
but he remained undisturbed and dumb.

As he was taking observations with the sextant, one of the
sailors of the Nautilus (the strong man who had accompanied
us on our first submarine excursion to the Island of Crespo)
came to clean the glasses of the lantern.  I examined the fittings
of the apparatus, the strength of which was increased a hundredfold
by lenticular rings, placed similar to those in a lighthouse,
and which projected their brilliance in a horizontal plane.
The electric lamp was combined in such a way as to give
its most powerful light.  Indeed, it was produced in vacuo,
which insured both its steadiness and its intensity.
This vacuum economised the graphite points between which
the luminous arc was developed--an important point of economy
for Captain Nemo, who could not easily have replaced them;
and under these conditions their waste was imperceptible.
When the Nautilus was ready to continue its submarine journey,
I went down to the saloon.  The panel was closed, and the course
marked direct west.

We were furrowing the waters of the Indian Ocean, a vast liquid plain,
with a surface of 1,200,000,000 of acres, and whose waters are so clear
and transparent that any one leaning over them would turn giddy.
The Nautilus usually floated between fifty and a hundred fathoms deep.
We went on so for some days.  To anyone but myself, who had a great
love for the sea, the hours would have seemed long and monotonous;
but the daily walks on the platform, when I steeped myself in the reviving
air of the ocean, the sight of the rich waters through the windows
of the saloon, the books in the library, the compiling of my memoirs,
took up all my time, and left me not a moment of ennui or weariness.

For some days we saw a great number of aquatic birds, sea-mews or gulls.
Some were cleverly killed and, prepared in a certain way, made very acceptable
water-game. Amongst large-winged birds, carried a long distance from all lands
and resting upon the waves from the fatigue of their flight, I saw some
magnificent albatrosses, uttering discordant cries like the braying of an ass,
and birds belonging to the family of the long-wings.

As to the fish, they always provoked our admiration when we surprised
the secrets of their aquatic life through the open panels.
I saw many kinds which I never before had a chance of observing.

{3 paragraphs are missing}

From the 21st to the 23rd of January the Nautilus went at
the rate of two hundred and fifty leagues in twenty-four hours,
being five hundred and forty miles, or twenty-two miles an hour.
If we recognised so many different varieties of fish, it was because,
attracted by the electric light, they tried to follow us;
the greater part, however, were soon distanced by our speed,
though some kept their place in the waters of the Nautilus for a time.
The morning of the 24th, in 12@ 5' S. lat., and 94@ 33'
long., we observed Keeling Island, a coral formation,
planted with magnificent cocos, and which had been visited by
Mr. Darwin and Captain Fitzroy.  The Nautilus skirted the shores
of this desert island for a little distance.  Its nets brought
up numerous specimens of polypi and curious shells of mollusca.
{one sentence stripped here}

Soon Keeling Island disappeared from the horizon, and our course was directed
to the north-west in the direction of the Indian Peninsula.

From Keeling Island our course was slower and more variable,
often taking us into great depths.  Several times they made use
of the inclined planes, which certain internal levers placed
obliquely to the waterline.  In that way we went about two miles,
but without ever obtaining the greatest depths of the Indian Sea,
which soundings of seven thousand fathoms have never reached.
As to the temperature of the lower strata, the thermometer invariably
indicated 4@ above zero.  I only observed that in the upper regions
the water was always colder in the high levels than at the surface
of the sea.

On the 25th of January the ocean was entirely deserted; the Nautilus
passed the day on the surface, beating the waves with its powerful
screw and making them rebound to a great height.  Who under such
circumstances would not have taken it for a gigantic cetacean?
Three parts of this day I spent on the platform.  I watched the sea.
Nothing on the horizon, till about four o'clock a steamer running
west on our counter.  Her masts were visible for an instant,
but she could not see the Nautilus, being too low in the water.
I fancied this steamboat belonged to the P.O. Company, which runs
from Ceylon to Sydney, touching at King George's Point and Melbourne.

At five o'clock in the evening, before that fleeting twilight
which binds night to day in tropical zones, Conseil and I
were astonished by a curious spectacle.

It was a shoal of argonauts travelling along on the surface of the ocean.
We could count several hundreds.  They belonged to the tubercle kind
which are peculiar to the Indian seas.

These graceful molluscs moved backwards by means of their
locomotive tube, through which they propelled the water already
drawn in.  Of their eight tentacles, six were elongated,
and stretched out floating on the water, whilst the other two,
rolled up flat, were spread to the wing like a light sail.
I saw their spiral-shaped and fluted shells, which Cuvier
justly compares to an elegant skiff.  A boat indeed!
It bears the creature which secretes it without its adhering to it.

For nearly an hour the Nautilus floated in the midst of this shoal
of molluscs.  Then I know not what sudden fright they took.
But as if at a signal every sail was furled, the arms folded,
the body drawn in, the shells turned over, changing their centre
of gravity, and the whole fleet disappeared under the waves.
Never did the ships of a squadron manoeuvre with more unity.

At that moment night fell suddenly, and the reeds, scarcely raised
by the breeze, lay peaceably under the sides of the Nautilus.

The next day, 26th of January, we cut the equator at the
eighty-second meridian and entered the northern hemisphere.
During the day a formidable troop of sharks accompanied us,
terrible creatures, which multiply in these seas and make them
very dangerous.  They were "cestracio philippi" sharks, with brown
backs and whitish bellies, armed with eleven rows of teeth--
eyed sharks--their throat being marked with a large black
spot surrounded with white like an eye.  There were also some
Isabella sharks, with rounded snouts marked with dark spots.
These powerful creatures often hurled themselves at the windows
of the saloon with such violence as to make us feel very insecure.
At such times Ned Land was no longer master of himself.
He wanted to go to the surface and harpoon the monsters,
particularly certain smooth-hound sharks, whose mouth is studded with
teeth like a mosaic; and large tiger-sharks nearly six yards long,
the last named of which seemed to excite him more particularly.
But the Nautilus, accelerating her speed, easily left the most rapid
of them behind.

The 27th of January, at the entrance of the vast Bay of Bengal,
we met repeatedly a forbidding spectacle, dead bodies floating on
the surface of the water.  They were the dead of the Indian villages,
carried by the Ganges to the level of the sea, and which the vultures,
the only undertakers of the country, had not been able to devour.
But the sharks did not fail to help them at their funeral work.

About seven o'clock in the evening, the Nautilus, half-immersed, was
sailing in a sea of milk.  At first sight the ocean seemed lactified.
Was it the effect of the lunar rays?  No; for the moon, scarcely two
days old, was still lying hidden under the horizon in the rays of the sun.
The whole sky, though lit by the sidereal rays, seemed black by contrast
with the whiteness of the waters.

Conseil could not believe his eyes, and questioned me as to the cause
of this strange phenomenon.  Happily I was able to answer him.

"It is called a milk sea," I explained.  "A large extent
of white wavelets often to be seen on the coasts of Amboyna,
and in these parts of the sea."

"But, sir," said Conseil, "can you tell me what causes such an effect?
for I suppose the water is not really turned into milk."

"No, my boy; and the whiteness which surprises you is caused only by
the presence of myriads of infusoria, a sort of luminous little worm,
gelatinous and without colour, of the thickness of a hair,
and whose length is not more than seven-thousandths of an inch.
These insects adhere to one another sometimes for several leagues."

"Several leagues!" exclaimed Conseil.

"Yes, my boy; and you need not try to compute the number of these infusoria.
You will not be able, for, if I am not mistaken, ships have floated on these
milk seas for more than forty miles."

Towards midnight the sea suddenly resumed its usual colour;
but behind us, even to the limits of the horizon, the sky
reflected the whitened waves, and for a long time seemed
impregnated with the vague glimmerings of an aurora borealis.



CHAPTER II

A NOVEL PROPOSAL OF CAPTAIN NEMO'S

On the 28th of February, when at noon the Nautilus came to the surface
of the sea, in 9@ 4' N. lat., there was land in sight about eight
miles to westward.  The first thing I noticed was a range of mountains
about two thousand feet high, the shapes of which were most capricious.
On taking the bearings, I knew that we were nearing the island of Ceylon,
the pearl which hangs from the lobe of the Indian Peninsula.

Captain Nemo and his second appeared at this moment.
The Captain glanced at the map.  Then turning to me, said:

"The Island of Ceylon, noted for its pearl-fisheries. Would you
like to visit one of them, M. Aronnax?"

"Certainly, Captain."

"Well, the thing is easy.  Though, if we see the fisheries, we shall
not see the fishermen.  The annual exportation has not yet begun.
Never mind, I will give orders to make for the Gulf of Manaar,
where we shall arrive in the night."

The Captain said something to his second, who immediately went out.
Soon the Nautilus returned to her native element, and the manometer
showed that she was about thirty feet deep.

"Well, sir," said Captain Nemo, "you and your companions shall visit
the Bank of Manaar, and if by chance some fisherman should be there,
we shall see him at work."

"Agreed, Captain!"

"By the bye, M. Aronnax you are not afraid of sharks?"

"Sharks!" exclaimed I.

This question seemed a very hard one.

"Well?" continued Captain Nemo.

"I admit, Captain, that I am not yet very familiar with that kind of fish."

"We are accustomed to them," replied Captain Nemo,
"and in time you will be too.  However, we shall be armed,
and on the road we may be able to hunt some of the tribe.
It is interesting.  So, till to-morrow, sir, and early."

This said in a careless tone, Captain Nemo left the saloon.
Now, if you were invited to hunt the bear in the mountains
of Switzerland, what would you say?

"Very well! to-morrow we will go and hunt the bear."
If you were asked to hunt the lion in the plains of Atlas,
or the tiger in the Indian jungles, what would you say?

"Ha! ha! it seems we are going to hunt the tiger or the lion!"
But when you are invited to hunt the shark in its natural element,
you would perhaps reflect before accepting the invitation.
As for myself, I passed my hand over my forehead, on which stood large
drops of cold perspiration.  "Let us reflect," said I, "and take our time.
Hunting otters in submarine forests, as we did in the Island of Crespo,
will pass; but going up and down at the bottom of the sea,
where one is almost certain to meet sharks, is quite another thing!
I know well that in certain countries, particularly in the Andaman Islands,
the negroes never hesitate to attack them with a dagger in one hand
and a running noose in the other; but I also know that few who affront
those creatures ever return alive.  However, I am not a negro,
and if I were I think a little hesitation in this case would
not be ill-timed."

At this moment Conseil and the Canadian entered, quite composed,
and even joyous.  They knew not what awaited them.

"Faith, sir," said Ned Land, "your Captain Nemo--the devil take him!--
has just made us a very pleasant offer."

"Ah!" said I, "you know?"

"If agreeable to you, sir," interrupted Conseil, "the commander
of the Nautilus has invited us to visit the magnificent Ceylon
fisheries to-morrow, in your company; he did it kindly,
and behaved like a real gentleman."

"He said nothing more?"

"Nothing more, sir, except that he had already spoken to you
of this little walk."

"Sir," said Conseil, "would you give us some details of the pearl fishery?"

"As to the fishing itself," I asked, "or the incidents, which?"

"On the fishing," replied the Canadian; "before entering upon the ground,
it is as well to know something about it."

"Very well; sit down, my friends, and I will teach you."

Ned and Conseil seated themselves on an ottoman, and the first thing
the Canadian asked was:

"Sir, what is a pearl?"

"My worthy Ned," I answered, "to the poet, a pearl is a tear of the sea;
to the Orientals, it is a drop of dew solidified; to the ladies, it is
a jewel of an oblong shape, of a brilliancy of mother-of-pearl substance,
which they wear on their fingers, their necks, or their ears; for the chemist
it is a mixture of phosphate and carbonate of lime, with a little gelatine;
and lastly, for naturalists, it is simply a morbid secretion of the organ
that produces the mother-of-pearl amongst certain bivalves."

"Branch of molluscs," said Conseil.

"Precisely so, my learned Conseil; and, amongst these testacea
the earshell, the tridacnae, the turbots, in a word, all those
which secrete mother-of-pearl, that is, the blue, bluish, violet,
or white substance which lines the interior of their shells,
are capable of producing pearls."

"Mussels too?" asked the Canadian.

"Yes, mussels of certain waters in Scotland, Wales, Ireland,
Saxony, Bohemia, and France."

"Good!  For the future I shall pay attention," replied the Canadian.

"But," I continued, "the particular mollusc which secretes
the pearl is the pearl-oyster. The pearl is nothing but a
formation deposited in a globular form, either adhering
to the oyster-shell or buried in the folds of the creature.
On the shell it is fast:  in the flesh it is loose; but always
has for a kernel a small hard substance, maybe a barren egg,
maybe a grain of sand, around which the pearly matter deposits itself
year after year successively, and by thin concentric layers."
{this paragraph is edited}

"Are many pearls found in the same oyster?" asked Conseil.

"Yes, my boy.  Some are a perfect casket.  One oyster has been mentioned,
though I allow myself to doubt it, as having contained no less than a hundred
and fifty sharks."

"A hundred and fifty sharks!" exclaimed Ned Land.

"Did I say sharks?" said I hurriedly.  "I meant to say a hundred
and fifty pearls.  Sharks would not be sense."

"Certainly not," said Conseil; "but will you tell us now by what means
they extract these pearls?"

"They proceed in various ways.  When they adhere to the shell,
the fishermen often pull them off with pincers; but the most common
way is to lay the oysters on mats of the seaweed which covers
the banks.  Thus they die in the open air; and at the end
of ten days they are in a forward state of decomposition.
They are then plunged into large reservoirs of sea-water;
then they are opened and washed."

"The price of these pearls varies according to their size?" asked Conseil.

"Not only according to their size," I answered, "but also according
to their shape, their water (that is, their colour), and their lustre:
that is, that bright and diapered sparkle which makes them so charming
to the eye.  The most beautiful are called virgin pearls, or paragons.
They are formed alone in the tissue of the mollusc, are white,
often opaque, and sometimes have the transparency of an opal;
they are generally round or oval.  The round are made into bracelets,
the oval into pendants, and, being more precious, are sold singly.
Those adhering to the shell of the oyster are more irregular in shape,
and are sold by weight.  Lastly, in a lower order are classed those small
pearls known under the name of seed-pearls; they are sold by measure,
and are especially used in embroidery for church ornaments."

"But," said Conseil, "is this pearl-fishery dangerous?"

"No," I answered, quickly; "particularly if certain precautions are taken."

"What does one risk in such a calling?" said Ned Land,
"the swallowing of some mouthfuls of sea-water?"

"As you say, Ned.  By the bye," said I, trying to take Captain
Nemo's careless tone, "are you afraid of sharks, brave Ned?"

"I!" replied the Canadian; "a harpooner by profession?
It is my trade to make light of them."

"But," said I, "it is not a question of fishing for them
with an iron-swivel, hoisting them into the vessel, cutting off
their tails with a blow of a chopper, ripping them up,
and throwing their heart into the sea!"

"Then, it is a question of----"

"Precisely."

"In the water?"

"In the water."

"Faith, with a good harpoon!  You know, sir, these sharks are
ill-fashioned beasts.  They turn on their bellies to seize you,
and in that time----"

Ned Land had a way of saying "seize" which made my blood run cold.

"Well, and you, Conseil, what do you think of sharks?"

"Me!" said Conseil.  "I will be frank, sir."

"So much the better," thought I.

"If you, sir, mean to face the sharks, I do not see why your faithful
servant should not face them with you."



CHAPTER III

A PEARL OF TEN MILLIONS

The next morning at four o'clock I was awakened by
the steward whom Captain Nemo had placed at my service.
I rose hurriedly, dressed, and went into the saloon.

Captain Nemo was awaiting me.

"M. Aronnax," said he, "are you ready to start?"

"I am ready."

"Then please to follow me."

"And my companions, Captain?"

"They have been told and are waiting."

"Are we not to put on our diver's dresses?" asked I.

"Not yet.  I have not allowed the Nautilus to come too near this coast,
and we are some distance from the Manaar Bank; but the boat is ready, and will
take us to the exact point of disembarking, which will save us a long way.
It carries our diving apparatus, which we will put on when we begin
our submarine journey."

Captain Nemo conducted me to the central staircase,
which led on the platform.  Ned and Conseil were already there,
delighted at the idea of the "pleasure party" which was preparing.
Five sailors from the Nautilus, with their oars, waited in the boat,
which had been made fast against the side.

The night was still dark.  Layers of clouds covered the sky,
allowing but few stars to be seen.  I looked on the side
where the land lay, and saw nothing but a dark line enclosing
three parts of the horizon, from south-west to north west.
The Nautilus, having returned during the night up the western
coast of Ceylon, was now west of the bay, or rather gulf,
formed by the mainland and the Island of Manaar.
There, under the dark waters, stretched the pintadine bank,
an inexhaustible field of pearls, the length of which is more
than twenty miles.

Captain Nemo, Ned Land, Conseil, and I took our places
in the stern of the boat.  The master went to the tiller;
his four companions leaned on their oars, the painter was cast off,
and we sheered off.

The boat went towards the south; the oarsmen did not hurry.  I noticed
that their strokes, strong in the water, only followed each other every
ten seconds, according to the method generally adopted in the navy.
Whilst the craft was running by its own velocity, the liquid drops
struck the dark depths of the waves crisply like spats of melted lead.
A little billow, spreading wide, gave a slight roll to the boat, and some
samphire reeds flapped before it.

We were silent.  What was Captain Nemo thinking of?  Perhaps of
the land he was approaching, and which he found too near to him,
contrary to the Canadian's opinion, who thought it too far off.
As to Conseil, he was merely there from curiosity.

About half-past five the first tints on the horizon showed
the upper line of coast more distinctly.  Flat enough in the east,
it rose a little to the south.  Five miles still lay between us,
and it was indistinct owing to the mist on the water.
At six o'clock it became suddenly daylight, with that rapidity
peculiar to tropical regions, which know neither dawn nor twilight.
The solar rays pierced the curtain of clouds, piled up
on the eastern horizon, and the radiant orb rose rapidly.
I saw land distinctly, with a few trees scattered here and there.
The boat neared Manaar Island, which was rounded to the south.
Captain Nemo rose from his seat and watched the sea.

At a sign from him the anchor was dropped, but the chain scarcely ran,
for it was little more than a yard deep, and this spot was one of the highest
points of the bank of pintadines.

"Here we are, M. Aronnax," said Captain Nemo.
"You see that enclosed bay?  Here, in a month will be
assembled the numerous fishing boats of the exporters,
and these are the waters their divers will ransack so boldly.
Happily, this bay is well situated for that kind of fishing.
It is sheltered from the strongest winds; the sea is never very
rough here, which makes it favourable for the diver's work.
We will now put on our dresses, and begin our walk."

I did not answer, and, while watching the suspected waves,
began with the help of the sailors to put on my heavy
sea-dress. Captain Nemo and my companions were also dressing.
None of the Nautilus men were to accompany us on this new excursion.

Soon we were enveloped to the throat in india-rubber clothing;
the air apparatus fixed to our backs by braces.
As to the Ruhmkorff apparatus, there was no necessity for it.
Before putting my head into the copper cap, I had asked the question
of the Captain.

"They would be useless," he replied.  "We are going to no great depth,
and the solar rays will be enough to light our walk.  Besides, it would
not be prudent to carry the electric light in these waters;
its brilliancy might attract some of the dangerous inhabitants
of the coast most inopportunely."

As Captain Nemo pronounced these words, I turned to Conseil and Ned Land.
But my two friends had already encased their heads in the metal cap,
and they could neither hear nor answer.

One last question remained to ask of Captain Nemo.

"And our arms?" asked I; "our guns?"

"Guns!  What for?  Do not mountaineers attack the bear with
a dagger in their hand, and is not steel surer than lead?
Here is a strong blade; put it in your belt, and we start."

I looked at my companions; they were armed like us, and, more than that,
Ned Land was brandishing an enormous harpoon, which he had placed in the boat
before leaving the Nautilus.

Then, following the Captain's example, I allowed myself to be
dressed in the heavy copper helmet, and our reservoirs of air
were at once in activity.  An instant after we were landed,
one after the other, in about two yards of water upon an even sand.
Captain Nemo made a sign with his hand, and we followed him
by a gentle declivity till we disappeared under the waves.

{3 paragraphs missing}

At about seven o'clock we found ourselves at last surveying the oyster-banks
on which the pearl-oysters are reproduced by millions.

Captain Nemo pointed with his hand to the enormous heap of oysters;
and I could well understand that this mine was inexhaustible, for
Nature's creative power is far beyond man's instinct of destruction.
Ned Land, faithful to his instinct, hastened to fill a net
which he carried by his side with some of the finest specimens.
But we could not stop.  We must follow the Captain,
who seemed to guide him self by paths known only to himself.
The ground was sensibly rising, and sometimes,
on holding up my arm, it was above the surface of the sea.
Then the level of the bank would sink capriciously.
Often we rounded high rocks scarped into pyramids.
In their dark fractures huge crustacea, perched upon their
high claws like some war-machine, watched us with fixed eyes,
and under our feet crawled various kinds of annelides.

At this moment there opened before us a large grotto dug in a picturesque
heap of rocks and carpeted with all the thick warp of the submarine flora.
At first it seemed very dark to me.  The solar rays seemed to be
extinguished by successive gradations, until its vague transparency became
nothing more than drowned light.  Captain Nemo entered; we followed.
My eyes soon accustomed themselves to this relative state of darkness.
I could distinguish the arches springing capriciously from natural pillars,
standing broad upon their granite base, like the heavy columns of
Tuscan architecture.  Why had our incomprehensible guide led us to the bottom
of this submarine crypt?  I was soon to know.  After descending a rather
sharp declivity, our feet trod the bottom of a kind of circular pit.
There Captain Nemo stopped, and with his hand indicated an object I
had not yet perceived.  It was an oyster of extraordinary dimensions,
a gigantic tridacne, a goblet which could have contained a whole lake of
holy-water, a basin the breadth of which was more than two yards and a half,
and consequently larger than that ornamenting the saloon of the Nautilus.
I approached this extraordinary mollusc.  It adhered by its filaments
to a table of granite, and there, isolated, it developed itself in the calm
waters of the grotto.  I estimated the weight of this tridacne at 600 lb.
Such an oyster would contain 30 lb.  of meat; and one must have the stomach of
a Gargantua to demolish some dozens of them.

Captain Nemo was evidently acquainted with the existence of this bivalve,
and seemed to have a particular motive in verifying the actual state
of this tridacne.  The shells were a little open; the Captain came near
and put his dagger between to prevent them from closing; then with his
hand he raised the membrane with its fringed edges, which formed a cloak
for the creature.  There, between the folded plaits, I saw a loose pearl,
whose size equalled that of a coco-nut. Its globular shape, perfect clearness,
and admirable lustre made it altogether a jewel of inestimable value.
Carried away by my curiosity, I stretched out my hand to seize it,
weigh it, and touch it; but the Captain stopped me, made a sign of refusal,
and quickly withdrew his dagger, and the two shells closed suddenly.
I then understood Captain Nemo's intention.  In leaving this pearl
hidden in the mantle of the tridacne he was allowing it to grow slowly.
Each year the secretions of the mollusc would add new concentric circles.
I estimated its value at L500,000 at least.

After ten minutes Captain Nemo stopped suddenly.
I thought he had halted previously to returning.  No; by a
gesture he bade us crouch beside him in a deep fracture
of the rock, his hand pointed to one part of the liquid mass,
which I watched attentively.

About five yards from me a shadow appeared, and sank to the ground.
The disquieting idea of sharks shot through my mind, but I was mistaken;
and once again it was not a monster of the ocean that we had anything
to do with.

It was a man, a living man, an Indian, a fisherman, a poor
devil who, I suppose, had come to glean before the harvest.
I could see the bottom of his canoe anchored some feet above his head.
He dived and went up successively.  A stone held between his feet,
cut in the shape of a sugar loaf, whilst a rope fastened him to his boat,
helped him to descend more rapidly.  This was all his apparatus.
Reaching the bottom, about five yards deep, he went on his knees
and filled his bag with oysters picked up at random.  Then he went up,
emptied it, pulled up his stone, and began the operation once more,
which lasted thirty seconds.

The diver did not see us.  The shadow of the rock hid us from sight.
And how should this poor Indian ever dream that men, beings like himself,
should be there under the water watching his movements and losing no detail
of the fishing?  Several times he went up in this way, and dived again.
He did not carry away more than ten at each plunge, for he was obliged to pull
them from the bank to which they adhered by means of their strong byssus.
And how many of those oysters for which he risked his life had no pearl
in them!  I watched him closely; his manoeuvres were regular; and for the
space of half an hour no danger appeared to threaten him.

I was beginning to accustom myself to the sight of this interesting fishing,
when suddenly, as the Indian was on the ground, I saw him make a gesture
of terror, rise, and make a spring to return to the surface of the sea.

I understood his dread.  A gigantic shadow appeared just above
the unfortunate diver.  It was a shark of enormous size
advancing diagonally, his eyes on fire, and his jaws open.
I was mute with horror and unable to move.

The voracious creature shot towards the Indian, who threw
himself on one side to avoid the shark's fins; but not its tail,
for it struck his chest and stretched him on the ground.

This scene lasted but a few seconds:  the shark returned, and,
turning on his back, prepared himself for cutting the Indian in two,
when I saw Captain Nemo rise suddenly, and then, dagger in hand,
walk straight to the monster, ready to fight face to face with him.
The very moment the shark was going to snap the unhappy fisherman
in two, he perceived his new adversary, and, turning over,
made straight towards him.

I can still see Captain Nemo's position.  Holding himself well together,
he waited for the shark with admirable coolness; and, when it rushed at him,
threw himself on one side with wonderful quickness, avoiding the shock,
and burying his dagger deep into its side.  But it was not all over.
A terrible combat ensued.

The shark had seemed to roar, if I might say so.  The blood
rushed in torrents from its wound.  The sea was dyed red,
and through the opaque liquid I could distinguish nothing more.
Nothing more until the moment when, like lightning, I saw
the undaunted Captain hanging on to one of the creature's fins,
struggling, as it were, hand to hand with the monster,
and dealing successive blows at his enemy, yet still unable to give
a decisive one.

The shark's struggles agitated the water with such fury that the rocking
threatened to upset me.

I wanted to go to the Captain's assistance, but, nailed to the spot
with horror, I could not stir.

I saw the haggard eye; I saw the different phases of the fight.
The Captain fell to the earth, upset by the enormous mass which leant
upon him.  The shark's jaws opened wide, like a pair of factory shears,
and it would have been all over with the Captain; but, quick as thought,
harpoon in hand, Ned Land rushed towards the shark and struck it with
its sharp point.

The waves were impregnated with a mass of blood.  They rocked under
the shark's movements, which beat them with indescribable fury.
Ned Land had not missed his aim.  It was the monster's death-rattle.
Struck to the heart, it struggled in dreadful convulsions, the shock
of which overthrew Conseil.

But Ned Land had disentangled the Captain, who, getting up without any wound,
went straight to the Indian, quickly cut the cord which held him
to his stone, took him in his arms, and, with a sharp blow of his heel,
mounted to the surface.

We all three followed in a few seconds, saved by a miracle,
and reached the fisherman's boat.

Captain Nemo's first care was to recall the unfortunate
man to life again.  I did not think he could succeed.
I hoped so, for the poor creature's immersion was not long;
but the blow from the shark's tail might have been his death-blow.

Happily, with the Captain's and Conseil's sharp friction,
I saw consciousness return by degrees.  He opened his eyes.
What was his surprise, his terror even, at seeing four great
copper heads leaning over him!  And, above all, what must
he have thought when Captain Nemo, drawing from the pocket
of his dress a bag of pearls, placed it in his hand!
This munificent charity from the man of the waters to the poor
Cingalese was accepted with a trembling hand.  His wondering eyes
showed that he knew not to what super-human beings he owed both
fortune and life.

At a sign from the Captain we regained the bank, and, following the road
already traversed, came in about half an hour to the anchor which held
the canoe of the Nautilus to the earth.

Once on board, we each, with the help of the sailors, got rid
of the heavy copper helmet.

Captain Nemo's first word was to the Canadian.

"Thank you, Master Land," said he.

"It was in revenge, Captain," replied Ned Land.
"I owed you that."

A ghastly smile passed across the Captain's lips, and that was all.

"To the Nautilus," said he.

The boat flew over the waves.  Some minutes after we met the shark's
dead body floating.  By the black marking of the extremity of its fins,
I recognised the terrible melanopteron of the Indian Seas, of the species
of shark so properly called.  It was more than twenty-five feet long;
its enormous mouth occupied one-third of its body.  It was an adult,
as was known by its six rows of teeth placed in an isosceles triangle in
the upper jaw.

Whilst I was contemplating this inert mass, a dozen of these voracious
beasts appeared round the boat; and, without noticing us, threw themselves
upon the dead body and fought with one another for the pieces.

At half-past eight we were again on board the Nautilus.
There I reflected on the incidents which had taken place in our
excursion to the Manaar Bank.

Two conclusions I must inevitably draw from it--one bearing
upon the unparalleled courage of Captain Nemo, the other upon
his devotion to a human being, a representative of that race
from which he fled beneath the sea.  Whatever he might say,
this strange man had not yet succeeded in entirely crushing his heart.

When I made this observation to him, he answered in a slightly moved tone:

"That Indian, sir, is an inhabitant of an oppressed country;
and I am still, and shall be, to my last breath, one of them!"



CHAPTER IV

THE RED SEA

In the course of the day of the 29th of January, the island
of Ceylon disappeared under the horizon, and the Nautilus,
at a speed of twenty miles an hour, slid into the labyrinth
of canals which separate the Maldives from the Laccadives.
It coasted even the Island of Kiltan, a land originally coraline,
discovered by Vasco da Gama in 1499, and one of the nineteen
principal islands of the Laccadive Archipelago, situated between
10@ and 14@ 30' N. lat., and 69@ 50' 72" E. long.

We had made 16,220 miles, or 7,500 (French) leagues from our starting-point
in the Japanese Seas.

The next day (30th January), when the Nautilus went
to the surface of the ocean there was no land in sight.
Its course was N.N.E., in the direction of the Sea of Oman,
between Arabia and the Indian Peninsula, which serves as an
outlet to the Persian Gulf.  It was evidently a block without
any possible egress.  Where was Captain Nemo taking us to?
I could not say.  This, however, did not satisfy the Canadian,
who that day came to me asking where we were going.

"We are going where our Captain's fancy takes us, Master Ned."

"His fancy cannot take us far, then," said the Canadian.
"The Persian Gulf has no outlet:  and, if we do go in, it will
not be long before we are out again."

"Very well, then, we will come out again, Master Land; and if,
after the Persian Gulf, the Nautilus would like to visit the Red Sea,
the Straits of Bab-el-mandeb are there to give us entrance."

"I need not tell you, sir," said Ned Land, "that the Red Sea is as much closed
as the Gulf, as the Isthmus of Suez is not yet cut; and, if it was, a boat
as mysterious as ours would not risk itself in a canal cut with sluices.
And again, the Red Sea is not the road to take us back to Europe."

"But I never said we were going back to Europe."

"What do you suppose, then?"

"I suppose that, after visiting the curious coasts of Arabia
and Egypt, the Nautilus will go down the Indian Ocean again,
perhaps cross the Channel of Mozambique, perhaps off the Mascarenhas,
so as to gain the Cape of Good Hope."

"And once at the Cape of Good Hope?" asked the Canadian,
with peculiar emphasis.

"Well, we shall penetrate into that Atlantic which we do not yet know.
Ah! friend Ned, you are getting tired of this journey under the sea; you are
surfeited with the incessantly varying spectacle of submarine wonders.
For my part, I shall be sorry to see the end of a voyage which it is given to
so few men to make."

For four days, till the 3rd of February, the Nautilus scoured
the Sea of Oman, at various speeds and at various depths.
It seemed to go at random, as if hesitating as to which road it
should follow, but we never passed the Tropic of Cancer.

In quitting this sea we sighted Muscat for an instant,
one of the most important towns of the country of Oman.
I admired its strange aspect, surrounded by black rocks
upon which its white houses and forts stood in relief.
I saw the rounded domes of its mosques, the elegant points
of its minarets, its fresh and verdant terraces.  But it was only
a vision!  The Nautilus soon sank under the waves of that part
of the sea.

We passed along the Arabian coast of Mahrah and Hadramaut,
for a distance of six miles, its undulating line of mountains
being occasionally relieved by some ancient ruin.
The 5th of February we at last entered the Gulf of Aden,
a perfect funnel introduced into the neck of Bab-el-mandeb,
through which the Indian waters entered the Red Sea.

The 6th of February, the Nautilus floated in sight of Aden,
perched upon a promontory which a narrow isthmus joins to the mainland,
a kind of inaccessible Gibraltar, the fortifications of which
were rebuilt by the English after taking possession in 1839.
I caught a glimpse of the octagon minarets of this town, which was at
one time the richest commercial magazine on the coast.

I certainly thought that Captain Nemo, arrived at this point,
would back out again; but I was mistaken, for he did no such thing,
much to my surprise.

The next day, the 7th of February, we entered the Straits
of Bab-el-mandeb, the name of which, in the Arab tongue,
means The Gate of Tears.

To twenty miles in breadth, it is only thirty-two in length.
And for the Nautilus, starting at full speed, the crossing was scarcely
the work of an hour.  But I saw nothing, not even the Island of Perim,
with which the British Government has fortified the position of Aden.
There were too many English or French steamers of the line of Suez
to Bombay, Calcutta to Melbourne, and from Bourbon to the Mauritius,
furrowing this narrow passage, for the Nautilus to venture to show itself.
So it remained prudently below.  At last about noon, we were in the waters of
the Red Sea.

I would not even seek to understand the caprice which had decided Captain Nemo
upon entering the gulf.  But I quite approved of the Nautilus entering it.
Its speed was lessened:  sometimes it kept on the surface, sometimes it dived
to avoid a vessel, and thus I was able to observe the upper and lower parts
of this curious sea.

The 8th of February, from the first dawn of day, Mocha came
in sight, now a ruined town, whose walls would fall at a gunshot,
yet which shelters here and there some verdant date-trees;
once an important city, containing six public markets,
and twenty-six mosques, and whose walls, defended by fourteen forts,
formed a girdle of two miles in circumference.

The Nautilus then approached the African shore, where the depth of the sea
was greater.  There, between two waters clear as crystal, through the open
panels we were allowed to contemplate the beautiful bushes of brilliant
coral and large blocks of rock clothed with a splendid fur of green
variety of sites and landscapes along these sandbanks and algae and fuci.
What an indescribable spectacle, and what variety of sites and landscapes
along these sandbanks and volcanic islands which bound the Libyan coast!
But where these shrubs appeared in all their beauty was on the eastern coast,
which the Nautilus soon gained.  It was on the coast of Tehama, for there
not only did this display of zoophytes flourish beneath the level of the sea,
but they also formed picturesque interlacings which unfolded themselves about
sixty feet above the surface, more capricious but less highly coloured than
those whose freshness was kept up by the vital power of the waters.

What charming hours I passed thus at the window of the saloon!
What new specimens of submarine flora and fauna did I admire under
the brightness of our electric lantern!

The 9th of February the Nautilus floated in the broadest part of the Red Sea,
which is comprised between Souakin, on the west coast, and Komfidah,
on the east coast, with a diameter of ninety miles.

That day at noon, after the bearings were taken, Captain Nemo mounted
the platform, where I happened to be, and I was determined not to let him go
down again without at least pressing him regarding his ulterior projects.
As soon as he saw me he approached and graciously offered me a cigar.

"Well, sir, does this Red Sea please you?  Have you sufficiently
observed the wonders it covers, its fishes, its zoophytes,
its parterres of sponges, and its forests of coral?
Did you catch a glimpse of the towns on its borders?"

"Yes, Captain Nemo," I replied; "and the Nautilus is wonderfully
fitted for such a study.  Ah! it is an intelligent boat!"

"Yes, sir, intelligent and invulnerable.  It fears neither
the terrible tempests of the Red Sea, nor its currents,
nor its sandbanks."

"Certainly," said I, "this sea is quoted as one of the worst,
and in the time of the ancients, if I am not mistaken,
its reputation was detestable."

"Detestable, M. Aronnax.  The Greek and Latin historians
do not speak favourably of it, and Strabo says it is very
dangerous during the Etesian winds and in the rainy season.
The Arabian Edrisi portrays it under the name of the Gulf of Colzoum,
and relates that vessels perished there in great numbers on
the sandbanks and that no one would risk sailing in the night.
It is, he pretends, a sea subject to fearful hurricanes,
strewn with inhospitable islands, and `which offers nothing good
either on its surface or in its depths.'"

"One may see," I replied, "that these historians never sailed
on board the Nautilus."

"Just so," replied the Captain, smiling; "and in that respect
moderns are not more advanced than the ancients.  It required
many ages to find out the mechanical power of steam.  Who knows if,
in another hundred years, we may not see a second Nautilus?
Progress is slow, M. Aronnax."

"It is true," I answered; "your boat is at least a century before its time,
perhaps an era.  What a misfortune that the secret of such an invention
should die with its inventor!"

Captain Nemo did not reply.  After some minutes' silence he continued:

"You were speaking of the opinions of ancient historians upon
the dangerous navigation of the Red Sea."

"It is true," said I; "but were not their fears exaggerated?"

"Yes and no, M. Aronnax," replied Captain Nemo, who seemed to know the Red
Sea by heart.  "That which is no longer dangerous for a modern vessel,
well rigged, strongly built, and master of its own course, thanks to
obedient steam, offered all sorts of perils to the ships of the ancients.
Picture to yourself those first navigators venturing in ships made
of planks sewn with the cords of the palmtree, saturated with
the grease of the seadog, and covered with powdered resin!
They had not even instruments wherewith to take their bearings, and they
went by guess amongst currents of which they scarcely knew anything.
Under such conditions shipwrecks were, and must have been, numerous.
But in our time, steamers running between Suez and the South Seas have
nothing more to fear from the fury of this gulf, in spite of contrary
trade-winds. The captain and passengers do not prepare for their
departure by offering propitiatory sacrifices; and, on their return,
they no longer go ornamented with wreaths and gilt fillets to thank
the gods in the neighbouring temple."

"I agree with you," said I; "and steam seems to have killed all gratitude
in the hearts of sailors.  But, Captain, since you seem to have especially
studied this sea, can you tell me the origin of its name?"

"There exist several explanations on the subject, M. Aronnax.
Would you like to know the opinion of a chronicler of
the fourteenth century?"

"Willingly."

"This fanciful writer pretends that its name was given to it
after the passage of the Israelites, when Pharaoh perished
in the waves which closed at the voice of Moses."

"A poet's explanation, Captain Nemo," I replied; "but I cannot content
myself with that.  I ask you for your personal opinion."

"Here it is, M. Aronnax.  According to my idea, we must see
in this appellation of the Red Sea a translation of the Hebrew
word `Edom'; and if the ancients gave it that name, it was
on account of the particular colour of its waters."

"But up to this time I have seen nothing but transparent waves
and without any particular colour."

"Very likely; but as we advance to the bottom of the gulf, you will see
this singular appearance.  I remember seeing the Bay of Tor entirely red,
like a sea of blood."

"And you attribute this colour to the presence of a microscopic seaweed?"

"Yes."

"So, Captain Nemo, it is not the first time you have overrun
the Red Sea on board the Nautilus?"

"No, sir."

"As you spoke a while ago of the passage of the Israelites and of
the catastrophe to the Egyptians, I will ask whether you have met
with the traces under the water of this great historical fact?"

"No, sir; and for a good reason."

"What is it?"

"It is that the spot where Moses and his people passed is now so blocked
up with sand that the camels can barely bathe their legs there.
You can well understand that there would not be water enough
for my Nautilus."

"And the spot?"  I asked.

"The spot is situated a little above the Isthmus of Suez, in the arm
which formerly made a deep estuary, when the Red Sea extended to
the Salt Lakes.  Now, whether this passage were miraculous or not,
the Israelites, nevertheless, crossed there to reach the Promised Land,
and Pharaoh's army perished precisely on that spot; and I think
that excavations made in the middle of the sand would bring to light
a large number of arms and instruments of Egyptian origin."

"That is evident," I replied; "and for the sake of archaeologists let us
hope that these excavations will be made sooner or later, when new towns
are established on the isthmus, after the construction of the Suez Canal;
a canal, however, very useless to a vessel like the Nautilus."

"Very likely; but useful to the whole world," said Captain Nemo.
"The ancients well understood the utility of a communication between
the Red Sea and the Mediterranean for their commercial affairs:
but they did not think of digging a canal direct, and took the Nile
as an intermediate.  Very probably the canal which united the Nile
to the Red Sea was begun by Sesostris, if we may believe tradition.
One thing is certain, that in the year 615 before Jesus Christ,
Necos undertook the works of an alimentary canal to the waters
of the Nile across the plain of Egypt, looking towards Arabia.
It took four days to go up this canal, and it was so wide that
two triremes could go abreast.  It was carried on by Darius,
the son of Hystaspes, and probably finished by Ptolemy II.
Strabo saw it navigated:  but its decline from the point
of departure, near Bubastes, to the Red Sea was so slight
that it was only navigable for a few months in the year.
This canal answered all commercial purposes to the age
of Antonius, when it was abandoned and blocked up with sand.
Restored by order of the Caliph Omar, it was definitely destroyed
in 761 or 762 by Caliph Al-Mansor, who wished to prevent the arrival
of provisions to Mohammed-ben-Abdallah, who had revolted against him.
During the expedition into Egypt, your General Bonaparte discovered
traces of the works in the Desert of Suez; and, surprised by
the tide, he nearly perished before regaining Hadjaroth,
at the very place where Moses had encamped three thousand
years before him."

"Well, Captain, what the ancients dared not undertake, this junction
between the two seas, which will shorten the road from Cadiz to India,
M. Lesseps has succeeded in doing; and before long he will have changed
Africa into an immense island."

"Yes, M. Aronnax; you have the right to be proud of your countryman.
Such a man brings more honour to a nation than great captains.
He began, like so many others, with disgust and rebuffs;
but he has triumphed, for he has the genius of will.
And it is sad to think that a work like that, which ought to have
been an international work and which would have sufficed to make
a reign illustrious, should have succeeded by the energy of one man.
All honour to M. Lesseps!"

"Yes! honour to the great citizen," I replied, surprised by the manner
in which Captain Nemo had just spoken.

"Unfortunately," he continued, "I cannot take you through the Suez Canal;
but you will be able to see the long jetty of Port Said after to-morrow,
when we shall be in the Mediterranean."

"The Mediterranean!"  I exclaimed.

"Yes, sir; does that astonish you?"

"What astonishes me is to think that we shall be there
the day after to-morrow."

"Indeed?"

"Yes, Captain, although by this time I ought to have accustomed myself
to be surprised at nothing since I have been on board your boat."

"But the cause of this surprise?"

"Well! it is the fearful speed you will have to put on the Nautilus,
if the day after to-morrow she is to be in the Mediterranean,
having made the round of Africa, and doubled the Cape of Good Hope!"

"Who told you that she would make the round of Africa and double
the Cape of Good Hope, sir?"

"Well, unless the Nautilus sails on dry land, and passes above the isthmus----"

"Or beneath it, M. Aronnax."

"Beneath it?"

"Certainly," replied Captain Nemo quietly.  "A long time ago Nature made
under this tongue of land what man has this day made on its surface."

"What! such a passage exists?"

"Yes; a subterranean passage, which I have named the Arabian Tunnel.
It takes us beneath Suez and opens into the Gulf of Pelusium."

"But this isthmus is composed of nothing but quick sands?"

"To a certain depth.  But at fifty-five yards only there is a solid
layer of rock."

"Did you discover this passage by chance?"  I asked more and more surprised.

"Chance and reasoning, sir; and by reasoning even more than by chance.
Not only does this passage exist, but I have profited by it several times.
Without that I should not have ventured this day into the impassable Red Sea.
I noticed that in the Red Sea and in the Mediterranean there existed a certain
number of fishes of a kind perfectly identical.  Certain of the fact, I asked
myself was it possible that there was no communication between the two seas?
If there was, the subterranean current must necessarily run from the Red
Sea to the Mediterranean, from the sole cause of difference of level.
I caught a large number of fishes in the neighbourhood of Suez.
I passed a copper ring through their tails, and threw them back into the sea.
Some months later, on the coast of Syria, I caught some of my fish ornamented
with the ring.  Thus the communication between the two was proved.
I then sought for it with my Nautilus; I discovered it, ventured into it,
and before long, sir, you too will have passed through my Arabian tunnel!"



CHAPTER V

THE ARABIAN TUNNEL

That same evening, in 21@ 30' N. lat., the Nautilus floated
on the surface of the sea, approaching the Arabian coast.
I saw Djeddah, the most important counting-house of Egypt,
Syria, Turkey, and India.  I distinguished clearly enough
its buildings, the vessels anchored at the quays, and those whose
draught of water obliged them to anchor in the roads.  The sun,
rather low on the horizon, struck full on the houses of the town,
bringing out their whiteness.  Outside, some wooden cabins,
and some made of reeds, showed the quarter inhabited by the Bedouins.
Soon Djeddah was shut out from view by the shadows of night,
and the Nautilus found herself under water slightly phosphorescent.

The next day, the 10th of February, we sighted several ships running
to windward.  The Nautilus returned to its submarine navigation;
but at noon, when her bearings were taken, the sea being deserted,
she rose again to her waterline.

Accompanied by Ned and Conseil, I seated myself on the platform.
The coast on the eastern side looked like a mass faintly printed upon
a damp fog.

We were leaning on the sides of the pinnace, talking of one thing and another,
when Ned Land, stretching out his hand towards a spot on the sea, said:

"Do you see anything there, sir?"

"No, Ned," I replied; "but I have not your eyes, you know."

"Look well," said Ned, "there, on the starboard beam, about the height
of the lantern!  Do you not see a mass which seems to move?"

"Certainly," said I, after close attention; "I see something
like a long black body on the top of the water."

And certainly before long the black object was not more than a mile
from us.  It looked like a great sandbank deposited in the open sea.
It was a gigantic dugong!

Ned Land looked eagerly.  His eyes shone with covetousness at
the sight of the animal.  His hand seemed ready to harpoon it.
One would have thought he was awaiting the moment to throw himself
into the sea and attack it in its element.

At this instant Captain Nemo appeared on the platform.
He saw the dugong, understood the Canadian's attitude, and,
addressing him, said:

"If you held a harpoon just now, Master Land, would it not burn your hand?"

"Just so, sir."

"And you would not be sorry to go back, for one day, to your trade
of a fisherman and to add this cetacean to the list of those you
have already killed?"

"I should not, sir."

"Well, you can try."

"Thank you, sir," said Ned Land, his eyes flaming.

"Only," continued the Captain, "I advise you for your own sake
not to miss the creature."

"Is the dugong dangerous to attack?"  I asked, in spite of the Canadian's
shrug of the shoulders.

"Yes," replied the Captain; "sometimes the animal
turns upon its assailants and overturns their boat.
But for Master Land this danger is not to be feared.
His eye is prompt, his arm sure."

At this moment seven men of the crew, mute and immovable as ever,
mounted the platform.  One carried a harpoon and a line similar
to those employed in catching whales.  The pinnace was lifted from
the bridge, pulled from its socket, and let down into the sea.
Six oarsmen took their seats, and the coxswain went to the tiller.
Ned, Conseil, and I went to the back of the boat.

"You are not coming, Captain?"  I asked.

"No, sir; but I wish you good sport."

The boat put off, and, lifted by the six rowers, drew rapidly towards
the dugong, which floated about two miles from the Nautilus.

Arrived some cables-length from the cetacean, the speed slackened,
and the oars dipped noiselessly into the quiet waters.
Ned Land, harpoon in hand, stood in the fore part of the boat.
The harpoon used for striking the whale is generally attached to a
very long cord which runs out rapidly as the wounded creature draws
it after him.  But here the cord was not more than ten fathoms long,
and the extremity was attached to a small barrel which, by floating,
was to show the course the dugong took under the water.

I stood and carefully watched the Canadian's adversary.
This dugong, which also bears the name of the halicore,
closely resembles the manatee; its oblong body terminated
in a lengthened tail, and its lateral fins in perfect fingers.
Its difference from the manatee consisted in its upper jaw,
which was armed with two long and pointed teeth which formed on each
side diverging tusks.

This dugong which Ned Land was preparing to attack was
of colossal dimensions; it was more than seven yards long.
It did not move, and seemed to be sleeping on the waves,
which circumstance made it easier to capture.

The boat approached within six yards of the animal.
The oars rested on the rowlocks.  I half rose.  Ned Land,
his body thrown a little back, brandished the harpoon in
his experienced hand.

Suddenly a hissing noise was heard, and the dugong disappeared.
The harpoon, although thrown with great force; had apparently only
struck the water.

"Curse it!" exclaimed the Canadian furiously; "I have missed it!"

"No," said I; "the creature is wounded--look at the blood;
but your weapon has not stuck in his body."

"My harpoon! my harpoon!" cried Ned Land.

The sailors rowed on, and the coxswain made for the floating barrel.
The harpoon regained, we followed in pursuit of the animal.

The latter came now and then to the surface to breathe.
Its wound had not weakened it, for it shot onwards with great rapidity.

The boat, rowed by strong arms, flew on its track.  Several times it
approached within some few yards, and the Canadian was ready to strike,
but the dugong made off with a sudden plunge, and it was impossible
to reach it.

Imagine the passion which excited impatient Ned Land!  He hurled at the
unfortunate creature the most energetic expletives in the English tongue.
For my part, I was only vexed to see the dugong escape all our attacks.

We pursued it without relaxation for an hour, and I began to think
it would prove difficult to capture, when the animal, possessed with
the perverse idea of vengeance of which he had cause to repent,
turned upon the pinnace and assailed us in its turn.

This manoeuvre did not escape the Canadian.

"Look out!" he cried.

The coxswain said some words in his outlandish tongue,
doubtless warning the men to keep on their guard.

The dugong came within twenty feet of the boat, stopped, sniffed the air
briskly with its large nostrils (not pierced at the extremity,
but in the upper part of its muzzle). Then, taking a spring,
he threw himself upon us.

The pinnace could not avoid the shock, and half upset, shipped at least
two tons of water, which had to be emptied; but, thanks to the coxswain,
we caught it sideways, not full front, so we were not quite overturned.
While Ned Land, clinging to the bows, belaboured the gigantic animal with
blows from his harpoon, the creature's teeth were buried in the gunwale,
and it lifted the whole thing out of the water, as a lion does a roebuck.
We were upset over one another, and I know not how the adventure would
have ended, if the Canadian, still enraged with the beast, had not struck it
to the heart.

I heard its teeth grind on the iron plate, and the dugong disappeared,
carrying the harpoon with him.  But the barrel soon returned to the surface,
and shortly after the body of the animal, turned on its back.
The boat came up with it, took it in tow, and made straight for the Nautilus.

It required tackle of enormous strength to hoist the dugong
on to the platform.  It weighed 10,000 lb.

The next day, 11th February, the larder of the Nautilus was enriched by some
more delicate game.  A flight of sea-swallows rested on the Nautilus.
It was a species of the Sterna nilotica, peculiar to Egypt; its beak is black,
head grey and pointed, the eye surrounded by white spots, the back, wings,
and tail of a greyish colour, the belly and throat white, and claws red.
They also took some dozen of Nile ducks, a wild bird of high flavour,
its throat and upper part of the head white with black spots.

About five o'clock in the evening we sighted to the north the Cape
of Ras-Mohammed. This cape forms the extremity of Arabia Petraea,
comprised between the Gulf of Suez and the Gulf of Acabah.

The Nautilus penetrated into the Straits of Jubal, which leads
to the Gulf of Suez.  I distinctly saw a high mountain,
towering between the two gulfs of Ras-Mohammed. It was Mount Horeb,
that Sinai at the top of which Moses saw God face to face.

At six o'clock the Nautilus, sometimes floating, sometimes immersed,
passed some distance from Tor, situated at the end of the bay, the waters
of which seemed tinted with red, an observation already made by Captain Nemo.
Then night fell in the midst of a heavy silence, sometimes broken by the cries
of the pelican and other night-birds, and the noise of the waves breaking upon
the shore, chafing against the rocks, or the panting of some far-off steamer
beating the waters of the Gulf with its noisy paddles.

From eight to nine o'clock the Nautilus remained some fathoms
under the water.  According to my calculation we must have
been very near Suez.  Through the panel of the saloon I saw
the bottom of the rocks brilliantly lit up by our electric lamp.
We seemed to be leaving the Straits behind us more and more.

At a quarter-past nine, the vessel having returned to the surface,
I mounted the platform.  Most impatient to pass through Captain
Nemo's tunnel, I could not stay in one place, so came to breathe
the fresh night air.

Soon in the shadow I saw a pale light, half discoloured by the fog,
shining about a mile from us.

"A floating lighthouse!" said someone near me.

I turned, and saw the Captain.

"It is the floating light of Suez," he continued.
"It will not be long before we gain the entrance of the tunnel."

"The entrance cannot be easy?"

"No, sir; for that reason I am accustomed to go into the steersman's cage
and myself direct our course.  And now, if you will go down, M. Aronnax,
the Nautilus is going under the waves, and will not return to the surface
until we have passed through the Arabian Tunnel."

Captain Nemo led me towards the central staircase; half way down he opened
a door, traversed the upper deck, and landed in the pilot's cage,
which it may be remembered rose at the extremity of the platform.
It was a cabin measuring six feet square, very much like that occupied
by the pilot on the steamboats of the Mississippi or Hudson.
In the midst worked a wheel, placed vertically, and caught
to the tiller-rope, which ran to the back of the Nautilus.
Four light-ports with lenticular glasses, let in a groove in
the partition of the cabin, allowed the man at the wheel to see
in all directions.

This cabin was dark; but soon my eyes accustomed themselves to the obscurity,
and I perceived the pilot, a strong man, with his hands resting on the spokes
of the wheel.  Outside, the sea appeared vividly lit up by the lantern,
which shed its rays from the back of the cabin to the other extremity
of the platform.

"Now," said Captain Nemo, "let us try to make our passage."

Electric wires connected the pilot's cage with the machinery room,
and from there the Captain could communicate simultaneously to his
Nautilus the direction and the speed.  He pressed a metal knob,
and at once the speed of the screw diminished.

I looked in silence at the high straight wall we were running
by at this moment, the immovable base of a massive sandy coast.
We followed it thus for an hour only some few yards off.

Captain Nemo did not take his eye from the knob, suspended by
its two concentric circles in the cabin.  At a simple gesture,
the pilot modified the course of the Nautilus every instant.

I had placed myself at the port-scuttle, and saw some magnificent
substructures of coral, zoophytes, seaweed, and fucus, agitating their
enormous claws, which stretched out from the fissures of the rock.

At a quarter-past ten, the Captain himself took the helm.
A large gallery, black and deep, opened before us.  The Nautilus
went boldly into it.  A strange roaring was heard round its sides.
It was the waters of the Red Sea, which the incline of
the tunnel precipitated violently towards the Mediterranean.
The Nautilus went with the torrent, rapid as an arrow, in spite
of the efforts of the machinery, which, in order to offer more
effective resistance, beat the waves with reversed screw.

On the walls of the narrow passage I could see nothing
but brilliant rays, straight lines, furrows of fire,
traced by the great speed, under the brilliant electric light.
My heart beat fast.

At thirty-five minutes past ten, Captain Nemo quitted the helm,
and, turning to me, said:

"The Mediterranean!"

In less than twenty minutes, the Nautilus, carried along by the torrent,
had passed through the Isthmus of Suez.



CHAPTER VI

THE GRECIAN ARCHIPELAGO

The next day, the 12th of February, at the dawn of day,
the Nautilus rose to the surface.  I hastened on to the platform.
Three miles to the south the dim outline of Pelusium was to be seen.
A torrent had carried us from one sea to another.
About seven o'clock Ned and Conseil joined me.

"Well, Sir Naturalist," said the Canadian, in a slightly jovial tone,
"and the Mediterranean?"

"We are floating on its surface, friend Ned."

"What!" said Conseil, "this very night."

"Yes, this very night; in a few minutes we have passed
this impassable isthmus."

"I do not believe it," replied the Canadian.

"Then you are wrong, Master Land," I continued; "this low
coast which rounds off to the south is the Egyptian coast.
And you who have such good eyes, Ned, you can see the jetty of Port
Said stretching into the sea."

The Canadian looked attentively.

"Certainly you are right, sir, and your Captain is a first-rate man.
We are in the Mediterranean.  Good!  Now, if you please, let us talk
of our own little affair, but so that no one hears us."

I saw what the Canadian wanted, and, in any case, I thought it better to let
him talk, as he wished it; so we all three went and sat down near the lantern,
where we were less exposed to the spray of the blades.

"Now, Ned, we listen; what have you to tell us?"

"What I have to tell you is very simple.  We are in Europe; and before
Captain Nemo's caprices drag us once more to the bottom of the Polar Seas,
or lead us into Oceania, I ask to leave the Nautilus."

I wished in no way to shackle the liberty of my companions,
but I certainly felt no desire to leave Captain Nemo.

Thanks to him, and thanks to his apparatus, I was each day
nearer the completion of my submarine studies; and I was
rewriting my book of submarine depths in its very element.
Should I ever again have such an opportunity of observing
the wonders of the ocean?  No, certainly not!  And I could
not bring myself to the idea of abandoning the Nautilus before
the cycle of investigation was accomplished.

"Friend Ned, answer me frankly, are you tired of being on board?
Are you sorry that destiny has thrown us into Captain Nemo's hands?"

The Canadian remained some moments without answering.
Then, crossing his arms, he said:

"Frankly, I do not regret this journey under the seas.  I shall be glad
to have made it; but, now that it is made, let us have done with it.
That is my idea."

"It will come to an end, Ned."

"Where and when?"

"Where I do not know--when I cannot say; or, rather, I suppose
it will end when these seas have nothing more to teach us."

"Then what do you hope for?" demanded the Canadian.

"That circumstances may occur as well six months hence as now by which we
may and ought to profit."

"Oh!" said Ned Land, "and where shall we be in six months,
if you please, Sir Naturalist?"

"Perhaps in China; you know the Nautilus is a rapid traveller.
It goes through water as swallows through the air, or as an express
on the land.  It does not fear frequented seas; who can say
that it may not beat the coasts of France, England, or America,
on which flight may be attempted as advantageously as here."

"M. Aronnax," replied the Canadian, "your arguments are rotten
at the foundation.  You speak in the future, `We shall be there!
we shall be here!'  I speak in the present, `We are here,
and we must profit by it.'"

Ned Land's logic pressed me hard, and I felt myself beaten on that ground.
I knew not what argument would now tell in my favour.

"Sir," continued Ned, "let us suppose an impossibility:
if Captain Nemo should this day offer you your liberty;
would you accept it?"

"I do not know," I answered.

"And if," he added, "the offer made you this day was never to be renewed,
would you accept it?"

"Friend Ned, this is my answer.  Your reasoning is against me.
We must not rely on Captain Nemo's good-will. Common prudence
forbids him to set us at liberty.  On the other side, prudence bids
us profit by the first opportunity to leave the Nautilus."

"Well, M. Aronnax, that is wisely said."

"Only one observation--just one.  The occasion must be serious,
and our first attempt must succeed; if it fails, we shall never
find another, and Captain Nemo will never forgive us."

"All that is true," replied the Canadian.  "But your observation
applies equally to all attempts at flight, whether in two years'
time, or in two days'. But the question is still this:
If a favourable opportunity presents itself, it must be seized."

"Agreed!  And now, Ned, will you tell me what you mean
by a favourable opportunity?"

"It will be that which, on a dark night, will bring the Nautilus
a short distance from some European coast."

"And you will try and save yourself by swimming?"

"Yes, if we were near enough to the bank, and if the vessel
was floating at the time.  Not if the bank was far away,
and the boat was under the water."

"And in that case?"

"In that case, I should seek to make myself master of the pinnace.
I know how it is worked.  We must get inside, and the bolts once drawn,
we shall come to the surface of the water, without even the pilot,
who is in the bows, perceiving our flight."

"Well, Ned, watch for the opportunity; but do not forget that a hitch
will ruin us."

"I will not forget, sir."

"And now, Ned, would you like to know what I think of your project?"

"Certainly, M. Aronnax."

"Well, I think--I do not say I hope--I think that this favourable
opportunity will never present itself."

"Why not?"

"Because Captain Nemo cannot hide from himself that we have not given up
all hope of regaining our liberty, and he will be on his guard, above all,
in the seas and in the sight of European coasts."

"We shall see," replied Ned Land, shaking his head determinedly.

"And now, Ned Land," I added, "let us stop here.
Not another word on the subject.  The day that you
are ready, come and let us know, and we will follow you.
I rely entirely upon you."

Thus ended a conversation which, at no very distant time,
led to such grave results.  I must say here that facts seemed
to confirm my foresight, to the Canadian's great despair.
Did Captain Nemo distrust us in these frequented seas? or did
he only wish to hide himself from the numerous vessels,
of all nations, which ploughed the Mediterranean?
I could not tell; but we were oftener between waters
and far from the coast.  Or, if the Nautilus did emerge,
nothing was to be seen but the pilot's cage; and sometimes it
went to great depths, for, between the Grecian Archipelago
and Asia Minor we could not touch the bottom by more than
a thousand fathoms.

Thus I only knew we were near the Island of Carpathos, one of the Sporades,
by Captain Nemo reciting these lines from Virgil:

"Est Carpathio Neptuni gurgite vates, Caeruleus Proteus,"

as he pointed to a spot on the planisphere.

It was indeed the ancient abode of Proteus, the old shepherd of Neptune's
flocks, now the Island of Scarpanto, situated between Rhodes and Crete.
I saw nothing but the granite base through the glass panels of the saloon.

The next day, the 14th of February, I resolved to employ some hours in
studying the fishes of the Archipelago; but for some reason or other the
panels remained hermetically sealed.  Upon taking the course of the Nautilus,
I found that we were going towards Candia, the ancient Isle of Crete.
At the time I embarked on the Abraham Lincoln, the whole of this
island had risen in insurrection against the despotism of the Turks.
But how the insurgents had fared since that time I was absolutely ignorant,
and it was not Captain Nemo, deprived of all land communications,
who could tell me.

I made no allusion to this event when that night I found myself alone
with him in the saloon.  Besides, he seemed to be taciturn and preoccupied.
Then, contrary to his custom, he ordered both panels to be opened, and,
going from one to the other, observed the mass of waters attentively.
To what end I could not guess; so, on my side, I employed my time in studying
the fish passing before my eyes.

In the midst of the waters a man appeared, a diver, carrying at his
belt a leathern purse.  It was not a body abandoned to the waves;
it was a living man, swimming with a strong hand, disappearing occasionally
to take breath at the surface.

I turned towards Captain Nemo, and in an agitated voice exclaimed:

"A man shipwrecked!  He must be saved at any price!"

The Captain did not answer me, but came and leaned against the panel.

The man had approached, and, with his face flattened against the glass,
was looking at us.

To my great amazement, Captain Nemo signed to him.
The diver answered with his hand, mounted immediately to
the surface of the water, and did not appear again.

"Do not be uncomfortable," said Captain Nemo.  "It is Nicholas of
Cape Matapan, surnamed Pesca.  He is well known in all the Cyclades.
A bold diver! water is his element, and he lives more in it than on land,
going continually from one island to another, even as far as Crete."

"You know him, Captain?"

"Why not, M. Aronnax?"

Saying which, Captain Nemo went towards a piece of furniture standing
near the left panel of the saloon.  Near this piece of furniture,
I saw a chest bound with iron, on the cover of which was a copper plate,
bearing the cypher of the Nautilus with its device.

At that moment, the Captain, without noticing my presence,
opened the piece of furniture, a sort of strong box, which held
a great many ingots.

They were ingots of gold.  From whence came this precious metal,
which represented an enormous sum?  Where did the Captain gather
this gold from? and what was he going to do with it?

I did not say one word.  I looked.  Captain Nemo took the ingots one by one,
and arranged them methodically in the chest, which he filled entirely.
I estimated the contents at more than 4,000 lb.  weight of gold, that is
to say, nearly L200,000.

The chest was securely fastened, and the Captain wrote an address on the lid,
in characters which must have belonged to Modern Greece.

This done, Captain Nemo pressed a knob, the wire of which communicated with
the quarters of the crew.  Four men appeared, and, not without some trouble,
pushed the chest out of the saloon.  Then I heard them hoisting it up the iron
staircase by means of pulleys.

At that moment, Captain Nemo turned to me.

"And you were saying, sir?" said he.

"I was saying nothing, Captain."

"Then, sir, if you will allow me, I will wish you good night."

Whereupon he turned and left the saloon.

I returned to my room much troubled, as one may believe.
I vainly tried to sleep--I sought the connecting link between
the apparition of the diver and the chest filled with gold.
Soon, I felt by certain movements of pitching and tossing
that the Nautilus was leaving the depths and returning
to the surface.

Then I heard steps upon the platform; and I knew they were
unfastening the pinnace and launching it upon the waves.
For one instant it struck the side of the Nautilus,
then all noise ceased.

Two hours after, the same noise, the same going and coming was renewed;
the boat was hoisted on board, replaced in its socket, and the Nautilus
again plunged under the waves.

So these millions had been transported to their address.
To what point of the continent?  Who was Captain Nemo's correspondent?

The next day I related to Conseil and the Canadian the events
of the night, which had excited my curiosity to the highest degree.
My companions were not less surprised than myself.

"But where does he take his millions to?" asked Ned Land.

To that there was no possible answer.  I returned to the saloon
after having breakfast and set to work.  Till five o'clock
in the evening I employed myself in arranging my notes.
At that moment--(ought I to attribute it to some peculiar idiosyncrasy)--
I felt so great a heat that I was obliged to take off my coat.
It was strange, for we were under low latitudes; and even then the Nautilus,
submerged as it was, ought to experience no change of temperature.
I looked at the manometer; it showed a depth of sixty feet, to which
atmospheric heat could never attain.

I continued my work, but the temperature rose to such a pitch
as to be intolerable.

"Could there be fire on board?"  I asked myself.

I was leaving the saloon, when Captain Nemo entered; he approached
the thermometer, consulted it, and, turning to me, said:

"Forty-two degrees."

"I have noticed it, Captain," I replied; "and if it gets much
hotter we cannot bear it."

"Oh, sir, it will not get better if we do not wish it."

"You can reduce it as you please, then?"

"No; but I can go farther from the stove which produces it."

"It is outward, then!"

"Certainly; we are floating in a current of boiling water."

"Is it possible!"  I exclaimed.

"Look."

The panels opened, and I saw the sea entirely white all round.
A sulphurous smoke was curling amid the waves, which boiled like
water in a copper.  I placed my hand on one of the panes of glass,
but the heat was so great that I quickly took it off again.

"Where are we?"  I asked.

"Near the Island of Santorin, sir," replied the Captain.
"I wished to give you a sight of the curious spectacle of
a submarine eruption."

"I thought," said I, "that the formation of these new islands was ended."

"Nothing is ever ended in the volcanic parts of the sea,"
replied Captain Nemo; "and the globe is always being worked by
subterranean fires.  Already, in the nineteenth year of our era,
according to Cassiodorus and Pliny, a new island, Theia
(the divine), appeared in the very place where these islets
have recently been formed.  Then they sank under the waves,
to rise again in the year 69, when they again subsided.
Since that time to our days the Plutonian work has been suspended.
But on the 3rd of February, 1866, a new island, which they named
George Island, emerged from the midst of the sulphurous vapour
near Nea Kamenni, and settled again the 6th of the same month.
Seven days after, the 13th of February, the Island of Aphroessa
appeared, leaving between Nea Kamenni and itself a canal ten
yards broad.  I was in these seas when the phenomenon occurred,
and I was able therefore to observe all the different phases.
The Island of Aphroessa, of round form, measured 300 feet
in diameter, and 30 feet in height.  It was composed of
black and vitreous lava, mixed with fragments of felspar.
And lastly, on the 10th of March, a smaller island, called Reka,
showed itself near Nea Kamenni, and since then these three have
joined together, forming but one and the same island."

"And the canal in which we are at this moment?"  I asked.

"Here it is," replied Captain Nemo, showing me a map of the Archipelago.
"You see, I have marked the new islands."

I returned to the glass.  The Nautilus was no longer moving,
the heat was becoming unbearable.  The sea, which till now had
been white, was red, owing to the presence of salts of iron.
In spite of the ship's being hermetically sealed, an insupportable
smell of sulphur filled the saloon, and the brilliancy of the
electricity was entirely extinguished by bright scarlet flames.
I was in a bath, I was choking, I was broiled.

"We can remain no longer in this boiling water," said I to the Captain.

"It would not be prudent," replied the impassive Captain Nemo.

An order was given; the Nautilus tacked about and left
the furnace it could not brave with impunity.  A quarter
of an hour after we were breathing fresh air on the surface.
The thought then struck me that, if Ned Land had chosen this part
of the sea for our flight, we should never have come alive out
of this sea of fire.

The next day, the 16th of February, we left the basin which,
between Rhodes and Alexandria, is reckoned about 1,500 fathoms
in depth, and the Nautilus, passing some distance from Cerigo,
quitted the Grecian Archipelago after having doubled Cape Matapan.



CHAPTER VII

THE MEDITERRANEAN IN FORTY-EIGHT HOURS

The Mediterranean, the blue sea par excellence, "the great sea"
of the Hebrews, "the sea" of the Greeks, the "mare nostrum"
of the Romans, bordered by orange-trees, aloes, cacti, and sea-pines;
embalmed with the perfume of the myrtle, surrounded by rude mountains,
saturated with pure and transparent air, but incessantly worked
by underground fires; a perfect battlefield in which Neptune and Pluto
still dispute the empire of the world!

It is upon these banks, and on these waters, says Michelet, that man
is renewed in one of the most powerful climates of the globe.
But, beautiful as it was, I could only take a rapid glance at
the basin whose superficial area is two million of square yards.
Even Captain Nemo's knowledge was lost to me, for this puzzling
person did not appear once during our passage at full speed.
I estimated the course which the Nautilus took under the waves
of the sea at about six hundred leagues, and it was accomplished
in forty-eight hours.  Starting on the morning of the 16th
of February from the shores of Greece, we had crossed the Straits
of Gibraltar by sunrise on the 18th.

It was plain to me that this Mediterranean, enclosed in the midst of those
countries which he wished to avoid, was distasteful to Captain Nemo.
Those waves and those breezes brought back too many remembrances, if not
too many regrets.  Here he had no longer that independence and that liberty
of gait which he had when in the open seas, and his Nautilus felt itself
cramped between the close shores of Africa and Europe.

Our speed was now twenty-five miles an hour.  It may be well
understood that Ned Land, to his great disgust, was obliged
to renounce his intended flight.  He could not launch the pinnace,
going at the rate of twelve or thirteen yards every second.
To quit the Nautilus under such conditions would be as bad
as jumping from a train going at full speed--an imprudent thing,
to say the least of it.  Besides, our vessel only mounted
to the surface of the waves at night to renew its stock of air;
it was steered entirely by the compass and the log.

I saw no more of the interior of this Mediterranean than a traveller
by express train perceives of the landscape which flies before his eyes;
that is to say, the distant horizon, and not the nearer objects which pass
like a flash of lightning.

We were then passing between Sicily and the coast of Tunis.
In the narrow space between Cape Bon and the Straits
of Messina the bottom of the sea rose almost suddenly.
There was a perfect bank, on which there was not more than
nine fathoms of water, whilst on either side the depth
was ninety fathoms.

The Nautilus had to manoeuvre very carefully so as not to strike
against this submarine barrier.

I showed Conseil, on the map of the Mediterranean, the spot occupied
by this reef.

"But if you please, sir," observed Conseil, "it is like a real
isthmus joining Europe to Africa."

"Yes, my boy, it forms a perfect bar to the Straits of Lybia,
and the soundings of Smith have proved that in former times
the continents between Cape Boco and Cape Furina were joined."

"I can well believe it," said Conseil.

"I will add," I continued, "that a similar barrier exists between Gibraltar
and Ceuta, which in geological times formed the entire Mediterranean."

"What if some volcanic burst should one day raise these two barriers
above the waves?"

"It is not probable, Conseil."

"Well, but allow me to finish, please, sir; if this phenomenon
should take place, it will be troublesome for M. Lesseps,
who has taken so much pains to pierce the isthmus."

"I agree with you; but I repeat, Conseil, this phenomenon will
never happen.  The violence of subterranean force is ever diminishing.
Volcanoes, so plentiful in the first days of the world,
are being extinguished by degrees; the internal heat is weakened,
the temperature of the lower strata of the globe is lowered by a
perceptible quantity every century to the detriment of our globe,
for its heat is its life."

"But the sun?"

"The sun is not sufficient, Conseil.  Can it give heat to a dead body?"

"Not that I know of."

"Well, my friend, this earth will one day be that cold corpse;
it will become uninhabitable and uninhabited like the moon,
which has long since lost all its vital heat."

"In how many centuries?"

"In some hundreds of thousands of years, my boy."

"Then," said Conseil, "we shall have time to finish our journey--
that is, if Ned Land does not interfere with it."

And Conseil, reassured, returned to the study of the bank,
which the Nautilus was skirting at a moderate speed.

During the night of the 16th and 17th February we had entered the second
Mediterranean basin, the greatest depth of which was 1,450 fathoms.
The Nautilus, by the action of its crew, slid down the inclined planes
and buried itself in the lowest depths of the sea.

On the 18th of February, about three o'clock in the morning, we were at
the entrance of the Straits of Gibraltar.  There once existed two currents:
an upper one, long since recognised, which conveys the waters of the ocean
into the basin of the Mediterranean; and a lower counter-current,
which reasoning has now shown to exist.  Indeed, the volume of water
in the Mediterranean, incessantly added to by the waves of the Atlantic
and by rivers falling into it, would each year raise the level of this sea,
for its evaporation is not sufficient to restore the equilibrium.
As it is not so, we must necessarily admit the existence of an under-current,
which empties into the basin of the Atlantic through the Straits
of Gibraltar the surplus waters of the Mediterranean.  A fact indeed;
and it was this counter-current by which the Nautilus profited.
It advanced rapidly by the narrow pass.  For one instant I caught a glimpse
of the beautiful ruins of the temple of Hercules, buried in the ground,
according to Pliny, and with the low island which supports it; and a few
minutes later we were floating on the Atlantic.



CHAPTER VIII

VIGO BAY

The Atlantic! a vast sheet of water whose superficial area covers
twenty-five millions of square miles, the length of which is nine
thousand miles, with a mean breadth of two thousand seven hundred--
an ocean whose parallel winding shores embrace an immense circumference,
watered by the largest rivers of the world, the St. Lawrence,
the Mississippi, the Amazon, the Plata, the Orinoco, the Niger,
the Senegal, the Elbe, the Loire, and the Rhine, which carry water
from the most civilised, as well as from the most savage, countries!
Magnificent field of water, incessantly ploughed by vessels
of every nation, sheltered by the flags of every nation, and which
terminates in those two terrible points so dreaded by mariners,
Cape Horn and the Cape of Tempests.

The Nautilus was piercing the water with its sharp spur,
after having accomplished nearly ten thousand leagues in three months
and a half, a distance greater than the great circle of the earth.
Where were we going now, and what was reserved for the future?
The Nautilus, leaving the Straits of Gibraltar, had gone far out.
It returned to the surface of the waves, and our daily walks on the
platform were restored to us.

I mounted at once, accompanied by Ned Land and Conseil.
At a distance of about twelve miles, Cape St. Vincent
was dimly to be seen, forming the south-western point of
the Spanish peninsula.  A strong southerly gale was blowing.
The sea was swollen and billowy; it made the Nautilus rock violently.
It was almost impossible to keep one's foot on the platform,
which the heavy rolls of the sea beat over every instant.
So we descended after inhaling some mouthfuls of fresh air.

I returned to my room, Conseil to his cabin; but the Canadian,
with a preoccupied air, followed me.  Our rapid passage across
the Mediterranean had not allowed him to put his project
into execution, and he could not help showing his disappointment.
When the door of my room was shut, he sat down and looked
at me silently.

"Friend Ned," said I, "I understand you; but you cannot reproach yourself.
To have attempted to leave the Nautilus under the circumstances would
have been folly."

Ned Land did not answer; his compressed lips and frowning brow showed
with him the violent possession this fixed idea had taken of his mind.

"Let us see," I continued; "we need not despair yet.
We are going up the coast of Portugal again; France and
England are not far off, where we can easily find refuge.
Now if the Nautilus, on leaving the Straits of Gibraltar,
had gone to the south, if it had carried us towards regions
where there were no continents, I should share your uneasiness.
But we know now that Captain Nemo does not fly from civilised seas,
and in some days I think you can act with security."

Ned Land still looked at me fixedly; at length his fixed lips parted,
and he said, "It is for to-night."

I drew myself up suddenly.  I was, I admit, little prepared
for this communication.  I wanted to answer the Canadian,
but words would not come.

"We agreed to wait for an opportunity," continued Ned Land,
"and the opportunity has arrived.  This night we shall
be but a few miles from the Spanish coast.  It is cloudy.
The wind blows freely.  I have your word, M. Aronnax, and I
rely upon you."

As I was silent, the Canadian approached me.

"To-night, at nine o'clock," said he.  "I have warned Conseil.
At that moment Captain Nemo will be shut up in his room, probably in bed.
Neither the engineers nor the ship's crew can see us.
Conseil and I will gain the central staircase, and you, M. Aronnax,
will remain in the library, two steps from us, waiting my signal.
The oars, the mast, and the sail are in the canoe.  I have even succeeded
in getting some provisions.  I have procured an English wrench,
to unfasten the bolts which attach it to the shell of the Nautilus.
So all is ready, till to-night."

"The sea is bad."

"That I allow," replied the Canadian; "but we must risk that.
Liberty is worth paying for; besides, the boat is strong,
and a few miles with a fair wind to carry us is no great thing.
Who knows but by to-morrow we may be a hundred leagues away?
Let circumstances only favour us, and by ten or eleven o'clock we
shall have landed on some spot of terra firma, alive or dead.
But adieu now till to-night."

With these words the Canadian withdrew, leaving me almost dumb.
I had imagined that, the chance gone, I should have time to
reflect and discuss the matter.  My obstinate companion had given
me no time; and, after all, what could I have said to him?
Ned Land was perfectly right.  There was almost the opportunity
to profit by.  Could I retract my word, and take upon myself
the responsibility of compromising the future of my companions?
To-morrow Captain Nemo might take us far from all land.

At that moment a rather loud hissing noise told me that the reservoirs
were filling, and that the Nautilus was sinking under the waves
of the Atlantic.

A sad day I passed, between the desire of regaining my liberty
of action and of abandoning the wonderful Nautilus, and leaving
my submarine studies incomplete.

What dreadful hours I passed thus!  Sometimes seeing myself and
companions safely landed, sometimes wishing, in spite of my reason,
that some unforeseen circumstance, would prevent the realisation
of Ned Land's project.

Twice I went to the saloon.  I wished to consult the compass.
I wished to see if the direction the Nautilus was taking
was bringing us nearer or taking us farther from the coast.
But no; the Nautilus kept in Portuguese waters.

I must therefore take my part and prepare for flight.
My luggage was not heavy; my notes, nothing more.

As to Captain Nemo, I asked myself what he would think of our escape;
what trouble, what wrong it might cause him and what he might do in case
of its discovery or failure.  Certainly I had no cause to complain of him;
on the contrary, never was hospitality freer than his.  In leaving
him I could not be taxed with ingratitude.  No oath bound us to him.
It was on the strength of circumstances he relied, and not upon our word,
to fix us for ever.

I had not seen the Captain since our visit to the Island of Santorin.
Would chance bring me to his presence before our departure?
I wished it, and I feared it at the same time.  I listened if I could
hear him walking the room contiguous to mine.  No sound reached my ear.
I felt an unbearable uneasiness.  This day of waiting seemed eternal.
Hours struck too slowly to keep pace with my impatience.

My dinner was served in my room as usual.  I ate but little;
I was too preoccupied.  I left the table at seven o'clock. A
hundred and twenty minutes (I counted them) still separated
me from the moment in which I was to join Ned Land.
My agitation redoubled.  My pulse beat violently.
I could not remain quiet.  I went and came, hoping to calm
my troubled spirit by constant movement.  The idea of failure
in our bold enterprise was the least painful of my anxieties;
but the thought of seeing our project discovered before
leaving the Nautilus, of being brought before Captain Nemo,
irritated, or (what was worse) saddened, at my desertion,
made my heart beat.

I wanted to see the saloon for the last time.  I descended the stairs and
arrived in the museum, where I had passed so many useful and agreeable hours.
I looked at all its riches, all its treasures, like a man on the eve of an
eternal exile, who was leaving never to return.

These wonders of Nature, these masterpieces of art, amongst which for so many
days my life had been concentrated, I was going to abandon them for ever!
I should like to have taken a last look through the windows of the saloon into
the waters of the Atlantic:  but the panels were hermetically closed, and a
cloak of steel separated me from that ocean which I had not yet explored.

In passing through the saloon, I came near the door let
into the angle which opened into the Captain's room.
To my great surprise, this door was ajar.  I drew back involuntarily.
If Captain Nemo should be in his room, he could see me.
But, hearing no sound, I drew nearer.  The room was deserted.
I pushed open the door and took some steps forward.  Still the same
monklike severity of aspect.

Suddenly the clock struck eight.  The first beat of the hammer on the bell
awoke me from my dreams.  I trembled as if an invisible eye had plunged
into my most secret thoughts, and I hurried from the room.

There my eye fell upon the compass.  Our course was still north.
The log indicated moderate speed, the manometer a depth of about sixty feet.

I returned to my room, clothed myself warmly--sea boots,
an otterskin cap, a great coat of byssus, lined with sealskin;
I was ready, I was waiting.  The vibration of the screw
alone broke the deep silence which reigned on board.
I listened attentively.  Would no loud voice suddenly inform
me that Ned Land had been surprised in his projected flight.
A mortal dread hung over me, and I vainly tried to regain
my accustomed coolness.

At a few minutes to nine, I put my ear to the Captain's door.
No noise.  I left my room and returned to the saloon, which was half
in obscurity, but deserted.

I opened the door communicating with the library.
The same insufficient light, the same solitude.
I placed myself near the door leading to the central staircase,
and there waited for Ned Land's signal.

At that moment the trembling of the screw sensibly diminished,
then it stopped entirely.  The silence was now only disturbed
by the beatings of my own heart.  Suddenly a slight shock was felt;
and I knew that the Nautilus had stopped at the bottom of the ocean.
My uneasiness increased.  The Canadian's signal did not come.
I felt inclined to join Ned Land and beg of him to put off his attempt.
I felt that we were not sailing under our usual conditions.

At this moment the door of the large saloon opened, and Captain
Nemo appeared.  He saw me, and without further preamble began
in an amiable tone of voice:

"Ah, sir!  I have been looking for you.  Do you know the history of Spain?"

Now, one might know the history of one's own country by heart;
but in the condition I was at the time, with troubled mind
and head quite lost, I could not have said a word of it.

"Well," continued Captain Nemo, "you heard my question!
Do you know the history of Spain?"

"Very slightly," I answered.

"Well, here are learned men having to learn," said the Captain.
"Come, sit down, and I will tell you a curious episode in this history.
Sir, listen well," said he; "this history will interest you on one side,
for it will answer a question which doubtless you have not been
able to solve."

"I listen, Captain," said I, not knowing what my interlocutor was driving at,
and asking myself if this incident was bearing on our projected flight.

"Sir, if you have no objection, we will go back to 1702.  You cannot
be ignorant that your king, Louis XIV, thinking that the gesture
of a potentate was sufficient to bring the Pyrenees under his yoke,
had imposed the Duke of Anjou, his grandson, on the Spaniards.
This prince reigned more or less badly under the name of Philip V,
and had a strong party against him abroad.  Indeed, the preceding year,
the royal houses of Holland, Austria, and England had concluded
a treaty of alliance at the Hague, with the intention of plucking
the crown of Spain from the head of Philip V, and placing it
on that of an archduke to whom they prematurely gave the title
of Charles III.

"Spain must resist this coalition; but she was almost entirely unprovided
with either soldiers or sailors.  However, money would not fail them,
provided that their galleons, laden with gold and silver from America,
once entered their ports.  And about the end of 1702 they expected a rich
convoy which France was escorting with a fleet of twenty-three vessels,
commanded by Admiral Chateau-Renaud, for the ships of the coalition
were already beating the Atlantic.  This convoy was to go to Cadiz,
but the Admiral, hearing that an English fleet was cruising in those waters,
resolved to make for a French port.

"The Spanish commanders of the convoy objected to this decision.
They wanted to be taken to a Spanish port, and, if not to Cadiz,
into Vigo Bay, situated on the northwest coast of Spain,
and which was not blocked.

"Admiral Chateau-Renaud had the rashness to obey this injunction,
and the galleons entered Vigo Bay.

"Unfortunately, it formed an open road which could not be
defended in any way.  They must therefore hasten to unload
the galleons before the arrival of the combined fleet;
and time would not have failed them had not a miserable question
of rivalry suddenly arisen.

"You are following the chain of events?" asked Captain Nemo.

"Perfectly," said I, not knowing the end proposed by this historical lesson.

"I will continue.  This is what passed.  The merchants of Cadiz had
a privilege by which they had the right of receiving all merchandise
coming from the West Indies.  Now, to disembark these ingots at the port
of Vigo was depriving them of their rights.  They complained at Madrid,
and obtained the consent of the weak-minded Philip that the convoy,
without discharging its cargo, should remain sequestered in the roads
of Vigo until the enemy had disappeared.

"But whilst coming to this decision, on the 22nd of October,
1702, the English vessels arrived in Vigo Bay, when Admiral
Chateau-Renaud, in spite of inferior forces, fought bravely.
But, seeing that the treasure must fall into the enemy's hands,
he burnt and scuttled every galleon, which went to the bottom
with their immense riches."

Captain Nemo stopped.  I admit I could not see yet why this history
should interest me.

"Well?"  I asked.

"Well, M. Aronnax," replied Captain Nemo, "we are in that Vigo Bay;
and it rests with yourself whether you will penetrate its mysteries."

The Captain rose, telling me to follow him.  I had had time to recover.
I obeyed.  The saloon was dark, but through the transparent glass the waves
were sparkling.  I looked.

For half a mile around the Nautilus, the waters seemed bathed
in electric light.  The sandy bottom was clean and bright.
Some of the ship's crew in their diving-dresses were clearing away
half-rotten barrels and empty cases from the midst of the blackened wrecks.
From these cases and from these barrels escaped ingots of gold and silver,
cascades of piastres and jewels.  The sand was heaped up with them.
Laden with their precious booty, the men returned to the Nautilus,
disposed of their burden, and went back to this inexhaustible fishery of
gold and silver.

I understood now.  This was the scene of the battle of the 22nd
of October, 1702.  Here on this very spot the galleons laden for the Spanish
Government had sunk.  Here Captain Nemo came, according to his wants,
to pack up those millions with which he burdened the Nautilus.
It was for him and him alone America had given up her precious metals.
He was heir direct, without anyone to share, in those treasures torn
from the Incas and from the conquered of Ferdinand Cortez.

"Did you know, sir," he asked, smiling, "that the sea contained such riches?"

"I knew," I answered, "that they value money held in suspension
in these waters at two millions."

"Doubtless; but to extract this money the expense would be greater
than the profit.  Here, on the contrary, I have but to pick up what man
has lost--and not only in Vigo Bay, but in a thousand other ports where
shipwrecks have happened, and which are marked on my submarine map.
Can you understand now the source of the millions I am worth?"

"I understand, Captain.  But allow me to tell you that in exploring
Vigo Bay you have only been beforehand with a rival society."

"And which?"

"A society which has received from the Spanish Government
the privilege of seeking those buried galleons.
The shareholders are led on by the allurement of an enormous bounty,
for they value these rich shipwrecks at five hundred millions."

"Five hundred millions they were," answered Captain Nemo,
"but they are so no longer."

"Just so," said I; "and a warning to those shareholders would be
an act of charity.  But who knows if it would be well received?
What gamblers usually regret above all is less the loss
of their money than of their foolish hopes.  After all,
I pity them less than the thousands of unfortunates to whom
so much riches well-distributed would have been profitable,
whilst for them they will be for ever barren."

I had no sooner expressed this regret than I felt that it must
have wounded Captain Nemo.

"Barren!" he exclaimed, with animation.  "Do you think then,
sir, that these riches are lost because I gather them?
Is it for myself alone, according to your idea, that I take
the trouble to collect these treasures?  Who told you that I
did not make a good use of it?  Do you think I am ignorant
that there are suffering beings and oppressed races on
this earth, miserable creatures to console, victims to avenge?
Do you not understand?"

Captain Nemo stopped at these last words, regretting perhaps
that he had spoken so much.  But I had guessed that,
whatever the motive which had forced him to seek independence
under the sea, it had left him still a man, that his heart
still beat for the sufferings of humanity, and that his immense
charity was for oppressed races as well as individuals.
And I then understood for whom those millions were destined
which were forwarded by Captain Nemo when the Nautilus was cruising
in the waters of Crete.



CHAPTER IX

A VANISHED CONTINENT

The next morning, the 19th of February, I saw the Canadian enter my room.
I expected this visit.  He looked very disappointed.

"Well, sir?" said he.

"Well, Ned, fortune was against us yesterday."

"Yes; that Captain must needs stop exactly at the hour we intended
leaving his vessel."

"Yes, Ned, he had business at his bankers."

"His bankers!"

"Or rather his banking-house; by that I mean the ocean,
where his riches are safer than in the chests of the State."

I then related to the Canadian the incidents of the preceding night,
hoping to bring him back to the idea of not abandoning the Captain;
but my recital had no other result than an energetically expressed regret
from Ned that he had not been able to take a walk on the battlefield
of Vigo on his own account.

"However," said he, "all is not ended.  It is only a blow
of the harpoon lost.  Another time we must succeed;
and to-night, if necessary----"

"In what direction is the Nautilus going?"  I asked.

"I do not know," replied Ned.

"Well, at noon we shall see the point."

The Canadian returned to Conseil.  As soon as I was dressed,
I went into the saloon.  The compass was not reassuring.
The course of the Nautilus was S.S.W. We were turning our
backs on Europe.

I waited with some impatience till the ship's place was pricked
on the chart.  At about half-past eleven the reservoirs
were emptied, and our vessel rose to the surface of the ocean.
I rushed towards the platform.  Ned Land had preceded me.
No more land in sight.  Nothing but an immense sea.
Some sails on the horizon, doubtless those going to San Roque
in search of favourable winds for doubling the Cape of Good Hope.
The weather was cloudy.  A gale of wind was preparing.
Ned raved, and tried to pierce the cloudy horizon.
He still hoped that behind all that fog stretched the land he so
longed for.

At noon the sun showed itself for an instant.  The second profited by this
brightness to take its height.  Then, the sea becoming more billowy,
we descended, and the panel closed.

An hour after, upon consulting the chart, I saw the position
of the Nautilus was marked at 16@ 17' long., and 33@ 22'
lat., at 150 leagues from the nearest coast.  There was no means
of flight, and I leave you to imagine the rage of the Canadian
when I informed him of our situation.

For myself, I was not particularly sorry.  I felt lightened
of the load which had oppressed me, and was able to return
with some degree of calmness to my accustomed work.

That night, about eleven o'clock, I received a most unexpected
visit from Captain Nemo.  He asked me very graciously
if I felt fatigued from my watch of the preceding night.
I answered in the negative.

"Then, M. Aronnax, I propose a curious excursion."

"Propose, Captain?"

"You have hitherto only visited the submarine depths by daylight,
under the brightness of the sun.  Would it suit you to see them
in the darkness of the night?"

"Most willingly."

"I warn you, the way will be tiring.  We shall have far to walk,
and must climb a mountain.  The roads are not well kept."

"What you say, Captain, only heightens my curiosity;
I am ready to follow you."

"Come then, sir, we will put on our diving-dresses."

Arrived at the robing-room, I saw that neither of my companions
nor any of the ship's crew were to follow us on this excursion.
Captain Nemo had not even proposed my taking with me either
Ned or Conseil.

In a few moments we had put on our diving-dresses; they placed
on our backs the reservoirs, abundantly filled with air,
but no electric lamps were prepared.  I called the Captain's
attention to the fact.

"They will be useless," he replied.

I thought I had not heard aright, but I could not repeat my observation,
for the Captain's head had already disappeared in its metal case.
I finished harnessing myself.  I felt them put an iron-pointed stick
into my hand, and some minutes later, after going through the usual form,
we set foot on the bottom of the Atlantic at a depth of 150 fathoms.
Midnight was near.  The waters were profoundly dark, but Captain Nemo
pointed out in the distance a reddish spot, a sort of large light shining
brilliantly about two miles from the Nautilus.  What this fire might be,
what could feed it, why and how it lit up the liquid mass, I could not say.
In any case, it did light our way, vaguely, it is true, but I soon accustomed
myself to the peculiar darkness, and I understood, under such circumstances,
the uselessness of the Ruhmkorff apparatus.

As we advanced, I heard a kind of pattering above my head.
The noise redoubling, sometimes producing a continual shower,
I soon understood the cause.  It was rain falling violently,
and crisping the surface of the waves.  Instinctively the
thought flashed across my mind that I should be wet through!
By the water! in the midst of the water!  I could not help
laughing at the odd idea.  But, indeed, in the thick diving-dress,
the liquid element is no longer felt, and one only seems to be
in an atmosphere somewhat denser than the terrestrial atmosphere.
Nothing more.

After half an hour's walk the soil became stony.
Medusae, microscopic crustacea, and pennatules lit it slightly
with their phosphorescent gleam.  I caught a glimpse of pieces
of stone covered with millions of zoophytes and masses of sea weed.
My feet often slipped upon this sticky carpet of sea weed,
and without my iron-tipped stick I should have fallen more than once.
In turning round, I could still see the whitish lantern of the
Nautilus beginning to pale in the distance.

But the rosy light which guided us increased and lit up the horizon.
The presence of this fire under water puzzled me in the highest degree.
Was I going towards a natural phenomenon as yet unknown to the savants
of the earth?  Or even (for this thought crossed my brain) had the hand
of man aught to do with this conflagration?  Had he fanned this flame?
Was I to meet in these depths companions and friends of Captain Nemo whom
he was going to visit, and who, like him, led this strange existence?
Should I find down there a whole colony of exiles who, weary of the miseries
of this earth, had sought and found independence in the deep ocean?
All these foolish and unreasonable ideas pursued me.  And in this condition
of mind, over-excited by the succession of wonders continually passing before
my eyes, I should not have been surprised to meet at the bottom of the sea one
of those submarine towns of which Captain Nemo dreamed.

Our road grew lighter and lighter.  The white glimmer came in rays
from the summit of a mountain about 800 feet high.  But what I saw
was simply a reflection, developed by the clearness of the waters.
The source of this inexplicable light was a fire on the opposite side
of the mountain.

In the midst of this stony maze furrowing the bottom of the Atlantic,
Captain Nemo advanced without hesitation.  He knew this dreary road.
Doubtless he had often travelled over it, and could not lose himself.
I followed him with unshaken confidence.  He seemed to me like a genie of
the sea; and, as he walked before me, I could not help admiring his stature,
which was outlined in black on the luminous horizon.

It was one in the morning when we arrived at the first slopes of the mountain;
but to gain access to them we must venture through the difficult paths
of a vast copse.

Yes; a copse of dead trees, without leaves, without sap,
trees petrified by the action of the water and here and there
overtopped by gigantic pines.  It was like a coal-pit still standing,
holding by the roots to the broken soil, and whose branches, like fine
black paper cuttings, showed distinctly on the watery ceiling.
Picture to yourself a forest in the Hartz hanging on to the sides
of the mountain, but a forest swallowed up.  The paths were
encumbered with seaweed and fucus, between which grovelled
a whole world of crustacea.  I went along, climbing the rocks,
striding over extended trunks, breaking the sea bind-weed which hung
from one tree to the other; and frightening the fishes, which flew
from branch to branch.  Pressing onward, I felt no fatigue.
I followed my guide, who was never tired.  What a spectacle!
How can I express it? how paint the aspect of those woods and
rocks in this medium--their under parts dark and wild, the upper
coloured with red tints, by that light which the reflecting powers
of the waters doubled?  We climbed rocks which fell directly
after with gigantic bounds and the low growling of an avalanche.
To right and left ran long, dark galleries, where sight was lost.
Here opened vast glades which the hand of man seemed to have worked;
and I sometimes asked myself if some inhabitant of these submarine
regions would not suddenly appear to me.

But Captain Nemo was still mounting.  I could not stay behind.
I followed boldly.  My stick gave me good help.  A false step would
have been dangerous on the narrow passes sloping down to the sides
of the gulfs; but I walked with firm step, without feeling
any giddiness.  Now I jumped a crevice, the depth of which would
have made me hesitate had it been among the glaciers on the land;
now I ventured on the unsteady trunk of a tree thrown across
from one abyss to the other, without looking under my feet,
having only eyes to admire the wild sites of this region.

There, monumental rocks, leaning on their regularly-cut bases, seemed to defy
all laws of equilibrium.  From between their stony knees trees sprang,
like a jet under heavy pressure, and upheld others which upheld them.
Natural towers, large scarps, cut perpendicularly, like a "curtain," inclined
at an angle which the laws of gravitation could never have tolerated
in terrestrial regions.

Two hours after quitting the Nautilus we had crossed the line of trees,
and a hundred feet above our heads rose the top of the mountain,
which cast a shadow on the brilliant irradiation of the opposite slope.
Some petrified shrubs ran fantastically here and there.  Fishes got up
under our feet like birds in the long grass.  The massive rocks were
rent with impenetrable fractures, deep grottos, and unfathomable holes,
at the bottom of which formidable creatures might be heard moving.
My blood curdled when I saw enormous antennae blocking my road,
or some frightful claw closing with a noise in the shadow of some cavity.
Millions of luminous spots shone brightly in the midst of the darkness.
They were the eyes of giant crustacea crouched in their holes;
giant lobsters setting themselves up like halberdiers, and moving
their claws with the clicking sound of pincers; titanic crabs,
pointed like a gun on its carriage; and frightful-looking poulps,
interweaving their tentacles like a living nest of serpents.

We had now arrived on the first platform, where other surprises awaited me.
Before us lay some picturesque ruins, which betrayed the hand of man
and not that of the Creator.  There were vast heaps of stone,
amongst which might be traced the vague and shadowy forms of castles
and temples, clothed with a world of blossoming zoophytes, and over which,
instead of ivy, sea-weed and fucus threw a thick vegetable mantle.  But what
was this portion of the globe which had been swallowed by cataclysms?
Who had placed those rocks and stones like cromlechs of prehistoric times?
Where was I?  Whither had Captain Nemo's fancy hurried me?

I would fain have asked him; not being able to, I stopped him--
I seized his arm.  But, shaking his head, and pointing to the highest
point of the mountain, he seemed to say:

"Come, come along; come higher!"

I followed, and in a few minutes I had climbed to the top,
which for a circle of ten yards commanded the whole mass of rock.

I looked down the side we had just climbed.  The mountain did
not rise more than seven or eight hundred feet above the level
of the plain; but on the opposite side it commanded from
twice that height the depths of this part of the Atlantic.
My eyes ranged far over a large space lit by a violent fulguration.
In fact, the mountain was a volcano.

At fifty feet above the peak, in the midst of a rain of stones
and scoriae, a large crater was vomiting forth torrents of lava
which fell in a cascade of fire into the bosom of the liquid mass.
Thus situated, this volcano lit the lower plain like an
immense torch, even to the extreme limits of the horizon.
I said that the submarine crater threw up lava, but no flames.
Flames require the oxygen of the air to feed upon and cannot be
developed under water; but streams of lava, having in themselves
the principles of their incandescence, can attain a white heat,
fight vigorously against the liquid element, and turn it to
vapour by contact.

Rapid currents bearing all these gases in diffusion and torrents
of lava slid to the bottom of the mountain like an eruption
of Vesuvius on another Terra del Greco.

There indeed under my eyes, ruined, destroyed, lay a town--
its roofs open to the sky, its temples fallen, its arches dislocated,
its columns lying on the ground, from which one would still
recognise the massive character of Tuscan architecture.
Further on, some remains of a gigantic aqueduct; here the high
base of an Acropolis, with the floating outline of a Parthenon;
there traces of a quay, as if an ancient port had formerly
abutted on the borders of the ocean, and disappeared with
its merchant vessels and its war-galleys. Farther on again,
long lines of sunken walls and broad, deserted streets--
a perfect Pompeii escaped beneath the waters.  Such was the sight
that Captain Nemo brought before my eyes!

Where was I?  Where was I?  I must know at any cost.
I tried to speak, but Captain Nemo stopped me by a gesture,
and, picking up a piece of chalk-stone, advanced to a rock
of black basalt, and traced the one word:


ATLANTIS


What a light shot through my mind!  Atlantis! the Atlantis
of Plato, that continent denied by Origen and Humbolt,
who placed its disappearance amongst the legendary tales.
I had it there now before my eyes, bearing upon it
the unexceptionable testimony of its catastrophe.
The region thus engulfed was beyond Europe, Asia, and Lybia,
beyond the columns of Hercules, where those powerful people,
the Atlantides, lived, against whom the first wars of ancient
Greeks were waged.

Thus, led by the strangest destiny, I was treading under foot
the mountains of this continent, touching with my hand those ruins
a thousand generations old and contemporary with the geological epochs.
I was walking on the very spot where the contemporaries of the first
man had walked.

Whilst I was trying to fix in my mind every detail of this
grand landscape, Captain Nemo remained motionless,
as if petrified in mute ecstasy, leaning on a mossy stone.
Was he dreaming of those generations long since disappeared?
Was he asking them the secret of human destiny?  Was it here this
strange man came to steep himself in historical recollections,
and live again this ancient life--he who wanted no modern one?
What would I not have given to know his thoughts, to share them,
to understand them!  We remained for an hour at this place,
contemplating the vast plains under the brightness of the lava,
which was some times wonderfully intense.  Rapid tremblings ran
along the mountain caused by internal bubblings, deep noise,
distinctly transmitted through the liquid medium were echoed
with majestic grandeur.  At this moment the moon appeared through
the mass of waters and threw her pale rays on the buried continent.
It was but a gleam, but what an indescribable effect!
The Captain rose, cast one last look on the immense plain,
and then bade me follow him.

We descended the mountain rapidly, and, the mineral forest
once passed, I saw the lantern of the Nautilus shining like a star.
The Captain walked straight to it, and we got on board as the first
rays of light whitened the surface of the ocean.



CHAPTER X

THE SUBMARINE COAL-MINES

The next day, the 20th of February, I awoke very late:  the fatigues
of the previous night had prolonged my sleep until eleven o'clock. I
dressed quickly, and hastened to find the course the Nautilus was taking.
The instruments showed it to be still toward the south, with a speed of
twenty miles an hour and a depth of fifty fathoms.

The species of fishes here did not differ much from those already noticed.
There were rays of giant size, five yards long, and endowed with great
muscular strength, which enabled them to shoot above the waves;
sharks of many kinds; amongst others, one fifteen feet long,
with triangular sharp teeth, and whose transparency rendered it almost
invisible in the water.

Amongst bony fish Conseil noticed some about three yards long, armed at
the upper jaw with a piercing sword; other bright-coloured creatures,
known in the time of Aristotle by the name of the sea-dragon, which are
dangerous to capture on account of the spikes on their back.

About four o'clock, the soil, generally composed of a thick mud mixed with
petrified wood, changed by degrees, and it became more stony, and seemed
strewn with conglomerate and pieces of basalt, with a sprinkling of lava.
I thought that a mountainous region was succeeding the long plains;
and accordingly, after a few evolutions of the Nautilus, I saw the southerly
horizon blocked by a high wall which seemed to close all exit.
Its summit evidently passed the level of the ocean.  It must be a continent,
or at least an island--one of the Canaries, or of the Cape Verde Islands.
The bearings not being yet taken, perhaps designedly, I was ignorant
of our exact position.  In any case, such a wall seemed to me to mark
the limits of that Atlantis, of which we had in reality passed over only
the smallest part.

Much longer should I have remained at the window admiring
the beauties of sea and sky, but the panels closed.  At this moment
the Nautilus arrived at the side of this high, perpendicular wall.
What it would do, I could not guess.  I returned to my room;
it no longer moved.  I laid myself down with the full intention
of waking after a few hours' sleep; but it was eight o'clock
the next day when I entered the saloon.  I looked at the manometer.
It told me that the Nautilus was floating on the surface of the ocean.
Besides, I heard steps on the platform.  I went to the panel.
It was open; but, instead of broad daylight, as I expected,
I was surrounded by profound darkness.  Where were we?
Was I mistaken?  Was it still night?  No; not a star was shining
and night has not that utter darkness.

I knew not what to think, when a voice near me said:

"Is that you, Professor?"

"Ah!  Captain," I answered, "where are we?"

"Underground, sir."

"Underground!"  I exclaimed.  "And the Nautilus floating still?"

"It always floats."

"But I do not understand."

"Wait a few minutes, our lantern will be lit, and, if you like light places,
you will be satisfied."

I stood on the platform and waited.  The darkness was so complete
that I could not even see Captain Nemo; but, looking to the zenith,
exactly above my head, I seemed to catch an undecided gleam,
a kind of twilight filling a circular hole.  At this instant
the lantern was lit, and its vividness dispelled the faint light.
I closed my dazzled eyes for an instant, and then looked again.
The Nautilus was stationary, floating near a mountain which formed
a sort of quay.  The lake, then, supporting it was a lake
imprisoned by a circle of walls, measuring two miles in diameter
and six in circumference.  Its level (the manometer showed)
could only be the same as the outside level, for there must
necessarily be a communication between the lake and the sea.
The high partitions, leaning forward on their base, grew into
a vaulted roof bearing the shape of an immense funnel turned
upside down, the height being about five or six hundred yards.
At the summit was a circular orifice, by which I had caught the slight
gleam of light, evidently daylight.

"Where are we?"  I asked.

"In the very heart of an extinct volcano, the interior of which has
been invaded by the sea, after some great convulsion of the earth.
Whilst you were sleeping, Professor, the Nautilus penetrated
to this lagoon by a natural canal, which opens about ten yards
beneath the surface of the ocean.  This is its harbour of refuge,
a sure, commodious, and mysterious one, sheltered from all gales.
Show me, if you can, on the coasts of any of your continents or islands,
a road which can give such perfect refuge from all storms."

"Certainly," I replied, "you are in safety here, Captain Nemo.
Who could reach you in the heart of a volcano?  But did I not see
an opening at its summit?"

"Yes; its crater, formerly filled with lava, vapour, and flames,
and which now gives entrance to the life-giving air we breathe."

"But what is this volcanic mountain?"

"It belongs to one of the numerous islands with which this sea
is strewn--to vessels a simple sandbank--to us an immense cavern.
Chance led me to discover it, and chance served me well."

"But of what use is this refuge, Captain?  The Nautilus wants no port."

"No, sir; but it wants electricity to make it move, and the wherewithal
to make the electricity--sodium to feed the elements, coal from
which to get the sodium, and a coal-mine to supply the coal.
And exactly on this spot the sea covers entire forests embedded during
the geological periods, now mineralised and transformed into coal;
for me they are an inexhaustible mine."

"Your men follow the trade of miners here, then, Captain?"

"Exactly so.  These mines extend under the waves like the mines of Newcastle.
Here, in their diving-dresses, pick axe and shovel in hand, my men
extract the coal, which I do not even ask from the mines of the earth.
When I burn this combustible for the manufacture of sodium, the smoke,
escaping from the crater of the mountain, gives it the appearance of
a still-active volcano."

"And we shall see your companions at work?"

"No; not this time at least; for I am in a hurry to continue
our submarine tour of the earth.  So I shall content myself
with drawing from the reserve of sodium I already possess.
The time for loading is one day only, and we continue our voyage.
So, if you wish to go over the cavern and make the round of
the lagoon, you must take advantage of to-day, M. Aronnax."

I thanked the Captain and went to look for my companions, who had not yet
left their cabin.  I invited them to follow me without saying where we were.
They mounted the platform.  Conseil, who was astonished at nothing,
seemed to look upon it as quite natural that he should wake under
a mountain, after having fallen asleep under the waves.  But Ned Land
thought of nothing but finding whether the cavern had any exit.
After breakfast, about ten o'clock, we went down on to the mountain.

"Here we are, once more on land," said Conseil.

"I do not call this land," said the Canadian.  "And besides,
we are not on it, but beneath it."

Between the walls of the mountains and the waters of the lake lay a sandy
shore which, at its greatest breadth, measured five hundred feet.
On this soil one might easily make the tour of the lake.  But the base
of the high partitions was stony ground, with volcanic locks and enormous
pumice-stones lying in picturesque heaps.  All these detached masses,
covered with enamel, polished by the action of the subterraneous fires,
shone resplendent by the light of our electric lantern.  The mica dust
from the shore, rising under our feet, flew like a cloud of sparks.
The bottom now rose sensibly, and we soon arrived at long circuitous slopes,
or inclined planes, which took us higher by degrees; but we were obliged
to walk carefully among these conglomerates, bound by no cement, the feet
slipping on the glassy crystal, felspar, and quartz.

The volcanic nature of this enormous excavation was confirmed on all sides,
and I pointed it out to my companions.

"Picture to yourselves," said I, "what this crater must
have been when filled with boiling lava, and when the level
of the incandescent liquid rose to the orifice of the mountain,
as though melted on the top of a hot plate."

"I can picture it perfectly," said Conseil.  "But, sir,
will you tell me why the Great Architect has suspended operations,
and how it is that the furnace is replaced by the quiet waters
of the lake?"

"Most probably, Conseil, because some convulsion beneath the ocean produced
that very opening which has served as a passage for the Nautilus.
Then the waters of the Atlantic rushed into the interior of the mountain.
There must have been a terrible struggle between the two elements, a struggle
which ended in the victory of Neptune.  But many ages have run out since then,
and the submerged volcano is now a peaceable grotto."

"Very well," replied Ned Land; "I accept the explanation, sir; but, in our
own interests, I regret that the opening of which you speak was not made
above the level of the sea."

"But, friend Ned," said Conseil, "if the passage had not been under the sea,
the Nautilus could not have gone through it."

We continued ascending.  The steps became more and more perpendicular
and narrow.  Deep excavations, which we were obliged to cross,
cut them here and there; sloping masses had to be turned.
We slid upon our knees and crawled along.  But Conseil's
dexterity and the Canadian's strength surmounted all obstacles.
At a height of about 31 feet the nature of the ground changed
without becoming more practicable.  To the conglomerate and trachyte
succeeded black basalt, the first dispread in layers full of bubbles,
the latter forming regular prisms, placed like a colonnade
supporting the spring of the immense vault, an admirable specimen
of natural architecture.  Between the blocks of basalt wound long
streams of lava, long since grown cold, encrusted with bituminous rays;
and in some places there were spread large carpets of sulphur.
A more powerful light shone through the upper crater, shedding a
vague glimmer over these volcanic depressions for ever buried
in the bosom of this extinguished mountain.  But our upward march
was soon stopped at a height of about two hundred and fifty feet
by impassable obstacles.  There was a complete vaulted arch
overhanging us, and our ascent was changed to a circular walk.
At the last change vegetable life began to struggle with the mineral.
Some shrubs, and even some trees, grew from the fractures of the walls.
I recognised some euphorbias, with the caustic sugar coming
from them; heliotropes, quite incapable of justifying their name,
sadly drooped their clusters of flowers, both their colour
and perfume half gone.  Here and there some chrysanthemums grew
timidly at the foot of an aloe with long, sickly-looking leaves.
But between the streams of lava, I saw some little violets still
slightly perfumed, and I admit that I smelt them with delight.
Perfume is the soul of the flower, and sea-flowers have no soul.

We had arrived at the foot of some sturdy dragon-trees,
which had pushed aside the rocks with their strong roots,
when Ned Land exclaimed:

"Ah! sir, a hive! a hive!"

"A hive!"  I replied, with a gesture of incredulity.

"Yes, a hive," repeated the Canadian, "and bees humming round it."

I approached, and was bound to believe my own eyes.  There at a hole bored
in one of the dragon-trees were some thousands of these ingenious insects,
so common in all the Canaries, and whose produce is so much esteemed.
Naturally enough, the Canadian wished to gather the honey, and I could
not well oppose his wish.  A quantity of dry leaves, mixed with sulphur,
he lit with a spark from his flint, and he began to smoke out the bees.
The humming ceased by degrees, and the hive eventually yielded several pounds
of the sweetest honey, with which Ned Land filled his haversack.

"When I have mixed this honey with the paste of the bread-fruit,"
said he, "I shall be able to offer you a succulent cake."

{`bread-fruit' has been substituted for `artocarpus' in this ed.}

"'Pon my word," said Conseil, "it will be gingerbread."

"Never mind the gingerbread," said I; "let us continue our interesting walk."

At every turn of the path we were following, the lake appeared
in all its length and breadth.  The lantern lit up the whole
of its peaceable surface, which knew neither ripple nor wave.
The Nautilus remained perfectly immovable.  On the platform,
and on the mountain, the ship's crew were working like black
shadows clearly carved against the luminous atmosphere.
We were now going round the highest crest of the first layers of rock
which upheld the roof.  I then saw that bees were not the only
representatives of the animal kingdom in the interior of this volcano.
Birds of prey hovered here and there in the shadows, or fled from
their nests on the top of the rocks.  There were sparrow hawks,
with white breasts, and kestrels, and down the slopes scampered,
with their long legs, several fine fat bustards.  I leave anyone
to imagine the covetousness of the Canadian at the sight of this
savoury game, and whether he did not regret having no gun.
But he did his best to replace the lead by stones, and, after several
fruitless attempts, he succeeded in wounding a magnificent bird.
To say that he risked his life twenty times before reaching
it is but the truth; but he managed so well that the creature
joined the honey-cakes in his bag.  We were now obliged to
descend toward the shore, the crest becoming impracticable.
Above us the crater seemed to gape like the mouth of a well.
From this place the sky could be clearly seen, and clouds,
dissipated by the west wind, leaving behind them, even on the summit
of the mountain, their misty remnants--certain proof that they
were only moderately high, for the volcano did not rise more than
eight hundred feet above the level of the ocean.  Half an hour
after the Canadian's last exploit we had regained the inner shore.
Here the flora was represented by large carpets of marine crystal,
a little umbelliferous plant very good to pickle, which also bears the name
of pierce-stone and sea-fennel. Conseil gathered some bundles of it.
As to the fauna, it might be counted by thousands of crustacea
of all sorts, lobsters, crabs, spider-crabs, chameleon shrimps,
and a large number of shells, rockfish, and limpets.  Three-quarters of
an hour later we had finished our circuitous walk and were on board.
The crew had just finished loading the sodium, and the Nautilus
could have left that instant.  But Captain Nemo gave no order.
Did he wish to wait until night, and leave the submarine passage secretly?
Perhaps so.  Whatever it might be, the next day, the Nautilus,
having left its port, steered clear of all land at a few yards beneath
the waves of the Atlantic.



CHAPTER XI

THE SARGASSO SEA

That day the Nautilus crossed a singular part of the Atlantic Ocean.
No one can be ignorant of the existence of a current of warm
water known by the name of the Gulf Stream.  After leaving
the Gulf of Florida, we went in the direction of Spitzbergen.
But before entering the Gulf of Mexico, about 45@ of N. lat., this
current divides into two arms, the principal one going towards
the coast of Ireland and Norway, whilst the second bends to the south
about the height of the Azores; then, touching the African shore,
and describing a lengthened oval, returns to the Antilles.
This second arm--it is rather a collar than an arm--surrounds with its
circles of warm water that portion of the cold, quiet, immovable ocean
called the Sargasso Sea, a perfect lake in the open Atlantic:
it takes no less than three years for the great current to pass round it.
Such was the region the Nautilus was now visiting, a perfect meadow,
a close carpet of seaweed, fucus, and tropical berries, so thick and so
compact that the stem of a vessel could hardly tear its way through it.
And Captain Nemo, not wishing to entangle his screw in this herbaceous mass,
kept some yards beneath the surface of the waves.  The name Sargasso
comes from the Spanish word "sargazzo" which signifies kelp.
This kelp, or berry-plant, is the principal formation of this immense bank.
And this is the reason why these plants unite in the peaceful basin
of the Atlantic.  The only explanation which can be given, he says,
seems to me to result from the experience known to all the world.
Place in a vase some fragments of cork or other floating body,
and give to the water in the vase a circular movement,
the scattered fragments will unite in a group in the centre of
the liquid surface, that is to say, in the part least agitated.
In the phenomenon we are considering, the Atlantic is the vase,
the Gulf Stream the circular current, and the Sargasso Sea the central
point at which the floating bodies unite.

I share Maury's opinion, and I was able to study the phenomenon
in the very midst, where vessels rarely penetrate.  Above us floated
products of all kinds, heaped up among these brownish plants;
trunks of trees torn from the Andes or the Rocky Mountains, and floated
by the Amazon or the Mississippi; numerous wrecks, remains of keels,
or ships' bottoms, side-planks stove in, and so weighted with shells
and barnacles that they could not again rise to the surface.
And time will one day justify Maury's other opinion, that these
substances thus accumulated for ages will become petrified by
the action of the water and will then form inexhaustible coal-mines--
a precious reserve prepared by far-seeing Nature for the moment
when men shall have exhausted the mines of continents.

In the midst of this inextricable mass of plants and sea weed,
I noticed some charming pink halcyons and actiniae, with their long
tentacles trailing after them, and medusae, green, red, and blue.

All the day of the 22nd of February we passed in the Sargasso Sea,
where such fish as are partial to marine plants find abundant nourishment.
The next, the ocean had returned to its accustomed aspect.
From this time for nineteen days, from the 23rd of February to the 12th
of March, the Nautilus kept in the middle of the Atlantic, carrying us
at a constant speed of a hundred leagues in twenty-four hours.
Captain Nemo evidently intended accomplishing his submarine programme,
and I imagined that he intended, after doubling Cape Horn, to return
to the Australian seas of the Pacific.  Ned Land had cause for fear.
In these large seas, void of islands, we could not attempt to leave
the boat.  Nor had we any means of opposing Captain Nemo's will.
Our only course was to submit; but what we could neither gain by force
nor cunning, I liked to think might be obtained by persuasion.
This voyage ended, would he not consent to restore our liberty,
under an oath never to reveal his existence?--an oath of honour which we
should have religiously kept.  But we must consider that delicate
question with the Captain.  But was I free to claim this liberty?
Had he not himself said from the beginning, in the firmest manner,
that the secret of his life exacted from him our lasting imprisonment
on board the Nautilus?  And would not my four months' silence appear
to him a tacit acceptance of our situation?  And would not a return
to the subject result in raising suspicions which might be hurtful
to our projects, if at some future time a favourable opportunity offered
to return to them?

During the nineteen days mentioned above, no incident
of any kind happened to signalise our voyage.  I saw little
of the Captain; he was at work.  In the library I often found
his books left open, especially those on natural history.
My work on submarine depths, conned over by him, was covered
with marginal notes, often contradicting my theories and systems;
but the Captain contented himself with thus purging my work;
it was very rare for him to discuss it with me.
Sometimes I heard the melancholy tones of his organ;
but only at night, in the midst of the deepest obscurity,
when the Nautilus slept upon the deserted ocean.  During this part
of our voyage we sailed whole days on the surface of the waves.
The sea seemed abandoned.  A few sailing-vessels, on
the road to India, were making for the Cape of Good Hope.
One day we were followed by the boats of a whaler, who, no doubt,
took us for some enormous whale of great price; but Captain
Nemo did not wish the worthy fellows to lose their time
and trouble, so ended the chase by plunging under the water.
Our navigation continued until the 13th of March;
that day the Nautilus was employed in taking soundings,
which greatly interested me.  We had then made about 13,000
leagues since our departure from the high seas of the Pacific.
The bearings gave us 45@ 37' S. lat., and 37@ 53' W. long.
It was the same water in which Captain Denham of the Herald
sounded 7,000 fathoms without finding the bottom.
There, too, Lieutenant Parker, of the American frigate Congress,
could not touch the bottom with 15,140 fathoms.
Captain Nemo intended seeking the bottom of the ocean by a
diagonal sufficiently lengthened by means of lateral planes
placed at an angle of 45@ with the water-line of the Nautilus.
Then the screw set to work at its maximum speed, its four
blades beating the waves with in describable force.
Under this powerful pressure, the hull of the Nautilus quivered
like a sonorous chord and sank regularly under the water.

At 7,000 fathoms I saw some blackish tops rising from the midst of the waters;
but these summits might belong to high mountains like the Himalayas or
Mont Blanc, even higher; and the depth of the abyss remained incalculable.
The Nautilus descended still lower, in spite of the great pressure.
I felt the steel plates tremble at the fastenings of the bolts;
its bars bent, its partitions groaned; the windows of the saloon
seemed to curve under the pressure of the waters.  And this firm
structure would doubtless have yielded, if, as its Captain had said,
it had not been capable of resistance like a solid block.  We had attained
a depth of 16,000 yards (four leagues), and the sides of the Nautilus
then bore a pressure of 1,600 atmospheres, that is to say, 3,200 lb.
to each square two-fifths of an inch of its surface.

"What a situation to be in!"  I exclaimed.  "To overrun these deep regions
where man has never trod!  Look, Captain, look at these magnificent rocks,
these uninhabited grottoes, these lowest receptacles of the globe,
where life is no longer possible!  What unknown sights are here!
Why should we be unable to preserve a remembrance of them?"

"Would you like to carry away more than the remembrance?"
said Captain Nemo.

"What do you mean by those words?"

"I mean to say that nothing is easier than to make a photographic
view of this submarine region."

I had not time to express my surprise at this new proposition, when,
at Captain Nemo's call, an objective was brought into the saloon.
Through the widely-opened panel, the liquid mass was bright with electricity,
which was distributed with such uniformity that not a shadow, not a gradation,
was to be seen in our manufactured light.  The Nautilus remained motionless,
the force of its screw subdued by the inclination of its planes:
the instrument was propped on the bottom of the oceanic site, and in a few
seconds we had obtained a perfect negative.

But, the operation being over, Captain Nemo said, "Let us go up;
we must not abuse our position, nor expose the Nautilus too long
to such great pressure."

"Go up again!"  I exclaimed.

"Hold well on."

I had not time to understand why the Captain cautioned me thus, when I
was thrown forward on to the carpet.  At a signal from the Captain,
its screw was shipped, and its blades raised vertically; the Nautilus
shot into the air like a balloon, rising with stunning rapidity,
and cutting the mass of waters with a sonorous agitation.
Nothing was visible; and in four minutes it had shot through the four
leagues which separated it from the ocean, and, after emerging like a
flying-fish, fell, making the waves rebound to an enormous height.



CHAPTER XII

CACHALOTS AND WHALES

During the nights of the 13th and 14th of March, the Nautilus returned
to its southerly course.  I fancied that, when on a level with Cape Horn,
he would turn the helm westward, in order to beat the Pacific seas,
and so complete the tour of the world.  He did nothing of the kind,
but continued on his way to the southern regions.  Where was he going to?
To the pole?  It was madness!  I began to think that the Captain's
temerity justified Ned Land's fears.  For some time past the Canadian
had not spoken to me of his projects of flight; he was less communicative,
almost silent.  I could see that this lengthened imprisonment was
weighing upon him, and I felt that rage was burning within him.
When he met the Captain, his eyes lit up with suppressed anger;
and I feared that his natural violence would lead him into some extreme.
That day, the 14th of March, Conseil and he came to me in my room.
I inquired the cause of their visit.

"A simple question to ask you, sir," replied the Canadian.

"Speak, Ned."

"How many men are there on board the Nautilus, do you think?"

"I cannot tell, my friend."

"I should say that its working does not require a large crew."

"Certainly, under existing conditions, ten men, at the most,
ought to be enough."

"Well, why should there be any more?"

"Why?"  I replied, looking fixedly at Ned Land, whose meaning was easy
to guess.  "Because," I added, "if my surmises are correct, and if I have
well understood the Captain's existence, the Nautilus is not only a vessel:
it is also a place of refuge for those who, like its commander, have broken
every tie upon earth."

"Perhaps so," said Conseil; "but, in any case, the Nautilus can only contain
a certain number of men.  Could not you, sir, estimate their maximum?"

"How, Conseil?"

"By calculation; given the size of the vessel, which you know, sir,
and consequently the quantity of air it contains, knowing also how much
each man expends at a breath, and comparing these results with the fact
that the Nautilus is obliged to go to the surface every twenty-four hours."

Conseil had not finished the sentence before I saw what he was driving at.

"I understand," said I; "but that calculation, though simple enough,
can give but a very uncertain result."

"Never mind," said Ned Land urgently.

"Here it is, then," said I. "In one hour each man consumes the oxygen
contained in twenty gallons of air; and in twenty-four, that contained
in 480 gallons.  We must, therefore find how many times 480 gallons
of air the Nautilus contains."

"Just so," said Conseil.

"Or," I continued, "the size of the Nautilus being 1,500 tons;
and one ton holding 200 gallons, it contains 300,000 gallons
of air, which, divided by 480, gives a quotient of 625.
Which means to say, strictly speaking, that the air contained in
the Nautilus would suffice for 625 men for twenty-four hours."

"Six hundred and twenty-five!" repeated Ned.

"But remember that all of us, passengers, sailors, and officers included,
would not form a tenth part of that number."

"Still too many for three men," murmured Conseil.

The Canadian shook his head, passed his hand across his forehead,
and left the room without answering.

"Will you allow me to make one observation, sir?" said Conseil.
"Poor Ned is longing for everything that he can not have.  His past life
is always present to him; everything that we are forbidden he regrets.
His head is full of old recollections.  And we must understand him.
What has he to do here?  Nothing; he is not learned like you, sir;
and has not the same taste for the beauties of the sea that we have.
He would risk everything to be able to go once more into a tavern
in his own country."

Certainly the monotony on board must seem intolerable to the Canadian,
accustomed as he was to a life of liberty and activity.
Events were rare which could rouse him to any show of spirit; but that day
an event did happen which recalled the bright days of the harpooner.
About eleven in the morning, being on the surface of the ocean,
the Nautilus fell in with a troop of whales--an encounter which did
not astonish me, knowing that these creatures, hunted to death,
had taken refuge in high latitudes.

We were seated on the platform, with a quiet sea.  The month of October
in those latitudes gave us some lovely autumnal days.  It was the Canadian--
he could not be mistaken--who signalled a whale on the eastern horizon.
Looking attentively, one might see its black back rise and fall with the waves
five miles from the Nautilus.

"Ah!" exclaimed Ned Land, "if I was on board a whaler, now such
a meeting would give me pleasure.  It is one of large size.
See with what strength its blow-holes throw up columns of air an steam!
Confound it, why am I bound to these steel plates?"

"What, Ned," said I, "you have not forgotten your old ideas of fishing?"

"Can a whale-fisher ever forget his old trade, sir?  Can he ever
tire of the emotions caused by such a chase?"

"You have never fished in these seas, Ned?"

"Never, sir; in the northern only, and as much in Behring
as in Davis Straits."

"Then the southern whale is still unknown to you.  It is the Greenland
whale you have hunted up to this time, and that would not risk passing
through the warm waters of the equator.  Whales are localised,
according to their kinds, in certain seas which they never leave.
And if one of these creatures went from Behring to Davis Straits,
it must be simply because there is a passage from one sea to the other,
either on the American or the Asiatic side."

"In that case, as I have never fished in these seas, I do not know
the kind of whale frequenting them!"

"I have told you, Ned."

"A greater reason for making their acquaintance," said Conseil.

"Look! look!" exclaimed the Canadian, "they approach:
they aggravate me; they know that I cannot get at them!"

Ned stamped his feet.  His hand trembled, as he grasped an imaginary harpoon.

"Are these cetaceans as large as those of the northern seas?" asked he.

"Very nearly, Ned."

"Because I have seen large whales, sir, whales measuring a hundred feet.
I have even been told that those of Hullamoch and Umgallick,
of the Aleutian Islands, are sometimes a hundred and fifty feet long."

"That seems to me exaggeration.  These creatures are generally much smaller
than the Greenland whale."  {this paragraph has been edited}

"Ah!" exclaimed the Canadian, whose eyes had never left the ocean,
"they are coming nearer; they are in the same water as the Nautilus."

Then, returning to the conversation, he said:

"You spoke of the cachalot as a small creature.
I have heard of gigantic ones.  They are intelligent cetacea.
It is said of some that they cover themselves with seaweed and fucus,
and then are taken for islands.  People encamp upon them,
and settle there; lights a fire----"

"And build houses," said Conseil.

"Yes, joker," said Ned Land.  "And one fine day the creature plunges,
carrying with it all the inhabitants to the bottom of the sea."

"Something like the travels of Sinbad the Sailor," I replied, laughing.

"Ah!" suddenly exclaimed Ned Land, "it is not one whale;
there are ten--there are twenty--it is a whole troop!
And I not able to do anything! hands and feet tied!"

"But, friend Ned," said Conseil, "why do you not ask Captain
Nemo's permission to chase them?"

Conseil had not finished his sentence when Ned Land had
lowered himself through the panel to seek the Captain.
A few minutes afterwards the two appeared together on the platform.

Captain Nemo watched the troop of cetacea playing on the waters
about a mile from the Nautilus.

"They are southern whales," said he; "there goes the fortune
of a whole fleet of whalers."

"Well, sir," asked the Canadian, "can I not chase them,
if only to remind me of my old trade of harpooner?"

"And to what purpose?" replied Captain Nemo; "only to destroy!
We have nothing to do with the whale-oil on board."

"But, sir," continued the Canadian, "in the Red Sea you allowed
us to follow the dugong."

"Then it was to procure fresh meat for my crew.  Here it would
be killing for killing's sake.  I know that is a privilege
reserved for man, but I do not approve of such murderous pastime.
In destroying the southern whale (like the Greenland whale,
an inoffensive creature), your traders do a culpable action,
Master Land.  They have already depopulated the whole of
Baffin's Bay, and are annihilating a class of useful animals.
Leave the unfortunate cetacea alone.  They have plenty
of natural enemies--cachalots, swordfish, and sawfish--
without you troubling them."

The Captain was right.  The barbarous and inconsiderate greed of these
fishermen will one day cause the disappearance of the last whale
in the ocean.  Ned Land whistled "Yankee-doodle" between his teeth,
thrust his hands into his pockets, and turned his back upon us.
But Captain Nemo watched the troop of cetacea, and, addressing me, said:

"I was right in saying that whales had natural enemies enough,
without counting man.  These will have plenty to do before long.
Do you see, M. Aronnax, about eight miles to leeward,
those blackish moving points?"

"Yes, Captain," I replied.

"Those are cachalots--terrible animals, which I have met in troops of two
or three hundred.  As to those, they are cruel, mischievous creatures;
they would be right in exterminating them."

The Canadian turned quickly at the last words.

"Well, Captain," said he, "it is still time, in the interest
of the whales."

"It is useless to expose one's self, Professor.  The Nautilus
will disperse them.  It is armed with a steel spur as good
as Master Land's harpoon, I imagine."

The Canadian did not put himself out enough to shrug his shoulders.
Attack cetacea with blows of a spur!  Who had ever heard of such a thing?

"Wait, M. Aronnax," said Captain Nemo.  "We will show you something you
have never yet seen.  We have no pity for these ferocious creatures.
They are nothing but mouth and teeth."

Mouth and teeth!  No one could better describe the macrocephalous
cachalot, which is sometimes more than seventy-five feet long.
Its enormous head occupies one-third of its entire body.
Better armed than the whale, whose upper jaw is furnished only
with whalebone, it is supplied with twenty-five large tusks,
about eight inches long, cylindrical and conical at the top,
each weighing two pounds.  It is in the upper part of this
enormous head, in great cavities divided by cartilages, that is
to be found from six to eight hundred pounds of that precious
oil called spermaceti.  The cachalot is a disagreeable creature,
more tadpole than fish, according to Fredol's description.
It is badly formed, the whole of its left side being
(if we may say it), a "failure," and being only able to see
with its right eye.  But the formidable troop was nearing us.
They had seen the whales and were preparing to attack them.
One could judge beforehand that the cachalots would be victorious,
not only because they were better built for attack than
their inoffensive adversaries, but also because they could
remain longer under water without coming to the surface.
There was only just time to go to the help of the whales.
The Nautilus went under water.  Conseil, Ned Land,
and I took our places before the window in the saloon,
and Captain Nemo joined the pilot in his cage to work
his apparatus as an engine of destruction.  Soon I felt
the beatings of the screw quicken, and our speed increased.
The battle between the cachalots and the whales had already begun
when the Nautilus arrived.  They did not at first show any fear
at the sight of this new monster joining in the conflict.
But they soon had to guard against its blows.  What a battle!
The Nautilus was nothing but a formidable harpoon,
brandished by the hand of its Captain.  It hurled itself against
the fleshy mass, passing through from one part to the other,
leaving behind it two quivering halves of the animal.
It could not feel the formidable blows from their tails upon
its sides, nor the shock which it produced itself, much more.
One cachalot killed, it ran at the next, tacked on the spot
that it might not miss its prey, going forwards and backwards,
answering to its helm, plunging when the cetacean dived into
the deep waters, coming up with it when it returned to the surface,
striking it front or sideways, cutting or tearing in all
directions and at any pace, piercing it with its terrible spur.
What carnage!  What a noise on the surface of the waves!
What sharp hissing, and what snorting peculiar to
these enraged animals!  In the midst of these waters,
generally so peaceful, their tails made perfect billows.
For one hour this wholesale massacre continued, from which the
cachalots could not escape.  Several times ten or twelve united
tried to crush the Nautilus by their weight.  From the window
we could see their enormous mouths, studded with tusks,
and their formidable eyes.  Ned Land could not contain himself;
he threatened and swore at them.  We could feel them clinging
to our vessel like dogs worrying a wild boar in a copse.
But the Nautilus, working its screw, carried them here and there,
or to the upper levels of the ocean, without caring for their
enormous weight, nor the powerful strain on the vessel.
At length the mass of cachalots broke up, the waves
became quiet, and I felt that we were rising to the surface.
The panel opened, and we hurried on to the platform.
The sea was covered with mutilated bodies.  A formidable explosion
could not have divided and torn this fleshy mass with more violence.
We were floating amid gigantic bodies, bluish on the back
and white underneath, covered with enormous protuberances.
Some terrified cachalots were flying towards the horizon.
The waves were dyed red for several miles, and the Nautilus
floated in a sea of blood:  Captain Nemo joined
us.

"Well, Master Land?" said he.

"Well, sir," replied the Canadian, whose enthusiasm had somewhat calmed;
"it is a terrible spectacle, certainly.  But I am not a butcher.
I am a hunter, and I call this a butchery."

"It is a massacre of mischievous creatures," replied the Captain;
"and the Nautilus is not a butcher's knife."

"I like my harpoon better," said the Canadian.

"Every one to his own," answered the Captain, looking fixedly
at Ned Land.

I feared he would commit some act of violence, which would end
in sad consequences.  But his anger was turned by the sight
of a whale which the Nautilus had just come up with.
The creature had not quite escaped from the cachalot's teeth.
I recognised the southern whale by its flat head,
which is entirely black.  Anatomically, it is distinguished
from the white whale and the North Cape whale by the seven
cervical vertebrae, and it has two more ribs than its congeners.
The unfortunate cetacean was lying on its side,
riddled with holes from the bites, and quite dead.
From its mutilated fin still hung a young whale which it could
not save from the massacre.  Its open mouth let the water flow
in and out, murmuring like the waves breaking on the shore.
Captain Nemo steered close to the corpse of the creature.
Two of his men mounted its side, and I saw, not without surprise,
that they were drawing from its breasts all the milk which
they contained, that is to say, about two or three tons.
The Captain offered me a cup of the milk, which was still warm.
I could not help showing my repugnance to the drink;
but he assured me that it was excellent, and not to be distinguished
from cow's milk.  I tasted it, and was of his opinion.
It was a useful reserve to us, for in the shape of salt butter
or cheese it would form an agreeable variety from our ordinary food.
From that day I noticed with uneasiness that Ned Land's ill-will
towards Captain Nemo increased, and I resolved to watch the
Canadian's gestures closely.



CHAPTER VIII

THE ICEBERG

The Nautilus was steadily pursuing its southerly course,
following the fiftieth meridian with considerable speed.
Did he wish to reach the pole?  I did not think so,
for every attempt to reach that point had hitherto failed.
Again, the season was far advanced, for in the Antarctic regions
the 13th of March corresponds with the 13th of September
of northern regions, which begin at the equinoctial season.
On the 14th of March I saw floating ice in latitude 55@,
merely pale bits of debris from twenty to twenty-five
feet long, forming banks over which the sea curled.
The Nautilus remained on the surface of the ocean.
Ned Land, who had fished in the Arctic Seas, was familiar with
its icebergs; but Conseil and I admired them for the first time.
In the atmosphere towards the southern horizon stretched
a white dazzling band.  English whalers have given it
the name of "ice blink."  However thick the clouds may be,
it is always visible, and announces the presence of an ice
pack or bank.  Accordingly, larger blocks soon appeared,
whose brilliancy changed with the caprices of the fog.
Some of these masses showed green veins, as if long undulating
lines had been traced with sulphate of copper; others resembled
enormous amethysts with the light shining through them.
Some reflected the light of day upon a thousand crystal facets.
Others shaded with vivid calcareous reflections resembled a perfect
town of marble.  The more we neared the south the more these floating
islands increased both in number and importance.

At 60@ lat.  every pass had disappeared.  But, seeking carefully,
Captain Nemo soon found a narrow opening, through which he boldly slipped,
knowing, however, that it would close behind him.  Thus, guided by this
clever hand, the Nautilus passed through all the ice with a precision
which quite charmed Conseil; icebergs or mountains, ice-fields or
smooth plains, seeming to have no limits, drift-ice or floating ice-packs,
plains broken up, called palchs when they are circular, and streams
when they are made up of long strips.  The temperature was very low;
the thermometer exposed to the air marked 2@ or 3@ below zero, but we
were warmly clad with fur, at the expense of the sea-bear and seal.
The interior of the Nautilus, warmed regularly by its electric apparatus,
defied the most intense cold.  Besides, it would only have been necessary
to go some yards beneath the waves to find a more bearable temperature.
Two months earlier we should have had perpetual daylight in these latitudes;
but already we had had three or four hours of night, and by and by there
would be six months of darkness in these circumpolar regions.  On the 15th
of March we were in the latitude of New Shetland and South Orkney.
The Captain told me that formerly numerous tribes of seals inhabited them;
but that English and American whalers, in their rage for destruction,
massacred both old and young; thus, where there was once life and animation,
they had left silence and death.

About eight o'clock on the morning of the 16th of March the Nautilus,
following the fifty-fifth meridian, cut the Antarctic polar circle.
Ice surrounded us on all sides, and closed the horizon.
But Captain Nemo went from one opening to another, still going higher.
I cannot express my astonishment at the beauties of these new regions.
The ice took most surprising forms.  Here the grouping formed an
oriental town, with innumerable mosques and minarets; there a fallen
city thrown to the earth, as it were, by some convulsion of nature.
The whole aspect was constantly changed by the oblique rays
of the sun, or lost in the greyish fog amidst hurricanes of snow.
Detonations and falls were heard on all sides, great overthrows of icebergs,
which altered the whole landscape like a diorama.  Often seeing no exit,
I thought we were definitely prisoners; but, instinct guiding him
at the slightest indication, Captain Nemo would discover a new pass.
He was never mistaken when he saw the thin threads of bluish water
trickling along the ice-fields; and I had no doubt that he had
already ventured into the midst of these Antarctic seas before.
On the 16th of March, however, the ice-fields absolutely blocked our road.
It was not the iceberg itself, as yet, but vast fields cemented
by the cold.  But this obstacle could not stop Captain Nemo:
he hurled himself against it with frightful violence.  The Nautilus entered
the brittle mass like a wedge, and split it with frightful crackings.
It was the battering ram of the ancients hurled by infinite strength.
The ice, thrown high in the air, fell like hail around us.
By its own power of impulsion our apparatus made a canal for itself;
some times carried away by its own impetus, it lodged on the ice-field,
crushing it with its weight, and sometimes buried beneath it,
dividing it by a simple pitching movement, producing large rents in it.
Violent gales assailed us at this time, accompanied by thick fogs,
through which, from one end of the platform to the other, we could
see nothing.  The wind blew sharply from all parts of the compass,
and the snow lay in such hard heaps that we had to break it with
blows of a pickaxe.  The temperature was always at 5@ below zero;
every outward part of the Nautilus was covered with ice.
A rigged vessel would have been entangled in the blocked up gorges.
A vessel without sails, with electricity for its motive power,
and wanting no coal, could alone brave such high latitudes.  At length,
on the 18th of March, after many useless assaults, the Nautilus was
positively blocked.  It was no longer either streams, packs, or ice-fields,
but an interminable and immovable barrier, formed by mountains soldered
together.

"An iceberg!" said the Canadian to me.

I knew that to Ned Land, as well as to all other navigators who had
preceded us, this was an inevitable obstacle.  The sun appearing for an
instant at noon, Captain Nemo took an observation as near as possible,
which gave our situation at 51@ 30' long.  and 67@ 39' of S. lat.
We had advanced one degree more in this Antarctic region.
Of the liquid surface of the sea there was no longer a glimpse.
Under the spur of the Nautilus lay stretched a vast plain,
entangled with confused blocks.  Here and there sharp points and slender
needles rising to a height of 200 feet; further on a steep shore,
hewn as it were with an axe and clothed with greyish tints;
huge mirrors, reflecting a few rays of sunshine, half drowned in the fog.
And over this desolate face of nature a stern silence reigned,
scarcely broken by the flapping of the wings of petrels and puffins.
Everything was frozen--even the noise.  The Nautilus was then
obliged to stop in its adventurous course amid these fields of ice.
In spite of our efforts, in spite of the powerful means
employed to break up the ice, the Nautilus remained immovable.
Generally, when we can proceed no further, we have return still
open to us; but here return was as impossible as advance,
for every pass had closed behind us; and for the few moments
when we were stationary, we were likely to be entirely blocked,
which did indeed happen about two o'clock in the afternoon,
the fresh ice forming around its sides with astonishing rapidity.
I was obliged to admit that Captain Nemo was more than imprudent.
I was on the platform at that moment.  The Captain had been observing
our situation for some time past, when he said to me:

"Well, sir, what do you think of this?"

"I think that we are caught, Captain."

"So, M. Aronnax, you really think that the Nautilus cannot disengage itself?"

"With difficulty, Captain; for the season is already too far
advanced for you to reckon on the breaking of the ice."

"Ah! sir," said Captain Nemo, in an ironical tone, "you will always
be the same.  You see nothing but difficulties and obstacles.
I affirm that not only can the Nautilus disengage itself,
but also that it can go further still."

"Further to the South?"  I asked, looking at the Captain.

"Yes, sir; it shall go to the pole."

"To the pole!"  I exclaimed, unable to repress a gesture of incredulity.

"Yes," replied the Captain, coldly, "to the Antarctic pole--
to that unknown point from whence springs every meridian of the globe.
You know whether I can do as I please with the Nautilus!"

Yes, I knew that.  I knew that this man was bold, even to rashness.
But to conquer those obstacles which bristled round the South Pole,
rendering it more inaccessible than the North, which had not yet
been reached by the boldest navigators--was it not a mad enterprise,
one which only a maniac would have conceived?  It then came into
my head to ask Captain Nemo if he had ever discovered that pole
which had never yet been trodden by a human creature?

"No, sir," he replied; "but we will discover it together.
Where others have failed, I will not fail.  I have never yet led
my Nautilus so far into southern seas; but, I repeat, it shall
go further yet."

"I can well believe you, Captain," said I, in a slightly ironical tone.
"I believe you!  Let us go ahead!  There are no obstacles for us!
Let us smash this iceberg!  Let us blow it up; and, if it resists,
let us give the Nautilus wings to fly over it!"

"Over it, sir!" said Captain Nemo, quietly; "no, not over it,
but under it!"

"Under it!"  I exclaimed, a sudden idea of the Captain's projects flashing
upon my mind.  I understood; the wonderful qualities of the Nautilus were
going to serve us in this superhuman enterprise.

"I see we are beginning to understand one another, sir," said the Captain,
half smiling.  "You begin to see the possibility--I should say the success--
of this attempt.  That which is impossible for an ordinary vessel is easy
to the Nautilus.  If a continent lies before the pole, it must stop before
the continent; but if, on the contrary, the pole is washed by open sea,
it will go even to the pole."

"Certainly," said I, carried away by the Captain's reasoning;
"if the surface of the sea is solidified by the ice,
the lower depths are free by the Providential law which has
placed the maximum of density of the waters of the ocean one
degree higher than freezing-point; and, if I am not mistaken,
the portion of this iceberg which is above the water is as one
to four to that which is below."

"Very nearly, sir; for one foot of iceberg above the sea there
are three below it.  If these ice mountains are not more than 300
feet above the surface, they are not more than 900 beneath.
And what are 900 feet to the Nautilus?"

"Nothing, sir."

"It could even seek at greater depths that uniform temperature
of sea-water, and there brave with impunity the thirty or forty
degrees of surface cold."

"Just so, sir--just so," I replied, getting animated.

"The only difficulty," continued Captain Nemo, "is that of remaining
several days without renewing our provision of air."

"Is that all?  The Nautilus has vast reservoirs; we can fill them,
and they will supply us with all the oxygen we want."

"Well thought of, M. Aronnax," replied the Captain, smiling.
"But, not wishing you to accuse me of rashness, I will first give
you all my objections."

"Have you any more to make?"

"Only one.  It is possible, if the sea exists at the South Pole,
that it may be covered; and, consequently, we shall be unable
to come to the surface."

"Good, sir! but do you forget that the Nautilus is armed with a powerful spur,
and could we not send it diagonally against these fields of ice, which would
open at the shocks."

"Ah! sir, you are full of ideas to-day."

"Besides, Captain," I added, enthusiastically, "why should we
not find the sea open at the South Pole as well as at the North?
The frozen poles of the earth do not coincide, either in the southern
or in the northern regions; and, until it is proved to the contrary,
we may suppose either a continent or an ocean free from ice at these two
points of the globe."

"I think so too, M. Aronnax," replied Captain Nemo.
"I only wish you to observe that, after having made so many
objections to my project, you are now crushing me with arguments
in its favour!"

The preparations for this audacious attempt now began.
The powerful pumps of the Nautilus were working air into the
reservoirs and storing it at high pressure.  About four o'clock,
Captain Nemo announced the closing of the panels on the platform.
I threw one last look at the massive iceberg which we were going
to cross.  The weather was clear, the atmosphere pure enough,
the cold very great, being 12@ below zero; but, the wind
having gone down, this temperature was not so unbearable.
About ten men mounted the sides of the Nautilus, armed with
pickaxes to break the ice around the vessel, which was soon free.
The operation was quickly performed, for the fresh ice was still
very thin.  We all went below.  The usual reservoirs were filled
with the newly-liberated water, and the Nautilus soon descended.
I had taken my place with Conseil in the saloon; through the open
window we could see the lower beds of the Southern Ocean.
The thermometer went up, the needle of the compass deviated
on the dial.  At about 900 feet, as Captain Nemo had foreseen,
we were floating beneath the undulating bottom of the iceberg.
But the Nautilus went lower still--it went to the depth of four
hundred fathoms.  The temperature of the water at the surface
showed twelve degrees, it was now only ten; we had gained two.
I need not say the temperature of the Nautilus was raised by its heating
apparatus to a much higher degree; every manoeuvre was accomplished
with wonderful precision.

"We shall pass it, if you please, sir," said Conseil.

"I believe we shall," I said, in a tone of firm conviction.

In this open sea, the Nautilus had taken its course direct
to the pole, without leaving the fifty-second meridian.
From 67@ 30' to 90@, twenty-two degrees and a half of latitude
remained to travel; that is, about five hundred leagues.
The Nautilus kept up a mean speed of twenty-six miles an hour--
the speed of an express train.  If that was kept up, in forty hours we
should reach the pole.

For a part of the night the novelty of the situation kept us
at the window.  The sea was lit with the electric lantern; but it
was deserted; fishes did not sojourn in these imprisoned waters;
they only found there a passage to take them from the
Antarctic Ocean to the open polar sea.  Our pace was rapid;
we could feel it by the quivering of the long steel body.
About two in the morning I took some hours' repose, and Conseil
did the same.  In crossing the waist I did not meet Captain Nemo:
I supposed him to be in the pilot's cage.  The next morning,
the 19th of March, I took my post once more in the saloon.
The electric log told me that the speed of the Nautilus
had been slackened.  It was then going towards the surface;
but prudently emptying its reservoirs very slowly.
My heart beat fast.  Were we going to emerge and regain the open
polar atmosphere?  No!  A shock told me that the Nautilus
had struck the bottom of the iceberg, still very thick,
judging from the deadened sound.  We had in deed "struck," to use
a sea expression, but in an inverse sense, and at a thousand
feet deep.  This would give three thousand feet of ice above us;
one thousand being above the water-mark. The iceberg was then
higher than at its borders--not a very reassuring fact.
Several times that day the Nautilus tried again, and every
time it struck the wall which lay like a ceiling above it.
Sometimes it met with but 900 yards, only 200 of which
rose above the surface.  It was twice the height it was
when the Nautilus had gone under the waves.  I carefully
noted the different depths, and thus obtained a submarine
profile of the chain as it was developed under the water.
That night no change had taken place in our situation.
Still ice between four and five hundred yards in depth!
It was evidently diminishing, but, still, what a thickness
between us and the surface of the ocean!  It was then eight.
According to the daily custom on board the Nautilus,
its air should have been renewed four hours ago;
but I did not suffer much, although Captain Nemo had not yet
made any demand upon his reserve of oxygen.  My sleep was
painful that night; hope and fear besieged me by turns:
I rose several times.  The groping of the Nautilus continued.
About three in the morning, I noticed that the lower surface
of the iceberg was only about fifty feet deep.  One hundred
and fifty feet now separated us from the surface of the waters.
The iceberg was by degrees becoming an ice-field, the mountain
a plain.  My eyes never left the manometer.  We were still rising
diagonally to the surface, which sparkled under the electric rays.
The iceberg was stretching both above and beneath into
lengthening slopes; mile after mile it was getting thinner.
At length, at six in the morning of that memorable day,
the 19th of March, the door of the saloon opened, and Captain Nemo
appeared.

"The sea is open!!" was all he said.



CHAPTER XIV

THE SOUTH POLE

I rushed on to the platform.  Yes! the open sea, with but a few
scattered pieces of ice and moving icebergs--a long stretch of sea;
a world of birds in the air, and myriads of fishes under those waters,
which varied from intense blue to olive green, according to the bottom.
The thermometer marked 3@ C. above zero.  It was comparatively spring,
shut up as we were behind this iceberg, whose lengthened mass was dimly
seen on our northern horizon.

"Are we at the pole?"  I asked the Captain, with a beating heart.

"I do not know," he replied.  "At noon I will take our bearings."

"But will the sun show himself through this fog?" said I,
looking at the leaden sky.

"However little it shows, it will be enough," replied the Captain.

About ten miles south a solitary island rose to a height
of one hundred and four yards.  We made for it, but carefully,
for the sea might be strewn with banks.  One hour afterwards we
had reached it, two hours later we had made the round of it.
It measured four or five miles in circumference.
A narrow canal separated it from a considerable stretch of land,
perhaps a continent, for we could not see its limits.
The existence of this land seemed to give some colour to Maury's theory.
The ingenious American has remarked that, between the South Pole
and the sixtieth parallel, the sea is covered with floating ice
of enormous size, which is never met with in the North Atlantic.
From this fact he has drawn the conclusion that the Antarctic
Circle encloses considerable continents, as icebergs cannot form
in open sea, but only on the coasts.  According to these calculations,
the mass of ice surrounding the southern pole forms a vast cap,
the circumference of which must be, at least, 2,500 miles.
But the Nautilus, for fear of running aground, had stopped
about three cable-lengths from a strand over which reared
a superb heap of rocks.  The boat was launched; the Captain,
two of his men, bearing instruments, Conseil, and myself were in it.
It was ten in the morning.  I had not seen Ned Land.
Doubtless the Canadian did not wish to admit the presence of
the South Pole.  A few strokes of the oar brought us to the sand,
where we ran ashore.  Conseil was going to jump on to the land,
when I held him back.

"Sir," said I to Captain Nemo, "to you belongs the honour of first setting
foot on this land."

"Yes, sir," said the Captain, "and if I do not hesitate
to tread this South Pole, it is because, up to this time,
no human being has left a trace there."

Saying this, he jumped lightly on to the sand.  His heart beat
with emotion.  He climbed a rock, sloping to a little promontory,
and there, with his arms crossed, mute and motionless, and with an
eager look, he seemed to take possession of these southern regions.
After five minutes passed in this ecstasy, he turned to us.

"When you like, sir."

I landed, followed by Conseil, leaving the two men in the boat.
For a long way the soil was composed of a reddish sandy stone,
something like crushed brick, scoriae, streams of lava,
and pumice-stones. One could not mistake its volcanic origin.
In some parts, slight curls of smoke emitted a sulphurous smell,
proving that the internal fires had lost nothing of their
expansive powers, though, having climbed a high acclivity,
I could see no volcano for a radius of several miles.
We know that in those Antarctic countries, James Ross found
two craters, the Erebus and Terror, in full activity,
on the 167th meridian, latitude 77@ 32'. The vegetation
of this desolate continent seemed to me much restricted.
Some lichens lay upon the black rocks; some microscopic plants,
rudimentary diatomas, a kind of cells placed between two quartz shells;
long purple and scarlet weed, supported on little swimming bladders,
which the breaking of the waves brought to the shore.
These constituted the meagre flora of this region.
The shore was strewn with molluscs, little mussels, and limpets.
I also saw myriads of northern clios, one-and-a-quarter inches long,
of which a whale would swallow a whole world at a mouthful;
and some perfect sea-butterflies, animating the waters on the skirts
of the shore.

There appeared on the high bottoms some coral shrubs,
of the kind which, according to James Ross, live in
the Antarctic seas to the depth of more than 1,000 yards.
Then there were little kingfishers and starfish studding the soil.
But where life abounded most was in the air.  There thousands
of birds fluttered and flew of all kinds, deafening us with
their cries; others crowded the rock, looking at us as we passed
by without fear, and pressing familiarly close by our feet.
There were penguins, so agile in the water, heavy and awkward
as they are on the ground; they were uttering harsh cries,
a large assembly, sober in gesture, but extravagant in clamour.
Albatrosses passed in the air, the expanse of their wings being
at least four yards and a half, and justly called the vultures
of the ocean; some gigantic petrels, and some damiers, a kind
of small duck, the underpart of whose body is black and white;
then there were a whole series of petrels, some whitish, with
brown-bordered wings, others blue, peculiar to the Antarctic seas,
and so oily, as I told Conseil, that the inhabitants of the Ferroe
Islands had nothing to do before lighting them but to put
a wick in.

"A little more," said Conseil, "and they would be perfect lamps!
After that, we cannot expect Nature to have previously furnished
them with wicks!"

About half a mile farther on the soil was riddled with ruffs'
nests, a sort of laying-ground, out of which many birds were issuing.
Captain Nemo had some hundreds hunted.  They uttered a cry like the braying
of an ass, were about the size of a goose, slate-colour on the body,
white beneath, with a yellow line round their throats; they allowed
themselves to be killed with a stone, never trying to escape.
But the fog did not lift, and at eleven the sun had not yet shown itself.
Its absence made me uneasy.  Without it no observations were possible.
How, then, could we decide whether we had reached the pole?  When I rejoined
Captain Nemo, I found him leaning on a piece of rock, silently watching
the sky.  He seemed impatient and vexed.  But what was to be done?
This rash and powerful man could not command the sun as he did the sea.
Noon arrived without the orb of day showing itself for an instant.
We could not even tell its position behind the curtain of fog; and soon
the fog turned to snow.

"Till to-morrow," said the Captain, quietly, and we returned
to the Nautilus amid these atmospheric disturbances.

The tempest of snow continued till the next day.
It was impossible to remain on the platform.  From the saloon,
where I was taking notes of incidents happening during this
excursion to the polar continent, I could hear the cries of petrels
and albatrosses sporting in the midst of this violent storm.
The Nautilus did not remain motionless, but skirted the coast,
advancing ten miles more to the south in the half-light
left by the sun as it skirted the edge of the horizon.
The next day, the 20th of March, the snow had ceased.
The cold was a little greater, the thermometer showing 2@
below zero.  The fog was rising, and I hoped that that day
our observations might be taken.  Captain Nemo not having
yet appeared, the boat took Conseil and myself to land.
The soil was still of the same volcanic nature;
everywhere were traces of lava, scoriae, and basalt;
but the crater which had vomited them I could not see.
Here, as lower down, this continent was alive with myriads
of birds.  But their rule was now divided with large troops
of sea-mammals, looking at us with their soft eyes.
There were several kinds of seals, some stretched on the earth,
some on flakes of ice, many going in and out of the sea.  They did
not flee at our approach, never having had anything to do with man;
and I reckoned that there were provisions there for hundreds
of vessels.

"Sir," said Conseil, "will you tell me the names of these creatures?"

"They are seals and morses."

It was now eight in the morning.  Four hours remained to us before
the sun could be observed with advantage.  I directed our steps
towards a vast bay cut in the steep granite shore.  There, I can aver
that earth and ice were lost to sight by the numbers of sea-mammals
covering them, and I involuntarily sought for old Proteus,
the mythological shepherd who watched these immense flocks of Neptune.
There were more seals than anything else, forming distinct groups,
male and female, the father watching over his family, the mother
suckling her little ones, some already strong enough to go a few steps.
When they wished to change their place, they took little jumps,
made by the contraction of their bodies, and helped awkwardly enough
by their imperfect fin, which, as with the lamantin, their cousins,
forms a perfect forearm.  I should say that, in the water,
which is their element--the spine of these creatures is flexible;
with smooth and close skin and webbed feet--they swim admirably.
In resting on the earth they take the most graceful attitudes.
Thus the ancients, observing their soft and expressive looks,
which cannot be surpassed by the most beautiful look a woman can give,
their clear voluptuous eyes, their charming positions, and the poetry
of their manners, metamorphosed them, the male into a triton and
the female into a mermaid.  I made Conseil notice the considerable
development of the lobes of the brain in these interesting cetaceans.
No mammal, except man, has such a quantity of brain matter;
they are also capable of receiving a certain amount of education,
are easily domesticated, and I think, with other naturalists,
that if properly taught they would be of great service as fishing-dogs.
The greater part of them slept on the rocks or on the sand.
Amongst these seals, properly so called, which have no external ears
(in which they differ from the otter, whose ears are prominent),
I noticed several varieties of seals about three yards long,
with a white coat, bulldog heads, armed with teeth in both jaws,
four incisors at the top and four at the bottom, and two large
canine teeth in the shape of a fleur-de-lis. Amongst them glided
sea-elephants, a kind of seal, with short, flexible trunks.
The giants of this species measured twenty feet round and ten yards
and a half in length; but they did not move as we approached.

"These creatures are not dangerous?" asked Conseil.

"No; not unless you attack them.  When they have to defend
their young their rage is terrible, and it is not uncommon
for them to break the fishing-boats to pieces."

"They are quite right," said Conseil.

"I do not say they are not."

Two miles farther on we were stopped by the promontory which shelters
the bay from the southerly winds.  Beyond it we heard loud bellowings
such as a troop of ruminants would produce.

"Good!" said Conseil; "a concert of bulls!"

"No; a concert of morses."

"They are fighting!"

"They are either fighting or playing."

We now began to climb the blackish rocks, amid unforeseen stumbles,
and over stones which the ice made slippery.  More than once I rolled
over at the expense of my loins.  Conseil, more prudent or more steady,
did not stumble, and helped me up, saying:

"If, sir, you would have the kindness to take wider steps,
you would preserve your equilibrium better."

Arrived at the upper ridge of the promontory, I saw a vast white
plain covered with morses.  They were playing amongst themselves,
and what we heard were bellowings of pleasure, not of anger.

As I passed these curious animals I could examine them leisurely,
for they did not move.  Their skins were thick and rugged,
of a yellowish tint, approaching to red; their hair was short
and scant.  Some of them were four yards and a quarter long.
Quieter and less timid than their cousins of the north, they did not,
like them, place sentinels round the outskirts of their encampment.
After examining this city of morses, I began to think of returning.
It was eleven o'clock, and, if Captain Nemo found the conditions
favourable for observations, I wished to be present at the operation.
We followed a narrow pathway running along the summit of the steep shore.
At half-past eleven we had reached the place where we landed.
The boat had run aground, bringing the Captain.  I saw him standing on a block
of basalt, his instruments near him, his eyes fixed on the northern horizon,
near which the sun was then describing a lengthened curve.  I took my place
beside him, and waited without speaking.  Noon arrived, and, as before,
the sun did not appear.  It was a fatality.  Observations were still wanting.
If not accomplished to-morrow, we must give up all idea of taking any.
We were indeed exactly at the 20th of March.  To-morrow, the 21st,
would be the equinox; the sun would disappear behind the horizon for
six months, and with its disappearance the long polar night would begin.
Since the September equinox it had emerged from the northern horizon,
rising by lengthened spirals up to the 21st of December.  At this period,
the summer solstice of the northern regions, it had begun to descend;
and to-morrow was to shed its last rays upon them.  I communicated my fears
and observations to Captain Nemo.

"You are right, M. Aronnax," said he; "if to-morrow I cannot take
the altitude of the sun, I shall not be able to do it for six months.
But precisely because chance has led me into these seas on the 21st
of March, my bearings will be easy to take, if at twelve we can
see the sun."

"Why, Captain?"

"Because then the orb of day described such lengthened curves that it
is difficult to measure exactly its height above the horizon,
and grave errors may be made with instruments."

"What will you do then?"

"I shall only use my chronometer," replied Captain Nemo.
"If to-morrow, the 21st of March, the disc of the sun,
allowing for refraction, is exactly cut by the northern horizon,
it will show that I am at the South Pole."

"Just so," said I. "But this statement is not mathematically correct,
because the equinox does not necessarily begin at noon."

"Very likely, sir; but the error will not be a hundred yards
and we do not want more.  Till to-morrow, then!"

Captain Nemo returned on board.  Conseil and I remained to survey
the shore, observing and studying until five o'clock. Then I
went to bed, not, however, without invoking, like the Indian,
the favour of the radiant orb.  The next day, the 21st
of March, at five in the morning, I mounted the platform.
I found Captain Nemo there.

"The weather is lightening a little," said he.  "I have some hope.
After breakfast we will go on shore and choose a post for observation."

That point settled, I sought Ned Land.  I wanted to take him with me.
But the obstinate Canadian refused, and I saw that his taciturnity and his
bad humour grew day by day.  After all, I was not sorry for his obstinacy
under the circumstances.  Indeed, there were too many seals on shore,
and we ought not to lay such temptation in this unreflecting fisherman's way.
Breakfast over, we went on shore.  The Nautilus had gone some miles
further up in the night.  It was a whole league from the coast,
above which reared a sharp peak about five hundred yards high.
The boat took with me Captain Nemo, two men of the crew, and the instruments,
which consisted of a chronometer, a telescope, and a barometer.
While crossing, I saw numerous whales belonging to the three kinds
peculiar to the southern seas; the whale, or the English "right whale,"
which has no dorsal fin; the "humpback," with reeved chest and large,
whitish fins, which, in spite of its name, do not form wings;
and the fin-back, of a yellowish brown, the liveliest of all the cetacea.
This powerful creature is heard a long way off when he throws to a great
height columns of air and vapour, which look like whirlwinds of smoke.
These different mammals were disporting themselves in troops in the
quiet waters; and I could see that this basin of the Antarctic Pole serves
as a place of refuge to the cetacea too closely tracked by the hunters.
I also noticed large medusae floating between the reeds.

At nine we landed; the sky was brightening, the clouds were flying to
the south, and the fog seemed to be leaving the cold surface of the waters.
Captain Nemo went towards the peak, which he doubtless meant
to be his observatory.  It was a painful ascent over the sharp lava
and the pumice-stones, in an atmosphere often impregnated with a
sulphurous smell from the smoking cracks.  For a man unaccustomed
to walk on land, the Captain climbed the steep slopes with an
agility I never saw equalled and which a hunter would have envied.
We were two hours getting to the summit of this peak, which was half
porphyry and half basalt.  From thence we looked upon a vast sea which,
towards the north, distinctly traced its boundary line upon the sky.
At our feet lay fields of dazzling whiteness.  Over our heads
a pale azure, free from fog.  To the north the disc of the sun seemed
like a ball of fire, already horned by the cutting of the horizon.
From the bosom of the water rose sheaves of liquid jets by hundreds.
In the distance lay the Nautilus like a cetacean asleep on the water.
Behind us, to the south and east, an immense country and a chaotic
heap of rocks and ice, the limits of which were not visible.
On arriving at the summit Captain Nemo carefully took the mean height
of the barometer, for he would have to consider that in taking
his observations.  At a quarter to twelve the sun, then seen only
by refraction, looked like a golden disc shedding its last rays upon
this deserted continent and seas which never man had yet ploughed.
Captain Nemo, furnished with a lenticular glass which, by means
of a mirror, corrected the refraction, watched the orb sinking
below the horizon by degrees, following a lengthened diagonal.
I held the chronometer.  My heart beat fast.  If the disappearance of
the half-disc of the sun coincided with twelve o'clock on the chronometer,
we were at the pole itself.

"Twelve!"  I exclaimed.

"The South Pole!" replied Captain Nemo, in a grave voice,
handing me the glass, which showed the orb cut in exactly equal
parts by the horizon.

I looked at the last rays crowning the peak, and the shadows
mounting by degrees up its slopes.  At that moment Captain Nemo,
resting with his hand on my shoulder, said:

"I, Captain Nemo, on this 21st day of March, 1868, have reached the South Pole
on the ninetieth degree; and I take possession of this part of the globe,
equal to one-sixth of the known continents."

"In whose name, Captain?"

"In my own, sir!"

Saying which, Captain Nemo unfurled a black banner, bearing an "N"
in gold quartered on its bunting.  Then, turning towards the orb of day,
whose last rays lapped the horizon of the sea, he exclaimed:

"Adieu, sun!  Disappear, thou radiant orb! rest beneath this open sea,
and let a night of six months spread its shadows over my new domains!"



CHAPTER XV

ACCIDENT OR INCIDENT?

The next day, the 22nd of March, at six in the morning,
preparations for departure were begun.  The last gleams
of twilight were melting into night.  The cold was great,
the constellations shone with wonderful intensity.
In the zenith glittered that wondrous Southern Cross--
the polar bear of Antarctic regions.  The thermometer showed 120
below zero, and when the wind freshened it was most biting.
Flakes of ice increased on the open water.  The sea seemed
everywhere alike.  Numerous blackish patches spread on the surface,
showing the formation of fresh ice.  Evidently the southern basin,
frozen during the six winter months, was absolutely inaccessible.
What became of the whales in that time?  Doubtless they
went beneath the icebergs, seeking more practicable seas.
As to the seals and morses, accustomed to live in a hard climate,
they remained on these icy shores.  These creatures have the
instinct to break holes in the ice-field and to keep them open.
To these holes they come for breath; when the birds,
driven away by the cold, have emigrated to the north,
these sea mammals remain sole masters of the polar continent.
But the reservoirs were filling with water, and the Nautilus
was slowly descending.  At 1,000 feet deep it stopped;
its screw beat the waves, and it advanced straight towards
the north at a speed of fifteen miles an hour.  Towards night
it was already floating under the immense body of the iceberg.
At three in the morning I was awakened by a violent shock.
I sat up in my bed and listened in the darkness,
when I was thrown into the middle of the room.
The Nautilus, after having struck, had rebounded violently.
I groped along the partition, and by the staircase to the saloon,
which was lit by the luminous ceiling.  The furniture was upset.
Fortunately the windows were firmly set, and had held fast.
The pictures on the starboard side, from being no longer vertical,
were clinging to the paper, whilst those of the port side
were hanging at least a foot from the wall.  The Nautilus
was lying on its starboard side perfectly motionless.
I heard footsteps, and a confusion of voices; but Captain Nemo did
not appear.  As I was leaving the saloon, Ned Land and Conseil
entered.

"What is the matter?" said I, at once.

"I came to ask you, sir," replied Conseil.

"Confound it!" exclaimed the Canadian, "I know well enough!
The Nautilus has struck; and, judging by the way she lies,
I do not think she will right herself as she did the first time
in Torres Straits."

"But," I asked, "has she at least come to the surface of the sea?"

"We do not know," said Conseil.

"It is easy to decide," I answered.  I consulted the manometer.
To my great surprise, it showed a depth of more than 180 fathoms.
"What does that mean?"  I exclaimed.

"We must ask Captain Nemo," said Conseil.

"But where shall we find him?" said Ned Land.

"Follow me," said I, to my companions.

We left the saloon.  There was no one in the library.
At the centre staircase, by the berths of the ship's crew, there was
no one.  I thought that Captain Nemo must be in the pilot's cage.
It was best to wait.  We all returned to the saloon.  For twenty
minutes we remained thus, trying to hear the slightest noise which
might be made on board the Nautilus, when Captain Nemo entered.
He seemed not to see us; his face, generally so impassive,
showed signs of uneasiness.  He watched the compass silently,
then the manometer; and, going to the planisphere,
placed his finger on a spot representing the southern seas.
I would not interrupt him; but, some minutes later, when he
turned towards me, I said, using one of his own expressions
in the Torres Straits:

"An incident, Captain?"

"No, sir; an accident this time."

"Serious?"

"Perhaps."

"Is the danger immediate?"

"No."

"The Nautilus has stranded?"

"Yes."

"And this has happened--how?"

"From a caprice of nature, not from the ignorance of man.
Not a mistake has been made in the working.  But we cannot prevent
equilibrium from producing its effects.  We may brave human laws,
but we cannot resist natural ones."

Captain Nemo had chosen a strange moment for uttering this
philosophical reflection.  On the whole, his answer helped me little.

"May I ask, sir, the cause of this accident?"

"An enormous block of ice, a whole mountain, has turned over," he replied.
"When icebergs are undermined at their base by warmer water or reiterated
shocks their centre of gravity rises, and the whole thing turns over.
This is what has happened; one of these blocks, as it fell,
struck the Nautilus, then, gliding under its hull, raised it with
irresistible force, bringing it into beds which are not so thick,
where it is lying on its side."

"But can we not get the Nautilus off by emptying its reservoirs,
that it might regain its equilibrium?"

"That, sir, is being done at this moment.  You can hear the pump working.
Look at the needle of the manometer; it shows that the Nautilus is rising,
but the block of ice is floating with it; and, until some obstacle stops its
ascending motion, our position cannot be altered."

Indeed, the Nautilus still held the same position to starboard;
doubtless it would right itself when the block stopped.
But at this moment who knows if we may not be frightfully
crushed between the two glassy surfaces?  I reflected on all
the consequences of our position.  Captain Nemo never took
his eyes off the manometer.  Since the fall of the iceberg,
the Nautilus had risen about a hundred and fifty feet,
but it still made the same angle with the perpendicular.
Suddenly a slight movement was felt in the hold.
Evidently it was righting a little.  Things hanging in
the saloon were sensibly returning to their normal position.
The partitions were nearing the upright.  No one spoke.
With beating hearts we watched and felt the straightening.
The boards became horizontal under our feet.
Ten minutes passed.

"At last we have righted!"  I exclaimed.

"Yes," said Captain Nemo, going to the door of the saloon.

"But are we floating?"  I asked.

"Certainly," he replied; "since the reservoirs are not empty; and, when empty,
the Nautilus must rise to the surface of the sea."

We were in open sea; but at a distance of about ten yards,
on either side of the Nautilus, rose a dazzling wall of ice.
Above and beneath the same wall.  Above, because the lower surface
of the iceberg stretched over us like an immense ceiling.
Beneath, because the overturned block, having slid by degrees, had found
a resting-place on the lateral walls, which kept it in that position.
The Nautilus was really imprisoned in a perfect tunnel of ice
more than twenty yards in breadth, filled with quiet water.
It was easy to get out of it by going either forward or backward,
and then make a free passage under the iceberg, some hundreds
of yards deeper.  The luminous ceiling had been extinguished,
but the saloon was still resplendent with intense light.
It was the powerful reflection from the glass partition sent violently
back to the sheets of the lantern.  I cannot describe the effect
of the voltaic rays upon the great blocks so capriciously cut;
upon every angle, every ridge, every facet was thrown a different light,
according to the nature of the veins running through the ice;
a dazzling mine of gems, particularly of sapphires, their blue rays
crossing with the green of the emerald.  Here and there were opal
shades of wonderful softness, running through bright spots like
diamonds of fire, the brilliancy of which the eye could not bear.
The power of the lantern seemed increased a hundredfold, like a lamp
through the lenticular plates of a first-class lighthouse.

"How beautiful! how beautiful!" cried Conseil.

"Yes," I said, "it is a wonderful sight.  Is it not, Ned?"

"Yes, confound it!  Yes," answered Ned Land, "it is superb!
I am mad at being obliged to admit it.  No one has ever seen anything
like it; but the sight may cost us dear.  And, if I must say all,
I think we are seeing here things which God never intended
man to see."

Ned was right, it was too beautiful.  Suddenly a cry from Conseil
made me turn.

"What is it?"  I asked.

"Shut your eyes, sir!  Do not look, sir!"  Saying which,
Conseil clapped his hands over his eyes.

"But what is the matter, my boy?"

"I am dazzled, blinded."

My eyes turned involuntarily towards the glass, but I could not stand
the fire which seemed to devour them.  I understood what had happened.
The Nautilus had put on full speed.  All the quiet lustre of the ice-walls
was at once changed into flashes of lightning.  The fire from these myriads
of diamonds was blinding.  It required some time to calm our troubled looks.
At last the hands were taken down.

"Faith, I should never have believed it," said Conseil.

It was then five in the morning; and at that moment a shock was
felt at the bows of the Nautilus.  I knew that its spur had struck
a block of ice.  It must have been a false manoeuvre, for this
submarine tunnel, obstructed by blocks, was not very easy navigation.
I thought that Captain Nemo, by changing his course, would either
turn these obstacles or else follow the windings of the tunnel.
In any case, the road before us could not be entirely blocked.
But, contrary to my expectations, the Nautilus took a decided
retrograde motion.

"We are going backwards?" said Conseil.

"Yes," I replied.  "This end of the tunnel can have no egress."

"And then?"

"Then," said I, "the working is easy.  We must go back again,
and go out at the southern opening.  That is all."

In speaking thus, I wished to appear more confident than I really was.
But the retrograde motion of the Nautilus was increasing; and, reversing
the screw, it carried us at great speed.

"It will be a hindrance," said Ned.

"What does it matter, some hours more or less, provided we get
out at last?"

"Yes," repeated Ned Land, "provided we do get out at last!"

For a short time I walked from the saloon to the library.
My companions were silent.  I soon threw myself on an ottoman,
and took a book, which my eyes overran mechanically.  A quarter
of an hour after, Conseil, approaching me, said, "Is what you are
reading very interesting, sir?"

"Very interesting!"  I replied.

"I should think so, sir.  It is your own book you are reading."

"My book?"

And indeed I was holding in my hand the work on the Great Submarine Depths.
I did not even dream of it.  I closed the book and returned to my walk.
Ned and Conseil rose to go.

"Stay here, my friends," said I, detaining them.
"Let us remain together until we are out of this block."

"As you please, sir," Conseil replied.

Some hours passed.  I often looked at the instruments hanging
from the partition.  The manometer showed that the Nautilus kept
at a constant depth of more than three hundred yards; the compass
still pointed to south; the log indicated a speed of twenty
miles an hour, which, in such a cramped space, was very great.
But Captain Nemo knew that he could not hasten too much,
and that minutes were worth ages to us.  At twenty-five minutes
past eight a second shock took place, this time from behind.
I turned pale.  My companions were close by my side.
I seized Conseil's hand.  Our looks expressed our feelings better
than words.  At this moment the Captain entered the saloon.
I went up to him.

"Our course is barred southward?"  I asked.

"Yes, sir.  The iceberg has shifted and closed every outlet."

"We are blocked up then?"

"Yes."



CHAPTER XVI

WANT OF AIR

Thus around the Nautilus, above and below, was an impenetrable wall
of ice.  We were prisoners to the iceberg.  I watched the Captain.
His countenance had resumed its habitual imperturbability.

"Gentlemen," he said calmly, "there are two ways of dying in
the circumstances in which we are placed."  (This puzzling person
had the air of a mathematical professor lecturing to his pupils.)
"The first is to be crushed; the second is to die of suffocation.
I do not speak of the possibility of dying of hunger, for the supply
of provisions in the Nautilus will certainly last longer than we shall.
Let us, then, calculate our chances."

"As to suffocation, Captain," I replied, "that is not to be feared,
because our reservoirs are full."

"Just so; but they will only yield two days' supply of air.
Now, for thirty-six hours we have been hidden under the water,
and already the heavy atmosphere of the Nautilus requires renewal.
In forty-eight hours our reserve will be exhausted."

"Well, Captain, can we be delivered before forty-eight hours?"

"We will attempt it, at least, by piercing the wall that surrounds us."

"On which side?"

"Sound will tell us.  I am going to run the Nautilus aground
on the lower bank, and my men will attack the iceberg on the side
that is least thick."

Captain Nemo went out.  Soon I discovered by a hissing noise
that the water was entering the reservoirs.  The Nautilus
sank slowly, and rested on the ice at a depth of 350 yards,
the depth at which the lower bank was immersed.

"My friends," I said, "our situation is serious, but I rely
on your courage and energy."

"Sir," replied the Canadian, "I am ready to do anything
for the general safety."

"Good!  Ned," and I held out my hand to the Canadian.

"I will add," he continued, "that, being as handy with the pickaxe
as with the harpoon, if I can be useful to the Captain, he can
command my services."

"He will not refuse your help.  Come, Ned!"

I led him to the room where the crew of the Nautilus
were putting on their cork-jackets. I told the Captain
of Ned's proposal, which he accepted.  The Canadian put on
his sea-costume, and was ready as soon as his companions.
When Ned was dressed, I re-entered the drawing-room, where
the panes of glass were open, and, posted near Conseil,
I examined the ambient beds that supported the Nautilus.
Some instants after, we saw a dozen of the crew set foot on the bank
of ice, and among them Ned Land, easily known by his stature.
Captain Nemo was with them.  Before proceeding to dig the walls,
he took the soundings, to be sure of working in the right direction.
Long sounding lines were sunk in the side walls, but after
fifteen yards they were again stopped by the thick wall.
It was useless to attack it on the ceiling-like surface,
since the iceberg itself measured more than 400 yards in height.
Captain Nemo then sounded the lower surface.  There ten yards
of wall separated us from the water, so great was the thickness
of the ice-field. It was necessary, therefore, to cut from it
a piece equal in extent to the waterline of the Nautilus.
There were about 6,000 cubic yards to detach, so as to dig
a hole by which we could descend to the ice-field. The work
had begun immediately and carried on with indefatigable energy.
Instead of digging round the Nautilus which would have involved
greater difficulty, Captain Nemo had an immense trench made at eight
yards from the port-quarter. Then the men set to work simultaneously
with their screws on several points of its circumference.
Presently the pickaxe attacked this compact matter vigorously,
and large blocks were detached from the mass.  By a curious
effect of specific gravity, these blocks, lighter than water,
fled, so to speak, to the vault of the tunnel, that increased
in thickness at the top in proportion as it diminished at the base.
But that mattered little, so long as the lower part grew thinner.
After two hours' hard work, Ned Land came in exhausted.  He and his
comrades were replaced by new workers, whom Conseil and I joined.
The second lieutenant of the Nautilus superintended us.
The water seemed singularly cold, but I soon got warm
handling the pickaxe.  My movements were free enough,
although they were made under a pressure of thirty atmospheres.
When I re-entered, after working two hours, to take some food
and rest, I found a perceptible difference between the pure
fluid with which the Rouquayrol engine supplied me and the
atmosphere of the Nautilus, already charged with carbonic acid.
The air had not been renewed for forty-eight hours, and its vivifying
qualities were considerably enfeebled.  However, after a lapse
of twelve hours, we had only raised a block of ice one yard thick,
on the marked surface, which was about 600 cubic yards!
Reckoning that it took twelve hours to accomplish this much it
would take five nights and four days to bring this enterprise
to a satisfactory conclusion.  Five nights and four days!
And we have only air enough for two days in the reservoirs!
"Without taking into account," said Ned, "that, even if we get out
of this infernal prison, we shall also be imprisoned under the iceberg,
shut out from all possible communication with the atmosphere."
True enough!  Who could then foresee the minimum of time
necessary for our deliverance?  We might be suffocated before
the Nautilus could regain the surface of the waves?  Was it
destined to perish in this ice-tomb, with all those it enclosed?
The situation was terrible.  But everyone had looked the danger
in the face, and each was determined to do his duty to the
last.

As I expected, during the night a new block a yard square
was carried away, and still further sank the immense hollow.
But in the morning when, dressed in my cork-jacket, I traversed
the slushy mass at a temperature of six or seven degrees below zero,
I remarked that the side walls were gradually closing in.
The beds of water farthest from the trench, that were not warmed
by the men's work, showed a tendency to solidification.  In presence
of this new and imminent danger, what would become of our chances
of safety, and how hinder the solidification of this liquid medium,
that would burst the partitions of the Nautilus like glass?

I did not tell my companions of this new danger.
What was the good of damping the energy they displayed in
the painful work of escape?  But when I went on board again,
I told Captain Nemo of this grave complication.

"I know it," he said, in that calm tone which could counteract
the most terrible apprehensions.  "It is one danger more;
but I see no way of escaping it; the only chance of safety is to go
quicker than solidification.  We must be beforehand with it,
that is all."

On this day for several hours I used my pickaxe vigorously.
The work kept me up.  Besides, to work was to quit the Nautilus,
and breathe directly the pure air drawn from the reservoirs,
and supplied by our apparatus, and to quit the impoverished and
vitiated atmosphere.  Towards evening the trench was dug one yard deeper.
When I returned on board, I was nearly suffocated by the carbonic
acid with which the air was filled--ah! if we had only the chemical
means to drive away this deleterious gas.  We had plenty of oxygen;
all this water contained a considerable quantity, and by dissolving
it with our powerful piles, it would restore the vivifying fluid.
I had thought well over it; but of what good was that,
since the carbonic acid produced by our respiration had invaded
every part of the vessel?  To absorb it, it was necessary to fill
some jars with caustic potash, and to shake them incessantly.
Now this substance was wanting on board, and nothing could replace it.
On that evening, Captain Nemo ought to open the taps of his reservoirs,
and let some pure air into the interior of the Nautilus; without this
precaution we could not get rid of the sense of suffocation.  The next day,
March 26th, I resumed my miner's work in beginning the fifth yard.
The side walls and the lower surface of the iceberg thickened visibly.
It was evident that they would meet before the Nautilus was
able to disengage itself.  Despair seized me for an instant;
my pickaxe nearly fell from my hands.  What was the good of digging
if I must be suffocated, crushed by the water that was turning
into stone?--a punishment that the ferocity of the savages even
would not have invented!  Just then Captain Nemo passed near me.
I touched his hand and showed him the walls of our prison.
The wall to port had advanced to at least four yards from the hull of
the Nautilus.  The Captain understood me, and signed me to follow him.
We went on board.  I took off my cork-jacket and accompanied him into the
drawing-room.

"M. Aronnax, we must attempt some desperate means, or we shall
be sealed up in this solidified water as in cement."

"Yes; but what is to be done?"

"Ah! if my Nautilus were strong enough to bear this pressure
without being crushed!"

"Well?"  I asked, not catching the Captain's idea.

"Do you not understand," he replied, "that this congelation of water
will help us?  Do you not see that by its solidification, it would
burst through this field of ice that imprisons us, as, when it freezes,
it bursts the hardest stones?  Do you not perceive that it would be
an agent of safety instead of destruction?"

"Yes, Captain, perhaps.  But, whatever resistance to crushing
the Nautilus possesses, it could not support this terrible pressure,
and would be flattened like an iron plate."

"I know it, sir.  Therefore we must not reckon on the aid of nature,
but on our own exertions.  We must stop this solidification.
Not only will the side walls be pressed together; but there
is not ten feet of water before or behind the Nautilus.
The congelation gains on us on all sides."

"How long will the air in the reservoirs last for us to breathe on board?"

The Captain looked in my face.  "After to-morrow they will be empty!"

A cold sweat came over me.  However, ought I to have been astonished
at the answer?  On March 22, the Nautilus was in the open polar seas.
We were at 26@. For five days we had lived on the reserve on board.
And what was left of the respirable air must be kept for the workers.
Even now, as I write, my recollection is still so vivid that an
involuntary terror seizes me and my lungs seem to be without air.
Meanwhile, Captain Nemo reflected silently, and evidently an idea
had struck him; but he seemed to reject it.  At last, these words
escaped his lips:

"Boiling water!" he muttered.

"Boiling water?"  I cried.

"Yes, sir.  We are enclosed in a space that is relatively confined.
Would not jets of boiling water, constantly injected by the pumps,
raise the temperature in this part and stay the congelation?"

"Let us try it," I said resolutely.

"Let us try it, Professor."

The thermometer then stood at 7@ outside.  Captain Nemo took
me to the galleys, where the vast distillatory machines
stood that furnished the drinkable water by evaporation.
They filled these with water, and all the electric heat from
the piles was thrown through the worms bathed in the liquid.
In a few minutes this water reached 100@. It was directed
towards the pumps, while fresh water replaced it in proportion.
The heat developed by the troughs was such that cold water,
drawn up from the sea after only having gone through the machines,
came boiling into the body of the pump.  The injection was begun,
and three hours after the thermometer marked 6@ below zero outside.
One degree was gained.  Two hours later the thermometer only marked
4@.

"We shall succeed," I said to the Captain, after having anxiously
watched the result of the operation.

"I think," he answered, "that we shall not be crushed.
We have no more suffocation to fear."

During the night the temperature of the water rose to 1@ below zero.
The injections could not carry it to a higher point.  But, as the congelation
of the sea-water produces at least 2@, I was at least reassured against
the dangers of solidification.

The next day, March 27th, six yards of ice had been cleared, twelve feet
only remaining to be cleared away.  There was yet forty-eight hours' work.
The air could not be renewed in the interior of the Nautilus.
And this day would make it worse.  An intolerable weight oppressed me.
Towards three o'clock in the evening this feeling rose to a violent degree.
Yawns dislocated my jaws.  My lungs panted as they inhaled this burning fluid,
which became rarefied more and more.  A moral torpor took hold of me.
I was powerless, almost unconscious.  My brave Conseil, though exhibiting
the same symptoms and suffering in the same manner, never left me.
He took my hand and encouraged me, and I heard him murmur, "Oh! if I could
only not breathe, so as to leave more air for my master!"

Tears came into my eyes on hearing him speak thus.  If our
situation to all was intolerable in the interior, with what haste
and gladness would we put on our cork-jackets to work in our turn!
Pickaxes sounded on the frozen ice-beds. Our arms ached,
the skin was torn off our hands.  But what were these fatigues,
what did the wounds matter?  Vital air came to the lungs!
We breathed! we breathed!

All this time no one prolonged his voluntary task beyond the prescribed time.
His task accomplished, each one handed in turn to his panting companions
the apparatus that supplied him with life.  Captain Nemo set the example,
and submitted first to this severe discipline.  When the time came,
he gave up his apparatus to another and returned to the vitiated air
on board, calm, unflinching, unmurmuring.

On that day the ordinary work was accomplished with unusual vigour.
Only two yards remained to be raised from the surface.
Two yards only separated us from the open sea.  But the reservoirs
were nearly emptied of air.  The little that remained ought
to be kept for the workers; not a particle for the Nautilus.
When I went back on board, I was half suffocated.  What a night!
I know not how to describe it.  The next day my breathing
was oppressed.  Dizziness accompanied the pain in my head and made
me like a drunken man.  My companions showed the same symptoms.
Some of the crew had rattling in the throat.

On that day, the sixth of our imprisonment, Captain Nemo,
finding the pickaxes work too slowly, resolved to crush
the ice-bed that still separated us from the liquid sheet.
This man's coolness and energy never forsook him.  He subdued his
physical pains by moral force.

By his orders the vessel was lightened, that is to say,
raised from the ice-bed by a change of specific gravity.
When it floated they towed it so as to bring it above
the immense trench made on the level of the water-line. Then,
filling his reservoirs of water, he descended and shut himself up
in the hole.

Just then all the crew came on board, and the double door of communication
was shut.  The Nautilus then rested on the bed of ice, which was not one
yard thick, and which the sounding leads had perforated in a thousand places.
The taps of the reservoirs were then opened, and a hundred cubic yards
of water was let in, increasing the weight of the Nautilus to 1,800 tons.
We waited, we listened, forgetting our sufferings in hope.  Our safety
depended on this last chance.  Notwithstanding the buzzing in my head,
I soon heard the humming sound under the hull of the Nautilus.  The ice
cracked with a singular noise, like tearing paper, and the Nautilus sank.

"We are off!" murmured Conseil in my ear.

I could not answer him.  I seized his hand, and pressed it convulsively.
All at once, carried away by its frightful overcharge, the Nautilus sank like
a bullet under the waters, that is to say, it fell as if it was in a vacuum.
Then all the electric force was put on the pumps, that soon began to let
the water out of the reservoirs.  After some minutes, our fall was stopped.
Soon, too, the manometer indicated an ascending movement.  The screw,
going at full speed, made the iron hull tremble to its very bolts and drew
us towards the north.  But if this floating under the iceberg is to last
another day before we reach the open sea, I shall be dead first.

Half stretched upon a divan in the library, I was suffocating.
My face was purple, my lips blue, my faculties suspended.
I neither saw nor heard.  All notion of time had gone from my mind.
My muscles could not contract.  I do not know how many hours
passed thus, but I was conscious of the agony that was coming over me.
I felt as if I was going to die.  Suddenly I came to.
Some breaths of air penetrated my lungs.  Had we risen to the surface
of the waves?  Were we free of the iceberg?  No!  Ned and Conseil,
my two brave friends, were sacrificing themselves to save me.
Some particles of air still remained at the bottom of one apparatus.
Instead of using it, they had kept it for me, and, while they
were being suffocated, they gave me life, drop by drop.
I wanted to push back the thing; they held my hands,
and for some moments I breathed freely.  I looked at the clock;
it was eleven in the morning.  It ought to be the 28th of March.
The Nautilus went at a frightful pace, forty miles an hour.  It literally
tore through the water.  Where was Captain Nemo?  Had he succumbed?
Were his companions dead with him?  At the moment the manometer
indicated that we were not more than twenty feet from the surface.
A mere plate of ice separated us from the atmosphere.  Could we not
break it?  Perhaps.  In any case the Nautilus was going to attempt it.
I felt that it was in an oblique position, lowering the stern,
and raising the bows.  The introduction of water had been the means
of disturbing its equilibrium.  Then, impelled by its powerful screw,
it attacked the ice-field from beneath like a formidable battering-ram.
It broke it by backing and then rushing forward against the field,
which gradually gave way; and at last, dashing suddenly against it,
shot forwards on the ice-field, that crushed beneath its weight.
The panel was opened--one might say torn off--and the pure air came in in
abundance to all parts of the Nautilus.



CHAPTER XVII

FROM CAPE HORN TO THE AMAZON

How I got on to the platform, I have no idea; perhaps the Canadian
had carried me there.  But I breathed, I inhaled the vivifying sea-air.
My two companions were getting drunk with the fresh particles.
The other unhappy men had been so long without food, that they
could not with impunity indulge in the simplest aliments that were
given them.  We, on the contrary, had no end to restrain ourselves;
we could draw this air freely into our lungs, and it was the breeze,
the breeze alone, that filled us with this keen enjoyment.

"Ah!" said Conseil, "how delightful this oxygen is!
Master need not fear to breathe it.  There is enough for everybody."

Ned Land did not speak, but he opened his jaws wide enough
to frighten a shark.  Our strength soon returned, and, when I
looked round me, I saw we were alone on the platform.
The foreign seamen in the Nautilus were contented with the air
that circulated in the interior; none of them had come to drink
in the open air.

The first words I spoke were words of gratitude and
thankfulness to my two companions.  Ned and Conseil had
prolonged my life during the last hours of this long agony.
All my gratitude could not repay such devotion.

"My friends," said I, "we are bound one to the other for ever,
and I am under infinite obligations to you."

"Which I shall take advantage of," exclaimed the Canadian.

"What do you mean?" said Conseil.

"I mean that I shall take you with me when I leave this infernal Nautilus."

"Well," said Conseil, "after all this, are we going right?"

"Yes," I replied, "for we are going the way of the sun,
and here the sun is in the north."

"No doubt," said Ned Land; "but it remains to be seen whether
he will bring the ship into the Pacific or the Atlantic Ocean,
that is, into frequented or deserted seas."

I could not answer that question, and I feared that Captain Nemo
would rather take us to the vast ocean that touches the coasts
of Asia and America at the same time.  He would thus complete
the tour round the submarine world, and return to those waters
in which the Nautilus could sail freely.  We ought, before long,
to settle this important point.  The Nautilus went at a rapid pace.
The polar circle was soon passed, and the course shaped for Cape Horn.
We were off the American point, March 31st, at seven o'clock
in the evening.  Then all our past sufferings were forgotten.
The remembrance of that imprisonment in the ice was effaced
from our minds.  We only thought of the future.  Captain Nemo did
not appear again either in the drawing-room or on the platform.
The point shown each day on the planisphere, and, marked by
the lieutenant, showed me the exact direction of the Nautilus.
Now, on that evening, it was evident, to, my great satisfaction,
that we were going back to the North by the Atlantic.
The next day, April 1st, when the Nautilus ascended to the surface
some minutes before noon, we sighted land to the west.
It was Terra del Fuego, which the first navigators named thus from
seeing the quantity of smoke that rose from the natives' huts.
The coast seemed low to me, but in the distance rose high mountains.
I even thought I had a glimpse of Mount Sarmiento, that rises 2,070
yards above the level of the sea, with a very pointed summit, which,
according as it is misty or clear, is a sign of fine or of wet weather.
At this moment the peak was clearly defined against the sky.
The Nautilus, diving again under the water, approached the coast,
which was only some few miles off.  From the glass windows in
the drawing-room, I saw long seaweeds and gigantic fuci and varech,
of which the open polar sea contains so many specimens, with their
sharp polished filaments; they measured about 300 yards in length--
real cables, thicker than one's thumb; and, having great tenacity,
they are often used as ropes for vessels.  Another weed known as velp,
with leaves four feet long, buried in the coral concretions,
hung at the bottom.  It served as nest and food for myriads
of crustacea and molluscs, crabs, and cuttlefish.
There seals and otters had splendid repasts, eating the flesh
of fish with sea-vegetables, according to the English fashion.
Over this fertile and luxuriant ground the Nautilus passed with
great rapidity.  Towards evening it approached the Falkland group,
the rough summits of which I recognised the following day.
The depth of the sea was moderate.  On the shores our nets brought
in beautiful specimens of sea weed, and particularly a certain fucus,
the roots of which were filled with the best mussels in the world.
Geese and ducks fell by dozens on the platform, and soon took
their places in the pantry on board.

When the last heights of the Falklands had disappeared
from the horizon, the Nautilus sank to between twenty
and twenty-five yards, and followed the American coast.
Captain Nemo did not show himself.  Until the 3rd of April we
did not quit the shores of Patagonia, sometimes under the ocean,
sometimes at the surface.  The Nautilus passed beyond the large
estuary formed by the Uraguay.  Its direction was northwards,
and followed the long windings of the coast of South America.
We had then made 1,600 miles since our embarkation in the seas
of Japan.  About eleven o'clock in the morning the Tropic
of Capricorn was crossed on the thirty-seventh meridian,
and we passed Cape Frio standing out to sea.  Captain Nemo,
to Ned Land's great displeasure, did not like the neighbourhood
of the inhabited coasts of Brazil, for we went at a giddy speed.
Not a fish, not a bird of the swiftest kind could follow us,
and the natural curiosities of these seas escaped all observation.

This speed was kept up for several days, and in the evening
of the 9th of April we sighted the most westerly point of South
America that forms Cape San Roque.  But then the Nautilus
swerved again, and sought the lowest depth of a submarine valley
which is between this Cape and Sierra Leone on the African coast.
This valley bifurcates to the parallel of the Antilles,
and terminates at the mouth by the enormous depression of 9,000 yards.
In this place, the geological basin of the ocean forms,
as far as the Lesser Antilles, a cliff to three and a half
miles perpendicular in height, and, at the parallel of
the Cape Verde Islands, an other wall not less considerable,
that encloses thus all the sunk continent of the Atlantic.
The bottom of this immense valley is dotted with some mountains,
that give to these submarine places a picturesque aspect.
I speak, moreover, from the manuscript charts that were in the library
of the Nautilus--charts evidently due to Captain Nemo's hand,
and made after his personal observations.  For two days the desert
and deep waters were visited by means of the inclined planes.
The Nautilus was furnished with long diagonal broadsides which carried
it to all elevations.  But on the 11th of April it rose suddenly,
and land appeared at the mouth of the Amazon River, a vast estuary,
the embouchure of which is so considerable that it freshens
the sea-water for the distance of several leagues.  {8 paragraphs
are deleted from this edition}



CHAPTER XVIII

THE POULPS

For several days the Nautilus kept off from the American coast.
Evidently it did not wish to risk the tides of the Gulf of
Mexico or of the sea of the Antilles.  April 16th, we sighted
Martinique and Guadaloupe from a distance of about thirty miles.
I saw their tall peaks for an instant.  The Canadian,
who counted on carrying out his projects in the Gulf,
by either landing or hailing one of the numerous boats that
coast from one island to another, was quite disheartened.
Flight would have been quite practicable, if Ned Land had been able
to take possession of the boat without the Captain's knowledge.
But in the open sea it could not be thought of.  The Canadian,
Conseil, and I had a long conversation on this subject.
For six months we had been prisoners on board the Nautilus.
We had travelled 17,000 leagues; and, as Ned Land said, there was
no reason why it should come to an end.  We could hope nothing
from the Captain of the Nautilus, but only from ourselves.
Besides, for some time past he had become graver, more retired,
less sociable.  He seemed to shun me.  I met him rarely.
Formerly he was pleased to explain the submarine marvels to me;
now he left me to my studies, and came no more to the saloon.
What change had come over him?  For what cause?  For my part,
I did not wish to bury with me my curious and novel studies.
I had now the power to write the true book of the sea;
and this book, sooner or later, I wished to see daylight.
The land nearest us was the archipelago of the Bahamas.  There rose
high submarine cliffs covered with large weeds.  It was about eleven
o'clock when Ned Land drew my attention to a formidable pricking,
like the sting of an ant, which was produced by means of large
seaweeds.

"Well," I said, "these are proper caverns for poulps, and I
should not be astonished to see some of these monsters."

"What!" said Conseil; "cuttlefish, real cuttlefish of the cephalopod class?"

"No," I said, "poulps of huge dimensions."

"I will never believe that such animals exist," said Ned.

"Well," said Conseil, with the most serious air in the world,
"I remember perfectly to have seen a large vessel drawn under
the waves by an octopus's arm."

"You saw that?" said the Canadian.

"Yes, Ned."

"With your own eyes?"

"With my own eyes."

"Where, pray, might that be?"

"At St. Malo," answered Conseil.

"In the port?" said Ned, ironically.

"No; in a church," replied Conseil.

"In a church!" cried the Canadian.

"Yes; friend Ned.  In a picture representing the poulp in question."

"Good!" said Ned Land, bursting out laughing.

"He is quite right," I said.  "I have heard of this picture;
but the subject represented is taken from a legend, and you know
what to think of legends in the matter of natural history.
Besides, when it is a question of monsters, the imagination
is apt to run wild.  Not only is it supposed that these poulps
can draw down vessels, but a certain Olaus Magnus speaks of an
octopus a mile long that is more like an island than an animal.
It is also said that the Bishop of Nidros was building
an altar on an immense rock.  Mass finished, the rock began
to walk, and returned to the sea.  The rock was a poulp.
Another Bishop, Pontoppidan, speaks also of a poulp on which
a regiment of cavalry could manoeuvre.  Lastly, the ancient
naturalists speak of monsters whose mouths were like gulfs,
and which were too large to pass through the Straits of Gibraltar."

"But how much is true of these stories?" asked Conseil.

"Nothing, my friends; at least of that which passes the limit of truth
to get to fable or legend.  Nevertheless, there must be some ground
for the imagination of the story-tellers. One cannot deny that poulps and
cuttlefish exist of a large species, inferior, however, to the cetaceans.
Aristotle has stated the dimensions of a cuttlefish as five cubits,
or nine feet two inches.  Our fishermen frequently see some that are
more than four feet long.  Some skeletons of poulps are preserved in
the museums of Trieste and Montpelier, that measure two yards in length.
Besides, according to the calculations of some naturalists, one of these
animals only six feet long would have tentacles twenty-seven feet long.
That would suffice to make a formidable monster."

"Do they fish for them in these days?" asked Ned.

"If they do not fish for them, sailors see them at least.
One of my friends, Captain Paul Bos of Havre, has often affirmed
that he met one of these monsters of colossal dimensions in
the Indian seas.  But the most astonishing fact, and which does
not permit of the denial of the existence of these gigantic animals,
happened some years ago, in 1861."

"What is the fact?" asked Ned Land.

"This is it.  In 1861, to the north-east of Teneriffe, very nearly
in the same latitude we are in now, the crew of the despatch-boat
Alector perceived a monstrous cuttlefish swimming in the waters.
Captain Bouguer went near to the animal, and attacked it with
harpoon and guns, without much success, for balls and harpoons
glided over the soft flesh.  After several fruitless attempts
the crew tried to pass a slip-knot round the body of the mollusc.
The noose slipped as far as the tail fins and there stopped.
They tried then to haul it on board, but its weight was so
considerable that the tightness of the cord separated the tail
from the body, and, deprived of this ornament, he disappeared
under the water."

"Indeed! is that a fact?"

"An indisputable fact, my good Ned.  They proposed to name this
poulp `Bouguer's cuttlefish.'"

"What length was it?" asked the Canadian.

"Did it not measure about six yards?" said Conseil, who, posted at the window,
was examining again the irregular windings of the cliff.

"Precisely," I replied.

"Its head," rejoined Conseil, "was it not crowned with eight tentacles,
that beat the water like a nest of serpents?"

"Precisely."

"Had not its eyes, placed at the back of its head, considerable development?"

"Yes, Conseil."

"And was not its mouth like a parrot's beak?"

"Exactly, Conseil."

"Very well! no offence to master," he replied, quietly; "if this
is not Bouguer's cuttlefish, it is, at least, one of its brothers."

I looked at Conseil.  Ned Land hurried to the window.

"What a horrible beast!" he cried.

I looked in my turn, and could not repress a gesture of disgust.
Before my eyes was a horrible monster worthy to figure in the legends
of the marvellous.  It was an immense cuttlefish, being eight yards long.
It swam crossways in the direction of the Nautilus with great speed,
watching us with its enormous staring green eyes.  Its eight arms,
or rather feet, fixed to its head, that have given the name
of cephalopod to these animals, were twice as long as its body,
and were twisted like the furies' hair.  One could see the 250 air
holes on the inner side of the tentacles.  The monster's mouth,
a horned beak like a parrot's, opened and shut vertically.
Its tongue, a horned substance, furnished with several rows
of pointed teeth, came out quivering from this veritable pair
of shears.  What a freak of nature, a bird's beak on a mollusc!
Its spindle-like body formed a fleshy mass that might weigh 4,000
to 5,000 lb.; the, varying colour changing with great rapidity,
according to the irritation of the animal, passed successively
from livid grey to reddish brown.  What irritated this mollusc?
No doubt the presence of the Nautilus, more formidable than itself,
and on which its suckers or its jaws had no hold.  Yet, what monsters
these poulps are! what vitality the Creator has given them!
what vigour in their movements! and they possess three hearts!
Chance had brought us in presence of this cuttlefish, and I did not wish
to lose the opportunity of carefully studying this specimen of cephalopods.
I overcame the horror that inspired me, and, taking a pencil, began
to draw it.

"Perhaps this is the same which the Alector saw," said Conseil.

"No," replied the Canadian; "for this is whole, and the other
had lost its tail."

"That is no reason," I replied.  "The arms and tails of these animals
are re-formed by renewal; and in seven years the tail of Bouguer's
cuttlefish has no doubt had time to grow."

By this time other poulps appeared at the port light.  I counted seven.
They formed a procession after the Nautilus, and I heard their beaks
gnashing against the iron hull.  I continued my work.  These monsters
kept in the water with such precision that they seemed immovable.
Suddenly the Nautilus stopped.  A shock made it tremble in every plate.

"Have we struck anything?"  I asked.

"In any case," replied the Canadian, "we shall be free,
for we are floating."

The Nautilus was floating, no doubt, but it did not move.
A minute passed.  Captain Nemo, followed by his lieutenant,
entered the drawing-room. I had not seen him for some time.
He seemed dull.  Without noticing or speaking to us, he went
to the panel, looked at the poulps, and said something to
his lieutenant.  The latter went out.  Soon the panels were shut.
The ceiling was lighted.  I went towards the Captain.

"A curious collection of poulps?"  I said.

"Yes, indeed, Mr. Naturalist," he replied; "and we are going to fight them,
man to beast."

I looked at him.  I thought I had not heard aright.

"Man to beast?"  I repeated.

"Yes, sir.  The screw is stopped.  I think that the horny
jaws of one of the cuttlefish is entangled in the blades.
That is what prevents our moving."

"What are you going to do?"

"Rise to the surface, and slaughter this vermin."

"A difficult enterprise."

"Yes, indeed.  The electric bullets are powerless against the
soft flesh, where they do not find resistance enough to go off.
But we shall attack them with the hatchet."

"And the harpoon, sir," said the Canadian, "if you do not refuse my help."

"I will accept it, Master Land."

"We will follow you," I said, and, following Captain Nemo,
we went towards the central staircase.

There, about ten men with boarding-hatchets were ready for the attack.
Conseil and I took two hatchets; Ned Land seized a harpoon.
The Nautilus had then risen to the surface.  One of the sailors,
posted on the top ladderstep, unscrewed the bolts of the panels.
But hardly were the screws loosed, when the panel rose with
great violence, evidently drawn by the suckers of a poulp's arm.
Immediately one of these arms slid like a serpent down the opening
and twenty others were above.  With one blow of the axe, Captain Nemo
cut this formidable tentacle, that slid wriggling down the ladder.
Just as we were pressing one on the other to reach the platform,
two other arms, lashing the air, came down on the seaman placed
before Captain Nemo, and lifted him up with irresistible power.
Captain Nemo uttered a cry, and rushed out.  We hurried after him.

What a scene!  The unhappy man, seized by the tentacle and fixed
to the suckers, was balanced in the air at the caprice of this
enormous trunk.  He rattled in his throat, he was stifled, he cried,
"Help! help!"  These words, spoken in French, startled me!
I had a fellow-countryman on board, perhaps several!
That heart-rending cry!  I shall hear it all my life.
The unfortunate man was lost.  Who could rescue him from that
powerful pressure?  However, Captain Nemo had rushed to the poulp,
and with one blow of the axe had cut through one arm.
His lieutenant struggled furiously against other monsters that crept
on the flanks of the Nautilus.  The crew fought with their axes.
The Canadian, Conseil, and I buried our weapons in the fleshy masses;
a strong smell of musk penetrated the atmosphere.
It was horrible!

For one instant, I thought the unhappy man, entangled with the poulp, would be
torn from its powerful suction.  Seven of the eight arms had been cut off.
One only wriggled in the air, brandishing the victim like a feather.  But just
as Captain Nemo and his lieutenant threw themselves on it, the animal ejected
a stream of black liquid.  We were blinded with it.  When the cloud dispersed,
the cuttlefish had disappeared, and my unfortunate countryman with it.
Ten or twelve poulps now invaded the platform and sides of the Nautilus.
We rolled pell-mell into the midst of this nest of serpents, that wriggled
on the platform in the waves of blood and ink.  It seemed as though these
slimy tentacles sprang up like the hydra's heads.  Ned Land's harpoon,
at each stroke, was plunged into the staring eyes of the cuttle fish.
But my bold companion was suddenly overturned by the tentacles of a monster
he had not been able to avoid.

Ah! how my heart beat with emotion and horror!
The formidable beak of a cuttlefish was open over Ned Land.
The unhappy man would be cut in two.  I rushed to his succour.
But Captain Nemo was before me; his axe disappeared between
the two enormous jaws, and, miraculously saved, the Canadian,
rising, plunged his harpoon deep into the triple heart
of the poulp.

"I owed myself this revenge!" said the Captain to the Canadian.

Ned bowed without replying.  The combat had lasted a quarter of an hour.
The monsters, vanquished and mutilated, left us at last, and disappeared
under the waves.  Captain Nemo, covered with blood, nearly exhausted,
gazed upon the sea that had swallowed up one of his companions, and great
tears gathered in his eyes.



CHAPTER XIX

THE GULF STREAM

This terrible scene of the 20th of April none of us can ever forget.
I have written it under the influence of violent emotion.  Since then I
have revised the recital; I have read it to Conseil and to the Canadian.
They found it exact as to facts, but insufficient as to effect.
To paint such pictures, one must have the pen of the most illustrious
of our poets, the author of The Toilers of the Deep.

I have said that Captain Nemo wept while watching the waves;
his grief was great.  It was the second companion he had
lost since our arrival on board, and what a death!
That friend, crushed, stifled, bruised by the dreadful
arms of a poulp, pounded by his iron jaws, would not
rest with his comrades in the peaceful coral cemetery!
In the midst of the struggle, it was the despairing cry
uttered by the unfortunate man that had torn my heart.
The poor Frenchman, forgetting his conventional language,
had taken to his own mother tongue, to utter a last appeal!
Amongst the crew of the Nautilus, associated with
the body and soul of the Captain, recoiling like him
from all contact with men, I had a fellow-countryman. Did
he alone represent France in this mysterious association,
evidently composed of individuals of divers nationalities?
It was one of these insoluble problems that rose up unceasingly
before my mind!

Captain Nemo entered his room, and I saw him no more for some time.
But that he was sad and irresolute I could see by the vessel,
of which he was the soul, and which received all his impressions.
The Nautilus did not keep on in its settled course; it floated
about like a corpse at the will of the waves.  It went at random.
He could not tear himself away from the scene of the last struggle,
from this sea that had devoured one of his men.  Ten days passed thus.
It was not till the 1st of May that the Nautilus resumed its northerly course,
after having sighted the Bahamas at the mouth of the Bahama Canal.
We were then following the current from the largest river to the sea,
that has its banks, its fish, and its proper temperatures.  I mean
the Gulf Stream.  It is really a river, that flows freely to the middle
of the Atlantic, and whose waters do not mix with the ocean waters.
It is a salt river, salter than the surrounding sea.  Its mean depth is
1,500 fathoms, its mean breadth ten miles.  In certain places the current
flows with the speed of two miles and a half an hour.  The body of its
waters is more considerable than that of all the rivers in the globe.
It was on this ocean river that the Nautilus then sailed.

I must add that, during the night, the phosphorescent waters
of the Gulf Stream rivalled the electric power of our watch-light,
especially in the stormy weather that threatened us so frequently.
May 8th, we were still crossing Cape Hatteras, at the height
of the North Caroline.  The width of the Gulf Stream there
is seventy-five miles, and its depth 210 yards.  The Nautilus
still went at random; all supervision seemed abandoned.
I thought that, under these circumstances, escape would be possible.
Indeed, the inhabited shores offered anywhere an easy refuge.
The sea was incessantly ploughed by the steamers that ply
between New York or Boston and the Gulf of Mexico, and overrun
day and night by the little schooners coasting about the several
parts of the American coast.  We could hope to be picked up.
It was a favourable opportunity, notwithstanding the thirty
miles that separated the Nautilus from the coasts of the Union.
One unfortunate circumstance thwarted the Canadian's plans.
The weather was very bad.  We were nearing those shores
where tempests are so frequent, that country of waterspouts and
cyclones actually engendered by the current of the Gulf Stream.
To tempt the sea in a frail boat was certain destruction.  Ned Land
owned this himself.  He fretted, seized with nostalgia that flight
only could cure.

"Master," he said that day to me, "this must come to an end.  I must make
a clean breast of it.  This Nemo is leaving land and going up to the north.
But I declare to you that I have had enough of the South Pole, and I will not
follow him to the North."

"What is to be done, Ned, since flight is impracticable just now?"

"We must speak to the Captain," said he; "you said nothing when we
were in your native seas.  I will speak, now we are in mine.
When I think that before long the Nautilus will be by Nova Scotia,
and that there near New foundland is a large bay, and into that bay
the St. Lawrence empties itself, and that the St. Lawrence is my river,
the river by Quebec, my native town--when I think of this,
I feel furious, it makes my hair stand on end.  Sir, I would
rather throw myself into the sea!  I will not stay here!
I am stifled!"

The Canadian was evidently losing all patience.
His vigorous nature could not stand this prolonged imprisonment.
His face altered daily; his temper became more surly.  I knew
what he must suffer, for I was seized with home-sickness myself.
Nearly seven months had passed without our having had any news
from land; Captain Nemo's isolation, his altered spirits,
especially since the fight with the poulps, his taciturnity, all made
me view things in a different light.

"Well, sir?" said Ned, seeing I did not reply.

"Well, Ned, do you wish me to ask Captain Nemo his intentions concerning us?"

"Yes, sir."

"Although he has already made them known?"

"Yes; I wish it settled finally.  Speak for me, in my name only,
if you like."

"But I so seldom meet him.  He avoids me."

"That is all the more reason for you to go to see him."

I went to my room.  From thence I meant to go to Captain Nemo's.
It would not do to let this opportunity of meeting him slip.
I knocked at the door.  No answer.  I knocked again, then turned
the handle.  The door opened, I went in.  The Captain was there.
Bending over his work-table, he had not heard me.
Resolved not to go without having spoken, I approached him.
He raised his head quickly, frowned, and said roughly, "You here!
What do you want?"

"To speak to you, Captain."

"But I am busy, sir; I am working.  I leave you at liberty to shut
yourself up; cannot I be allowed the same?"

This reception was not encouraging; but I was determined to hear
and answer everything.

"Sir," I said coldly, "I have to speak to you on a matter that admits
of no delay."

"What is that, sir?" he replied, ironically.  "Have you discovered something
that has escaped me, or has the sea delivered up any new secrets?"

We were at cross-purposes. But, before I could reply, he showed me
an open manuscript on his table, and said, in a more serious tone,
"Here, M. Aronnax, is a manuscript written in several languages.
It contains the sum of my studies of the sea; and, if it please God,
it shall not perish with me.  This manuscript, signed with my name,
complete with the history of my life, will be shut up in a little
floating case.  The last survivor of all of us on board the Nautilus
will throw this case into the sea, and it will go whither it is borne
by the waves."

This man's name! his history written by himself!
His mystery would then be revealed some day.

"Captain," I said, "I can but approve of the idea that makes you act thus.
The result of your studies must not be lost.  But the means you employ seem
to me to be primitive.  Who knows where the winds will carry this case,
and in whose hands it will fall?  Could you not use some other means?
Could not you, or one of yours----"

"Never, sir!" he said, hastily interrupting me.

"But I and my companions are ready to keep this manuscript
in store; and, if you will put us at liberty----"

"At liberty?" said the Captain, rising.

"Yes, sir; that is the subject on which I wish to question you.
For seven months we have been here on board, and I ask you to-day,
in the name of my companions and in my own, if your intention is
to keep us here always?"

"M. Aronnax, I will answer you to-day as I did seven months ago:
Whoever enters the Nautilus, must never quit it."

"You impose actual slavery upon us!"

"Give it what name you please."

"But everywhere the slave has the right to regain his liberty."

"Who denies you this right?  Have I ever tried to chain you with an oath?"

He looked at me with his arms crossed.

"Sir," I said, "to return a second time to this subject will be neither
to your nor to my taste; but, as we have entered upon it, let us go
through with it.  I repeat, it is not only myself whom it concerns.
Study is to me a relief, a diversion, a passion that could make
me forget everything.  Like you, I am willing to live obscure,
in the frail hope of bequeathing one day, to future time,
the result of my labours.  But it is otherwise with Ned Land.
Every man, worthy of the name, deserves some consideration.
Have you thought that love of liberty, hatred of slavery,
can give rise to schemes of revenge in a nature like the Canadian's;
that he could think, attempt, and try----"

I was silenced; Captain Nemo rose.

"Whatever Ned Land thinks of, attempts, or tries, what does it matter to me?
I did not seek him!  It is not for my pleasure that I keep him on board!
As for you, M. Aronnax, you are one of those who can understand everything,
even silence.  I have nothing more to say to you.  Let this first time you
have come to treat of this subject be the last, for a second time I will not
listen to you."

I retired.  Our situation was critical.  I related my conversation
to my two companions.

"We know now," said Ned, "that we can expect nothing from this man.
The Nautilus is nearing Long Island.  We will escape, whatever the
weather may be."

But the sky became more and more threatening.  Symptoms of a hurricane
became manifest.  The atmosphere was becoming white and misty.
On the horizon fine streaks of cirrhous clouds were succeeded
by masses of cumuli.  Other low clouds passed swiftly by.
The swollen sea rose in huge billows.  The birds disappeared
with the exception of the petrels, those friends of the storm.
The barometer fell sensibly, and indicated an extreme extension
of the vapours.  The mixture of the storm glass was decomposed
under the influence of the electricity that pervaded the atmosphere.
The tempest burst on the 18th of May, just as the Nautilus was
floating off Long Island, some miles from the port of New York.
I can describe this strife of the elements! for,
instead of fleeing to the depths of the sea, Captain Nemo,
by an unaccountable caprice, would brave it at the surface.
The wind blew from the south-west at first.  Captain Nemo,
during the squalls, had taken his place on the platform.
He had made himself fast, to prevent being washed overboard
by the monstrous waves.  I had hoisted myself up, and made myself
fast also, dividing my admiration between the tempest and this
extraordinary man who was coping with it.  The raging sea was swept
by huge cloud-drifts, which were actually saturated with the waves.
The Nautilus, sometimes lying on its side, sometimes standing up
like a mast, rolled and pitched terribly.  About five o'clock
a torrent of rain fell, that lulled neither sea nor wind.
The hurri cane blew nearly forty leagues an hour.  It is under
these conditions that it overturns houses, breaks iron gates,
displaces twenty-four pounders.  However, the Nautilus, in the midst
of the tempest, confirmed the words of a clever engineer,
"There is no well-constructed hull that cannot defy the sea."
This was not a resisting rock; it was a steel spindle,
obedient and movable, without rigging or masts, that braved its fury
with impunity.  However, I watched these raging waves attentively.
They measured fifteen feet in height, and 150 to 175 yards long,
and their speed of propagation was thirty feet per second.
Their bulk and power increased with the depth of the water.
Such waves as these, at the Hebrides, have displaced a mass
weighing 8,400 lb.  They are they which, in the tempest of
December 23rd, 1864, after destroying the town of Yeddo, in Japan,
broke the same day on the shores of America.  The intensity of
the tempest increased with the night.  The barometer, as in 1860
at Reunion during a cyclone, fell seven-tenths at the close of day.
I saw a large vessel pass the horizon struggling painfully.
She was trying to lie to under half steam, to keep up above the waves.
It was probably one of the steamers of the line from New York
to Liverpool, or Havre.  It soon disappeared in the gloom.
At ten o'clock in the evening the sky was on fire.
The atmosphere was streaked with vivid lightning.
I could not bear the brightness of it; while the captain,
looking at it, seemed to envy the spirit of the tempest.
A terrible noise filled the air, a complex noise, made up
of the howls of the crushed waves, the roaring of the wind,
and the claps of thunder.  The wind veered suddenly to all
points of the horizon; and the cyclone, rising in the east,
returned after passing by the north, west, and south, in the inverse
course pursued by the circular storm of the southern hemisphere.
Ah, that Gulf Stream!  It deserves its name of the King of Tempests.
It is that which causes those formidable cyclones, by the
difference of temperature between its air and its currents.
A shower of fire had succeeded the rain.  The drops of water were
changed to sharp spikes.  One would have thought that Captain Nemo
was courting a death worthy of himself, a death by lightning.
As the Nautilus, pitching dreadfully, raised its steel spur in the air,
it seemed to act as a conductor, and I saw long sparks burst from it.
Crushed and without strength I crawled to the panel, opened it,
and descended to the saloon.  The storm was then at its height.
It was impossible to stand upright in the interior of the Nautilus.
Captain Nemo came down about twelve.  I heard the reservoirs filling
by degrees, and the Nautilus sank slowly beneath the waves.
Through the open windows in the saloon I saw large fish terrified,
passing like phantoms in the water.  Some were struck before my eyes.
The Nautilus was still descending.  I thought that at about eight
fathoms deep we should find a calm.  But no! the upper beds
were too violently agitated for that.  We had to seek repose
at more than twenty-five fathoms in the bowels of the deep.
But there, what quiet, what silence, what peace!  Who could have told
that such a hurricane had been let loose on the surface of that
ocean?



CHAPTER XX

FROM LATITUDE 47@ 24' TO LONGITUDE 17@ 28'

In consequence of the storm, we had been thrown eastward once more.
All hope of escape on the shores of New York or St. Lawrence had faded away;
and poor Ned, in despair, had isolated himself like Captain Nemo.
Conseil and I, however, never left each other.  I said that the Nautilus
had gone aside to the east.  I should have said (to be more exact)
the north-east. For some days, it wandered first on the surface,
and then beneath it, amid those fogs so dreaded by sailors.
What accidents are due to these thick fogs!  What shocks upon
these reefs when the wind drowns the breaking of the waves!
What collisions between vessels, in spite of their warning lights,
whistles, and alarm bells!  And the bottoms of these seas look like
a field of battle, where still lie all the conquered of the ocean;
some old and already encrusted, others fresh and reflecting from their
iron bands and copper plates the brilliancy of our lantern.

On the 15th of May we were at the extreme south of the Bank of Newfoundland.
This bank consists of alluvia, or large heaps of organic matter,
brought either from the Equator by the Gulf Stream, or from the North Pole
by the counter-current of cold water which skirts the American coast.
There also are heaped up those erratic blocks which are carried along
by the broken ice; and close by, a vast charnel-house of molluscs,
which perish here by millions.  The depth of the sea is not great
at Newfoundland--not more than some hundreds of fathoms; but towards
the south is a depression of 1,500 fathoms.  There the Gulf Stream widens.
It loses some of its speed and some of its temperature, but it
becomes a sea.

It was on the 17th of May, about 500 miles from Heart's Content,
at a depth of more than 1,400 fathoms, that I saw the electric cable lying
on the bottom.  Conseil, to whom I had not mentioned it, thought at first
that it was a gigantic sea-serpent. But I undeceived the worthy fellow,
and by way of consolation related several particulars in the laying
of this cable.  The first one was laid in the years 1857 and 1858;
but, after transmitting about 400 telegrams, would not act any longer.
In 1863 the engineers constructed an other one, measuring 2,000 miles
in length, and weighing 4,500 tons, which was embarked on the Great Eastern.
This attempt also failed.

On the 25th of May the Nautilus, being at a depth of more
than 1,918 fathoms, was on the precise spot where the rupture
occurred which ruined the enterprise.  It was within 638 miles
of the coast of Ireland; and at half-past two in the afternoon
they discovered that communication with Europe had ceased.
The electricians on board resolved to cut the cable before
fishing it up, and at eleven o'clock at night they had recovered
the damaged part.  They made another point and spliced it,
and it was once more submerged.  But some days after it broke again,
and in the depths of the ocean could not be recaptured.
The Americans, however, were not discouraged.  Cyrus Field, the bold
promoter of the enterprise, as he had sunk all his own fortune,
set a new subscription on foot, which was at once answered,
and another cable was constructed on better principles.
The bundles of conducting wires were each enveloped in gutta-percha,
and protected by a wadding of hemp, contained in a metallic covering.
The Great Eastern sailed on the 13th of July, 1866.  The operation
worked well.  But one incident occurred.  Several times in
unrolling the cable they observed that nails had recently been
forced into it, evidently with the motive of destroying it.
Captain Anderson, the officers, and engineers consulted together,
and had it posted up that, if the offender was surprised on board,
he would be thrown without further trial into the sea.
From that time the criminal attempt was never repeated.

On the 23rd of July the Great Eastern was not more than 500 miles
from Newfoundland, when they telegraphed from Ireland the news
of the armistice concluded between Prussia and Austria after Sadowa.
On the 27th, in the midst of heavy fogs, they reached the port
of Heart's Content.  The enterprise was successfully terminated;
and for its first despatch, young America addressed old Europe in these
words of wisdom, so rarely understood:  "Glory to God in the highest,
and on earth peace, goodwill towards men."

I did not expect to find the electric cable in its
primitive state, such as it was on leaving the manufactory.
The long serpent, covered with the remains of shells,
bristling with foraminiferae, was encrusted with a strong coating
which served as a protection against all boring molluscs.
It lay quietly sheltered from the motions of the sea, and under
a favourable pressure for the transmission of the electric
spark which passes from Europe to America in .32 of a second.
Doubtless this cable will last for a great length of time,
for they find that the gutta-percha covering is improved
by the sea-water. Besides, on this level, so well chosen,
the cable is never so deeply submerged as to cause it to break.
The Nautilus followed it to the lowest depth, which was more than
2,212 fathoms, and there it lay without any anchorage; and then
we reached the spot where the accident had taken place in 1863.
The bottom of the ocean then formed a valley about 100
miles broad, in which Mont Blanc might have been placed without
its summit appearing above the waves.  This valley is closed
at the east by a perpendicular wall more than 2,000 yards high.
We arrived there on the 28th of May, and the Nautilus was then not
more than 120 miles from Ireland.

Was Captain Nemo going to land on the British Isles?
No. To my great surprise he made for the south, once more coming
back towards European seas.  In rounding the Emerald Isle,
for one instant I caught sight of Cape Clear, and the light which
guides the thousands of vessels leaving Glasgow or Liverpool.
An important question then arose in my mind.  Did the Nautilus
dare entangle itself in the Manche?  Ned Land, who had re-appeared
since we had been nearing land, did not cease to question me.
How could I answer?  Captain Nemo reminded invisible.
After having shown the Canadian a glimpse of American shores,
was he going to show me the coast of France?

But the Nautilus was still going southward.  On the 30th of May,
it passed in sight of Land's End, between the extreme point
of England and the Scilly Isles, which were left to starboard.
If we wished to enter the Manche, he must go straight to the east.
He did not do so.

During the whole of the 31st of May, the Nautilus described
a series of circles on the water, which greatly interested me.
It seemed to be seeking a spot it had some trouble in finding.
At noon, Captain Nemo himself came to work the ship's log.
He spoke no word to me, but seemed gloomier than ever.  What could
sadden him thus?  Was it his proxim ity to European shores?
Had he some recollections of his abandoned country?
If not, what did he feel?  Remorse or regret?
For a long while this thought haunted my mind, and I had
a kind of presentiment that before long chance would betray
the captain's secrets.

The next day, the 1st of June, the Nautilus continued the same process.
It was evidently seeking some particular spot in the ocean.
Captain Nemo took the sun's altitude as he had done the day before.
The sea was beautiful, the sky clear.  About eight miles to the east,
a large steam vessel could be discerned on the horizon.
No flag fluttered from its mast, and I could not discover
its nationality.  Some minutes before the sun passed the meridian,
Captain Nemo took his sextant, and watched with great attention.
The perfect rest of the water greatly helped the operation.
The Nautilus was motionless; it neither rolled nor pitched.

I was on the platform when the altitude was taken, and the Captain
pronounced these words:  "It is here."

He turned and went below.  Had he seen the vessel which
was changing its course and seemed to be nearing us?
I could not tell.  I returned to the saloon.  The panels closed,
I heard the hissing of the water in the reservoirs.
The Nautilus began to sink, following a vertical line, for its
screw communicated no motion to it.  Some minutes later it stopped
at a depth of more than 420 fathoms, resting on the ground.
The luminous ceiling was darkened, then the panels were opened,
and through the glass I saw the sea brilliantly illuminated by
the rays of our lantern for at least half a mile round us.

I looked to the port side, and saw nothing but an immensity
of quiet waters.  But to starboard, on the bottom appeared
a large protuberance, which at once attracted my attention.
One would have thought it a ruin buried under a coating
of white shells, much resembling a covering of snow.
Upon examining the mass attentively, I could recognise
the ever-thickening form of a vessel bare of its masts,
which must have sunk.  It certainly belonged to past times.
This wreck, to be thus encrusted with the lime of the water,
must already be able to count many years passed at the bottom
of the ocean.

What was this vessel?  Why did the Nautilus visit its tomb?
Could it have been aught but a shipwreck which had drawn it under the water?
I knew not what to think, when near me in a slow voice I heard
Captain Nemo say:

"At one time this ship was called the Marseillais.  It carried
seventy-four guns, and was launched in 1762.  In 1778, the 13th of August,
commanded by La Poype-Ver trieux, it fought boldly against the Preston.
In 1779, on the 4th of July, it was at the taking of Grenada,
with the squadron of Admiral Estaing.  In 1781, on the 5th of September,
it took part in the battle of Comte de Grasse, in Chesapeake Bay.
In 1794, the French Republic changed its name.  On the 16th of April,
in the same year, it joined the squadron of Villaret Joyeuse, at Brest,
being entrusted with the escort of a cargo of corn coming from America,
under the command of Admiral Van Stebel.  On the 11th and 12th Prairal
of the second year, this squadron fell in with an English vessel.
Sir, to-day is the 13th Prairal, the first of June, 1868.  It is now
seventy-four years ago, day for day on this very spot, in latitude 47@
24', longitude 17@ 28', that this vessel, after fighting heroically,
losing its three masts, with the water in its hold, and the third of its
crew disabled, preferred sinking with its 356 sailors to surrendering;
and, nailing its colours to the poop, disappeared under the waves to
the cry of `Long live the Republic!'"

"The Avenger!"  I exclaimed.

"Yes, sir, the Avenger!  A good name!" muttered Captain Nemo,
crossing his arms.



CHAPTER XXI

A HECATOMB

The way of describing this unlooked-for scene, the history
of the patriot ship, told at first so coldly, and the emotion
with which this strange man pronounced the last words,
the name of the Avenger, the significance of which could
not escape me, all impressed itself deeply on my mind.
My eyes did not leave the Captain, who, with his hand stretched
out to sea, was watching with a glowing eye the glorious wreck.
Perhaps I was never to know who he was, from whence he came,
or where he was going to, but I saw the man move, and apart
from the savant.  It was no common misanthropy which had
shut Captain Nemo and his companions within the Nautilus,
but a hatred, either monstrous or sublime, which time could
never weaken.  Did this hatred still seek for vengeance?
The future would soon teach me that.  But the Nautilus
was rising slowly to the surface of the sea, and the form
of the Avenger disappeared by degrees from my sight.
Soon a slight rolling told me that we were in the open air.
At that moment a dull boom was heard.  I looked at the Captain.
He did not move.

"Captain?" said I.

He did not answer.  I left him and mounted the platform.
Conseil and the Canadian were already there.

"Where did that sound come from?"  I asked.

"It was a gunshot," replied Ned Land.

I looked in the direction of the vessel I had already seen.
It was nearing the Nautilus, and we could see that it was putting on steam.
It was within six miles of us.

"What is that ship, Ned?"

"By its rigging, and the height of its lower masts," said the Canadian,
"I bet she is a ship-of-war. May it reach us; and, if necessary,
sink this cursed Nautilus."

"Friend Ned," replied Conseil, "what harm can it do to the Nautilus?
Can it attack it beneath the waves?  Can its cannonade us at the bottom
of the sea?"

"Tell me, Ned," said I, "can you recognise what country she belongs to?"

The Canadian knitted his eyebrows, dropped his eyelids,
and screwed up the corners of his eyes, and for a few moments
fixed a piercing look upon the vessel.

"No, sir," he replied; "I cannot tell what nation she belongs to,
for she shows no colours.  But I can declare she is a man-of-war,
for a long pennant flutters from her main mast."

For a quarter of an hour we watched the ship which was steaming
towards us.  I could not, however, believe that she could
see the Nautilus from that distance; and still less that she
could know what this submarine engine was.  Soon the Canadian
informed me that she was a large, armoured, two-decker ram.
A thick black smoke was pouring from her two funnels.
Her closely-furled sails were stopped to her yards.
She hoisted no flag at her mizzen-peak. The distance
prevented us from distinguishing the colours of her pennant,
which floated like a thin ribbon.  She advanced rapidly.
If Captain Nemo allowed her to approach, there was a chance of
salvation for us.

"Sir," said Ned Land, "if that vessel passes within a mile of us I shall
throw myself into the sea, and I should advise you to do the same."

I did not reply to the Canadian's suggestion, but continued
watching the ship.  Whether English, French, American, or Russian,
she would be sure to take us in if we could only reach her.
Presently a white smoke burst from the fore part of the vessel;
some seconds after, the water, agitated by the fall of a heavy body,
splashed the stern of the Nautilus, and shortly afterwards a loud
explosion struck my ear.

"What! they are firing at us!"  I exclaimed.

"So please you, sir," said Ned, "they have recognised the unicorn,
and they are firing at us."

"But," I exclaimed, "surely they can see that there are men in the case?"

"It is, perhaps, because of that," replied Ned Land, looking at me.

A whole flood of light burst upon my mind.  Doubtless they knew
now how to believe the stories of the pretended monster.  No doubt,
on board the Abraham Lincoln, when the Canadian struck it with the harpoon,
Commander Farragut had recognised in the supposed narwhal a submarine vessel,
more dangerous than a supernatural cetacean.  Yes, it must have been so;
and on every sea they were now seeking this engine of destruction.
Terrible indeed! if, as we supposed, Captain Nemo employed the Nautilus
in works of vengeance.  On the night when we were imprisoned in that cell,
in the midst of the Indian Ocean, had he not attacked some vessel?
The man buried in the coral cemetery, had he not been a victim to
the shock caused by the Nautilus?  Yes, I repeat it, it must be so.
One part of the mysterious existence of Captain Nemo had been unveiled;
and, if his identity had not been recognised, at least, the nations
united against him were no longer hunting a chimerical creature,
but a man who had vowed a deadly hatred against them.
All the formidable past rose before me.  Instead of meeting friends
on board the approaching ship, we could only expect pitiless enemies.
But the shot rattled about us.  Some of them struck the sea
and ricochetted, losing themselves in the distance.  But none touched
the Nautilus.  The vessel was not more than three miles from us.
In spite of the serious cannonade, Captain Nemo did not appear
on the platform; but, if one of the conical projectiles had struck
the shell of the Nautilus, it would have been fatal.  The Canadian
then said, "Sir, we must do all we can to get out of this dilemma.
Let us signal them.  They will then, perhaps, understand that we
are honest folks."

Ned Land took his handkerchief to wave in the air; but he had
scarcely displayed it, when he was struck down by an iron hand,
and fell, in spite of his great strength, upon the deck.

"Fool!" exclaimed the Captain, "do you wish to be pierced by the spur
of the Nautilus before it is hurled at this vessel?"

Captain Nemo was terrible to hear; he was still more terrible to see.
His face was deadly pale, with a spasm at his heart.  For an instant
it must have ceased to beat.  His pupils were fearfully contracted.
He did not speak, he roared, as, with his body thrown forward,
he wrung the Canadian's shoulders.  Then, leaving him, and turning
to the ship of war, whose shot was still raining around him,
he exclaimed, with a powerful voice, "Ah, ship of an accursed nation,
you know who I am!  I do not want your colours to know you by!
Look! and I will show you mine!"

And on the fore part of the platform Captain Nemo unfurled
a black flag, similar to the one he had placed at the South Pole.
At that moment a shot struck the shell of the Nautilus obliquely,
without piercing it; and, rebounding near the Captain, was lost in the sea.
He shrugged his shoulders; and, addressing me, said shortly, "Go down,
you and your companions, go down!"

"Sir," I cried, "are you going to attack this vessel?"

"Sir, I am going to sink it."

"You will not do that?"

"I shall do it," he replied coldly.  "And I advise you not to
judge me, sir.  Fate has shown you what you ought not to have seen.
The attack has begun; go down."

"What is this vessel?"

"You do not know?  Very well! so much the better!
Its nationality to you, at least, will be a secret.  Go down!"

We could but obey.  About fifteen of the sailors surrounded the Captain,
looking with implacable hatred at the vessel nearing them.
One could feel that the same desire of vengeance animated every soul.
I went down at the moment another projectile struck the Nautilus, and I
heard the Captain exclaim:

"Strike, mad vessel!  Shower your useless shot!  And then, you will not
escape the spur of the Nautilus.  But it is not here that you shall perish!
I would not have your ruins mingle with those of the Avenger!"

I reached my room.  The Captain and his second had remained on the platform.
The screw was set in motion, and the Nautilus, moving with speed,
was soon beyond the reach of the ship's guns.  But the pursuit continued,
and Captain Nemo contented himself with keeping his distance.

About four in the afternoon, being no longer able to
contain my impatience, I went to the central staircase.
The panel was open, and I ventured on to the platform.
The Captain was still walking up and down with an agitated step.
He was looking at the ship, which was five or six miles to leeward.

He was going round it like a wild beast, and, drawing it eastward,
he allowed them to pursue.  But he did not attack.
Perhaps he still hesitated?  I wished to mediate once more.
But I had scarcely spoken, when Captain Nemo imposed silence, saying:

"I am the law, and I am the judge!  I am the oppressed, and there is
the oppressor!  Through him I have lost all that I loved, cherished,
and venerated--country, wife, children, father, and mother.
I saw all perish!  All that I hate is there!  Say no more!"

I cast a last look at the man-of-war, which was putting on steam,
and rejoined Ned and Conseil.

"We will fly!"  I exclaimed.

"Good!" said Ned.  "What is this vessel?"

"I do not know; but, whatever it is, it will be sunk before night.
In any case, it is better to perish with it, than be made accomplices
in a retaliation the justice of which we cannot judge."

"That is my opinion too," said Ned Land, coolly.  "Let us wait for night."

Night arrived.  Deep silence reigned on board.
The compass showed that the Nautilus had not altered its course.
It was on the surface, rolling slightly.  My companions and I
resolved to fly when the vessel should be near enough either
to hear us or to see us; for the moon, which would be full
in two or three days, shone brightly.  Once on board the ship,
if we could not prevent the blow which threatened it, we could,
at least we would, do all that circumstances would allow.
Several times I thought the Nautilus was preparing for attack;
but Captain Nemo contented himself with allowing his adversary
to approach, and then fled once more before it.

Part of the night passed without any incident.  We watched the
opportunity for action.  We spoke little, for we were too much moved.
Ned Land would have thrown himself into the sea, but I forced him to wait.
According to my idea, the Nautilus would attack the ship at her waterline,
and then it would not only be possible, but easy to fly.

At three in the morning, full of uneasiness, I mounted the platform.
Captain Nemo had not left it.  He was standing at the fore part near
his flag, which a slight breeze displayed above his head.  He did not take
his eyes from the vessel.  The intensity of his look seemed to attract,
and fascinate, and draw it onward more surely than if he had been towing it.
The moon was then passing the meridian.  Jupiter was rising in the east.
Amid this peaceful scene of nature, sky and ocean rivalled each other
in tranquillity, the sea offering to the orbs of night the finest mirror
they could ever have in which to reflect their image.  As I thought of
the deep calm of these elements, compared with all those passions brooding
imperceptibly within the Nautilus, I shuddered.

The vessel was within two miles of us.  It was ever nearing that
phosphorescent light which showed the presence of the Nautilus.
I could see its green and red lights, and its white lantern hanging
from the large foremast.  An indistinct vibration quivered through
its rigging, showing that the furnaces were heated to the uttermost.
Sheaves of sparks and red ashes flew from the funnels, shining in the
atmosphere like stars.

I remained thus until six in the morning, without Captain Nemo noticing me.
The ship stood about a mile and a half from us, and with the first dawn
of day the firing began afresh.  The moment could not be far off when,
the Nautilus attacking its adversary, my companions and myself should
for ever leave this man.  I was preparing to go down to remind them,
when the second mounted the platform, accompanied by several sailors.
Captain Nemo either did not or would not see them.  Some steps were taken
which might be called the signal for action.  They were very simple.
The iron balustrade around the platform was lowered, and the lantern and pilot
cages were pushed within the shell until they were flush with the deck.
The long surface of the steel cigar no longer offered a single point to check
its manoeuvres.  I returned to the saloon.  The Nautilus still floated;
some streaks of light were filtering through the liquid beds.
With the undulations of the waves the windows were brightened by
the red streaks of the rising sun, and this dreadful day of the 2nd of
June had dawned.

At five o'clock, the log showed that the speed of the Nautilus
was slackening, and I knew that it was allowing them to
draw nearer.  Besides, the reports were heard more distinctly,
and the projectiles, labouring through the ambient water,
were extinguished with a strange hissing noise.

"My friends," said I, "the moment is come.  One grasp of the hand,
and may God protect us!"

Ned Land was resolute, Conseil calm, myself so nervous
that I knew not how to contain myself.  We all passed into
the library; but the moment I pushed the door opening on to
the central staircase, I heard the upper panel close sharply.
The Canadian rushed on to the stairs, but I stopped him.
A well-known hissing noise told me that the water was running
into the reservoirs, and in a few minutes the Nautilus
was some yards beneath the surface of the waves.
I understood the manoeuvre.  It was too late to act.
The Nautilus did not wish to strike at the impenetrable cuirass,
but below the water-line, where the metallic covering no
longer protected it.

We were again imprisoned, unwilling witnesses of the dreadful
drama that was preparing.  We had scarcely time to reflect;
taking refuge in my room, we looked at each other without speaking.
A deep stupor had taken hold of my mind:  thought seemed to stand still.
I was in that painful state of expectation preceding a dreadful report.
I waited, I listened, every sense was merged in that of hearing!
The speed of the Nautilus was accelerated.  It was preparing to rush.
The whole ship trembled.  Suddenly I screamed.  I felt the shock,
but comparatively light.  I felt the penetrating power of the steel spur.
I heard rattlings and scrapings.  But the Nautilus, carried along
by its propelling power, passed through the mass of the vessel like a
needle through sailcloth!

I could stand it no longer.  Mad, out of my mind, I rushed
from my room into the saloon.  Captain Nemo was there,
mute, gloomy, implacable; he was looking through the port panel.
A large mass cast a shadow on the water; and, that it might
lose nothing of her agony, the Nautilus was going down into
the abyss with her.  Ten yards from me I saw the open shell,
through which the water was rushing with the noise of thunder,
then the double line of guns and the netting.  The bridge was
covered with black, agitated shadows.

The water was rising.  The poor creatures were crowding the ratlines,
clinging to the masts, struggling under the water.  It was a human ant-heap
overtaken by the sea.  Paralysed, stiffened with anguish, my hair standing
on end, with eyes wide open, panting, without breath, and without voice,
I too was watching!  An irresistible attraction glued me to the glass!
Suddenly an explosion took place.  The compressed air blew up her decks,
as if the magazines had caught fire.  Then the unfortunate vessel sank
more rapidly.  Her topmast, laden with victims, now appeared; then her spars,
bending under the weight of men; and, last of all, the top of her mainmast.
Then the dark mass disappeared, and with it the dead crew, drawn down by
the strong eddy.

I turned to Captain Nemo.  That terrible avenger, a perfect
archangel of hatred, was still looking.  When all was over,
he turned to his room, opened the door, and entered.
I followed him with my eyes.  On the end wall beneath his heroes,
I saw the portrait of a woman, still young, and two little children.
Captain Nemo looked at them for some moments, stretched his arms
towards them, and, kneeling down, burst into deep sobs.



CHAPTER XXII

THE LAST WORDS OF CAPTAIN NEMO

The panels had closed on this dreadful vision, but light had not returned
to the saloon:  all was silence and darkness within the Nautilus.
At wonderful speed, a hundred feet beneath the water, it was leaving
this desolate spot.  Whither was it going?  To the north or south?
Where was the man flying to after such dreadful retaliation?
I had returned to my room, where Ned and Conseil had remained silent enough.
I felt an insurmountable horror for Captain Nemo.  Whatever he had
suffered at the hands of these men, he had no right to punish thus.
He had made me, if not an accomplice, at least a witness of his vengeance.
At eleven the electric light reappeared.  I passed into the saloon.
It was deserted.  I consulted the different instruments.  The Nautilus was
flying northward at the rate of twenty-five miles an hour, now on the surface,
and now thirty feet below it.  On taking the bearings by the chart,
I saw that we were passing the mouth of the Manche, and that our course
was hurrying us towards the northern seas at a frightful speed.  That night
we had crossed two hundred leagues of the Atlantic.  The shadows fell,
and the sea was covered with darkness until the rising of the moon.  I went
to my room, but could not sleep.  I was troubled with dreadful nightmare.
The horrible scene of destruction was continually before my eyes.
From that day, who could tell into what part of the North Atlantic
basin the Nautilus would take us?  Still with unaccountable speed.
Still in the midst of these northern fogs.  Would it touch at Spitzbergen,
or on the shores of Nova Zembla?  Should we explore those unknown seas,
the White Sea, the Sea of Kara, the Gulf of Obi, the Archipelago of Liarrov,
and the unknown coast of Asia?  I could not say.  I could no longer judge
of the time that was passing.  The clocks had been stopped on board.
It seemed, as in polar countries, that night and day no longer followed
their regular course.  I felt myself being drawn into that strange
region where the foundered imagination of Edgar Poe roamed at will.
Like the fabulous Gordon Pym, at every moment I expected to see "that veiled
human figure, of larger proportions than those of any inhabitant of the earth,
thrown across the cataract which defends the approach to the pole."
I estimated (though, perhaps, I may be mistaken)--I estimated this
adventurous course of the Nautilus to have lasted fifteen or twenty days.
And I know not how much longer it might have lasted, had it not been
for the catastrophe which ended this voyage.  Of Captain Nemo I saw nothing
whatever now, nor of his second.  Not a man of the crew was visible for
an instant.  The Nautilus was almost incessantly under water.  When we came
to the surface to renew the air, the panels opened and shut mechanically.
There were no more marks on the planisphere.  I knew not where we were.
And the Canadian, too, his strength and patience at an end, appeared no more.
Conseil could not draw a word from him; and, fearing that, in a dreadful
fit of madness, he might kill himself, watched him with constant devotion.
One morning (what date it was I could not say) I had fallen into a heavy
sleep towards the early hours, a sleep both painful and unhealthy, when I
suddenly awoke.  Ned Land was leaning over me, saying, in a low voice,
"We are going to fly."  I sat up.

"When shall we go?"  I asked.

"To-night. All inspection on board the Nautilus seems to have ceased.
All appear to be stupefied.  You will be ready, sir?"

"Yes; where are we?"

"In sight of land.  I took the reckoning this morning in the fog--
twenty miles to the east."

"What country is it?"

"I do not know; but, whatever it is, we will take refuge there."

"Yes, Ned, yes.  We will fly to-night, even if the sea should swallow us up."

"The sea is bad, the wind violent, but twenty miles in that light
boat of the Nautilus does not frighten me.  Unknown to the crew,
I have been able to procure food and some bottles of water."

"I will follow you."

"But," continued the Canadian, "if I am surprised, I will defend myself;
I will force them to kill me."

"We will die together, friend Ned."

I had made up my mind to all.  The Canadian left me.
I reached the platform, on which I could with difficulty support
myself against the shock of the waves.  The sky was threatening;
but, as land was in those thick brown shadows, we must fly.
I returned to the saloon, fearing and yet hoping to see Captain Nemo,
wishing and yet not wishing to see him.  What could I have said to him?
Could I hide the involuntary horror with which he inspired me?
No. It was better that I should not meet him face to face;
better to forget him.  And yet---- How long seemed that day, the last
that I should pass in the Nautilus.  I remained alone.  Ned Land
and Conseil avoided speaking, for fear of betraying themselves.
At six I dined, but I was not hungry; I forced myself to eat in spite
of my disgust, that I might not weaken myself.  At half-past six
Ned Land came to my room, saying, "We shall not see each other
again before our departure.  At ten the moon will not be risen.
We will profit by the darkness.  Come to the boat; Conseil and I
will wait for you."

The Canadian went out without giving me time to answer.
Wishing to verify the course of the Nautilus, I went to the saloon.
We were running N.N.E. at frightful speed, and more than fifty yards deep.
I cast a last look on these wonders of nature, on the riches of art
heaped up in this museum, upon the unrivalled collection destined
to perish at the bottom of the sea, with him who had formed it.
I wished to fix an indelible impression of it in my mind.
I remained an hour thus, bathed in the light of that luminous ceiling,
and passing in review those treasures shining under their glasses.
Then I returned to my room.

I dressed myself in strong sea clothing.  I collected my notes,
placing them carefully about me.  My heart beat loudly.
I could not check its pulsations.  Certainly my trouble and agitation
would have betrayed me to Captain Nemo's eyes.  What was he doing
at this moment?  I listened at the door of his room.  I heard steps.
Captain Nemo was there.  He had not gone to rest.  At every moment
I expected to see him appear, and ask me why I wished to fly.
I was constantly on the alert.  My imagination magnified everything.
The impression became at last so poignant that I asked myself if it
would not be better to go to the Captain's room, see him face to face,
and brave him with look and gesture.

It was the inspiration of a madman; fortunately I resisted the desire,
and stretched myself on my bed to quiet my bodily agitation.
My nerves were somewhat calmer, but in my excited brain I saw
over again all my existence on board the Nautilus; every incident,
either happy or unfortunate, which had happened since my disappearance
from the Abraham Lincoln--the submarine hunt, the Torres Straits,
the savages of Papua, the running ashore, the coral cemetery,
the passage of Suez, the Island of Santorin, the Cretan diver,
Vigo Bay, Atlantis, the iceberg, the South Pole, the imprisonment
in the ice, the fight among the poulps, the storm in the Gulf Stream,
the Avenger, and the horrible scene of the vessel sunk with all her crew.
All these events passed before my eyes like scenes in a drama.
Then Captain Nemo seemed to grow enormously, his features to assume
superhuman proportions.  He was no longer my equal, but a man of the waters,
the genie of the sea.

It was then half-past nine.  I held my head between my hands to keep
it from bursting.  I closed my eyes; I would not think any longer.
There was another half-hour to wait, another half-hour of a nightmare,
which might drive me mad.

At that moment I heard the distant strains of the organ, a sad harmony to an
undefinable chant, the wail of a soul longing to break these earthly bonds.
I listened with every sense, scarcely breathing; plunged, like Captain Nemo,
in that musical ecstasy, which was drawing him in spirit to the end of life.

Then a sudden thought terrified me.  Captain Nemo had left his room.
He was in the saloon, which I must cross to fly.  There I should
meet him for the last time.  He would see me, perhaps speak to me.
A gesture of his might destroy me, a single word chain me on board.

But ten was about to strike.  The moment had come for me to leave my room,
and join my companions.

I must not hesitate, even if Captain Nemo himself should rise before me.
I opened my door carefully; and even then, as it turned on its hinges,
it seemed to me to make a dreadful noise.  Perhaps it only existed in
my own imagination.

I crept along the dark stairs of the Nautilus, stopping at each step
to check the beating of my heart.  I reached the door of the saloon,
and opened it gently.  It was plunged in profound darkness.
The strains of the organ sounded faintly.  Captain Nemo was there.
He did not see me.  In the full light I do not think he would have
noticed me, so entirely was he absorbed in the ecstasy.

I crept along the carpet, avoiding the slightest sound which might
betray my presence.  I was at least five minutes reaching the door,
at the opposite side, opening into the library.

I was going to open it, when a sigh from Captain Nemo nailed me to the spot.
I knew that he was rising.  I could even see him, for the light from
the library came through to the saloon.  He came towards me silently,
with his arms crossed, gliding like a spectre rather than walking.
His breast was swelling with sobs; and I heard him murmur these words
(the last which ever struck my ear):

"Almighty God! enough! enough!"

Was it a confession of remorse which thus escaped from this man's conscience?

In desperation, I rushed through the library, mounted the central
staircase, and, following the upper flight, reached the boat.
I crept through the opening, which had already admitted
my two companions.

"Let us go! let us go!"  I exclaimed.

"Directly!" replied the Canadian.

The orifice in the plates of the Nautilus was first closed,
and fastened down by means of a false key, with which Ned Land
had provided himself; the opening in the boat was also closed.
The Canadian began to loosen the bolts which still held us to
the submarine boat.

Suddenly a noise was heard.  Voices were answering each other loudly.
What was the matter?  Had they discovered our flight?
I felt Ned Land slipping a dagger into my hand.

"Yes," I murmured, "we know how to die!"

The Canadian had stopped in his work.  But one word many times repeated,
a dreadful word, revealed the cause of the agitation spreading on board
the Nautilus.  It was not we the crew were looking after!

"The maelstrom! the maelstrom!"  Could a more dreadful word in a more
dreadful situation have sounded in our ears!  We were then upon
the dangerous coast of Norway.  Was the Nautilus being drawn into
this gulf at the moment our boat was going to leave its sides?
We knew that at the tide the pent-up waters between the islands
of Ferroe and Loffoden rush with irresistible violence,
forming a whirlpool from which no vessel ever escapes.
From every point of the horizon enormous waves were meeting,
forming a gulf justly called the "Navel of the Ocean,"
whose power of attraction extends to a distance of twelve miles.
There, not only vessels, but whales are sacrificed, as well as white
bears from the northern regions.

It is thither that the Nautilus, voluntarily or involuntarily,
had been run by the Captain.

It was describing a spiral, the circumference of which was lessening
by degrees, and the boat, which was still fastened to its side,
was carried along with giddy speed.  I felt that sickly giddiness
which arises from long-continued whirling round.

We were in dread.  Our horror was at its height, circulation had stopped,
all nervous influence was annihilated, and we were covered with cold sweat,
like a sweat of agony!  And what noise around our frail bark!
What roarings repeated by the echo miles away!  What an uproar was that
of the waters broken on the sharp rocks at the bottom, where the hardest
bodies are crushed, and trees worn away, "with all the fur rubbed off,"
according to the Norwegian phrase!

What a situation to be in!  We rocked frightfully.  The Nautilus
defended itself like a human being.  Its steel muscles cracked.
Sometimes it seemed to stand upright, and we with it!

"We must hold on," said Ned, "and look after the bolts.
We may still be saved if we stick to the Nautilus."

He had not finished the words, when we heard a crashing noise,
the bolts gave way, and the boat, torn from its groove, was hurled
like a stone from a sling into the midst of the whirlpool.

My head struck on a piece of iron, and with the violent shock
I lost all consciousness.



CHAPTER XXIII

CONCLUSION

Thus ends the voyage under the seas.  What passed during that night--
how the boat escaped from the eddies of the maelstrom--
how Ned Land, Conseil, and myself ever came out of the gulf,
I cannot tell.

But when I returned to consciousness, I was lying in a fisherman's hut,
on the Loffoden Isles.  My two companions, safe and sound, were near me
holding my hands.  We embraced each other heartily.

At that moment we could not think of returning to France.  The means
of communication between the north of Norway and the south are rare.
And I am therefore obliged to wait for the steamboat running monthly
from Cape North.

And, among the worthy people who have so kindly received us,
I revise my record of these adventures once more.
Not a fact has been omitted, not a detail exaggerated.
It is a faithful narrative of this incredible expedition in an
element inaccessible to man, but to which Progress will one day
open a road.

Shall I be believed?  I do not know.  And it matters little, after all.
What I now affirm is, that I have a right to speak of these seas, under which,
in less than ten months, I have crossed 20,000 leagues in that submarine tour
of the world, which has revealed so many wonders.

But what has become of the Nautilus?  Did it resist the pressure
of the maelstrom?  Does Captain Nemo still live?  And does
he still follow under the ocean those frightful retaliations?
Or, did he stop after the last hecatomb?

Will the waves one day carry to him this manuscript containing
the history of his life?  Shall I ever know the name of this man?
Will the missing vessel tell us by its nationality that of Captain Nemo?

I hope so.  And I also hope that his powerful vessel has conquered
the sea at its most terrible gulf, and that the Nautilus has survived
where so many other vessels have been lost!  If it be so--if Captain
Nemo still inhabits the ocean, his adopted country, may hatred be
appeased in that savage heart!  May the contemplation of so many wonders
extinguish for ever the spirit of vengeance!  May the judge disappear,
and the philosopher continue the peaceful exploration of the sea!
If his destiny be strange, it is also sublime.  Have I not understood
it myself?  Have I not lived ten months of this unnatural life?
And to the question asked by Ecclesiastes three thousand years ago,
"That which is far off and exceeding deep, who can find it out?"
two men alone of all now living have the right to give an answer----

CAPTAIN NEMO AND MYSELF.


The end of Project Gutenberg etext of "Twenty Thousand Leagues
Under the Sea"


###################################################################################

Around the World in 80 Days, by Jules Verne


AROUND THE WORLD IN EIGHTY DAYS

Chapter I

IN WHICH PHILEAS FOGG AND PASSEPARTOUT ACCEPT EACH OTHER,
THE ONE AS MASTER, THE OTHER AS MAN


Mr. Phileas Fogg lived, in 1872, at No. 7, Saville Row, Burlington
Gardens, the house in which Sheridan died in 1814.  He was one of
the most noticeable members of the Reform Club, though he seemed
always to avoid attracting attention; an enigmatical personage,
about whom little was known, except that he was a polished man
of the world.  People said that he resembled Byron--at least
that his head was Byronic; but he was a bearded, tranquil Byron,
who might live on a thousand years without growing old.

Certainly an Englishman, it was more doubtful whether Phileas Fogg
was a Londoner.  He was never seen on 'Change, nor at the Bank,
nor in the counting-rooms of the "City"; no ships ever came into
London docks of which he was the owner; he had no public employment;
he had never been entered at any of the Inns of Court, either at the Temple,
or Lincoln's Inn, or Gray's Inn; nor had his voice ever resounded
in the Court of Chancery, or in the Exchequer, or the Queen's Bench,
or the Ecclesiastical Courts.  He certainly was not a manufacturer;
nor was he a merchant or a gentleman farmer.  His name was strange
to the scientific and learned societies, and he never was known
to take part in the sage deliberations of the Royal Institution
or the London Institution, the Artisan's Association, or the
Institution of Arts and Sciences.  He belonged, in fact,
to none of the numerous societies which swarm in the English capital,
from the Harmonic to that of the Entomologists, founded mainly
for the purpose of abolishing pernicious insects.

Phileas Fogg was a member of the Reform, and that was all.

The way in which he got admission to this exclusive club
was simple enough.

He was recommended by the Barings, with whom he had an open credit.
His cheques were regularly paid at sight from his account current,
which was always flush.

Was Phileas Fogg rich?  Undoubtedly.  But those who knew him
best could not imagine how he had made his fortune, and Mr. Fogg
was the last person to whom to apply for the information.  He was
not lavish, nor, on the contrary, avaricious; for, whenever he knew
that money was needed for a noble, useful, or benevolent purpose,
he supplied it quietly and sometimes anonymously.  He was, in short,
the least communicative of men.  He talked very little, and seemed
all the more mysterious for his taciturn manner.  His daily habits
were quite open to observation; but whatever he did was so exactly
the same thing that he had always done before, that the wits
of the curious were fairly puzzled.

Had he travelled?  It was likely, for no one seemed to know
the world more familiarly; there was no spot so secluded
that he did not appear to have an intimate acquaintance with it.
He often corrected, with a few clear words, the thousand conjectures
advanced by members of the club as to lost and unheard-of travellers,
pointing out the true probabilities, and seeming as if gifted with
a sort of second sight, so often did events justify his predictions.
He must have travelled everywhere, at least in the spirit.

It was at least certain that Phileas Fogg had not absented himself
from London for many years.  Those who were honoured by a better
acquaintance with him than the rest, declared that nobody could
pretend to have ever seen him anywhere else.  His sole pastimes
were reading the papers and playing whist.  He often won at this game,
which, as a silent one, harmonised with his nature; but his winnings
never went into his purse, being reserved as a fund for his charities.
Mr. Fogg played, not to win, but for the sake of playing.
The game was in his eyes a contest, a struggle with a difficulty,
yet a motionless, unwearying struggle, congenial to his tastes.

Phileas Fogg was not known to have either wife or children,
which may happen to the most honest people; either relatives
or near friends, which is certainly more unusual.  He lived alone
in his house in Saville Row, whither none penetrated.  A single
domestic sufficed to serve him.  He breakfasted and dined at the club,
at hours mathematically fixed, in the same room, at the same table,
never taking his meals with other members, much less bringing
a guest with him; and went home at exactly midnight, only to retire
at once to bed.  He never used the cosy chambers which the Reform
provides for its favoured members.  He passed ten hours out of the
twenty-four in Saville Row, either in sleeping or making his toilet.
When he chose to take a walk it was with a regular step in the
entrance hall with its mosaic flooring, or in the circular gallery
with its dome supported by twenty red porphyry Ionic columns,
and illumined by blue painted windows.  When he breakfasted or dined
all the resources of the club--its kitchens and pantries,
its buttery and dairy--aided to crowd his table with their most
succulent stores; he was served by the gravest waiters,
in dress coats, and shoes with swan-skin soles, who proffered
the viands in special porcelain, and on the finest linen;
club decanters, of a lost mould, contained his sherry,
his port, and his cinnamon-spiced claret; while his beverages
were refreshingly cooled with ice, brought at great cost
from the American lakes.

If to live in this style is to be eccentric, it must be
confessed that there is something good in eccentricity.

The mansion in Saville Row, though not sumptuous, was exceedingly comfortable.
The habits of its occupant were such as to demand but little from the
sole domestic, but Phileas Fogg required him to be almost superhumanly
prompt and regular.  On this very 2nd of October he had dismissed
James Forster, because that luckless youth had brought him shaving-water
at eighty-four degrees Fahrenheit instead of eighty-six;
and he was awaiting his successor, who was due at the house
between eleven and half-past.

Phileas Fogg was seated squarely in his armchair, his feet close together
like those of a grenadier on parade, his hands resting on his knees,
his body straight, his head erect; he was steadily watching a complicated
clock which indicated the hours, the minutes, the seconds, the days,
the months, and the years.  At exactly half-past eleven Mr. Fogg would,
according to his daily habit, quit Saville Row, and repair to the Reform.

A rap at this moment sounded on the door of the cosy apartment where
Phileas Fogg was seated, and James Forster, the dismissed servant, appeared.

"The new servant," said he.

A young man of thirty advanced and bowed.

"You are a Frenchman, I believe," asked Phileas Fogg, "and your name is John?"

"Jean, if monsieur pleases," replied the newcomer, "Jean Passepartout,
a surname which has clung to me because I have a natural aptness
for going out of one business into another.  I believe I'm honest,
monsieur, but, to be outspoken, I've had several trades.  I've been
an itinerant singer, a circus-rider, when I used to vault like Leotard,
and dance on a rope like Blondin.  Then I got to be a professor of gymnastics,
so as to make better use of my talents; and then I was a sergeant fireman
at Paris, and assisted at many a big fire.  But I quitted France
five years ago, and, wishing to taste the sweets of domestic life,
took service as a valet here in England.  Finding myself out of place,
and hearing that Monsieur Phileas Fogg was the most exact and settled
gentleman in the United Kingdom, I have come to monsieur in the hope
of living with him a tranquil life, and forgetting even the name
of Passepartout."

"Passepartout suits me," responded Mr. Fogg.  "You are well recommended
to me; I hear a good report of you.  You know my conditions?"

"Yes, monsieur."

"Good!  What time is it?"

"Twenty-two minutes after eleven," returned Passepartout,
drawing an enormous silver watch from the depths of his pocket.

"You are too slow," said Mr. Fogg.

"Pardon me, monsieur, it is impossible--"

"You are four minutes too slow.  No matter; it's enough to mention
the error.  Now from this moment, twenty-nine minutes after eleven, a.m.,
this Wednesday, 2nd October, you are in my service."

Phileas Fogg got up, took his hat in his left hand, put it on
his head with an automatic motion, and went off without a word.

Passepartout heard the street door shut once; it was his new
master going out.  He heard it shut again; it was his predecessor,
James Forster, departing in his turn.  Passepartout remained
alone in the house in Saville Row.




Chapter II

IN WHICH PASSEPARTOUT IS CONVINCED THAT HE HAS AT LAST FOUND HIS IDEAL


"Faith," muttered Passepartout, somewhat flurried, "I've seen people
at Madame Tussaud's as lively as my new master!"

Madame Tussaud's "people," let it be said, are of wax, and are much
visited in London; speech is all that is wanting to make them human.

During his brief interview with Mr. Fogg, Passepartout had been
carefully observing him.  He appeared to be a man about forty years of age,
with fine, handsome features, and a tall, well-shaped figure;
his hair and whiskers were light, his forehead compact and unwrinkled,
his face rather pale, his teeth magnificent.  His countenance possessed
in the highest degree what physiognomists call "repose in action,"
a quality of those who act rather than talk.  Calm and phlegmatic,
with a clear eye, Mr. Fogg seemed a perfect type of that English
composure which Angelica Kauffmann has so skilfully represented on canvas.
Seen in the various phases of his daily life, he gave the idea of being
perfectly well-balanced, as exactly regulated as a Leroy chronometer.
Phileas Fogg was, indeed, exactitude personified, and this was betrayed
even in the expression of his very hands and feet; for in men, as well as
in animals, the limbs themselves are expressive of the passions.

He was so exact that he was never in a hurry, was always ready,
and was economical alike of his steps and his motions.  He never took
one step too many, and always went to his destination by the shortest cut;
he made no superfluous gestures, and was never seen to be moved or agitated.
He was the most deliberate person in the world, yet always reached his
destination at the exact moment.

He lived alone, and, so to speak, outside of every social relation;
and as he knew that in this world account must be taken of friction,
and that friction retards, he never rubbed against anybody.

As for Passepartout, he was a true Parisian of Paris.  Since he
had abandoned his own country for England, taking service as a valet,
he had in vain searched for a master after his own heart.
Passepartout was by no means one of those pert dunces depicted by
Moliere with a bold gaze and a nose held high in the air; he was
an honest fellow, with a pleasant face, lips a trifle protruding,
soft-mannered and serviceable, with a good round head, such as one
likes to see on the shoulders of a friend.  His eyes were blue,
his complexion rubicund, his figure almost portly and well-built,
his body muscular, and his physical powers fully developed by the
exercises of his younger days.  His brown hair was somewhat tumbled;
for, while the ancient sculptors are said to have known eighteen methods
of arranging Minerva's tresses, Passepartout was familiar with but one of
dressing his own: three strokes of a large-tooth comb completed his toilet.

It would be rash to predict how Passepartout's lively nature would agree
with Mr. Fogg.  It was impossible to tell whether the new servant
would turn out as absolutely methodical as his master required;
experience alone could solve the question.  Passepartout had been
a sort of vagrant in his early years, and now yearned for repose;
but so far he had failed to find it, though he had already served
in ten English houses.  But he could not take root in any of these;
with chagrin, he found his masters invariably whimsical and irregular,
constantly running about the country, or on the look-out for adventure.
His last master, young Lord Longferry, Member of Parliament,
after passing his nights in the Haymarket taverns, was too often
brought home in the morning on policemen's shoulders.  Passepartout,
desirous of respecting the gentleman whom he served, ventured a mild
remonstrance on such conduct; which, being ill-received, he took his leave.
Hearing that Mr. Phileas Fogg was looking for a servant, and that his life
was one of unbroken regularity, that he neither travelled nor stayed
from home overnight, he felt sure that this would be the place he was after.
He presented himself, and was accepted, as has been seen.

At half-past eleven, then, Passepartout found himself alone in
the house in Saville Row.  He begun its inspection without delay,
scouring it from cellar to garret.  So clean, well-arranged,
solemn a mansion pleased him ; it seemed to him like a snail's shell,
lighted and warmed by gas, which sufficed for both these purposes.
When Passepartout reached the second story he recognised at once
the room which he was to inhabit, and he was well satisfied with it.
Electric bells and speaking-tubes afforded communication with
the lower stories; while on the mantel stood an electric clock,
precisely like that in Mr. Fogg's bedchamber, both beating
the same second at the same instant.  "That's good, that'll do,"
said Passepartout to himself.

He suddenly observed, hung over the clock, a card which, upon inspection,
proved to be a programme of the daily routine of the house.
It comprised all that was required of the servant, from eight in the morning,
exactly at which hour Phileas Fogg rose, till half-past eleven,
when he left the house for the Reform Club--all the details of service,
the tea and toast at twenty-three minutes past eight, the shaving-water
at thirty-seven minutes past nine, and the toilet at twenty minutes before ten.
Everything was regulated and foreseen that was to be done from
half-past eleven a.m. till midnight, the hour at which the
methodical gentleman retired.

Mr. Fogg's wardrobe was amply supplied and in the best taste.
Each pair of trousers, coat, and vest bore a number,
indicating the time of year and season at which they were
in turn to be laid out for wearing; and the same system
was applied to the master's shoes.  In short, the house
in Saville Row, which must have been a very temple of disorder
and unrest under the illustrious but dissipated Sheridan, was cosiness,
comfort, and method idealised.  There was no study, nor were there books,
which would have been quite useless to Mr. Fogg; for at the Reform
two libraries, one of general literature and the other of law and politics,
were at his service.  A moderate-sized safe stood in his bedroom,
constructed so as to defy fire as well as burglars; but Passepartout
found neither arms nor hunting weapons anywhere; everything betrayed
the most tranquil and peaceable habits.

Having scrutinised the house from top to bottom, he rubbed his hands,
a broad smile overspread his features, and he said joyfully,
"This is just what I wanted!  Ah, we shall get on together,
Mr. Fogg and I!  What a domestic and regular gentleman!
A real machine; well, I don't mind serving a machine."




Chapter III

IN WHICH A CONVERSATION TAKES PLACE WHICH SEEMS LIKELY TO COST
PHILEAS FOGG DEAR


Phileas Fogg, having shut the door of his house at half-past eleven, and
having put his right foot before his left five hundred and seventy-five times, and his left foot
before his right five hundred and seventy-six times, reached the Reform Club,
an imposing edifice in Pall Mall, which could not have cost less than
three millions.  He repaired at once to the dining-room, the nine windows
of which open upon a tasteful garden, where the trees were already gilded
with an autumn colouring; and took his place at the habitual table,
the cover of which had already been laid for him.  His breakfast consisted
of a side-dish, a broiled fish with Reading sauce, a scarlet slice of
roast beef garnished with mushrooms, a rhubarb and gooseberry tart,
and a morsel of Cheshire cheese, the whole being washed down with
several cups of tea, for which the Reform is famous.  He rose at
thirteen minutes to one, and directed his steps towards the large hall,
a sumptuous apartment adorned with lavishly-framed paintings.
A flunkey handed him an uncut Times, which he proceeded to cut
with a skill which betrayed familiarity with this delicate operation.
The perusal of this paper absorbed Phileas Fogg until a quarter before four,
whilst the Standard, his next task, occupied him till the dinner hour.
Dinner passed as breakfast had done, and Mr. Fogg re-appeared in the
reading-room and sat down to the Pall Mall at twenty minutes before six.
Half an hour later several members of the Reform came in and drew up
to the fireplace, where a coal fire was steadily burning.
They were Mr. Fogg's usual partners at whist: Andrew Stuart, an engineer;
John Sullivan and Samuel Fallentin, bankers; Thomas Flanagan, a brewer;
and Gauthier Ralph, one of the Directors of the Bank of England--
all rich and highly respectable personages, even in a club which
comprises the princes of English trade and finance.

"Well, Ralph," said Thomas Flanagan, "what about that robbery?"

"Oh," replied Stuart, "the Bank will lose the money."

"On the contrary," broke in Ralph, "I hope we may put our hands
on the robber.  Skilful detectives have been sent to all the
principal ports of America and the Continent, and he'll
be a clever fellow if he slips through their fingers."

"But have you got the robber's description?" asked Stuart.

"In the first place, he is no robber at all," returned Ralph, positively.

"What! a fellow who makes off with fifty-five thousand pounds, no robber?"

"No."

"Perhaps he's a manufacturer, then."

"The Daily Telegraph says that he is a gentleman."

It was Phileas Fogg, whose head now emerged from behind his newspapers, who
made this remark.  He bowed to his friends, and entered into the conversation.
The affair which formed its subject, and which was town talk, had occurred
three days before at the Bank of England.  A package of banknotes, to the
value of fifty-five thousand pounds, had been taken from the principal
cashier's table, that functionary being at the moment engaged in registering
the receipt of three shillings and sixpence.  Of course, he could not have
his eyes everywhere.  Let it be observed that the Bank of England reposes
a touching confidence in the honesty of the public.  There are neither guards
nor gratings to protect its treasures; gold, silver, banknotes are freely
exposed, at the mercy of the first comer.  A keen observer of English customs
relates that, being in one of the rooms of the Bank one day, he had the
curiosity to examine a gold ingot weighing some seven or eight pounds.
He took it up, scrutinised it, passed it to his neighbour, he to the next man,
and so on until the ingot, going from hand to hand, was transferred to the end
of a dark entry; nor did it return to its place for half an hour.  Meanwhile,
the cashier had not so much as raised his head.  But in the present instance
things had not gone so smoothly.  The package of notes not being found when
five o'clock sounded from the ponderous clock in the "drawing office,"
the amount was passed to the account of profit and loss.  As soon as
the robbery was discovered, picked detectives hastened off to Liverpool,
Glasgow, Havre, Suez, Brindisi, New York, and other ports, inspired by
the proffered reward of two thousand pounds, and five per cent. on the sum
that might be recovered.  Detectives were also charged with narrowly watching
those who arrived at or left London by rail, and a judicial examination
was at once entered upon.

There were real grounds for supposing, as the Daily Telegraph said,
that the thief did not belong to a professional band.  On the day
of the robbery a well-dressed gentleman of polished manners,
and with a well-to-do air, had been observed going to and fro
in the paying room where the crime was committed.  A description
of him was easily procured and sent to the detectives; and some
hopeful spirits, of whom Ralph was one, did not despair of his apprehension.
The papers and clubs were full of the affair, and everywhere people were
discussing the probabilities of a successful pursuit; and the Reform Club
was especially agitated, several of its members being Bank officials.

Ralph would not concede that the work of the detectives was likely
to be in vain, for he thought that the prize offered would greatly
stimulate their zeal and activity.  But Stuart was far from sharing
this confidence; and, as they placed themselves at the whist-table,
they continued to argue the matter.  Stuart and Flanagan played together,
while Phileas Fogg had Fallentin for his partner.  As the game proceeded
the conversation ceased, excepting between the rubbers, when it revived again.

"I maintain," said Stuart, "that the chances are in favour of the
thief, who must be a shrewd fellow."

"Well, but where can he fly to?" asked Ralph.  "No country is safe for him."

"Pshaw!"

"Where could he go, then?"

"Oh, I don't know that.  The world is big enough."

"It was once," said Phileas Fogg, in a low tone.  "Cut, sir,"
he added, handing the cards to Thomas Flanagan.

The discussion fell during the rubber, after which Stuart took up its thread.

"What do you mean by `once'?  Has the world grown smaller?"

"Certainly," returned Ralph.  "I agree with Mr. Fogg.  The world
has grown smaller, since a man can now go round it ten times more quickly
than a hundred years ago.  And that is why the search for this thief
will be more likely to succeed."

"And also why the thief can get away more easily."

"Be so good as to play, Mr. Stuart," said Phileas Fogg.

But the incredulous Stuart was not convinced, and when the
hand was finished, said eagerly: "You have a strange way, Ralph,
of proving that the world has grown smaller.  So, because you
can go round it in three months--"

"In eighty days," interrupted Phileas Fogg.

"That is true, gentlemen," added John Sullivan.  "Only eighty days,
now that the section between Rothal and Allahabad, on the
Great Indian Peninsula Railway, has been opened.
Here is the estimate made by the Daily Telegraph:

 From London to Suez via Mont Cenis and
   Brindisi, by rail and steamboats .................  7 days
 From Suez to Bombay, by steamer .................... 13  "
 From Bombay to Calcutta, by rail ...................  3  "
 From Calcutta to Hong Kong, by steamer ............. 13  "
 From Hong Kong to Yokohama (Japan), by steamer .....  6  "
 From Yokohama to San Francisco, by steamer ......... 22  "
 From San Francisco to New York, by rail ............. 7  "
 From New York to London, by steamer and rail ........ 9  "
----
   Total ............................................ 80 days."

"Yes, in eighty days!" exclaimed Stuart, who in his excitement
made a false deal.  "But that doesn't take into account bad weather,
contrary winds, shipwrecks, railway accidents, and so on."

"All included," returned Phileas Fogg, continuing to play
despite the discussion.

"But suppose the Hindoos or Indians pull up the rails,"
replied Stuart; "suppose they stop the trains, pillage
the luggage-vans, and scalp the passengers!"

"All included," calmly retorted Fogg; adding, as he threw down the cards,
"Two trumps."

Stuart, whose turn it was to deal, gathered them up, and went on:
"You are right, theoretically, Mr. Fogg, but practically--"

"Practically also, Mr. Stuart."

"I'd like to see you do it in eighty days."

"It depends on you.  Shall we go?"

"Heaven preserve me!  But I would wager four thousand pounds
that such a journey, made under these conditions, is impossible."

"Quite possible, on the contrary," returned Mr. Fogg.

"Well, make it, then!"

"The journey round the world in eighty days?"

"Yes."

"I should like nothing better."

"When?"

"At once.  Only I warn you that I shall do it at your expense."

"It's absurd!" cried Stuart, who was beginning to be annoyed at
the persistency of his friend.  "Come, let's go on with the game."

"Deal over again, then," said Phileas Fogg.  "There's a false deal."

Stuart took up the pack with a feverish hand; then suddenly
put them down again.

"Well, Mr. Fogg," said he, "it shall be so: I will wager
the four thousand on it."

"Calm yourself, my dear Stuart," said Fallentin.  "It's only a joke."

"When I say I'll wager," returned Stuart, "I mean it."  "All right,"
said Mr. Fogg; and, turning to the others, he continued:  
"I have a deposit of twenty thousand at Baring's which
I will willingly risk upon it."

"Twenty thousand pounds!" cried Sullivan.  "Twenty thousand pounds,
which you would lose by a single accidental delay!"

"The unforeseen does not exist," quietly replied Phileas Fogg.

"But, Mr. Fogg, eighty days are only the estimate of the least possible
time in which the journey can be made."

"A well-used minimum suffices for everything."

"But, in order not to exceed it, you must jump mathematically
from the trains upon the steamers, and from the steamers upon
the trains again."

"I will jump--mathematically."

"You are joking."

"A true Englishman doesn't joke when he is talking about so
serious a thing as a wager," replied Phileas Fogg, solemnly.
"I will bet twenty thousand pounds against anyone who wishes
that I will make the tour of the world in eighty days or less;
in nineteen hundred and twenty hours, or a hundred and fifteen
thousand two hundred minutes.  Do you accept?"

"We accept," replied Messrs. Stuart, Fallentin, Sullivan,
Flanagan, and Ralph, after consulting each other.

"Good," said Mr. Fogg.  "The train leaves for Dover at a
quarter before nine.  I will take it."

"This very evening?" asked Stuart.

"This very evening," returned Phileas Fogg.  He took out and
consulted a pocket almanac, and added,  "As today is Wednesday,
the 2nd of October, I shall be due in London in this very room of
the Reform Club, on Saturday, the 21st of December, at a quarter
before nine p.m.; or else the twenty thousand pounds,
now deposited in my name at Baring's, will belong to you,
in fact and in right, gentlemen.  Here is a cheque for the amount."

A memorandum of the wager was at once drawn up and signed by
the six parties, during which Phileas Fogg preserved a stoical
composure.  He certainly did not bet to win, and had only staked
the twenty thousand pounds, half of his fortune, because he
foresaw that he might have to expend the other half to carry out
this difficult, not to say unattainable, project.  As for his
antagonists, they seemed much agitated; not so much by the value
of their stake, as because they had some scruples about betting
under conditions so difficult to their friend.

The clock struck seven, and the party offered to suspend the
game so that Mr. Fogg might make his preparations for departure.

"I am quite ready now," was his tranquil response.  "Diamonds are trumps:
be so good as to play, gentlemen."





Chapter IV

IN WHICH PHILEAS FOGG ASTOUNDS PASSEPARTOUT, HIS SERVANT


Having won twenty guineas at whist, and taken leave of his friends,
Phileas Fogg, at twenty-five minutes past seven, left the Reform Club.

Passepartout, who had conscientiously studied the programme of his duties,
was more than surprised to see his master guilty of the inexactness
of appearing at this unaccustomed hour; for, according to rule,
he was not due in Saville Row until precisely midnight.

Mr. Fogg repaired to his bedroom, and called out, "Passepartout!"

Passepartout did not reply.  It could not be he who was called;
it was not the right hour.

"Passepartout!" repeated Mr. Fogg, without raising his voice.

Passepartout made his appearance.

"I've called you twice," observed his master.

"But it is not midnight," responded the other, showing his watch.

"I know it; I don't blame you.  We start for Dover and Calais
in ten minutes."

A puzzled grin overspread Passepartout's round face;
clearly he had not comprehended his master.

"Monsieur is going to leave home?"

"Yes," returned Phileas Fogg.  "We are going round the world."

Passepartout opened wide his eyes, raised his eyebrows,
held up his hands, and seemed about to collapse,
so overcome was he with stupefied astonishment.

"Round the world!" he murmured.

"In eighty days," responded Mr. Fogg.  "So we haven't a moment to lose."

"But the trunks?" gasped Passepartout, unconsciously swaying
his head from right to left.

"We'll have no trunks; only a carpet-bag, with two shirts
and three pairs of stockings for me, and the same for you.
We'll buy our clothes on the way.  Bring down my mackintosh
and traveling-cloak, and some stout shoes, though we shall
do little walking.  Make haste!"

Passepartout tried to reply, but could not.  He went out,
mounted to his own room, fell into a chair, and muttered:
"That's good, that is!  And I, who wanted to remain quiet!"

He mechanically set about making the preparations for departure.
Around the world in eighty days!  Was his master a fool?  No.
Was this a joke, then?  They were going to Dover; good!
To Calais; good again!  After all, Passepartout, who had
been away from France five years, would not be sorry
to set foot on his native soil again.  Perhaps they would
go as far as Paris, and it would do his eyes good to see Paris once more.
But surely a gentleman so chary of his steps would stop there; no doubt--
but, then, it was none the less true that he was going away,
this so domestic person hitherto!

By eight o'clock Passepartout had packed the modest carpet-bag,
containing the wardrobes of his master and himself; then,
still troubled in mind, he carefully shut the door of his room,
and descended to Mr. Fogg.

Mr. Fogg was quite ready.  Under his arm might have been observed a red-bound
copy of Bradshaw's Continental Railway Steam Transit and General Guide,
with its timetables showing the arrival and departure of steamers and railways.
He took the carpet-bag, opened it, and slipped into it a goodly roll of
Bank of England notes, which would pass wherever he might go.

"You have forgotten nothing?" asked he.

"Nothing, monsieur."

"My mackintosh and cloak?"

"Here they are."

"Good!  Take this carpet-bag," handing it to Passepartout.
"Take good care of it, for there are twenty thousand pounds in it."

Passepartout nearly dropped the bag, as if the twenty thousand pounds
were in gold, and weighed him down.

Master and man then descended, the street-door was double-locked,
and at the end of Saville Row they took a cab and drove rapidly
to Charing Cross.  The cab stopped before the railway station
at twenty minutes past eight.  Passepartout jumped off the box
and followed his master, who, after paying the cabman,
was about to enter the station, when a poor beggar-woman,
with a child in her arms, her naked feet smeared with mud,
her head covered with a wretched bonnet, from which hung a tattered feather,
and her shoulders shrouded in a ragged shawl, approached,
and mournfully asked for alms.

Mr. Fogg took out the twenty guineas he had just won at whist,
and handed them to the beggar, saying, "Here, my good woman.
I'm glad that I met you;" and passed on.

Passepartout had a moist sensation about the eyes;
his master's action touched his susceptible heart.

Two first-class tickets for Paris having been speedily purchased,
Mr. Fogg was crossing the station to the train, when he perceived
his five friends of the Reform.

"Well, gentlemen," said he, "I'm off, you see; and, if you
will examine my passport when I get back, you will be able
to judge whether I have accomplished the journey agreed upon."

"Oh, that would be quite unnecessary, Mr. Fogg," said Ralph politely.
"We will trust your word, as a gentleman of honour."

"You do not forget when you are due in London again?"  asked Stuart.

"In eighty days; on Saturday, the 21st of December, 1872,
at a quarter before nine p.m.  Good-bye, gentlemen."

Phileas Fogg and his servant seated themselves in a first-class carriage
at twenty minutes before nine; five minutes later the whistle screamed,
and the train slowly glided out of the station.

The night was dark, and a fine, steady rain was falling.
Phileas Fogg, snugly ensconced in his corner, did not open his lips.
Passepartout, not yet recovered from his stupefaction,
clung mechanically to the carpet-bag, with its enormous treasure.

Just as the train was whirling through Sydenham,
Passepartout suddenly uttered a cry of despair.

"What's the matter?" asked Mr. Fogg.

"Alas!  In my hurry--I--I forgot--"

"What?"

"To turn off the gas in my room!"

"Very well, young man," returned Mr. Fogg, coolly; "it will burn--
at your expense."





Chapter V


IN WHICH A NEW SPECIES OF FUNDS, UNKNOWN TO THE MONEYED MEN,
APPEARS ON 'CHANGE


Phileas Fogg rightly suspected that his departure from London
would create a lively sensation at the West End.  The news of the
bet spread through the Reform Club, and afforded an exciting topic
of conversation to its members.  From the club it soon got into
the papers throughout England.  The boasted "tour of the world"
was talked about, disputed, argued with as much warmth as if the
subject were another Alabama claim.  Some took sides with Phileas
Fogg, but the large majority shook their heads and declared
against him; it was absurd, impossible, they declared, that the
tour of the world could be made, except theoretically and on paper,
in this minimum of time, and with the existing means of travelling.
The Times, Standard, Morning Post, and Daily News, and twenty other
highly respectable newspapers scouted Mr. Fogg's project as madness;
the Daily Telegraph alone hesitatingly supported him.  People in general
thought him a lunatic, and blamed his Reform Club friends for having
accepted a wager which betrayed the mental aberration of its proposer.

Articles no less passionate than logical appeared on the question,
for geography is one of the pet subjects of the English;
and the columns devoted to Phileas Fogg's venture were eagerly
devoured by all classes of readers.  At first some rash individuals,
principally of the gentler sex, espoused his cause, which became
still more popular when the Illustrated London News came out
with his portrait, copied from a photograph in the Reform Club.
A few readers of the Daily Telegraph even dared to say,
"Why not, after all?  Stranger things have come to pass."

At last a long article appeared, on the 7th of October, in the bulletin
of the Royal Geographical Society, which treated the question from
every point of view, and demonstrated the utter folly of the enterprise.

Everything, it said, was against the travellers, every obstacle imposed
alike by man and by nature.  A miraculous agreement of the times of departure
and arrival, which was impossible, was absolutely necessary to his success.
He might, perhaps, reckon on the arrival of trains at the designated hours,
in Europe, where the distances were relatively moderate; but when
he calculated upon crossing India in three days, and the United States
in seven, could he rely beyond misgiving upon accomplishing his task?
There were accidents to machinery, the liability of trains to run off the line,
collisions, bad weather, the blocking up by snow--were not all these against
Phileas Fogg?  Would he not find himself, when travelling by steamer in winter,
at the mercy of the winds and fogs?  Is it uncommon for the best ocean steamers
to be two or three days behind time?  But a single delay would suffice to
fatally break the chain of communication; should Phileas Fogg once miss,
even by an hour; a steamer, he would have to wait for the next,
and that would irrevocably render his attempt vain.

This article made a great deal of noise, and, being copied into
all the papers, seriously depressed the advocates of the rash tourist.

Everybody knows that England is the world of betting men, who are
of a higher class than mere gamblers; to bet is in the English temperament.
Not only the members of the Reform, but the general public, made heavy wagers
for or against Phileas Fogg, who was set down in the betting books as if
he were a race-horse.  Bonds were issued, and made their appearance on 'Change;
"Phileas Fogg bonds" were offered at par or at a premium, and a great business
was done in them.  But five days after the article in the bulletin of the
Geographical Society appeared, the demand began to subside:  "Phileas Fogg"
declined.  They were offered by packages, at first of five, then of ten,
until at last nobody would take less than twenty, fifty, a hundred!

Lord Albemarle, an elderly paralytic gentleman, was now the only advocate
of Phileas Fogg left.  This noble lord, who was fastened to his chair,
would have given his fortune to be able to make the tour of the world,
if it took ten years; and he bet five thousand pounds on Phileas Fogg.
When the folly as well as the uselessness of the adventure was pointed out
to him, he contented himself with replying, "If the thing is feasible,
the first to do it ought to be an Englishman."

The Fogg party dwindled more and more, everybody was going against him,
and the bets stood a hundred and fifty and two hundred to one;
and a week after his departure an incident occurred which deprived him
of backers at any price.

The commissioner of police was sitting in his office at nine o'clock
one evening, when the following telegraphic dispatch was put into his hands:

Suez to London.

Rowan, Commissioner of Police, Scotland Yard:

I've found the bank robber, Phileas Fogg.  Send with out delay warrant
of arrest to Bombay.

Fix, Detective.

The effect of this dispatch was instantaneous.  The polished gentleman
disappeared to give place to the bank robber.  His photograph, which was
hung with those of the rest of the members at the Reform Club,
was minutely examined, and it betrayed, feature by feature,
the description of the robber which had been provided to the police.
The mysterious habits of Phileas Fogg were recalled; his solitary ways,
his sudden departure; and it seemed clear that, in undertaking a tour
round the world on the pretext of a wager, he had had no other end in view
than to elude the detectives, and throw them off his track.




Chapter VI

IN WHICH FIX, THE DETECTIVE, BETRAYS A VERY NATURAL IMPATIENCE


The circumstances under which this telegraphic dispatch about
Phileas Fogg was sent were as follows:

The steamer Mongolia, belonging to the Peninsular and Oriental Company,
built of iron, of two thousand eight hundred tons burden, and five hundred
horse-power, was due at eleven o'clock a.m. on Wednesday, the 9th of October,
at Suez.  The Mongolia plied regularly between Brindisi and Bombay via
the Suez Canal, and was one of the fastest steamers belonging to the company,
always making more than ten knots an hour between Brindisi and Suez,
and nine and a half between Suez and Bombay.

Two men were promenading up and down the wharves, among the crowd
of natives and strangers who were sojourning at this once straggling village--
now, thanks to the enterprise of M. Lesseps, a fast-growing town.  One was
the British consul at Suez, who, despite the prophecies of the
English Government, and the unfavourable predictions of Stephenson,
was in the habit of seeing, from his office window, English ships
daily passing to and fro on the great canal, by which the old roundabout
route from England to India by the Cape of Good Hope was abridged
by at least a half.  The other was a small, slight-built personage,
with a nervous, intelligent face, and bright eyes peering out
from under eyebrows which he was incessantly twitching.
He was just now manifesting unmistakable signs of impatience,
nervously pacing up and down, and unable to stand still for a moment.
This was Fix, one of the detectives who had been dispatched from England
in search of the bank robber; it was his task to narrowly watch every
passenger who arrived at Suez, and to follow up all who seemed to
be suspicious characters, or bore a resemblance to the description
of the criminal, which he had received two days before from the
police headquarters at London.  The detective was evidently inspired
by the hope of obtaining the splendid reward which would be the prize
of success, and awaited with a feverish impatience, easy to understand,
the arrival of the steamer Mongolia.

"So you say, consul," asked he for the twentieth time, "that this steamer
is never behind time?"

"No, Mr. Fix," replied the consul.  "She was bespoken yesterday at Port Said,
and the rest of the way is of no account to such a craft.  I repeat that
the Mongolia has been in advance of the time required by the company's
regulations, and gained the prize awarded for excess of speed."

"Does she come directly from Brindisi?"

"Directly from Brindisi; she takes on the Indian mails there,
and she left there Saturday at five p.m.  Have patience, Mr. Fix;
she will not be late.  But really, I don't see how, from the
description you have, you will be able to recognise your man,
even if he is on board the Mongolia."

"A man rather feels the presence of these fellows, consul,
than recognises them.  You must have a scent for them,
and a scent is like a sixth sense which combines hearing,
seeing, and smelling.  I've arrested more than one of these gentlemen
in my time, and, if my thief is on board, I'll answer for it;
he'll not slip through my fingers."

"I hope so, Mr. Fix, for it was a heavy robbery."

"A magnificent robbery, consul; fifty-five thousand pounds!
We don't often have such windfalls.  Burglars are getting to be so
contemptible nowadays!  A fellow gets hung for a handful of shillings!"

"Mr. Fix," said the consul, "I like your way of talking, and hope
you'll succeed; but I fear you will find it far from easy.
Don't you see, the description which you have there has
a singular resemblance to an honest man?"

"Consul," remarked the detective, dogmatically, "great robbers
always resemble honest folks.  Fellows who have rascally faces
have only one course to take, and that is to remain honest;
otherwise they would be arrested off-hand.  The artistic thing is,
to unmask honest countenances; it's no light task, I admit,
but a real art."

Mr. Fix evidently was not wanting in a tinge of self-conceit.

Little by little the scene on the quay became more animated;
sailors of various nations, merchants, ship-brokers, porters, fellahs,
bustled to and fro as if the steamer were immediately expected.
The weather was clear, and slightly chilly.  The minarets of the town
loomed above the houses in the pale rays of the sun.  A jetty pier,
some two thousand yards along, extended into the roadstead.
A number of fishing-smacks and coasting boats, some retaining
the fantastic fashion of ancient galleys, were discernible on the Red Sea.

As he passed among the busy crowd, Fix, according to habit,
scrutinised the passers-by with a keen, rapid glance.

It was now half-past ten.

"The steamer doesn't come!" he exclaimed, as the port clock struck.

"She can't be far off now," returned his companion.

"How long will she stop at Suez?"

"Four hours; long enough to get in her coal.  It is thirteen hundred
and ten miles from Suez to Aden, at the other end of the Red Sea,
and she has to take in a fresh coal supply."

"And does she go from Suez directly to Bombay?"

"Without putting in anywhere."

"Good!" said Fix.  "If the robber is on board he will no doubt
get off at Suez, so as to reach the Dutch or French colonies in
Asia by some other route.  He ought to know that he would not be
safe an hour in India, which is English soil."

"Unless," objected the consul, "he is exceptionally shrewd.
An English criminal, you know, is always better concealed
n London than anywhere else."

This observation furnished the detective food for thought,
and meanwhile the consul went away to his office.  Fix, left alone,
was more impatient than ever, having a presentiment that the
robber was on board the Mongolia.  If he had indeed left London
intending to reach the New World, he would naturally take the
route via India, which was less watched and more difficult
to watch than that of the Atlantic.  But Fix's reflections were
soon interrupted by a succession of sharp whistles, which announced
the arrival of the Mongolia.  The porters and fellahs rushed
down the quay, and a dozen boats pushed off from the shore to go
and meet the steamer.  Soon her gigantic hull appeared passing
along between the banks, and eleven o'clock struck as she anchored
in the road.  She brought an unusual number of passengers,
some of whom remained on deck to scan the picturesque panorama
of the town, while the greater part disembarked in the boats,
and landed on the quay.

Fix took up a position, and carefully examined each face
and figure which made its appearance.  Presently one of
the passengers, after vigorously pushing his way through the
importunate crowd of porters, came up to him and politely asked if
he could point out the English consulate, at the same time showing
a passport which he wished to have visaed.  Fix instinctively took
the passport, and with a rapid glance read the description
of its bearer.  An involuntary motion of surprise nearly escaped him,
for the description in the passport was identical with that of the
bank robber which he had received from Scotland Yard.

"Is this your passport?" asked he.

"No, it's my master's."

"And your master is--"

"He stayed on board."

"But he must go to the consul's in person, so as to establish his identity."

"Oh, is that necessary?"

"Quite indispensable."

"And where is the consulate?"

"There, on the corner of the square," said Fix, pointing to
a house two hundred steps off.

"I'll go and fetch my master, who won't be much pleased, however,
to be disturbed."

The passenger bowed to Fix, and returned to the steamer.




Chapter VII

WHICH ONCE MORE DEMONSTRATES THE USELESSNESS OF PASSPORTS
AS AIDS TO DETECTIVES


The detective passed down the quay, and rapidly made his way to
the consul's office, where he was at once admitted to the presence
of that official.

"Consul," said he, without preamble, "I have strong reasons
for believing that my man is a passenger on the Mongolia."
And he narrated what had just passed concerning the passport.

"Well, Mr. Fix," replied the consul, "I shall not be sorry to
see the rascal's face; but perhaps he won't come here--that is,
if he is the person you suppose him to be.  A robber doesn't quite
like to leave traces of his flight behind him; and, besides,
he is not obliged to have his passport countersigned."

"If he is as shrewd as I think he is, consul, he will come."

"To have his passport visaed?"

"Yes.  Passports are only good for annoying honest folks,
and aiding in the flight of rogues.  I assure you it will be quite
the thing for him to do; but I hope you will not visa the passport."

"Why not?  If the passport is genuine I have no right to refuse."

"Still, I must keep this man here until I can get a warrant to
arrest him from London."

"Ah, that's your look-out.  But I cannot--"

The consul did not finish his sentence, for as he spoke a knock was heard
at the door, and two strangers entered, one of whom was the servant
whom Fix had met on the quay.  The other, who was his master,
held out his passport with the request that the consul would do him
the favour to visa it.  The consul took the document and carefully read it,
whilst Fix observed, or rather devoured, the stranger with his eyes
from a corner of the room.

"You are Mr. Phileas Fogg?" said the consul, after reading the passport.

"I am."

"And this man is your servant?"

"He is: a Frenchman, named Passepartout."

"You are from London?"

"Yes."

"And you are going--"

"To Bombay."

"Very good, sir.  You know that a visa is useless, and that no passport
is required?"

"I know it, sir," replied Phileas Fogg; "but I wish to prove,
by your visa, that I came by Suez."

"Very well, sir."

The consul proceeded to sign and date the passport, after which
he added his official seal.  Mr. Fogg paid the customary fee,
coldly bowed, and went out, followed by his servant.

"Well?" queried the detective.

"Well, he looks and acts like a perfectly honest man," replied the consul.

"Possibly; but that is not the question.  Do you think, consul,
that this phelgmatic gentleman resembles, feature by feature,
the robber whose description I have received?"

"I concede that; but then, you know, all descriptions--"

"I'll make certain of it," interrupted Fix.  "The servant seems
to me less mysterious than the master; besides, he's a Frenchman,
and can't help talking.  Excuse me for a little while, consul."

Fix started off in search of Passepartout.

Meanwhile Mr. Fogg, after leaving the consulate, repaired to
the quay, gave some orders to Passepartout, went off to
the    Mongolia in a boat, and descended to his cabin.
He took up his note-book, which contained the following memoranda:

"Left London, Wednesday, October 2nd, at 8.45 p.m.
"Reached Paris, Thursday, October 3rd, at 7.20 a.m.
"Left Paris, Thursday, at 8.40 a.m.
"Reached Turin by Mont Cenis, Friday, October 4th, at 6.35 a.m.
"Left Turin, Friday, at 7.20 a.m.
"Arrived at Brindisi, Saturday, October 5th, at 4 p.m.
"Sailed on the Mongolia, Saturday, at 5 p.m.
"Reached Suez, Wednesday, October 9th, at 11 a.m.
"Total of hours spent, 158+; or, in days, six days and a half."

These dates were inscribed in an itinerary divided into columns,
indicating the month, the day of the month, and the day for the
stipulated and actual arrivals at each principal point Paris,
Brindisi, Suez, Bombay, Calcutta, Singapore, Hong Kong, Yokohama,
San Francisco, New York, and London--from the 2nd of October
to the 21st of December; and giving a space for setting down
the gain made or the loss suffered on arrival at each locality.
This methodical record thus contained an account of everything needed,
and Mr. Fogg always knew whether he was behind-hand or in advance
of his time.  On this Friday, October 9th, he noted his arrival at Suez,
and observed that he had as yet neither gained nor lost.
He sat down quietly to breakfast in his cabin, never once thinking
of inspecting the town, being one of those Englishmen who are wont
to see foreign countries through the eyes of their domestics.




Chapter VIII

IN WHICH PASSEPARTOUT TALKS RATHER MORE, PERHAPS, THAN IS PRUDENT


Fix soon rejoined Passepartout, who was lounging and looking about
on the quay, as if he did not feel that he, at least, was obliged
not to see anything.

"Well, my friend," said the detective, coming up with him,
"is your passport visaed?"

"Ah, it's you, is it, monsieur?" responded Passepartout.
"Thanks, yes, the passport is all right."

"And you are looking about you?"

"Yes; but we travel so fast that I seem to be journeying in a dream.
So this is Suez?"

"Yes."

"In Egypt?"

"Certainly, in Egypt."

"And in Africa?"

"In Africa."

"In Africa!" repeated Passepartout.  "Just think, monsieur,
I had no idea that we should go farther than Paris; and all that I
saw of Paris was between twenty minutes past seven and twenty
minutes before nine in the morning, between the Northern and
the Lyons stations, through the windows of a car, and in a
driving rain!  How I regret not having seen once more Pere la Chaise
and the circus in the Champs Elysees!"

"You are in a great hurry, then?"

"I am not, but my master is.  By the way, I must buy some shoes and shirts.
We came away without trunks, only with a carpet-bag."

"I will show you an excellent shop for getting what you want."

"Really, monsieur, you are very kind."

And they walked off together, Passepartout chatting volubly
as they went along.

"Above all," said he; "don't let me lose the steamer."

"You have plenty of time; it's only twelve o'clock."

Passepartout pulled out his big watch.  "Twelve!" he exclaimed;
"why, it's only eight minutes before ten."

"Your watch is slow."

"My watch?  A family watch, monsieur, which has come down from
my great-grandfather!  It doesn't vary five minutes in the year.
It's a perfect chronometer, look you."

"I see how it is," said Fix.  "You have kept London time,
which is two hours behind that of Suez.  You ought to regulate
your watch at noon in each country."

"I regulate my watch?  Never!"

"Well, then, it will not agree with the sun."

"So much the worse for the sun, monsieur.  The sun will be wrong, then!"

And the worthy fellow returned the watch to its fob with a
defiant gesture.  After a few minutes silence, Fix resumed:
"You left London hastily, then?"

"I rather think so!  Last Friday at eight o'clock in the evening,
Monsieur Fogg came home from his club, and three-quarters of an hour
afterwards we were off."

"But where is your master going?"

"Always straight ahead.  He is going round the world."

"Round the world?" cried Fix.

"Yes, and in eighty days!  He says it is on a wager; but, between us,
I don't believe a word of it.  That wouldn't be common sense.
There's something else in the wind."

"Ah!  Mr. Fogg is a character, is he?"

"I should say he was."

"Is he rich?"

"No doubt, for he is carrying an enormous sum in brand new
banknotes with him.  And he doesn't spare the money on the way,
either: he has offered a large reward to the engineer of the
Mongolia if he gets us to Bombay well in advance of time."

"And you have known your master a long time?"

"Why, no; I entered his service the very day we left London."

The effect of these replies upon the already suspicious
and excited detective may be imagined.  The hasty departure
from London soon after the robbery; the large sum carried by Mr. Fogg;
his eagerness to reach distant countries; the pretext of an
eccentric and foolhardy bet--all confirmed Fix in his theory.
He continued to pump poor Passepartout, and learned that he really
knew little or nothing of his master, who lived a solitary
existence in London, was said to be rich, though no one knew
whence came his riches, and was mysterious and impenetrable
in his affairs and habits.  Fix felt sure that Phileas Fogg
would not land at Suez, but was really going on to Bombay.

"Is Bombay far from here?" asked Passepartout.

"Pretty far.  It is a ten days' voyage by sea."

"And in what country is Bombay?"

"India."

"In Asia?"

"Certainly."

"The deuce!  I was going to tell you there's one thing that worries me--
my burner!"

"What burner?"

"My gas-burner, which I forgot to turn off, and which is at
this moment burning at my expense.  I have calculated, monsieur,
that I lose two shillings every four and twenty hours, exactly
sixpense more than I earn; and you will understand that the longer
our journey--"

Did Fix pay any attention to Passepartout's trouble about the gas?
It is not probable.  He was not listening, but was cogitating a project.
Passepartout and he had now reached the shop, where Fix left his companion
to make his purchases, after recommending him not to miss the steamer,
and hurried back to the consulate.  Now that he was fully convinced,
Fix had quite recovered his equanimity.

"Consul," said he, "I have no longer any doubt.  I have spotted my man.
He passes himself off as an odd stick who is going round the world
in eighty days."

"Then he's a sharp fellow," returned the consul, "and counts on
returning to London after putting the police of the two countries
off his track."

"We'll see about that," replied Fix.

"But are you not mistaken?"

"I am not mistaken."

"Why was this robber so anxious to prove, by the visa,
that he had passed through Suez?"

"Why?  I have no idea; but listen to me."

He reported in a few words the most important parts
of his conversation with Passepartout.

"In short," said the consul, "appearances are wholly against this man.
And what are you going to do?"

"Send a dispatch to London for a warrant of arrest to be dispatched
instantly to Bombay, take passage on board the Mongolia, follow my rogue
to India, and there, on English ground, arrest him politely, with my warrant
in my hand, and my hand on his shoulder."

Having uttered these words with a cool, careless air, the detective
took leave of the consul, and repaired to the telegraph office,
whence he sent the dispatch which we have seen to the London police office.
A quarter of an hour later found Fix, with a small bag in his hand,
proceeding on board the Mongolia; and, ere many moments longer,
the noble steamer rode out at full steam upon the waters of the Red Sea.





Chapter IX

IN WHICH THE RED SEA AND THE INDIAN OCEAN PROVE PROPITIOUS
TO THE DESIGNS OF PHILEAS FOGG


The distance between Suez and Aden is precisely thirteen hundred
and ten miles, and the regulations of the company allow the
steamers one hundred and thirty-eight hours in which to traverse it.
The Mongolia, thanks to the vigorous exertions of the engineer,
seemed likely, so rapid was her speed, to reach her destination
considerably within that time.  The greater part of the passengers
from Brindisi were bound for India some for Bombay, others for Calcutta
by way of Bombay, the nearest route thither, now that a railway crosses
the Indian peninsula.  Among the passengers was a number of officials
and military officers of various grades, the latter being either attached
to the regular British forces or commanding the Sepoy troops,
and receiving high salaries ever since the central
government has assumed the powers of the East India Company:
for the sub-lieutenants get 280 pounds, brigadiers, 2,400 pounds,
and generals of divisions, 4,000 pounds.  What with the military men,
a number of rich young Englishmen on their travels, and the hospitable
efforts of the purser, the time passed quickly on the Mongolia.
The best of fare was spread upon the cabin tables at breakfast,
lunch, dinner, and the eight o'clock supper, and the ladies
scrupulously changed their toilets twice a day; and the hours
were whirled away, when the sea was tranquil, with music, dancing, and games.

But the Red Sea is full of caprice, and often boisterous, like most long
and narrow gulfs.  When the wind came from the African or Asian coast
the Mongolia, with her long hull, rolled fearfully.  Then the ladies
speedily disappeared below; the pianos were silent; singing and dancing
suddenly ceased.  Yet the good ship ploughed straight on, unretarded by wind
or wave, towards the straits of Bab-el-Mandeb.  What was Phileas Fogg
doing all this time?  It might be thought that, in his anxiety, he would
be constantly watching the changes of the wind, the disorderly raging
of the billows--every chance, in short, which might force the Mongolia
to slacken her speed, and thus interrupt his journey.  But, if he thought
of these possibilities, he did not betray the fact by any outward sign.

Always the same impassible member of the Reform Club, whom no
incident could surprise, as unvarying as the ship's chronometers,
and seldom having the curiosity even to go upon the deck, he passed
through the memorable scenes of the Red Sea with cold indifference;
did not care to recognise the historic towns and villages which,
along its borders, raised their picturesque outlines against the sky;
and betrayed no fear of the dangers of the Arabic Gulf, which the old
historians always spoke of with horror, and upon which the ancient
navigators never ventured without propitiating the gods by ample sacrifices.
How did this eccentric personage pass his time on the Mongolia?  He made his
four hearty meals every day, regardless of the most persistent rolling
and pitching on the part of the steamer; and he played whist indefatigably,
for he had found partners as enthusiastic in the game as himself.
A tax-collector, on the way to his post at Goa; the Rev. Decimus Smith,
returning to his parish at Bombay; and a brigadier-general of the English army,
who was about to rejoin his brigade at Benares, made up the party, and,
with Mr. Fogg, played whist by the hour together in absorbing silence.

As for Passepartout, he, too, had escaped sea-sickness, and took his meals
conscientiously in the forward cabin.  He rather enjoyed the voyage,
for he was well fed and well lodged, took a great interest in the scenes
through which they were passing, and consoled himself with the delusion
that his master's whim would end at Bombay.  He was pleased, on the day after
leaving Suez, to find on deck the obliging person with whom he had walked
and chatted on the quays.

"If I am not mistaken," said he, approaching this person, with his most
amiable smile, "you are the gentleman who so kindly volunteered
to guide me at Suez?"

"Ah!  I quite recognise you.  You are the servant of the strange Englishman--"

"Just so, monsieur--"

"Fix."

"Monsieur Fix," resumed Passepartout, "I'm charmed to find you on board.
Where are you bound?"

"Like you, to Bombay."

"That's capital!  Have you made this trip before?"

"Several times.  I am one of the agents of the Peninsular Company."

"Then you know India?"

"Why yes," replied Fix, who spoke cautiously.

"A curious place, this India?"

"Oh, very curious.  Mosques, minarets, temples, fakirs, pagodas, tigers,
snakes, elephants!  I hope you will have ample time to see the sights."

"I hope so, Monsieur Fix.  You see, a man of sound sense ought not
to spend his life jumping from a steamer upon a railway train,
and from a railway train upon a steamer again, pretending to make the tour
of the world in eighty days!  No; all these gymnastics, you may be sure,
will cease at Bombay."

"And Mr. Fogg is getting on well?" asked Fix, in the most natural
tone in the world.

"Quite well, and I too.  I eat like a famished ogre; it's the sea air.

"But I never see your master on deck."

"Never; he hasn't the least curiosity."

"Do you know, Mr. Passepartout, that this pretended tour in eighty days
may conceal some secret errand--perhaps a diplomatic mission?"

"Faith, Monsieur Fix, I assure you I know nothing about it,
nor would I give half a crown to find out."

After this meeting, Passepartout and Fix got into the habit
of chatting together, the latter making it a point to gain
the worthy man's confidence.  He frequently offered him a glass
of whiskey or pale ale in the steamer bar-room, which Passepartout
never failed to accept with graceful alacrity, mentally pronouncing
Fix the best of good fellows.

Meanwhile the Mongolia was pushing forward rapidly; on the 13th,
Mocha, surrounded by its ruined walls whereon date-trees were growing,
was sighted, and on the mountains beyond were espied vast coffee-fields.
Passepartout was ravished to behold this celebrated place, and thought that,
with its circular walls and dismantled fort, it looked like an immense
coffee-cup and saucer. The following night they passed through the Strait
of Bab-el-Mandeb, which means in Arabic The Bridge of Tears, and the
next day they put in at Steamer Point, north-west of Aden harbour,
to take in coal.  This matter of fuelling steamers is a serious
one at such distances from the coal-mines; it costs the Peninsular
Company some eight hundred thousand pounds a year.  In these
distant seas, coal is worth three or four pounds sterling a ton.

The Mongolia had still sixteen hundred and fifty miles to traverse
before reaching Bombay, and was obliged to remain four hours at
Steamer Point to coal up.  But this delay, as it was foreseen,
did not affect Phileas Fogg's programme; besides, the Mongolia,
instead of reaching Aden on the morning of the 15th, when she was due,
arrived there on the evening of the 14th, a gain of fifteen hours.

Mr. Fogg and his servant went ashore at Aden to have the passport
again visaed; Fix, unobserved, followed them.  The visa procured,
Mr. Fogg returned on board to resume his former habits; while Passepartout,
according to custom, sauntered about among the mixed population of Somanlis,
Banyans, Parsees, Jews, Arabs, and Europeans who comprise the twenty-five
thousand inhabitants of Aden.  He gazed with wonder upon the fortifications
which make this place the Gibraltar of the Indian Ocean, and the vast cisterns
where the English engineers were still at work, two thousand years after
the engineers of Solomon.

"Very curious, very curious," said Passepartout to himself,
on returning to the steamer.  "I see that it is by no means useless
to travel, if a man wants to see something new."  At six p.m.
the Mongolia slowly moved out of the roadstead, and was soon
once more on the Indian Ocean.  She had a hundred and sixty-eight hours
in which to reach Bombay, and the sea was favourable, the wind being
in the north-west, and all sails aiding the engine.  The steamer
rolled but little, the ladies, in fresh toilets, reappeared
on deck, and the singing and dancing were resumed.  The trip
was being accomplished most successfully, and Passepartout
was enchanted with the congenial companion which chance had secured
him in the person of the delightful Fix.  On Sunday, October 20th,
towards noon, they came in sight of the Indian coast: two hours
later the pilot came on board.  A range of hills lay against the
sky in the horizon, and soon the rows of palms which adorn Bombay
came distinctly into view.  The steamer entered the road formed by
the islands in the bay, and at half-past four she hauled up at the
quays of Bombay.

Phileas Fogg was in the act of finishing the thirty-third rubber
of the voyage, and his partner and himself having, by a bold stroke,
captured all thirteen of the tricks, concluded this fine campaign
with a brilliant victory.

The Mongolia was due at Bombay on the 22nd; she arrived on the
20th.  This was a gain to Phileas Fogg of two days since his
departure from London, and he calmly entered the fact in the
itinerary, in the column of gains.




Chapter X

IN WHICH PASSEPARTOUT IS ONLY TOO GLAD TO GET OFF
WITH THE LOSS OF HIS SHOES


Everybody knows that the great reversed triangle of land, with its
base in the north and its apex in the south, which is called India,
embraces fourteen hundred thousand square miles, upon which is spread
unequally a population of one hundred and eighty millions of souls.
The British Crown exercises a real and despotic dominion over the
larger portion of this vast country, and has a governor-general
stationed at Calcutta, governors at Madras, Bombay, and in Bengal,
and a lieutenant-governor at Agra.

But British India, properly so called, only embraces seven
hundred thousand square miles, and a population of from
one hundred to one hundred and ten millions of inhabitants.
A considerable portion of India is still free from British authority;
and there are certain ferocious rajahs in the interior who are
absolutely independent.  The celebrated East India Company
was all-powerful from 1756, when the English first gained a foothold
on the spot where now stands the city of Madras, down to the time
of the great Sepoy insurrection.  It gradually annexed province
after province, purchasing them of the native chiefs, whom it seldom paid,
and appointed the governor-general and his subordinates, civil and military.
But the East India Company has now passed away, leaving the British
possessions in India directly under the control of the Crown.
The aspect of the country, as well as the manners and distinctions of race,
is daily changing.

Formerly one was obliged to travel in India by the old cumbrous methods
of going on foot or on horseback, in palanquins or unwieldly coaches;
now fast steamboats ply on the Indus and the Ganges, and a great railway,
with branch lines joining the main line at many points on its route,
traverses the peninsula from Bombay to Calcutta in three days.
This railway does not run in a direct line across India.
The distance between Bombay and Calcutta, as the bird flies,
is only from one thousand to eleven hundred miles;
but the deflections of the road increase this distance by more than a third.

The general route of the Great Indian Peninsula Railway is as follows:
Leaving Bombay, it passes through Salcette, crossing to the continent
opposite Tannah, goes over the chain of the Western Ghauts,
runs thence north-east as far as Burhampoor, skirts the nearly
independent territory of Bundelcund, ascends to Allahabad,
turns thence eastwardly, meeting the Ganges at Benares,
then departs from the river a little, and, descending south-eastward
by Burdivan and the French town of Chandernagor, has its terminus at Calcutta.

The passengers of the Mongolia went ashore at half-past four p.m.;
at exactly eight the train would start for Calcutta.

Mr. Fogg, after bidding good-bye to his whist partners, left the steamer,
gave his servant several errands to do, urged it upon him to be at the station
promptly at eight, and, with his regular step, which beat to the second,
like a astronomical clock, directed his steps to the passport office.
As for the wonders of Bombay its famous city hall, its splendid library,
its forts and docks, its bazaars, mosques, synagogues, its Armenian churches,
and the noble pagoda on Malabar Hill, with its two polygonal towers--
he cared not a straw to see them.  He would not deign to examine
even the masterpieces of Elephanta, or the mysterious hypogea,
concealed south-east from the docks, or those fine remains of Buddhist
architecture, the Kanherian grottoes of the island of Salcette.

Having transacted his business at the passport office, Phileas Fogg
repaired quietly to the railway station, where he ordered dinner.
Among the dishes served up to him, the landlord especially recommended
a certain giblet of "native rabbit," on which he prided himself.

Mr. Fogg accordingly tasted the dish, but, despite its spiced sauce,
found it far from palatable.  He rang for the landlord, and,
on his appearance, said, fixing his clear eyes upon him,
"Is this rabbit, sir?"

"Yes, my lord," the rogue boldly replied, "rabbit from the jungles."

"And this rabbit did not mew when he was killed?"

"Mew, my lord!  What, a rabbit mew!  I swear to you--"

"Be so good, landlord, as not to swear, but remember this:
cats were formerly considered, in India, as sacred animals.
That was a good time."

"For the cats, my lord?"

"Perhaps for the travellers as well!"

After which Mr. Fogg quietly continued his dinner.  Fix had gone
on shore shortly after Mr. Fogg, and his first destination was
the headquarters of the Bombay police.  He made himself known
as a London detective, told his business at Bombay, and the
position of affairs relative to the supposed robber, and nervously
asked if a warrant had arrived from London.  It had not reached
the office; indeed, there had not yet been time for it to arrive.
Fix was sorely disappointed, and tried to obtain an order of arrest
from the director of the Bombay police.  This the director refused,
as the matter concerned the London office, which alone could legally
deliver the warrant.  Fix did not insist, and was fain to resign himself
to await the arrival of the important document; but he was determined
not to lose sight of the mysterious rogue as long as he stayed in Bombay.
He did not doubt for a moment, any more than Passepartout, that Phileas Fogg
would remain there, at least until it was time for the warrant to arrive.

Passepartout, however, had no sooner heard his master's orders
on leaving the Mongolia than he saw at once that they were to
leave Bombay as they had done Suez and Paris, and that the journey
would be extended at least as far as Calcutta, and perhaps beyond
that place.  He began to ask himself if this bet that Mr. Fogg
talked about was not really in good earnest, and whether his fate
was not in truth forcing him, despite his love of repose, around
the world in eighty days!

Having purchased the usual quota of shirts and shoes, he took
a leisurely promenade about the streets, where crowds of people
of many nationalities--Europeans, Persians with pointed caps,
Banyas with round turbans, Sindes with square bonnets, Parsees
with black mitres, and long-robed Armenians--were collected.
It happened to be the day of a Parsee festival.  These descendants
of the sect of Zoroaster--the most thrifty, civilised, intelligent,
and austere of the East Indians, among whom are counted the richest
native merchants of Bombay--were celebrating a sort of religious carnival,
with processions and shows, in the midst of which Indian dancing-girls,
clothed in rose-coloured gauze, looped up with gold and silver,
danced airily, but with perfect modesty, to the sound of viols
and the clanging of tambourines.  It is needless to say that Passepartout
watched these curious ceremonies with staring eyes and gaping mouth,
and that his countenance was that of the greenest booby imaginable.

Unhappily for his master, as well as himself, his curiosity
drew him unconsciously farther off than he intended to go.
At last, having seen the Parsee carnival wind away in the distance,
he was turning his steps towards the station, when he happened
to espy the splendid pagoda on Malabar Hill, and was seized with
an irresistible desire to see its interior.  He was quite ignorant
that it is forbidden to Christians to enter certain Indian temples,
and that even the faithful must not go in without first leaving their
shoes outside the door.  It may be said here that the wise policy
of the British Government severely punishes a disregard of the practices
of the native religions.

Passepartout, however, thinking no harm, went in like a simple tourist,
and was soon lost in admiration of the splendid Brahmin ornamentation
which everywhere met his eyes, when of a sudden he found himself sprawling
on the sacred flagging.  He looked up to behold three enraged priests,
who forthwith fell upon him; tore off his shoes, and began to beat him
with loud, savage exclamations.  The agile Frenchman was soon upon his feet
again, and lost no time in knocking down two of his long-gowned
adversaries with his fists and a vigorous application of his toes;
then, rushing out of the pagoda as fast as his legs could carry him,
he soon escaped the third priest by mingling with the crowd in the streets.

At five minutes before eight, Passepartout, hatless, shoeless,
and having in the squabble lost his package of shirts and shoes,
rushed breathlessly into the station.

Fix, who had followed Mr. Fogg to the station, and saw that he
was really going to leave Bombay, was there, upon the platform.
He had resolved to follow the supposed robber to Calcutta,
and farther, if necessary.  Passepartout did not observe the
detective, who stood in an obscure corner; but Fix heard him
relate his adventures in a few words to Mr. Fogg.

"I hope that this will not happen again," said Phileas Fogg coldly,
as he got into the train.  Poor Passepartout, quite crestfallen,
followed his master without a word.  Fix was on the point of entering
another carriage, when an idea struck him which induced him to alter his plan.

"No, I'll stay," muttered he.  "An offence has been committed on Indian soil.
I've got my man."

Just then the locomotive gave a sharp screech, and the train passed out
into the darkness of the night.



Chapter XI

IN WHICH PHILEAS FOGG SECURES A CURIOUS MEANS OF CONVEYANCE
AT A FABULOUS PRICE


The train had started punctually.  Among the passengers were
a number of officers, Government officials, and opium and indigo
merchants, whose business called them to the eastern coast.
Passepartout rode in the same carriage with his master, and a
third passenger occupied a seat opposite to them.  This was
Sir Francis Cromarty, one of Mr. Fogg's whist partners
on the Mongolia, now on his way to join his corps at Benares.
Sir Francis was a tall, fair man of fifty, who had greatly
distinguished himself in the last Sepoy revolt.  He made India
his home, only paying brief visits to England at rare intervals;
and was almost as familiar as a native with the customs, history,
and character of India and its people.  But Phileas Fogg, who was
not travelling, but only describing a circumference, took no pains
to inquire into these subjects; he was a solid body, traversing
an orbit around the terrestrial globe, according to the laws
of rational mechanics.  He was at this moment calculating in his mind
the number of hours spent since his departure from London, and,
had it been in his nature to make a useless demonstration,
would have rubbed his hands for satisfaction.  Sir Francis Cromarty
had observed the oddity of his travelling companion--although the
only opportunity he had for studying him had been while he was
dealing the cards, and between two rubbers--and questioned himself
whether a human heart really beat beneath this cold exterior,
and whether Phileas Fogg had any sense of the beauties of nature.
The brigadier-general was free to mentally confess that,
of all the eccentric persons he had ever met, none was comparable
to this product of the exact sciences.

Phileas Fogg had not concealed from Sir Francis his design of going
round the world, nor the circumstances under which he set out;
and the general only saw in the wager a useless eccentricity
and a lack of sound common sense.  In the way this strange gentleman
was going on, he would leave the world without having done any good
to himself or anybody else.

An hour after leaving Bombay the train had passed the viaducts
and the Island of Salcette, and had got into the open country.
At Callyan they reached the junction of the branch line which
descends towards south-eastern India by Kandallah and Pounah;
and, passing Pauwell, they entered the defiles of the mountains,
with their basalt bases, and their summits crowned with thick
and verdant forests.  Phileas Fogg and Sir Francis Cromarty exchanged
a few words from time to time, and now Sir Francis, reviving the conversation,
observed, "Some years ago, Mr. Fogg, you would have met with a delay
at this point which would probably have lost you your wager."

"How so, Sir Francis?"

"Because the railway stopped at the base of these mountains,
which the passengers were obliged to cross in palanquins
or on ponies to Kandallah, on the other side."

"Such a delay would not have deranged my plans in the least,"
said Mr. Fogg.  "I have constantly foreseen the likelihood of
certain obstacles."

"But, Mr. Fogg," pursued Sir Francis, "you run the risk of
having some difficulty about this worthy fellow's adventure
at the pagoda."  Passepartout, his feet comfortably wrapped
in his travelling-blanket, was sound asleep and did not dream
that anybody was talking about him.  "The Government is very severe
upon that kind of offence.  It takes particular care that the
religious customs of the Indians should be respected,
and if your servant were caught--"

"Very well, Sir Francis," replied Mr. Fogg; "if he had been
caught he would have been condemned and punished, and then would
have quietly returned to Europe.  I don't see how this affair
could have delayed his master."

The conversation fell again.  During the night the train left
the mountains behind, and passed Nassik, and the next day
proceeded over the flat, well-cultivated country of the Khandeish,
with its straggling villages, above which rose the minarets
of the pagodas.  This fertile territory is watered by numerous
small rivers and limpid streams, mostly tributaries of the Godavery.

Passepartout, on waking and looking out, could not realise
that he was actually crossing India in a railway train.
The locomotive, guided by an English engineer and fed with English
coal, threw out its smoke upon cotton, coffee, nutmeg, clove,
and pepper plantations, while the steam curled in spirals around
groups of palm-trees, in the midst of which were seen picturesque
bungalows, viharis (sort of abandoned monasteries), and marvellous
temples enriched by the exhaustless ornamentation of Indian architecture.
Then they came upon vast tracts extending to the horizon, with jungles
inhabited by snakes and tigers, which fled at the noise of the train;
succeeded by forests penetrated by the railway, and still haunted
by elephants which, with pensive eyes, gazed at the train as it passed.
The travellers crossed, beyond Milligaum, the fatal country so often
stained with blood by the sectaries of the goddess Kali.  Not far off
rose Ellora, with its graceful pagodas, and the famous Aurungabad,
capital of the ferocious Aureng-Zeb, now the chief town of one of the
detached provinces of the kingdom of the Nizam.  It was thereabouts
that Feringhea, the Thuggee chief, king of the stranglers, held his sway.
These ruffians, united by a secret bond, strangled victims of every age
in honour of the goddess Death, without ever shedding blood; there was
a period when this part of the country could scarcely be travelled over
without corpses being found in every direction.  The English Government
has succeeded in greatly diminishing these murders, though the Thuggees
still exist, and pursue the exercise of their horrible rites.

At half-past twelve the train stopped at Burhampoor where
Passepartout was able to purchase some Indian slippers,
ornamented with false pearls, in which, with evident vanity,
he proceeded to encase his feet.  The travellers made a hasty breakfast
and started off for Assurghur, after skirting for a little the banks
of the small river Tapty, which empties into the Gulf of Cambray, near Surat.

Passepartout was now plunged into absorbing reverie.  Up to
his arrival at Bombay, he had entertained hopes that their journey
would end there; but, now that they were plainly whirling across
India at full speed, a sudden change had come over the spirit of
his dreams.  His old vagabond nature returned to him; the fantastic
ideas of his youth once more took possession of him.  He came to regard
his master's project as intended in good earnest, believed in the reality
of the bet, and therefore in the tour of the world and the necessity
of making it without fail within the designated period.  Already he began
to worry about possible delays, and accidents which might happen on the way.
He recognised himself as being personally interested in the wager,
and trembled at the thought that he might have been the means of losing it
by his unpardonable folly of the night before.  Being much less cool-headed
than Mr. Fogg, he was much more restless, counting and recounting the
days passed over, uttering maledictions when the train stopped,
and accusing it of sluggishness, and mentally blaming Mr. Fogg
for not having bribed the engineer.  The worthy fellow was ignorant that,
while it was possible by such means to hasten the rate of a steamer,
it could not be done on the railway.

The train entered the defiles of the Sutpour Mountains, which separate
the Khandeish from Bundelcund, towards evening.  The next day Sir Francis
Cromarty asked Passepartout what time it was; to which, on consulting
his watch, he replied that it was three in the morning.  This famous timepiece,
always regulated on the Greenwich meridian, which was now some seventy-seven
degrees westward, was at least four hours slow.  Sir Francis corrected
Passepartout's time, whereupon the latter made the same remark that he had
done to Fix; and up on the general insisting that the watch should be
regulated in each new meridian, since he was constantly going eastward,
that is in the face of the sun, and therefore the days were shorter
by four minutes for each degree gone over, Passepartout obstinately refused
to alter his watch, which he kept at London time.  It was an innocent delusion
which could harm no one.

The train stopped, at eight o'clock, in the midst of a glade some
fifteen miles beyond Rothal, where there were several bungalows,
and workmen's cabins.  The conductor, passing along the carriages,
shouted, "Passengers will get out here!"

Phileas Fogg looked at Sir Francis Cromarty for an explanation;
but the general could not tell what meant a halt in the midst
of this forest of dates and acacias.

Passepartout, not less surprised, rushed out and speedily returned, crying:
"Monsieur, no more railway!"

"What do you mean?" asked Sir Francis.

"I mean to say that the train isn't going on."

The general at once stepped out, while Phileas Fogg calmly followed him,
and they proceeded together to the conductor.

"Where are we?" asked Sir Francis.

"At the hamlet of Kholby."

"Do we stop here?"

"Certainly.  The railway isn't finished."

"What! not finished?"

"No.  There's still a matter of fifty miles to be laid
from here to Allahabad, where the line begins again."

"But the papers announced the opening of the railway throughout."

"What would you have, officer?  The papers were mistaken."

"Yet you sell tickets from Bombay to Calcutta," retorted Sir Francis,
who was growing warm.

"No doubt," replied the conductor; "but the passengers know
that they must provide means of transportation for themselves
from Kholby to Allahabad."

Sir Francis was furious.  Passepartout would willingly have knocked
the conductor down, and did not dare to look at his master.

"Sir Francis," said Mr. Fogg quietly, "we will, if you please,
look about for some means of conveyance to Allahabad."

"Mr. Fogg, this is a delay greatly to your disadvantage."

"No, Sir Francis; it was foreseen."

"What!  You knew that the way--"

"Not at all; but I knew that some obstacle or other would sooner or later
arise on my route.  Nothing, therefore, is lost. I have two days,
which I have already gained, to sacrifice.  A steamer leaves Calcutta
for Hong Kong at noon, on the 25th.  This is the 22nd, and we shall
reach Calcutta in time."

There was nothing to say to so confident a response.

It was but too true that the railway came to a termination at this point.
The papers were like some watches, which have a way of getting too fast,
and had been premature in their announcement of the completion of the line.
The greater part of the travellers were aware of this interruption, and,
leaving the train, they began to engage such vehicles as the village
could provide four-wheeled palkigharis, waggons drawn by zebus,
carriages that looked like perambulating pagodas, palanquins, ponies,
and what not.

Mr. Fogg and Sir Francis Cromarty, after searching the village
from end to end, came back without having found anything.

"I shall go afoot," said Phileas Fogg.

Passepartout, who had now rejoined his master, made a wry grimace,
as he thought of his magnificent, but too frail Indian shoes.
Happily he too had been looking about him, and, after a moment's hesitation,
said, "Monsieur, I think I have found a means of conveyance."

"What?"

"An elephant!  An elephant that belongs to an Indian who lives
but a hundred steps from here."

"Let's go and see the elephant," replied Mr. Fogg.

They soon reached a small hut, near which, enclosed within
some high palings, was the animal in question.  An Indian came
out of the hut, and, at their request, conducted them within
the enclosure.  The elephant, which its owner had reared, not for
a beast of burden, but for warlike purposes, was half domesticated.
The Indian had begun already, by often irritating him, and feeding
him every three months on sugar and butter, to impart to him
a ferocity not in his nature, this method being often employed
by those who train the Indian elephants for battle.  Happily,
however, for Mr. Fogg, the animal's instruction in this direction
had not gone far, and the elephant still preserved his natural
gentleness.  Kiouni--this was the name of the beast--could
doubtless travel rapidly for a long time, and, in default of
any other means of conveyance, Mr. Fogg resolved to hire him.
But elephants are far from cheap in India, where they are becoming
scarce, the males, which alone are suitable for circus shows,
are much sought, especially as but few of them are domesticated.
When therefore Mr. Fogg proposed to the Indian to hire Kiouni,
he refused point-blank.  Mr. Fogg persisted, offering the excessive
sum of ten pounds an hour for the loan of the beast to Allahabad.
Refused.  Twenty pounds?  Refused also.  Forty pounds?  Still refused.
Passepartout jumped at each advance; but the Indian declined to be tempted.
Yet the offer was an alluring one, for, supposing it took the elephant
fifteen hours to reach Allahabad, his owner would receive no less than
six hundred pounds sterling.

Phileas Fogg, without getting in the least flurried, then proposed
to purchase the animal outright, and at first offered a thousand pounds
for him.  The Indian, perhaps thinking he was going to make a great bargain,
still refused.

Sir Francis Cromarty took Mr. Fogg aside, and begged him to reflect
before he went any further; to which that gentleman replied that
he was not in the habit of acting rashly, that a bet of twenty thousand
pounds was at stake, that the elephant was absolutely necessary to him,
and that he would secure him if he had to pay twenty times his value.
Returning to the Indian, whose small, sharp eyes, glistening with avarice,
betrayed that with him it was only a question of how great a price
he could obtain.  Mr. Fogg offered first twelve hundred, then fifteen hundred,
eighteen hundred, two thousand pounds.  Passepartout, usually so rubicund,
was fairly white with suspense.

At two thousand pounds the Indian yielded.

"What a price, good heavens!" cried Passepartout, "for an elephant.

It only remained now to find a guide, which was comparatively easy.
A young Parsee, with an intelligent face, offered his services,
which Mr. Fogg accepted, promising so generous a reward as to materially
stimulate his zeal.  The elephant was led out and equipped.  The Parsee,
who was an accomplished elephant driver, covered his back with a sort
of saddle-cloth, and attached to each of his flanks some curiously
uncomfortable howdahs.  Phileas Fogg paid the Indian with some banknotes
which he extracted from the famous carpet-bag, a proceeding that seemed
to deprive poor Passepartout of his vitals.  Then he offered to carry
Sir Francis to Allahabad, which the brigadier gratefully accepted,
as one traveller the more would not be likely to fatigue the
gigantic beast.  Provisions were purchased at Kholby, and,
while Sir Francis and Mr. Fogg took the howdahs on either side,
Passepartout got astride the saddle-cloth between them.
The Parsee perched himself on the elephant's neck, and at nine o'clock
they set out from the village, the animal marching off through the
dense forest of palms by the shortest cut.




Chapter XII

IN WHICH PHILEAS FOGG AND HIS COMPANIONS
VENTURE ACROSS THE INDIAN FORESTS, AND WHAT ENSUED


In order to shorten the journey, the guide passed to the left of the line
where the railway was still in process of being built.  This line,
owing to the capricious turnings of the Vindhia Mountains,
did not pursue a straight course.  The Parsee, who was quite familiar
with the roads and paths in the district, declared that they would gain
twenty miles by striking directly through the forest.

Phileas Fogg and Sir Francis Cromarty, plunged to the neck
in the peculiar howdahs provided for them, were horribly jostled
by the swift trotting of the elephant, spurred on as he was by
the skilful Parsee; but they endured the discomfort with true
British phlegm, talking little, and scarcely able to catch a glimpse
of each other.  As for Passepartout, who was mounted on the beast's back,
and received the direct force of each concussion as he trod along,
he was very careful, in accordance with his master's advice,
to keep his tongue from between his teeth, as it would otherwise
have been bitten off short.  The worthy fellow bounced from
the elephant's neck to his rump, and vaulted like a clown on a spring-board;
yet he laughed in the midst of his bouncing, and from time to time took
a piece of sugar out of his pocket, and inserted it in Kiouni's trunk,
who received it without in the least slackening his regular trot.

After two hours the guide stopped the elephant, and gave him
an hour for rest, during which Kiouni, after quenching his thirst
at a neighbouring spring, set to devouring the branches and shrubs
round about him.  Neither Sir Francis nor Mr. Fogg regretted
the delay, and both descended with a feeling of relief.  "Why, he's
made of iron!" exclaimed the general, gazing admiringly on Kiouni.

"Of forged iron," replied Passepartout, as he set about preparing
a hasty breakfast.

At noon the Parsee gave the signal of departure.  The country
soon presented a very savage aspect.  Copses of dates and
dwarf-palms succeeded the dense forests; then vast, dry plains,
dotted with scanty shrubs, and sown with great blocks of syenite.
All this portion of Bundelcund, which is little frequented
by travellers, is inhabited by a fanatical population,
hardened in the most horrible practices of the Hindoo faith.
The English have not been able to secure complete dominion over
this territory, which is subjected to the influence of rajahs,
whom it is almost impossible to reach in their inaccessible
mountain fastnesses. The travellers several times saw bands
of ferocious Indians, who, when they perceived the elephant
striding across-country, made angry arid threatening motions.
The Parsee avoided them as much as possible.  Few animals were
observed on the route; even the monkeys hurried from their path
with contortions and grimaces which convulsed Passepartout with laughter.

In the midst of his gaiety, however, one thought troubled the worthy servant.
What would Mr. Fogg do with the elephant when he got to Allahabad?
Would he carry him on with him?  Impossible!  The cost of transporting him
would make him ruinously expensive.  Would he sell him, or set him free?
The estimable beast certainly deserved some consideration.  Should Mr. Fogg
choose to make him, Passepartout, a present of Kiouni, he would be very much
embarrassed; and these thoughts did not cease worrying him for a long time.

The principal chain of the Vindhias was crossed by eight in the evening,
and another halt was made on the northern slope, in a ruined bungalow.
They had gone nearly twenty-five miles that day, and an equal distance
still separated them from the station of Allahabad.

The night was cold.  The Parsee lit a fire in the bungalow
with a few dry branches, and the warmth was very grateful,
provisions purchased at Kholby sufficed for supper, and the
travellers ate ravenously.  The conversation, beginning with a few
disconnected phrases, soon gave place to loud and steady snores.
The guide watched Kiouni, who slept standing, bolstering himself
against the trunk of a large tree.  Nothing occurred during the
night to disturb the slumberers, although occasional growls front
panthers and chatterings of monkeys broke the silence; the more
formidable beasts made no cries or hostile demonstration against
the occupants of the bungalow.  Sir Francis slept heavily, like an
honest soldier overcome with fatigue.  Passepartout was wrapped in
uneasy dreams of the bouncing of the day before.  As for Mr. Fogg,
he slumbered as peacefully as if he had been in his serene mansion
in Saville Row.

The journey was resumed at six in the morning; the guide hoped
to reach Allahabad by evening.  In that case, Mr. Fogg would only
lose a part of the forty-eight hours saved since the beginning
of the tour.  Kiouni, resuming his rapid gait, soon descended
the lower spurs of the Vindhias, and towards noon they passed
by the village of Kallenger, on the Cani, one of the branches
of the Ganges.  The guide avoided inhabited places, thinking it safer
to keep the open country, which lies along the first depressions
of the basin of the great river.  Allahabad was now only twelve miles
to the north-east.  They stopped under a clump of bananas,
the fruit of which, as healthy as bread and as succulent as cream,
was amply partaken of and appreciated.

At two o'clock the guide entered a thick forest which extended
several miles; he preferred to travel under cover of the woods.
They had not as yet had any unpleasant encounters, and the journey
seemed on the point of being successfully accomplished, when the
elephant, becoming restless, suddenly stopped.

It was then four o'clock.

"What's the matter?" asked Sir Francis, putting out his head.

"I don't know, officer," replied the Parsee, listening attentively
to a confused murmur which came through the thick branches.

The murmur soon became more distinct; it now seemed like a distant
concert of human voices accompanied by brass instruments.
Passepartout was all eyes and ears.  Mr. Fogg patiently
waited without a word.  The Parsee jumped to the ground,
fastened the elephant to a tree, and plunged into the thicket.
He soon returned, saying:

"A procession of Brahmins is coming this way.  We must prevent
their seeing us, if possible."

The guide unloosed the elephant and led him into a thicket,
at the same time asking the travellers not to stir.  He held himself
ready to bestride the animal at a moment's notice, should flight
become necessary; but he evidently thought that the procession
of the faithful would pass without perceiving them amid
the thick foliage, in which they were wholly concealed.

The discordant tones of the voices and instruments drew nearer,
and now droning songs mingled with the sound of the tambourines and cymbals.
The head of the procession soon appeared beneath the trees,
a hundred paces away; and the strange figures who performed the religious
ceremony were easily distinguished through the branches.
First came the priests, with mitres on their heads,
and clothed in long lace robes.  They were surrounded by men,
women, and children, who sang a kind of lugubrious psalm,
interrupted at regular intervals by the tambourines and cymbals;
while behind them was drawn a car with large wheels,
the spokes of which represented serpents entwined with each other.
Upon the car, which was drawn by four richly caparisoned zebus,
stood a hideous statue with four arms, the body coloured a dull red,
with haggard eyes, dishevelled hair, protruding tongue, and lips tinted
with betel.  It stood upright upon the figure of a prostrate
and headless giant.

Sir Francis, recognising the statue, whispered, "The goddess Kali;
the goddess of love and death."

"Of death, perhaps," muttered back Passepartout, "but of love--
that ugly old hag?  Never!"

The Parsee made a motion to keep silence.

A group of old fakirs were capering and making a wild ado round the statue;
these were striped with ochre, and covered with cuts whence their blood
issued drop by drop--stupid fanatics, who, in the great Indian ceremonies,
still throw themselves under the wheels of Juggernaut.  Some Brahmins,
clad in all the sumptuousness of Oriental apparel, and leading a woman
who faltered at every step, followed.  This woman was young, and as
fair as a European.  Her head and neck, shoulders, ears, arms,
hands, and toes were loaded down with jewels and gems with bracelets,
earrings, and rings; while a tunic bordered with gold, and covered
with a light muslin robe, betrayed the outline of her form.

The guards who followed the young woman presented a violent contrast
to her, armed as they were with naked sabres hung at their waists,
and long damascened pistols, and bearing a corpse on a palanquin.
It was the body of an old man, gorgeously arrayed in the habiliments
of a rajah, wearing, as in life, a turban embroidered with pearls,
a robe of tissue of silk and gold, a scarf of cashmere sewed with diamonds,
and the magnificent weapons of a Hindoo prince.  Next came the musicians
and a rearguard of capering fakirs, whose cries sometimes drowned the noise
of the instruments; these closed the procession.

Sir Francis watched the procession with a sad countenance, and,
turning to the guide, said, "A suttee."

The Parsee nodded, and put his finger to his lips.  The procession slowly
wound under the trees, and soon its last ranks disappeared in the depths
of the wood.  The songs gradually died away; occasionally cries were heard
in the distance, until at last all was silence again.

Phileas Fogg had heard what Sir Francis said, and, as soon as
the procession had disappeared, asked: "What is a suttee?"

"A suttee," returned the general, "is a human sacrifice, but a voluntary one.
The woman you have just seen will be burned to-morrow at the dawn of day."

"Oh, the scoundrels!" cried Passepartout, who could not repress
his indignation.

"And the corpse?" asked Mr. Fogg.

"Is that of the prince, her husband," said the guide; "an independent
rajah of Bundelcund."

"Is it possible," resumed Phileas Fogg, his voice betraying not
the least emotion, "that these barbarous customs still exist in India,
and that the English have been unable to put a stop to them?"

"These sacrifices do not occur in the larger portion of India,"
replied Sir Francis; "but we have no power over these savage territories,
and especially here in Bundelcund.  The whole district north of the Vindhias
is the theatre of incessant murders and pillage."

"The poor wretch!" exclaimed Passepartout, "to be burned alive!"

"Yes," returned Sir Francis, "burned alive.  And, if she were not,
you cannot conceive what treatment she would be obliged to submit
to from her relatives.  They would shave off her hair, feed her
on a scanty allowance of rice, treat her with contempt;
she would be looked upon as an unclean creature, and would die
in some corner, like a scurvy dog.  The prospect of so frightful
an existence drives these poor creatures to the sacrifice
much more than love or religious fanaticism.  Sometimes, however,
the sacrifice is really voluntary, and it requires the active
interference of the Government to prevent it.  Several years ago,
when I was living at Bombay, a young widow asked permission
of the governor to be burned along with her husband's body;
but, as you may imagine, he refused.  The woman left the town,
took refuge with an independent rajah, and there carried out
her self-devoted purpose."

While Sir Francis was speaking, the guide shook his head several times,
and now said: "The sacrifice which will take place to-morrow at dawn
is not a voluntary one."

"How do you know?"

"Everybody knows about this affair in Bundelcund."

"But the wretched creature did not seem to be making any resistance,"
observed Sir Francis.

"That was because they had intoxicated her with fumes of hemp and opium."

"But where are they taking her?"

"To the pagoda of Pillaji, two miles from here; she will pass the night there."

"And the sacrifice will take place--"

"To-morrow, at the first light of dawn."

The guide now led the elephant out of the thicket, and leaped upon his neck.
Just at the moment that he was about to urge Kiouni forward with a peculiar
whistle, Mr. Fogg stopped him, and, turning to Sir Francis Cromarty, said,
"Suppose we save this woman."

"Save the woman, Mr. Fogg!"

"I have yet twelve hours to spare; I can devote them to that."

"Why, you are a man of heart!"

"Sometimes," replied Phileas Fogg, quietly; "when I have the time."




Chapter XIII

IN WHICH PASSEPARTOUT RECEIVES A NEW PROOF
THAT FORTUNE FAVORS THE BRAVE


The project was a bold one, full of difficulty, perhaps impracticable.
Mr. Fogg was going to risk life, or at least liberty, and therefore
the success of his tour.  But he did not hesitate, and he found in
Sir Francis Cromarty an enthusiastic ally.

As for Passepartout, he was ready for anything that might be proposed.
His master's idea charmed him; he perceived a heart, a soul, under that
icy exterior.  He began to love Phileas Fogg.

There remained the guide: what course would he adopt?  Would he
not take part with the Indians?  In default of his assistance,
it was necessary to be assured of his neutrality.

Sir Francis frankly put the question to him.

"Officers," replied the guide, "I am a Parsee, and this woman is a Parsee.
Command me as you will."

"Excellent!" said Mr. Fogg.

"However," resumed the guide, "it is certain, not only that
we shall risk our lives, but horrible tortures, if we are taken."

"That is foreseen," replied Mr. Fogg.  "I think we must wait till night
before acting."

"I think so," said the guide.

The worthy Indian then gave some account of the victim, who,
he said, was a celebrated beauty of the Parsee race, and the
daughter of a wealthy Bombay merchant.  She had received a
thoroughly English education in that city, and, from her manners
and intelligence, would be thought an European.  Her name was Aouda.
Left an orphan, she was married against her will to the old rajah
of Bundelcund; and, knowing the fate that awaited her, she escaped,
was retaken, and devoted by the rajah's relatives, who had an interest
in her death, to the sacrifice from which it seemed she could not escape.

The Parsee's narrative only confirmed Mr. Fogg and his companions
in their generous design.  It was decided that the guide should direct
the elephant towards the pagoda of Pillaji, which he accordingly approached
as quickly as possible.  They halted, half an hour afterwards, in a copse,
some five hundred feet from the pagoda, where they were well concealed;
but they could hear the groans and cries of the fakirs distinctly.

They then discussed the means of getting at the victim.  The guide
was familiar with the pagoda of Pillaji, in which, as he declared,
the young woman was imprisoned.  Could they enter any of its doors
while the whole party of Indians was plunged in a drunken sleep,
or was it safer to attempt to make a hole in the walls?
This could only be determined at the moment and the place themselves;
but it was certain that the abduction must be made that night,
and not when, at break of day, the victim was led to her funeral pyre.
Then no human intervention could save her.

As soon as night fell, about six o'clock, they decided to make
a reconnaissance around the pagoda.  The cries of the fakirs were
just ceasing; the Indians were in the act of plunging themselves
into the drunkenness caused by liquid opium mingled with hemp,
and it might be possible to slip between them to the temple itself.

The Parsee, leading the others, noiselessly crept through the wood,
and in ten minutes they found themselves on the banks of a small stream,
whence, by the light of the rosin torches, they perceived a pyre of wood,
on the top of which lay the embalmed body of the rajah, which was to be
burned with his wife.  The pagoda, whose minarets loomed above the trees
in the deepening dusk, stood a hundred steps away.

"Come!" whispered the guide.

He slipped more cautiously than ever through the brush,
followed by his companions; the silence around was only broken
by the low murmuring of the wind among the branches.

Soon the Parsee stopped on the borders of the glade, which was lit up
by the torches.  The ground was covered by groups of the Indians,
motionless in their drunken sleep; it seemed a battlefield strewn
with the dead.  Men, women, and children lay together.

In the background, among the trees, the pagoda of Pillaji
loomed distinctly.  Much to the guide's disappointment,
the guards of the rajah, lighted by torches, were watching
at the doors and marching to and fro with naked sabres;
probably the priests, too, were watching within.

The Parsee, now convinced that it was impossible to force
an entrance to the temple, advanced no farther, but led his
companions back again.  Phileas Fogg and Sir Francis Cromarty
also saw that nothing could be attempted in that direction.
They stopped, and engaged in a whispered colloquy.

"It is only eight now," said the brigadier, "and these guards
may also go to sleep."

"It is not impossible," returned the Parsee.

They lay down at the foot of a tree, and waited.

The time seemed long; the guide ever and anon left them
to take an observation on the edge of the wood, but the guards
watched steadily by the glare of the torches, and a dim light
crept through the windows of the pagoda.

They waited till midnight; but no change took place among the guards,
and it became apparent that their yielding to sleep could not be counted on.
The other plan must be carried out; an opening in the walls of the pagoda
must be made.  It remained to ascertain whether the priests were watching
by the side of their victim as assiduously as were the soldiers at the door.

After a last consultation, the guide announced that he was ready
for the attempt, and advanced, followed by the others.  They took
a roundabout way, so as to get at the pagoda on the rear.
They reached the walls about half-past twelve, without having met anyone;
here there was no guard, nor were there either windows or doors.

The night was dark.  The moon, on the wane, scarcely left the horizon,
and was covered with heavy clouds; the height of the trees deepened
the darkness.

It was not enough to reach the walls; an opening in them must
be accomplished, and to attain this purpose the party only had
their pocket-knives.  Happily the temple walls were built of brick
and wood, which could be penetrated with little difficulty;
after one brick had been taken out, the rest would yield easily.

They set noiselessly to work, and the Parsee on one side
and Passepartout on the other began to loosen the bricks
so as to make an aperture two feet wide.  They were getting on rapidly,
when suddenly a cry was heard in the interior of the temple,
followed almost instantly by other cries replying from the outside.
Passepartout and the guide stopped.  Had they been heard?  Was the
alarm being given?  Common prudence urged them to retire, and they
did so, followed by Phileas Fogg and Sir Francis.  They again hid
themselves in the wood, and waited till the disturbance, whatever
it might be, ceased, holding themselves ready to resume their attempt
without delay.  But, awkwardly enough, the guards now appeared
at the rear of the temple, and there installed themselves,
in readiness to prevent a surprise.

It would be difficult to describe the disappointment of the party,
thus interrupted in their work.  They could not now reach the victim;
how, then, could they save her?  Sir Francis shook his fists,
Passepartout was beside himself, and the guide gnashed his teeth with rage.
The tranquil Fogg waited, without betraying any emotion.

"We have nothing to do but to go away," whispered Sir Francis.

"Nothing but to go away," echoed the guide.

"Stop," said Fogg.  "I am only due at Allahabad tomorrow before noon."

"But what can you hope to do?" asked Sir Francis.  "In a few hours
it will be daylight, and--"

"The chance which now seems lost may present itself at the last moment."

Sir Francis would have liked to read Phileas Fogg's eyes.
What was this cool Englishman thinking of?  Was he planning
to make a rush for the young woman at the very moment
of the sacrifice, and boldly snatch her from her executioners?

This would be utter folly, and it was hard to admit that Fogg
was such a fool.  Sir Francis consented, however, to remain
to the end of this terrible drama.  The guide led them to the rear
of the glade, where they were able to observe the sleeping groups.

Meanwhile Passepartout, who had perched himself on the lower branches
of a tree, was resolving an idea which had at first struck him like a flash,
and which was now firmly lodged in his brain.

He had commenced by saying to himself, "What folly!" and then he repeated,
"Why not, after all?  It's a chance perhaps the only one; and with such sots!"
Thinking thus, he slipped, with the suppleness of a serpent,
to the lowest branches, the ends of which bent almost to the ground.

The hours passed, and the lighter shades now announced the
approach of day, though it was not yet light.  This was the moment.
The slumbering multitude became animated, the tambourines sounded,
songs and cries arose; the hour of the sacrifice had come.
The doors of the pagoda swung open, and a bright light escaped
from its interior, in the midst of which Mr. Fogg and Sir Francis
espied the victim.  She seemed, having shaken off the stupor of intoxication,
to be striving to escape from her executioner.  Sir Francis's heart throbbed;
and, convulsively seizing Mr. Fogg's hand, found in it an open knife.
Just at this moment the crowd began to move.  The young woman had again
fallen into a stupor caused by the fumes of hemp, and passed among
the fakirs, who escorted her with their wild, religious cries.

Phileas Fogg and his companions, mingling in the rear ranks of the crowd,
followed; and in two minutes they reached the banks of the stream,
and stopped fifty paces from the pyre, upon which still lay the rajah's corpse.
In the semi-obscurity they saw the victim, quite senseless, stretched out
beside her husband's body. Then a torch was brought, and the wood,
heavily soaked with oil, instantly took fire.

At this moment Sir Francis and the guide seized Phileas Fogg, who,
in an instant of mad generosity, was about to rush upon the pyre.
But he had quickly pushed them aside, when the whole scene suddenly changed.
A cry of terror arose.  The whole multitude prostrated themselves,
terror-stricken, on the ground.

The old rajah was not dead, then, since he rose of a sudden,
like a spectre, took up his wife in his arms, and descended from
the pyre in the midst of the clouds of smoke, which only
heightened his ghostly appearance.

Fakirs and soldiers and priests, seized with instant terror,
lay there, with their faces on the ground, not daring to lift
their eyes and behold such a prodigy.

The inanimate victim was borne along by the vigorous arms which
supported her, and which she did not seem in the least to burden.
Mr. Fogg and Sir Francis stood erect, the Parsee bowed his head,
and Passepartout was, no doubt, scarcely less stupefied.

The resuscitated rajah approached Sir Francis and Mr. Fogg,
and, in an abrupt tone, said, "Let us be off!"

It was Passepartout himself, who had slipped upon the pyre
in the midst of the smoke and, profiting by the still
overhanging darkness, had delivered the young woman from death!
It was Passepartout who, playing his part with a happy audacity,
had passed through the crowd amid the general terror.

A moment after all four of the party had disappeared in the woods,
and the elephant was bearing them away at a rapid pace. But the cries
and noise, and a ball which whizzed through Phileas Fogg's hat,
apprised them that the trick had been discovered.

The old rajah's body, indeed, now appeared upon the burning pyre;
and the priests, recovered from their terror, perceived that an abduction
had taken place.  They hastened into the forest, followed by the soldiers,
who fired a volley after the fugitives; but the latter rapidly increased
the distance between them, and ere long found themselves beyond the reach
of the bullets and arrows.




Chapter XIV

IN WHICH PHILEAS FOGG DESCENDS THE WHOLE LENGTH OF THE BEAUTIFUL
VALLEY OF THE GANGES WITHOUT EVER THINKING OF SEEING IT


The rash exploit had been accomplished; and for an hour
Passepartout laughed gaily at his success.  Sir Francis pressed
the worthy fellow's hand, and his master said, "Well done!" which,
from him, was high commendation; to which Passepartout replied
that all the credit of the affair belonged to Mr. Fogg.  As for him,
he had only been struck with a "queer" idea; and he laughed
to think that for a few moments he, Passepartout, the ex-gymnast,
ex-sergeant fireman, had been the spouse of a charming woman,
a venerable, embalmed rajah!  As for the young Indian woman,
she had been unconscious throughout of what was passing, and now,
wrapped up in a travelling-blanket, was reposing in one of the howdahs.

The elephant, thanks to the skilful guidance of the Parsee,
was advancing rapidly through the still darksome forest, and,
an hour after leaving the pagoda, had crossed a vast plain.
They made a halt at seven o'clock, the young woman being still
in a state of complete prostration.  The guide made her drink a little
brandy and water, but the drowsiness which stupefied her could not
yet be shaken off.  Sir Francis, who was familiar with the effects
of the intoxication produced by the fumes of hemp, reassured his
companions on her account.  But he was more disturbed at the
prospect of her future fate.  He told Phileas Fogg that,
should Aouda remain in India, she would inevitably fall again
into the hands of her executioners.  These fanatics were scattered
throughout the county, and would, despite the English police,
recover their victim at Madras, Bombay, or Calcutta.  She would
only be safe by quitting India for ever.

Phileas Fogg replied that he would reflect upon the matter.

The station at Allahabad was reached about ten o'clock, and,
the interrupted line of railway being resumed, would enable them
to reach Calcutta in less than twenty-four hours.  Phileas Fogg
would thus be able to arrive in time to take the steamer which
left Calcutta the next day, October 25th, at noon, for Hong Kong.

The young woman was placed in one of the waiting-rooms of the station,
whilst Passepartout was charged with purchasing for her various articles
of toilet, a dress, shawl, and some furs; for which his master gave him
unlimited credit.  Passepartout started off forthwith, and found himself
in the streets of Allahabad, that is, the City of God, one of the most
venerated in India, being built at the junction of the two sacred rivers,
Ganges and Jumna, the waters of which attract pilgrims from every part
of the peninsula.  The Ganges, according to the legends of the Ramayana,
rises in heaven, whence, owing to Brahma's agency, it descends to the earth.

Passepartout made it a point, as he made his purchases, to take
a good look at the city.  It was formerly defended by a noble fort,
which has since become a state prison; its commerce has dwindled away,
and Passepartout in vain looked about him for such a bazaar as he used
to frequent in Regent Street.  At last he came upon an elderly,
crusty Jew, who sold second-hand articles, and from whom he purchased
a dress of Scotch stuff, a large mantle, and a fine otter-skin pelisse,
for which he did not hesitate to pay seventy-five pounds.  He then
returned triumphantly to the station.

The influence to which the priests of Pillaji had subjected Aouda
began gradually to yield, and she became more herself,
so that her fine eyes resumed all their soft Indian expression.

When the poet-king, Ucaf Uddaul, celebrates the charms
of the queen of Ahmehnagara, he speaks thus:

"Her shining tresses, divided in two parts, encircle the harmonious
contour of her white and delicate cheeks, brilliant in their glow
and freshness.  Her ebony brows have the form and charm of the bow of Kama,
the god of love, and beneath her long silken lashes the purest reflections
and a celestial light swim, as in the sacred lakes of Himalaya,
in the black pupils of her great clear eyes.  Her teeth, fine,
equal, and white, glitter between her smiling lips like dewdrops
in a passion-flower's half-enveloped breast.  Her delicately formed ears,
her vermilion hands, her little feet, curved and tender as the lotus-bud,
glitter with the brilliancy of the loveliest pearls of Ceylon,
the most dazzling diamonds of Golconda.  Her narrow and supple waist,
which a hand may clasp around, sets forth the outline of her rounded
figure and the beauty of her bosom, where youth in its flower displays
the wealth of its treasures; and beneath the silken folds of her tunic
she seems to have been modelled in pure silver by the godlike hand
of Vicvarcarma, the immortal sculptor."

It is enough to say, without applying this poetical rhapsody to Aouda,
that she was a charming woman, in all the European acceptation of the phrase.
She spoke English with great purity, and the guide had not exaggerated
in saying that the young Parsee had been transformed by her bringing up.

The train was about to start from Allahabad, and Mr. Fogg
proceeded to pay the guide the price agreed upon for his service,
and not a farthing more; which astonished Passepartout,
who remembered all that his master owed to the guide's devotion.
He had, indeed, risked his life in the adventure at Pillaji, and,
if he should be caught afterwards by the Indians, he would with
difficulty escape their vengeance.  Kiouni, also, must be disposed of.
What should be done with the elephant, which had been so dearly purchased?
Phileas Fogg had already determined this question.

"Parsee," said he to the guide, "you have been serviceable and devoted.
I have paid for your service, but not for your devotion.  Would you like
to have this elephant?  He is yours."

The guide's eyes glistened.

"Your honour is giving me a fortune!" cried he.

"Take him, guide," returned Mr. Fogg, "and I shall still be your debtor."

"Good!" exclaimed Passepartout.  "Take him, friend.  Kiouni is a brave
and faithful beast."  And, going up to the elephant, he gave him several
lumps of sugar, saying, "Here, Kiouni, here, here."

The elephant grunted out his satisfaction, and, clasping Passepartout
around the waist with his trunk, lifted him as high as his head.
Passepartout, not in the least alarmed, caressed the animal,
which replaced him gently on the ground.

Soon after, Phileas Fogg, Sir Francis Cromarty, and Passepartout,
installed in a carriage with Aouda, who had the best seat,
were whirling at full speed towards Benares.  It was a run of eighty miles,
and was accomplished in two hours.  During the journey, the young woman
fully recovered her senses.  What was her astonishment to find herself
in this carriage, on the railway, dressed in European habiliments,
and with travellers who were quite strangers to her!  Her companions
first set about fully reviving her with a little liquor,
and then Sir Francis narrated to her what had passed,
dwelling upon the courage with which Phileas Fogg
had not hesitated to risk his life to save her, and recounting
the happy sequel of the venture, the result of Passepartout's rash idea.
Mr. Fogg said nothing; while Passepartout, abashed, kept repeating that
"it wasn't worth telling."

Aouda pathetically thanked her deliverers, rather with tears
than words; her fine eyes interpreted her gratitude better
than her lips.  Then, as her thoughts strayed back to the scene
of the sacrifice, and recalled the dangers which still menaced her,
she shuddered with terror.

Phileas Fogg understood what was passing in Aouda's mind, and offered,
in order to reassure her, to escort her to Hong Kong, where she might remain
safely until the affair was hushed up--an offer which she eagerly
and gratefully accepted.  She had, it seems, a Parsee relation,
who was one of the principal merchants of Hong Kong, which is wholly
an English city, though on an island on the Chinese coast.

At half-past twelve the train stopped at Benares.  The Brahmin legends
assert that this city is built on the site of the ancient Casi, which,
like Mahomet's tomb, was once suspended between heaven and earth;
though the Benares of to-day, which the Orientalists call the Athens of India,
stands quite unpoetically on the solid earth, Passepartout caught glimpses
of its brick houses and clay huts, giving an aspect of desolation to the place,
as the train entered it.

Benares was Sir Francis Cromarty's destination, the troops he
was rejoining being encamped some miles northward of the city.
He bade adieu to Phileas Fogg, wishing him all success,
and expressing the hope that he would come that way again
in a less original but more profitable fashion.  Mr. Fogg lightly
pressed him by the hand.  The parting of Aouda, who did not forget
what she owed to Sir Francis, betrayed more warmth; and, as for
Passepartout, he received a hearty shake of the hand from the
gallant general.

The railway, on leaving Benares, passed for a while along the
valley of the Ganges.  Through the windows of their carriage
the travellers had glimpses of the diversified landscape of Behar,
with its mountains clothed in verdure, its fields of barley,
wheat, and corn, its jungles peopled with green alligators,
its neat villages, and its still thickly-leaved forests.
Elephants were bathing in the waters of the sacred river,
and groups of Indians, despite the advanced season and chilly air,
were performing solemnly their pious ablutions.  These were
fervent Brahmins, the bitterest foes of Buddhism, their deities
being Vishnu, the solar god, Shiva, the divine impersonation of
natural forces, and Brahma, the supreme ruler of priests and legislators.
What would these divinities think of India, anglicised as it is to-day,
with steamers whistling and scudding along the Ganges, frightening the gulls
which float upon its surface, the turtles swarming along its banks,
and the faithful dwelling upon its borders?

The panorama passed before their eyes like a flash, save when
the steam concealed it fitfully from the view; the travellers
could scarcely discern the fort of Chupenie, twenty miles
south-westward from Benares, the ancient stronghold of the rajahs
of Behar; or Ghazipur and its famous rose-water factories; or the
tomb of Lord Cornwallis, rising on the left bank of the Ganges;
the fortified town of Buxar, or Patna, a large manufacturing and
trading-place, where is held the principal opium market of India;
or Monghir, a more than European town, for it is as English as
Manchester or Birmingham, with its iron foundries, edgetool factories,
and high chimneys puffing clouds of black smoke heavenward.

Night came on; the train passed on at full speed, in the midst
of the roaring of the tigers, bears, and wolves which fled before
the locomotive; and the marvels of Bengal, Golconda ruined Gour,
Murshedabad, the ancient capital, Burdwan, Hugly, and the French
town of Chandernagor, where Passepartout would have been proud to see
his country's flag flying, were hidden from their view in the darkness.

Calcutta was reached at seven in the morning,
and the packet left for Hong Kong at noon;
so that Phileas Fogg had five hours before him.

According to his journal, he was due at Calcutta on the 25th
of October, and that was the exact date of his actual arrival.
He was therefore neither behind-hand nor ahead of time.
The two days gained between London and Bombay had been lost,
as has been seen, in the journey across India.  But it is not
to be supposed that Phileas Fogg regretted them.




Chapter XV

IN WHICH THE BAG OF BANKNOTES DISGORGES
SOME THOUSANDS OF POUNDS MORE


The train entered the station, and Passepartout jumping out first,
was followed by Mr. Fogg, who assisted his fair companion to descend.
Phileas Fogg intended to proceed at once to the Hong Kong steamer,
in order to get Aouda comfortably settled for the voyage.
He was unwilling to leave her while they were still on dangerous ground.

Just as he was leaving the station a policeman came up to him, and said,
"Mr. Phileas Fogg?"

"I am he."

"Is this man your servant?" added the policeman, pointing to Passepartout.

"Yes."

"Be so good, both of you, as to follow me."

Mr. Fogg betrayed no surprise whatever.  The policeman was a
representative of the law, and law is sacred to an Englishman.
Passepartout tried to reason about the matter, but the policeman
tapped him with his stick, and Mr. Fogg made him a signal to obey.

"May this young lady go with us?" asked he.

"She may," replied the policeman.

Mr. Fogg, Aouda, and Passepartout were conducted to a palkigahri,
a sort of four-wheeled carriage, drawn by two horses, in which they
took their places and were driven away.  No one spoke during
the twenty minutes which elapsed before they reached their destination.
They first passed through the "black town," with its narrow streets,
its miserable, dirty huts, and squalid population; then through the
"European town," which presented a relief in its bright brick mansions,
shaded by coconut-trees and bristling with masts, where, although it was
early morning, elegantly dressed horsemen and handsome equipages
were passing back and forth.

The carriage stopped before a modest-looking house, which,
however, did not have the appearance of a private mansion.
The policeman having requested his prisoners for so, truly,
they might be called-to descend, conducted them into a room
with barred windows, and said:  "You will appear before
Judge Obadiah at half-past eight."

He then retired, and closed the door.

"Why, we are prisoners!" exclaimed Passepartout, falling into a chair.

Aouda, with an emotion she tried to conceal, said to Mr. Fogg:
"Sir, you must leave me to my fate!  It is on my account that
you receive this treatment, it is for having saved me!"

Phileas Fogg contented himself with saying that it was impossible.
It was quite unlikely that he should be arrested for preventing a suttee.
The complainants would not dare present themselves with such a charge.
There was some mistake.  Moreover, he would not, in any event,
abandon Aouda, but would escort her to Hong Kong.

"But the steamer leaves at noon!" observed Passepartout, nervously.

"We shall be on board by noon," replied his master, placidly.

It was said so positively that Passepartout could not help
muttering to himself, "Parbleu that's certain!  Before noon
we shall be on board."  But he was by no means reassured.

At half-past eight the door opened, the policeman appeared, and,
requesting them to follow him, led the way to an adjoining hall.
It was evidently a court-room, and a crowd of Europeans and natives
already occupied the rear of the apartment.

Mr. Fogg and his two companions took their places on a
bench opposite the desks of the magistrate and his clerk.
Immediately after, Judge Obadiah, a fat, round man, followed by
the clerk, entered.  He proceeded to take down a wig which was
hanging on a nail, and put it hurriedly on his head.

"The first case," said he.  Then, putting his hand to his
head, he exclaimed, "Heh!  This is not my wig!"

"No, your worship," returned the clerk, "it is mine."

"My dear Mr. Oysterpuff, how can a judge give a wise sentence
in a clerk's wig?"

The wigs were exchanged.

Passepartout was getting nervous, for the hands on the face of the big clock
over the judge seemed to go around with terrible rapidity.

"The first case," repeated Judge Obadiah.

"Phileas Fogg?" demanded Oysterpuff.

"I am here," replied Mr. Fogg.

"Passepartout?"

"Present," responded Passepartout.

"Good," said the judge.  "You have been looked for, prisoners,
for two days on the trains from Bombay."

"But of what are we accused?" asked Passepartout, impatiently.

"You are about to be informed."

"I am an English subject, sir," said Mr. Fogg, "and I have the right--"

"Have you been ill-treated?"

"Not at all."

"Very well; let the complainants come in."

A door was swung open by order of the judge, and three Indian priests entered.

"That's it," muttered Passepartout; "these are the rogues
who were going to burn our young lady."

The priests took their places in front of the judge, and the clerk
proceeded to read in a loud voice a complaint of sacrilege against
Phileas Fogg and his servant, who were accused of having violated
a place held consecrated by the Brahmin religion.

"You hear the charge?" asked the judge.

"Yes, sir," replied Mr. Fogg, consulting his watch, "and I admit it."

"You admit it?"

"I admit it, and I wish to hear these priests admit, in their turn,
what they were going to do at the pagoda of Pillaji."

The priests looked at each other; they did not seem to understand
what was said.

"Yes," cried Passepartout, warmly; "at the pagoda of Pillaji,
where they were on the point of burning their victim."

The judge stared with astonishment, and the priests were stupefied.

"What victim?" said Judge Obadiah.  "Burn whom?  In Bombay itself?"

"Bombay?" cried Passepartout.

"Certainly.  We are not talking of the pagoda of Pillaji, but of the pagoda
of Malabar Hill, at Bombay."

"And as a proof," added the clerk, "here are the desecrator's very shoes,
which he left behind him."

Whereupon he placed a pair of shoes on his desk.

"My shoes!" cried Passepartout, in his surprise permitting
this imprudent exclamation to escape him.

The confusion of master and man, who had quite forgotten the
affair at Bombay, for which they were now detained at Calcutta,
may be imagined.

Fix the detective, had foreseen the advantage which Passepartout's
escapade gave him, and, delaying his departure for twelve hours,
had consulted the priests of Malabar Hill.  Knowing that the English
authorities dealt very severely with this kind of misdemeanour,
he promised them a goodly sum in damages, and sent them forward
to Calcutta by the next train.  Owing to the delay caused by the rescue
of the young widow, Fix and the priests reached the Indian capital before
Mr. Fogg and his servant, the magistrates having been already warned
by a dispatch to arrest them should they arrive.  Fix's disappointment
when he learned that Phileas Fogg had not made his appearance in Calcutta
may be imagined.  He made up his mind that the robber had stopped
somewhere on the route and taken refuge in the southern provinces.
For twenty-four hours Fix watched the station with feverish anxiety;
at last he was rewarded by seeing Mr. Fogg and Passepartout arrive,
accompanied by a young woman, whose presence he was wholly at a loss
to explain.  He hastened for a policeman; and this was how the party came
to be arrested and brought before Judge Obadiah.

Had Passepartout been a little less preoccupied, he would have
espied the detective ensconced in a corner of the court-room,
watching the proceedings with an interest easily understood;
for the warrant had failed to reach him at Calcutta,
as it had done at Bombay and Suez.

Judge Obadiah had unfortunately caught Passepartout's rash exclamation,
which the poor fellow would have given the world to recall.

"The facts are admitted?" asked the judge.

"Admitted," replied Mr. Fogg, coldly.

"Inasmuch," resumed the judge, "as the English law protects equally
and sternly the religions of the Indian people, and as the man
Passepartout has admitted that he violated the sacred pagoda of Malabar Hill,
at Bombay, on the 20th of October, I condemn the said Passepartout
to imprisonment for fifteen days and a fine of three hundred pounds."

"Three hundred pounds!" cried Passepartout, startled at the largeness
of the sum.

"Silence!" shouted the constable.

"And inasmuch," continued the judge, "as it is not proved that
the act was not done by the connivance of the master with the servant,
and as the master in any case must be held responsible for the acts
of his paid servant, I condemn Phileas Fogg to a week's imprisonment
and a fine of one hundred and fifty pounds."

Fix rubbed his hands softly with satisfaction; if Phileas Fogg
could be detained in Calcutta a week, it would be more than time
for the warrant to arrive.  Passepartout was stupefied.  This sentence
ruined his master.  A wager of twenty thousand pounds lost, because he,
like a precious fool, had gone into that abominable pagoda!

Phileas Fogg, as self-composed as if the judgment did not
in the least concern him, did not even lift his eyebrows while
it was being pronounced.  Just as the clerk was calling the next case,
he rose, and said, "I offer bail."

"You have that right," returned the judge.

Fix's blood ran cold, but he resumed his composure when he heard
the judge announce that the bail required for each prisoner
would be one thousand pounds.

"I will pay it at once," said Mr. Fogg, taking a roll of bank-bills
from the carpet-bag, which Passepartout had by him, and placing them
on the clerk's desk.

"This sum will be restored to you upon your release from prison,"
said the judge.  "Meanwhile, you are liberated on bail."

"Come!" said Phileas Fogg to his servant.

"But let them at least give me back my shoes!" cried Passepartout angrily.

"Ah, these are pretty dear shoes!" he muttered, as they were handed to him.
"More than a thousand pounds apiece; besides, they pinch my feet."

Mr. Fogg, offering his arm to Aouda, then departed, followed
by the crestfallen Passepartout.  Fix still nourished hopes
that the robber would not, after all, leave the two thousand pounds
behind him, but would decide to serve out his week in jail,
and issued forth on Mr. Fogg's traces.  That gentleman took a carriage,
and the party were soon landed on one of the quays.

The Rangoon was moored half a mile off in the harbour, its signal
of departure hoisted at the mast-head.  Eleven o'clock was striking;
Mr. Fogg was an hour in advance of time.  Fix saw them leave the carriage and
push off in a boat for the steamer, and stamped his feet with disappointment.

"The rascal is off, after all!" he exclaimed.  "Two thousand pounds sacrificed!
He's as prodigal as a thief!  I'll follow him to the end of the world
if necessary; but, at the rate he is going on, the stolen money will
soon be exhausted."

The detective was not far wrong in making this conjecture.
Since leaving London, what with travelling expenses, bribes,
the purchase of the elephant, bails, and fines, Mr. Fogg
had already spent more than five thousand pounds on the way,
and the percentage of the sum recovered from the bank robber
promised to the detectives, was rapidly diminishing.




Chapter XVI

IN WHICH FIX DOES NOT SEEM TO UNDERSTAND
IN THE LEAST WHAT IS SAID TO HIM


The Rangoon--one of the Peninsular and Oriental Company's boats
plying in the Chinese and Japanese seas--was a screw steamer,
built of iron, weighing about seventeen hundred and seventy tons,
and with engines of four hundred horse-power.  She was as fast,
but not as well fitted up, as the Mongolia, and Aouda was not as
comfortably provided for on board of her as Phileas Fogg could have wished.
However, the trip from Calcutta to Hong Kong only comprised some
three thousand five hundred miles, occupying from ten to twelve days,
and the young woman was not difficult to please.

During the first days of the journey Aouda became better acquainted
with her protector, and constantly gave evidence of her deep gratitude
for what he had done.  The phlegmatic gentleman listened to her,
apparently at least, with coldness, neither his voice nor his manner
betraying the slightest emotion; but he seemed to be always on the watch
that nothing should be wanting to Aouda's comfort.  He visited her
regularly each day at certain hours, not so much to talk himself,
as to sit and hear her talk.  He treated her with the strictest politeness,
but with the precision of an automaton, the movements of which had been
arranged for this purpose.  Aouda did not quite know what to make of him,
though Passepartout had given her some hints of his master's eccentricity,
and made her smile by telling her of the wager which was sending him
round the world.  After all, she owed Phileas Fogg her life, and she
always regarded him through the exalting medium of her gratitude.

Aouda confirmed the Parsee guide's narrative of her touching history.
She did, indeed, belong to the highest of the native races of India.
Many of the Parsee merchants have made great fortunes there by dealing
in cotton; and one of them, Sir Jametsee Jeejeebhoy, was made a baronet
by the English government.  Aouda was a relative of this great man,
and it was his cousin, Jeejeeh, whom she hoped to join at Hong Kong.
Whether she would find a protector in him she could not tell;
but Mr. Fogg essayed to calm her anxieties, and to assure her that
everything would be mathematically--he used the very word--arranged.
Aouda fastened her great eyes, "clear as thee sacred lakes of the Himalaya,"
upon him; but the intractable Fogg, as reserved as ever, did not seem
at all inclined to throw himself into this lake.

The first few days of the voyage passed prosperously, amid favourable
weather and propitious winds, and they soon came in sight of
the great Andaman, the principal of the islands in the Bay of Bengal,
with its picturesque Saddle Peak, two thousand four hundred feet high,
looming above the waters.  The steamer passed along near the shores,
but the savage Papuans, who are in the lowest scale of humanity,
but are not, as has been asserted, cannibals, did not make their appearance.

The panorama of the islands, as they steamed by them, was superb.
Vast forests of palms, arecs, bamboo, teakwood, of the gigantic mimosa,
and tree-like ferns covered the foreground, while behind, the graceful outlines
of the mountains were traced against the sky; and along the coasts swarmed
by thousands the precious swallows whose nests furnish a luxurious dish
to the tables of the Celestial Empire.  The varied landscape afforded by
the Andaman Islands was soon passed, however, and the Rangoon rapidly
approached the Straits of Malacca, which gave access to the China seas.

What was detective Fix, so unluckily drawn on from country to country,
doing all this while?  He had managed to embark on the Rangoon at Calcutta
without being seen by Passepartout, after leaving orders that,
if the warrant should arrive, it should be forwarded to him at Hong Kong;
and he hoped to conceal his presence to the end of the voyage.
It would have been difficult to explain why he was on board
without awakening Passepartout's suspicions, who thought him still at Bombay.
But necessity impelled him, nevertheless, to renew his acquaintance
with the worthy servant, as will be seen.

All the detective's hopes and wishes were now centred on Hong Kong;
for the steamer's stay at Singapore would be too brief to enable
him to take any steps there.  The arrest must be made at Hong Kong,
or the robber would probably escape him for ever.  Hong Kong was
the last English ground on which he would set foot; beyond, China,
Japan, America offered to Fogg an almost certain refuge.
If the warrant should at last make its appearance at Hong Kong,
Fix could arrest him and give him into the hands of the local police,
and there would be no further trouble.  But beyond Hong Kong,
a simple warrant would be of no avail; an extradition warrant
would be necessary, and that would result in delays and obstacles,
of which the rascal would take advantage to elude justice.

Fix thought over these probabilities during the long hours
which he spent in his cabin, and kept repeating to himself,
"Now, either the warrant will be at Hong Kong, in which case
I shall arrest my man, or it will not be there; and this time
it is absolutely necessary that I should delay his departure.
I have failed at Bombay, and I have failed at Calcutta; if I fail
at Hong Kong, my reputation is lost:  Cost what it may, I must succeed!
But how shall I prevent his departure, if that should turn out to be
my last resource?"

Fix made up his mind that, if worst came to worst, he would make
a confidant of Passepartout, and tell him what kind of a fellow
his master really was.  That Passepartout was not Fogg's accomplice,
he was very certain.  The servant, enlightened by his disclosure,
and afraid of being himself implicated in the crime, would doubtless
become an ally of the detective.  But this method was a dangerous one,
only to be employed when everything else had failed.  A word from
Passepartout to his master would ruin all.  The detective was therefore
in a sore strait.  But suddenly a new idea struck him.  The presence
of Aouda on the Rangoon, in company with Phileas Fogg, gave him
new material for reflection.

Who was this woman?  What combination of events had made her Fogg's
travelling companion?  They had evidently met somewhere between Bombay
and Calcutta; but where?  Had they met accidentally, or had Fogg gone
into the interior purposely in quest of this charming damsel?
Fix was fairly puzzled.  He asked himself whether there had not
been a wicked elopement; and this idea so impressed itself
upon his mind that he determined to make use of the supposed intrigue.
Whether the young woman were married or not, he would be able to create
such difficulties for Mr. Fogg at Hong Kong that he could not escape
by paying any amount of money.

But could he even wait till they reached Hong Kong?  Fogg had an
abominable way of jumping from one boat to another, and, before anything
could be effected, might get full under way again for Yokohama.

Fix decided that he must warn the English authorities, and signal
the Rangoon before her arrival.  This was easy to do, since the steamer
stopped at Singapore, whence there is a telegraphic wire to Hong Kong.
He finally resolved, moreover, before acting more positively,
to question Passepartout.  It would not be difficult to make him talk;
and, as there was no time to lose, Fix prepared to make himself known.

It was now the 30th of October, and on the following day the Rangoon
was due at Singapore.

Fix emerged from his cabin and went on deck.  Passepartout was
promenading up and down in the forward part of the steamer.
The detective rushed forward with every appearance of extreme
surprise, and exclaimed, "You here, on the Rangoon?"

"What, Monsieur Fix, are you on board?" returned the really
astonished Passepartout, recognising his crony of the Mongolia.
"Why, I left you at Bombay, and here you are, on the way to Hong Kong!
Are you going round the world too?"

"No, no," replied Fix; "I shall stop at Hong Kong--at least for some days."

"Hum!" said Passepartout, who seemed for an instant perplexed.
"But how is it I have not seen you on board since we left Calcutta?"

"Oh, a trifle of sea-sickness--I've been staying in my berth.
The Gulf of Bengal does not agree with me as well as the Indian Ocean.
And how is Mr. Fogg?"

"As well and as punctual as ever, not a day behind time!
But, Monsieur Fix, you don't know that we have a young lady with us."

"A young lady?" replied the detective, not seeming to comprehend
what was said.

Passepartout thereupon recounted Aouda's history, the affair
at the Bombay pagoda, the purchase of the elephant for
two thousand pounds, the rescue, the arrest, and sentence
of the Calcutta court, and the restoration of Mr. Fogg
and himself to liberty on bail.  Fix, who was familiar
with the last events, seemed to be equally ignorant of all
that Passepartout related; and the later was charmed
to find so interested a listener.

"But does your master propose to carry this young woman to Europe?"

"Not at all.  We are simply going to place her under the protection
of one of her relatives, a rich merchant at Hong Kong."

"Nothing to be done there," said Fix to himself, concealing his disappointment.
"A glass of gin, Mr. Passepartout?"

"Willingly, Monsieur Fix.  We must at least have a friendly glass
on board the Rangoon."




Chapter XVII

SHOWING WHAT HAPPENED ON THE VOYAGE FROM SINGAPORE TO HONG KONG


The detective and Passepartout met often on deck after this interview,
though Fix was reserved, and did not attempt to induce his companion
to divulge any more facts concerning Mr. Fogg.  He caught a glimpse
of that mysterious gentleman once or twice; but Mr. Fogg usually confined
himself to the cabin, where he kept Aouda company, or, according to his
inveterate habit, took a hand at whist.

Passepartout began very seriously to conjecture what strange
chance kept Fix still on the route that his master was pursuing.
It was really worth considering why this certainly very amiable
and complacent person, whom he had first met at Suez, had then
encountered on board the Mongolia, who disembarked at Bombay,
which he announced as his destination, and now turned up so
unexpectedly on the Rangoon, was following Mr. Fogg's tracks step
by step.  What was Fix's object?  Passepartout was ready to wager his
Indian shoes--which he religiously preserved--that Fix would also leave
Hong Kong at the same time with them, and probably on the same steamer.

Passepartout might have cudgelled his brain for a century without
hitting upon the real object which the detective had in view.
He never could have imagined that Phileas Fogg was being tracked
as a robber around the globe.  But, as it is in human nature to attempt
the solution of every mystery, Passepartout suddenly discovered
an explanation of Fix's movements, which was in truth far from unreasonable.
Fix, he thought, could only be an agent of Mr. Fogg's friends
at the Reform Club, sent to follow him up, and to ascertain
that he really went round the world as had been agreed upon.

"It's clear!" repeated the worthy servant to himself, proud of his shrewdness.
"He's a spy sent to keep us in view!  That isn't quite the thing, either,
to be spying Mr. Fogg, who is so honourable a man!  Ah, gentlemen of the Reform,
this shall cost you dear!"

Passepartout, enchanted with his discovery, resolved to say
nothing to his master, lest he should be justly offended at this
mistrust on the part of his adversaries.  But he determined
to chaff Fix, when he had the chance, with mysterious allusions,
which, however, need not betray his real suspicions.

During the afternoon of Wednesday, 30th October, the Rangoon
entered the Strait of Malacca, which separates the peninsula
of that name from Sumatra.  The mountainous and craggy islets
intercepted the beauties of this noble island from the view
of the travellers.  The Rangoon weighed anchor at Singapore the next day
at four a.m., to receive coal, having gained half a day on the prescribed
time of her arrival.  Phileas Fogg noted this gain in his journal, and then,
accompanied by Aouda, who betrayed a desire for a walk on shore, disembarked.

Fix, who suspected Mr. Fogg's every movement, followed them cautiously,
without being himself perceived; while Passepartout, laughing in his sleeve
at Fix's manoeuvres, went about his usual errands.

The island of Singapore is not imposing in aspect, for there are
no mountains; yet its appearance is not without attractions.
It is a park checkered by pleasant highways and avenues.
A handsome carriage, drawn by a sleek pair of New Holland horses,
carried Phileas Fogg and Aouda into the midst of rows of palms
with brilliant foliage, and of clove-trees, whereof the cloves
form the heart of a half-open flower.  Pepper plants replaced
the prickly hedges of European fields; sago-bushes, large ferns
with gorgeous branches, varied the aspect of this tropical clime;
while nutmeg-trees in full foliage filled the air with a penetrating perfume.
Agile and grinning bands of monkeys skipped about in the trees, nor were tigers
wanting in the jungles.

After a drive of two hours through the country, Aouda and Mr. Fogg
returned to the town, which is a vast collection of heavy-looking,
irregular houses, surrounded by charming gardens rich in tropical fruits
and plants; and at ten o'clock they re-embarked, closely followed by
the detective, who had kept them constantly in sight.

Passepartout, who had been purchasing several dozen mangoes--
a fruit as large as good-sized apples, of a dark-brown colour
outside and a bright red within, and whose white pulp, melting in
the mouth, affords gourmands a delicious sensation--was waiting
for them on deck.  He was only too glad to offer some mangoes
to Aouda, who thanked him very gracefully for them.

At eleven o'clock the Rangoon rode out of Singapore harbour,
and in a few hours the high mountains of Malacca, with their forests,
inhabited by the most beautifully-furred tigers in the world,
were lost to view.  Singapore is distant some thirteen hundred miles
from the island of Hong Kong, which is a little English colony
near the Chinese coast.  Phileas Fogg hoped to accomplish the journey
in six days, so as to be in time for the steamer which would leave
on the 6th of November for Yokohama, the principal Japanese port.

The Rangoon had a large quota of passengers, many of whom disembarked
at Singapore, among them a number of Indians, Ceylonese, Chinamen,
Malays, and Portuguese, mostly second-class travellers.

The weather, which had hitherto been fine, changed with the
last quarter of the moon.  The sea rolled heavily, and the wind
at intervals rose almost to a storm, but happily blew from
the south-west, and thus aided the steamer's progress.
The captain as often as possible put up his sails,
and under the double action of steam and sail the vessel made
rapid progress along the coasts of Anam and Cochin China.
Owing to the defective construction of the Rangoon, however,
unusual precautions became necessary in unfavourable weather;
but the loss of time which resulted from this cause, while it
nearly drove Passepartout out of his senses, did not seem
to affect his master in the least.  Passepartout blamed the captain,
the engineer, and the crew, and consigned all who were connected
with the ship to the land where the pepper grows.  Perhaps the thought
of the gas, which was remorselessly burning at his expense in Saville Row,
had something to do with his hot impatience.

"You are in a great hurry, then," said Fix to him one day, "to reach Hong Kong?"

"A very great hurry!"

"Mr. Fogg, I suppose, is anxious to catch the steamer for Yokohama?"

"Terribly anxious."

"You believe in this journey around the world, then?"

"Absolutely.  Don't you, Mr. Fix?"

"I?  I don't believe a word of it."

"You're a sly dog!" said Passepartout, winking at him.

This expression rather disturbed Fix, without his knowing why.
Had the Frenchman guessed his real purpose?  He knew not what
to think.  But how could Passepartout have discovered that he
was a detective?  Yet, in speaking as he did, the man evidently
meant more than he expressed.

Passepartout went still further the next day; he could not hold his tongue.

"Mr. Fix," said he, in a bantering tone, "shall we be so unfortunate
as to lose you when we get to Hong Kong?"

"Why," responded Fix, a little embarrassed, "I don't know; perhaps--"

"Ah, if you would only go on with us!  An agent of the Peninsular Company,
you know, can't stop on the way!  You were only going to Bombay,
and here you are in China.  America is not far off, and from America
to Europe is only a step."

Fix looked intently at his companion, whose countenance was
as serene as possible, and laughed with him.  But Passepartout
persisted in chaffing him by asking him if he made much by his
present occupation.

"Yes, and no," returned Fix; "there is good and bad luck in such things.
But you must understand that I don't travel at my own expense."

"Oh, I am quite sure of that!" cried Passepartout, laughing heartily.

Fix, fairly puzzled, descended to his cabin and gave himself
up to his reflections.  He was evidently suspected; somehow
or other the Frenchman had found out that he was a detective.
But had he told his master?  What part was he playing in all this:
was he an accomplice or not?  Was the game, then, up?  Fix spent
several hours turning these things over in his mind, sometimes
thinking that all was lost, then persuading himself that Fogg
was ignorant of his presence, and then undecided what course
it was best to take.

Nevertheless, he preserved his coolness of mind, and at last
resolved to deal plainly with Passepartout.  If he did not find it
practicable to arrest Fogg at Hong Kong, and if Fogg made preparations
to leave that last foothold of English territory, he, Fix, would tell
Passepartout all.  Either the servant was the accomplice of his master,
and in this case the master knew of his operations, and he should fail;
or else the servant knew nothing about the robbery, and then his interest
would be to abandon the robber.

Such was the situation between Fix and Passepartout.  Meanwhile Phileas Fogg
moved about above them in the most majestic and unconscious indifference.
He was passing methodically in his orbit around the world, regardless of
the lesser stars which gravitated around him.  Yet there was near by what
the astronomers would call a disturbing star, which might have produced
an agitation in this gentleman's heart.  But no! the charms of Aouda
failed to act, to Passepartout's great surprise; and the disturbances,
if they existed, would have been more difficult to calculate than those
of Uranus which led to the discovery of Neptune.

It was every day an increasing wonder to Passepartout, who read
in Aouda's eyes the depths of her gratitude to his master.
Phileas Fogg, though brave and gallant, must be, he thought,
quite heartless.  As to the sentiment which this journey might
have awakened in him, there was clearly no trace of such a thing;
while poor Passepartout existed in perpetual reveries.

One day he was leaning on the railing of the engine-room,
and was observing the engine, when a sudden pitch of the steamer
threw the screw out of the water.  The steam came hissing out
of the valves; and this made Passepartout indignant.

"The valves are not sufficiently charged!" he exclaimed.  "We are
not going.  Oh, these English!  If this was an American craft,
we should blow up, perhaps, but we should at all events go faster!"




Chapter XVIII

IN WHICH PHILEAS FOGG, PASSEPARTOUT, AND FIX GO EACH ABOUT HIS BUSINESS


The weather was bad during the latter days of the voyage.
The wind, obstinately remaining in the north-west, blew a gale,
and retarded the steamer.  The Rangoon rolled heavily and the
passengers became impatient of the long, monstrous waves which
the wind raised before their path.  A sort of tempest arose on
the 3rd of November, the squall knocking the vessel about with fury,
and the waves running high.  The Rangoon reefed all her sails, and even
the rigging proved too much, whistling and shaking amid the squall.
The steamer was forced to proceed slowly, and the captain estimated
that she would reach Hong Kong twenty hours behind time, and more
if the storm lasted.

Phileas Fogg gazed at the tempestuous sea, which seemed to be struggling
especially to delay him, with his habitual tranquillity.  He never changed
countenance for an instant, though a delay of twenty hours, by making him
too late for the Yokohama boat, would almost inevitably cause the loss
of the wager.  But this man of nerve manifested neither impatience
nor annoyance; it seemed as if the storm were a part of his programme,
and had been foreseen.  Aouda was amazed to find him as calm as he had been
from the first time she saw him.

Fix did not look at the state of things in the same light.
The storm greatly pleased him.  His satisfaction would have
been complete had the Rangoon been forced to retreat before
the violence of wind and waves.  Each delay filled him with hope,
for it became more and more probable that Fogg would be obliged
to remain some days at Hong Kong; and now the heavens themselves
became his allies, with the gusts and squalls.  It mattered not
that they made him sea-sick--he made no account of this inconvenience;
and, whilst his body was writhing under their effects, his spirit bounded
with hopeful exultation.

Passepartout was enraged beyond expression by the unpropitious weather.
Everything had gone so well till now!  Earth and sea had seemed to be
at his master's service; steamers and railways obeyed him; wind and steam
united to speed his journey.  Had the hour of adversity come?
Passepartout was as much excited as if the twenty thousand pounds
were to come from his own pocket.  The storm exasperated him,
the gale made him furious, and he longed to lash the obstinate sea
into obedience.  Poor fellow!  Fix carefully concealed from him
his own satisfaction, for, had he betrayed it, Passepartout could
scarcely have restrained himself from personal violence.

Passepartout remained on deck as long as the tempest lasted,
being unable to remain quiet below, and taking it into his head
to aid the progress of the ship by lending a hand with the crew.
He overwhelmed the captain, officers, and sailors, who could not
help laughing at his impatience, with all sorts of questions.
He wanted to know exactly how long the storm was going to last;
whereupon he was referred to the barometer, which seemed to have
no intention of rising.  Passepartout shook it, but with no
perceptible effect; for neither shaking nor maledictions
could prevail upon it to change its mind.

On the 4th, however, the sea became more calm, and the storm
lessened its violence; the wind veered southward, and was once
more favourable.  Passepartout cleared up with the weather.
Some of the sails were unfurled, and the Rangoon resumed its
most rapid speed.  The time lost could not, however, be regained.
Land was not signalled until five o'clock on the morning of the 6th;
the steamer was due on the 5th.  Phileas Fogg was twenty-four hours
behind-hand, and the Yokohama steamer would, of course, be missed.

The pilot went on board at six, and took his place on the bridge,
to guide the Rangoon through the channels to the port of Hong Kong.
Passepartout longed to ask him if the steamer had left for Yokohama;
but he dared not, for he wished to preserve the spark of hope,
which still remained till the last moment.  He had confided
his anxiety to Fix who--the sly rascal!--tried to console him
by saying that Mr. Fogg would be in time if he took the next boat;
but this only put Passepartout in a passion.

Mr. Fogg, bolder than his servant, did not hesitate to approach the pilot,
and tranquilly ask him if he knew when a steamer would leave Hong Kong
for Yokohama.

"At high tide to-morrow morning," answered the pilot.

"Ah!" said Mr. Fogg, without betraying any astonishment.

Passepartout, who heard what passed, would willingly have embraced the pilot,
while Fix would have been glad to twist his neck.

"What is the steamer's name?" asked Mr. Fogg.

"The Carnatic."

"Ought she not to have gone yesterday?"

"Yes, sir; but they had to repair one of her boilers,
and so her departure was postponed till to-morrow."

"Thank you," returned Mr. Fogg, descending mathematically to the saloon.

Passepartout clasped the pilot's hand and shook it heartily in his delight,
exclaiming, "Pilot, you are the best of good fellows!"

The pilot probably does not know to this day why his responses
won him this enthusiastic greeting.  He remounted the bridge,
and guided the steamer through the flotilla of junks,
tankas, and fishing boats which crowd the harbour of Hong Kong.

At one o'clock the Rangoon was at the quay, and the passengers
were going ashore.

Chance had strangely favoured Phileas Fogg, for had not the
Carnatic been forced to lie over for repairing her boilers,
she would have left on the 6th of November, and the passengers
for Japan would have been obliged to await for a week the sailing
of the next steamer.  Mr. Fogg was, it is true, twenty-four hours
behind his time; but this could not seriously imperil the
remainder of his tour.

The steamer which crossed the Pacific from Yokohama to San Francisco
made a direct connection with that from Hong Kong, and it could not sail
until the latter reached Yokohama; and if Mr. Fogg was twenty-four hours
late on reaching Yokohama, this time would no doubt be easily regained
in the voyage of twenty-two days across the Pacific.  He found himself,
then, about twenty-four hours behind-hand, thirty-five days
after leaving London.

The Carnatic was announced to leave Hong Kong at five the next morning.
Mr. Fogg had sixteen hours in which to attend to his business there,
which was to deposit Aouda safely with her wealthy relative.

On landing, he conducted her to a palanquin, in which they
repaired to the Club Hotel.  A room was engaged for the young woman,
and Mr. Fogg, after seeing that she wanted for nothing, set out in search
of her cousin Jeejeeh.  He instructed Passepartout to remain at the hotel
until his return, that Aouda might not be left entirely alone.

Mr. Fogg repaired to the Exchange, where, he did not doubt,
every one would know so wealthy and considerable a personage
as the Parsee merchant.  Meeting a broker, he made the inquiry,
to learn that Jeejeeh had left China two years before, and, retiring
from business with an immense fortune, had taken up his residence
in Europe--in Holland the broker thought, with the merchants
of which country he had principally traded.  Phileas Fogg returned
to the hotel, begged a moment's conversation with Aouda, and without
more ado, apprised her that Jeejeeh was no longer at Hong Kong,
but probably in Holland.

Aouda at first said nothing.  She passed her hand across her forehead,
and reflected a few moments.  Then, in her sweet, soft voice, she said:
"What ought I to do, Mr. Fogg?"

"It is very simple," responded the gentleman.  "Go on to Europe."

"But I cannot intrude--"

"You do not intrude, nor do you in the least embarrass my project.
Passepartout!"

"Monsieur."

"Go to the Carnatic, and engage three cabins."

Passepartout, delighted that the young woman, who was very gracious to him,
was going to continue the journey with them, went off at a brisk gait
to obey his master's order.




Chapter XIX

IN WHICH PASSEPARTOUT TAKES A TOO GREAT INTEREST IN HIS MASTER,
AND WHAT COMES OF IT

Hong Kong is an island which came into the possession of the
English by the Treaty of Nankin, after the war of 1842;
and the colonising genius of the English has created upon it
an important city and an excellent port.  The island is situated
at the mouth of the Canton River, and is separated by about sixty miles
from the Portuguese town of Macao, on the opposite coast.  Hong Kong
has beaten Macao in the struggle for the Chinese trade, and now
the greater part of the transportation of Chinese goods finds
its depot at the former place.  Docks, hospitals, wharves,
a Gothic cathedral, a government house, macadamised streets,
give to Hong Kong the appearance of a town in Kent or Surrey
transferred by some strange magic to the antipodes.

Passepartout wandered, with his hands in his pockets, towards the
Victoria port, gazing as he went at the curious palanquins
and other modes of conveyance, and the groups of Chinese, Japanese,
and Europeans who passed to and fro in the streets.  Hong Kong seemed
to him not unlike Bombay, Calcutta, and Singapore, since, like them,
it betrayed everywhere the evidence of English supremacy.
At the Victoria port he found a confused mass of ships of all nations:
English, French, American, and Dutch, men-of-war and trading vessels,
Japanese and Chinese junks, sempas, tankas, and flower-boats,
which formed so many floating parterres.  Passepartout noticed
in the crowd a number of the natives who seemed very old
and were dressed in yellow.  On going into a barber's
to get shaved he learned that these ancient men were all
at least eighty years old, at which age they are permitted
to wear yellow, which is the Imperial colour.  Passepartout,
without exactly knowing why, thought this very funny.

On reaching the quay where they were to embark on the Carnatic,
he was not astonished to find Fix walking up and down.
The detective seemed very much disturbed and disappointed.

"This is bad," muttered Passepartout, "for the gentlemen of
the Reform Club!"  He accosted Fix with a merry smile, as if he
had not perceived that gentleman's chagrin.  The detective had, indeed,
good reasons to inveigh against the bad luck which pursued him.
The warrant had not come!  It was certainly on the way,
but as certainly it could not now reach Hong Kong for several days;
and, this being the last English territory on Mr. Fogg's route,
the robber would escape, unless he could manage to detain him.

"Well, Monsieur Fix," said Passepartout, "have you decided to go with us
so far as America?"

"Yes," returned Fix, through his set teeth.

"Good!" exclaimed Passepartout, laughing heartily.
"I knew you could not persuade yourself to separate from us.
Come and engage your berth."

They entered the steamer office and secured cabins for four persons.
The clerk, as he gave them the tickets, informed them that,
the repairs on the Carnatic having been completed, the steamer
would leave that very evening, and not next morning, as had been announced.

"That will suit my master all the better," said Passepartout.
"I will go and let him know."

Fix now decided to make a bold move; he resolved to tell Passepartout all.
It seemed to be the only possible means of keeping Phileas Fogg several days
longer at Hong Kong.  He accordingly invited his companion into a tavern
which caught his eye on the quay.  On entering, they found themselves
in a large room handsomely decorated, at the end of which was a large
camp-bed furnished with cushions.  Several persons lay upon this bed
in a deep sleep.  At the small tables which were arranged about the room
some thirty customers were drinking English beer, porter, gin, and brandy;
smoking, the while, long red clay pipes stuffed with little balls of opium
mingled with essence of rose.  From time to time one of the smokers,
overcome with the narcotic, would slip under the table, whereupon the waiters,
taking him by the head and feet, carried and laid him upon the bed.
The bed already supported twenty of these stupefied sots.

Fix and Passepartout saw that they were in a smoking-house haunted
by those wretched, cadaverous, idiotic creatures to whom the English
merchants sell every year the miserable drug called opium,
to the amount of one million four hundred thousand pounds--
thousands devoted to one of the most despicable vices
which afflict humanity!  The Chinese government has in vain
attempted to deal with the evil by stringent laws.  It passed
gradually from the rich, to whom it was at first exclusively reserved,
to the lower classes, and then its ravages could not be arrested.
Opium is smoked everywhere, at all times, by men and women,
in the Celestial Empire; and, once accustomed to it, the victims
cannot dispense with it, except by suffering horrible bodily contortions
and agonies.  A great smoker can smoke as many as eight pipes a day;
but he dies in five years.  It was in one of these dens that Fix
and Passepartout, in search of a friendly glass, found themselves.
Passepartout had no money, but willingly accepted Fix's invitation
in the hope of returning the obligation at some future time.

They ordered two bottles of port, to which the Frenchman did ample justice,
whilst Fix observed him with close attention.  They chatted about the journey,
and Passepartout was especially merry at the idea that Fix was going to
continue it with them.  When the bottles were empty, however,
he rose to go and tell his master of the change in the time
of the sailing of the Carnatic.

Fix caught him by the arm, and said, "Wait a moment."

"What for, Mr. Fix?"

"I want to have a serious talk with you."

"A serious talk!" cried Passepartout, drinking up the little wine
that was left in the bottom of his glass.  "Well, we'll talk
about it to-morrow; I haven't time now."

"Stay!  What I have to say concerns your master."

Passepartout, at this, looked attentively at his companion.
Fix's face seemed to have a singular expression.  He resumed his seat.

"What is it that you have to say?"

Fix placed his hand upon Passepartout's arm, and,
lowering his voice, said, "You have guessed who I am?"

"Parbleu!" said Passepartout, smiling.

"Then I'm going to tell you everything--"

"Now that I know everything, my friend!  Ah! that's very good.
But go on, go on.  First, though, let me tell you that those
gentlemen have put themselves to a useless expense."

"Useless!" said Fix.  "You speak confidently.  It's clear that
you don't know how large the sum is."

"Of course I do," returned Passepartout.  "Twenty thousand pounds."

"Fifty-five thousand!" answered Fix, pressing his companion's hand.

"What!" cried the Frenchman.  "Has Monsieur Fogg dared--
fifty-five thousand pounds!  Well, there's all the more reason
for not losing an instant," he continued, getting up hastily.

Fix pushed Passepartout back in his chair, and resumed:
"Fifty-five thousand pounds; and if I succeed, I get two thousand pounds.
If you'll help me, I'll let you have five hundred of them."

"Help you?" cried Passepartout, whose eyes were standing wide open.

"Yes; help me keep Mr. Fogg here for two or three days."

"Why, what are you saying?  Those gentlemen are not satisfied
with following my master and suspecting his honour, but they must
try to put obstacles in his way!  I blush for them!"

"What do you mean?"

"I mean that it is a piece of shameful trickery.  They might
as well waylay Mr. Fogg and put his money in their pockets!"

"That's just what we count on doing."

"It's a conspiracy, then," cried Passepartout, who became more
and more excited as the liquor mounted in his head, for he drank
without perceiving it.  "A real conspiracy!  And gentlemen, too. Bah!"

Fix began to be puzzled.

"Members of the Reform Club!" continued Passepartout.  "You must know,
Monsieur Fix, that my master is an honest man, and that,
when he makes a wager, he tries to win it fairly!"

"But who do you think I am?" asked Fix, looking at him intently.

"Parbleu!  An agent of the members of the Reform Club, sent out here
to interrupt my master's journey.  But, though I found you out some time ago,
I've taken good care to say nothing about it to Mr. Fogg."

"He knows nothing, then?"

"Nothing," replied Passepartout, again emptying his glass.

The detective passed his hand across his forehead, hesitating before
he spoke again.  What should he do?  Passepartout's mistake seemed sincere,
but it made his design more difficult.  It was evident that the servant
was not the master's accomplice, as Fix had been inclined to suspect.

"Well," said the detective to himself, "as he is not an accomplice,
he will help me."

He had no time to lose: Fogg must be detained at Hong Kong,
so he resolved to make a clean breast of it.

"Listen to me," said Fix abruptly.  "I am not, as you think,
an agent of the members of the Reform Club--"

"Bah!" retorted Passepartout, with an air of raillery.

"I am a police detective, sent out here by the London office."

"You, a detective?"

"I will prove it.  Here is my commission."

Passepartout was speechless with astonishment when Fix displayed
this document, the genuineness of which could not be doubted.

"Mr. Fogg's wager," resumed Fix, "is only a pretext, of which you
and the gentlemen of the Reform are dupes.  He had a motive
for securing your innocent complicity."

"But why?"

"Listen.  On the 28th of last September a robbery of fifty-five thousand pounds
was committed at the Bank of England by a person whose description
was fortunately secured.  Here is his description; it answers exactly
to that of Mr. Phileas Fogg."

"What nonsense!" cried Passepartout, striking the table with his fist.
"My master is the most honourable of men!"

"How can you tell?  You know scarcely anything about him.  You went into
his service the day he came away; and he came away on a foolish pretext,
without trunks, and carrying a large amount in banknotes.  And yet you
are bold enough to assert that he is an honest man!"

"Yes, yes," repeated the poor fellow, mechanically.

"Would you like to be arrested as his accomplice?"

Passepartout, overcome by what he had heard, held his head
between his hands, and did not dare to look at the detective.
Phileas Fogg, the saviour of Aouda, that brave and generous man,
a robber!  And yet how many presumptions there were against him!
Passepartout essayed to reject the suspicions which forced themselves
upon his mind; he did not wish to believe that his master was guilty.

"Well, what do you want of me?" said he, at last, with an effort.

"See here," replied Fix; "I have tracked Mr. Fogg to this place,
but as yet I have failed to receive the warrant of arrest for which
I sent to London.  You must help me to keep him here in Hong Kong--"

"I!  But I--"

"I will share with you the two thousand pounds reward offered
by the Bank of England."

"Never!" replied Passepartout, who tried to rise, but fell back,
exhausted in mind and body.

"Mr. Fix," he stammered, "even should what you say be true--
if my master is really the robber you are seeking for--which I deny--
I have been, am, in his service; I have seen his generosity and goodness;
and I will never betray him--not for all the gold in the world.
I come from a village where they don't eat that kind of bread!"

"You refuse?"

"I refuse."

"Consider that I've said nothing," said Fix; "and let us drink."

"Yes; let us drink!"

Passepartout felt himself yielding more and more to the effects
of the liquor.  Fix, seeing that he must, at all hazards, be separated
from his master, wished to entirely overcome him.  Some pipes full of opium
lay upon the table.  Fix slipped one into Passepartout's hand.
He took it, put it between his lips, lit it, drew several puffs,
and his head, becoming heavy under the influence of the narcotic,
fell upon the table.

"At last!" said Fix, seeing Passepartout unconscious.
"Mr. Fogg will not be informed of the Carnatic's departure; and,
if he is, he will have to go without this cursed Frenchman!"

And, after paying his bill, Fix left the tavern.




Chapter XX

IN WHICH FIX COMES FACE TO FACE WITH PHILEAS FOGG


While these events were passing at the opium-house, Mr. Fogg,
unconscious of the danger he was in of losing the steamer,
was quietly escorting Aouda about the streets of the English quarter,
making the necessary purchases for the long voyage before them.
It was all very well for an Englishman like Mr. Fogg to make the
tour of the world with a carpet-bag; a lady could not be expected
to travel comfortably under such conditions.  He acquitted
his task with characteristic serenity, and invariably replied
to the remonstrances of his fair companion, who was confused
by his patience and generosity:

"It is in the interest of my journey--a part of my programme."

The purchases made, they returned to the hotel, where they
dined at a sumptuously served table-d'hote; after which Aouda,
shaking hands with her protector after the English fashion,
retired to her room for rest.  Mr. Fogg absorbed himself throughout
the evening in the perusal of The Times and Illustrated London News.

Had he been capable of being astonished at anything, it would
have been not to see his servant return at bedtime.
But, knowing that the steamer was not to leave for Yokohama until
the next morning, he did not disturb himself about the matter.
When Passepartout did not appear the next morning to answer
his master's bell, Mr. Fogg, not betraying the least vexation,
contented himself with taking his carpet-bag, calling Aouda,
and sending for a palanquin.

It was then eight o'clock; at half-past nine, it being then high
tide, the Carnatic would leave the harbour.  Mr. Fogg and Aouda
got into the palanquin, their luggage being brought after on a wheelbarrow,
and half an hour later stepped upon the quay whence they were to embark.
Mr. Fogg then learned that the Carnatic had sailed the evening before.
He had expected to find not only the steamer, but his domestic,
and was forced to give up both; but no sign of disappointment appeared
on his face, and he merely remarked to Aouda, "It is an accident, madam;
nothing more."

At this moment a man who had been observing him attentively approached.
It was Fix, who, bowing, addressed Mr. Fogg:  "Were you not, like me,
sir, a passenger by the Rangoon, which arrived yesterday?"

"I was, sir," replied Mr. Fogg coldly.  "But I have not the honour--"

"Pardon me; I thought I should find your servant here."

"Do you know where he is, sir?" asked Aouda anxiously.

"What!" responded Fix, feigning surprise.  "Is he not with you?"

"No," said Aouda.  "He has not made his appearance since yesterday.
Could he have gone on board the Carnatic without us?"

"Without you, madam?" answered the detective.  "Excuse me, did you intend
to sail in the Carnatic?"

"Yes, sir."

"So did I, madam, and I am excessively disappointed.  The Carnatic,
its repairs being completed, left Hong Kong twelve hours before
the stated time, without any notice being given; and we must now wait
a week for another steamer."

As he said "a week" Fix felt his heart leap for joy.  Fogg detained
at Hong Kong for a week!  There would be time for the warrant to arrive,
and fortune at last favoured the representative of the law.  His horror
may be imagined when he heard Mr. Fogg say, in his placid voice,
"But there are other vessels besides the Carnatic, it seems to me,
in the harbour of Hong Kong."

And, offering his arm to Aouda, he directed his steps toward the docks
in search of some craft about to start.  Fix, stupefied, followed;
it seemed as if he were attached to Mr. Fogg by an invisible thread.
Chance, however, appeared really to have abandoned the man it had hitherto
served so well.  For three hours Phileas Fogg wandered about the docks,
with the determination, if necessary, to charter a vessel to carry him
to Yokohama; but he could only find vessels which were loading or unloading,
and which could not therefore set sail.  Fix began to hope again.

But Mr. Fogg, far from being discouraged, was continuing his search,
resolved not to stop if he had to resort to Macao, when he was accosted
by a sailor on one of the wharves.

"Is your honour looking for a boat?"

"Have you a boat ready to sail?"

"Yes, your honour; a pilot-boat--No. 43--the best in the harbour."

"Does she go fast?"

"Between eight and nine knots the hour.  Will you look at her?"

"Yes."

"Your honour will be satisfied with her.  Is it for a sea excursion?"

"No; for a voyage."

"A voyage?"

"Yes, will you agree to take me to Yokohama?"

The sailor leaned on the railing, opened his eyes wide, and said,
"Is your honour joking?"

"No.  I have missed the Carnatic, and I must get to Yokohama
by the 14th at the latest, to take the boat for San Francisco."

"I am sorry," said the sailor; "but it is impossible."

"I offer you a hundred pounds per day, and an additional
reward of two hundred pounds if I reach Yokohama in time."

"Are you in earnest?"

"Very much so."

The pilot walked away a little distance, and gazed out to sea,
evidently struggling between the anxiety to gain a large sum
and the fear of venturing so far.  Fix was in mortal suspense.

Mr. Fogg turned to Aouda and asked her, "You would not be afraid,
would you, madam?"

"Not with you, Mr. Fogg," was her answer.

The pilot now returned, shuffling his hat in his hands.

"Well, pilot?" said Mr. Fogg.

"Well, your honour," replied he, "I could not risk myself, my men,
or my little boat of scarcely twenty tons on so long a voyage
at this time of year.  Besides, we could not reach Yokohama in time,
for it is sixteen hundred and sixty miles from Hong Kong."

"Only sixteen hundred," said Mr. Fogg.

"It's the same thing."

Fix breathed more freely.

"But," added the pilot, "it might be arranged another way."

Fix ceased to breathe at all.

"How?" asked Mr. Fogg.

"By going to Nagasaki, at the extreme south of Japan, or even
to Shanghai, which is only eight hundred miles from here.
In going to Shanghai we should not be forced to sail wide
of the Chinese coast, which would be a great advantage,
as the currents run northward, and would aid us.

"Pilot," said Mr. Fogg, "I must take the American steamer
at Yokohama, and not at Shanghai or Nagasaki."

"Why not?" returned the pilot.  "The San Francisco steamer
does not start from Yokohama.  It puts in at Yokohama
and Nagasaki, but it starts from Shanghai."

"You are sure of that?"

"Perfectly."

"And when does the boat leave Shanghai?"

"On the 11th, at seven in the evening.  We have, therefore,
four days before us, that is ninety-six hours; and in that time,
if we had good luck and a south-west wind, and the sea was calm,
we could make those eight hundred miles to Shanghai."

"And you could go--"

"In an hour; as soon as provisions could be got aboard
and the sails put up."

"It is a bargain.  Are you the master of the boat?"

"Yes; John Bunsby, master of the Tankadere."

"Would you like some earnest-money?"

"If it would not put your honour out--"

"Here are two hundred pounds on account sir," added Phileas Fogg,
turning to Fix, "if you would like to take advantage--"

"Thanks, sir; I was about to ask the favour."

"Very well.  In half an hour we shall go on board."

"But poor Passepartout?" urged Aouda, who was much disturbed
by the servant's disappearance.

"I shall do all I can to find him," replied Phileas Fogg.

While Fix, in a feverish, nervous state, repaired to the pilot-boat,
the others directed their course to the police-station at Hong Kong.
Phileas Fogg there gave Passepartout's description, and left a sum of money
to be spent in the search for him.  The same formalities having been gone
through at the French consulate, and the palanquin having stopped at the hotel
for the luggage, which had been sent back there, they returned to the wharf.

It was now three o'clock; and pilot-boat No. 43, with its crew
on board, and its provisions stored away, was ready for departure.

The Tankadere was a neat little craft of twenty tons,
as gracefully built as if she were a racing yacht.
Her shining copper sheathing, her galvanised iron-work,
her deck, white as ivory, betrayed the pride taken by John Bunsby
in making her presentable.  Her two masts leaned a trifle backward;
she carried brigantine, foresail, storm-jib, and standing-jib,
and was well rigged for running before the wind; and she seemed capable
of brisk speed, which, indeed, she had already proved by gaining
several prizes in pilot-boat races.  The crew of the Tankadere
was composed of John Bunsby, the master, and four hardy mariners,
who were familiar with the Chinese seas.  John Bunsby, himself,
a man of forty-five or thereabouts, vigorous, sunburnt, with a
sprightly expression of the eye, and energetic and self-reliant
countenance, would have inspired confidence in the most timid.

Phileas Fogg and Aouda went on board, where they found Fix
already installed.  Below deck was a square cabin, of which
the walls bulged out in the form of cots, above a circular divan;
in the centre was a table provided with a swinging lamp.
The accommodation was confined, but neat.

"I am sorry to have nothing better to offer you," said Mr.
Fogg to Fix, who bowed without responding.

The detective had a feeling akin to humiliation in profiting
by the kindness of Mr. Fogg.

"It's certain," thought he, "though rascal as he is, he is a polite one!"

The sails and the English flag were hoisted at ten minutes past three.
Mr. Fogg and Aouda, who were seated on deck, cast a last glance at the quay,
in the hope of espying Passepartout.  Fix was not without his fears
lest chance should direct the steps of the unfortunate servant,
whom he had so badly treated, in this direction; in which case
an explanation the reverse of satisfactory to the detective
must have ensued.  But the Frenchman did not appear, and, without doubt,
was still lying under the stupefying influence of the opium.

John Bunsby, master, at length gave the order to start, and
the Tankadere, taking the wind under her brigantine, foresail,
and standing-jib, bounded briskly forward over the waves.




Chapter XXI

IN WHICH THE MASTER OF THE "TANKADERE" RUNS
GREAT RISK OF LOSING A REWARD OF TWO HUNDRED POUNDS


This voyage of eight hundred miles was a perilous venture
on a craft of twenty tons, and at that season of the year.
The Chinese seas are usually boisterous, subject to terrible
gales of wind, and especially during the equinoxes;
and it was now early November.

It would clearly have been to the master's advantage to carry
his passengers to Yokohama, since he was paid a certain sum per day;
but he would have been rash to attempt such a voyage, and it was imprudent
even to attempt to reach Shanghai.  But John Bunsby believed in the Tankadere,
which rode on the waves like a seagull; and perhaps he was not wrong.

Late in the day they passed through the capricious channels of Hong Kong,
and the Tankadere, impelled by favourable winds, conducted herself admirably.

"I do not need, pilot," said Phileas Fogg, when they got into
the open sea, "to advise you to use all possible speed."

"Trust me, your honour.  We are carrying all the sail the wind will let us.
The poles would add nothing, and are only used when we are going into port."

"Its your trade, not mine, pilot, and I confide in you."

Phileas Fogg, with body erect and legs wide apart, standing
like a sailor, gazed without staggering at the swelling waters.
The young woman, who was seated aft, was profoundly affected
as she looked out upon the ocean, darkening now with the twilight,
on which she had ventured in so frail a vessel.  Above her head
rustled the white sails, which seemed like great white wings.
The boat, carried forward by the wind, seemed to be flying in the air.

Night came.  The moon was entering her first quarter, and her
insufficient light would soon die out in the mist on the horizon.
Clouds were rising from the east, and already overcast a part
of the heavens.

The pilot had hung out his lights, which was very necessary
in these seas crowded with vessels bound landward; for collisions
are not uncommon occurrences, and, at the speed she was going,
the least shock would shatter the gallant little craft.

Fix, seated in the bow, gave himself up to meditation.  He kept apart
from his fellow-travellers, knowing Mr. Fogg's taciturn tastes; besides,
he did not quite like to talk to the man whose favours he had accepted.
He was thinking, too, of the future.  It seemed certain that Fogg would not
stop at Yokohama, but would at once take the boat for San Francisco;
and the vast extent of America would ensure him impunity and safety.
Fogg's plan appeared to him the simplest in the world.  Instead of sailing
directly from England to the United States, like a common villain,
he had traversed three quarters of the globe, so as to gain the
American continent more surely; and there, after throwing
the police off his track, he would quietly enjoy himself
with the fortune stolen from the bank.  But, once in the United States,
what should he, Fix, do?  Should he abandon this man?  No, a hundred times no!
Until he had secured his extradition, he would not lose sight of him for an hour.
It was his duty, and he would fulfil it to the end.  At all events,
there was one thing to be thankful for; Passepartout was not with his master;
and it was above all important, after the confidences Fix had imparted to him,
that the servant should never have speech with his master.

Phileas Fogg was also thinking of Passepartout, who had so
strangely disappeared.  Looking at the matter from every point of view,
it did not seem to him impossible that, by some mistake, the man might
have embarked on the Carnatic at the last moment; and this was also
Aouda's opinion, who regretted very much the loss of the worthy fellow
to whom she owed so much.  They might then find him at Yokohama;
for, if the Carnatic was carrying him thither, it would be easy
to ascertain if he had been on board.

A brisk breeze arose about ten o'clock; but, though it might
have been prudent to take in a reef, the pilot, after carefully
examining the heavens, let the craft remain rigged as before.
The Tankadere bore sail admirably, as she drew a great deal of water,
and everything was prepared for high speed in case of a gale.

Mr. Fogg and Aouda descended into the cabin at midnight,
having been already preceded by Fix, who had lain down on one of the cots.
The pilot and crew remained on deck all night.

At sunrise the next day, which was 8th November, the boat had made
more than one hundred miles.  The log indicated a mean speed of between
eight and nine miles.  The Tankadere still carried all sail,
and was accomplishing her greatest capacity of speed.
If the wind held as it was, the chances would be in her favour.
During the day she kept along the coast, where the currents were favourable;
the coast, irregular in profile, and visible sometimes across the clearings,
was at most five miles distant.  The sea was less boisterous,
since the wind came off land--a fortunate circumstance for the boat,
which would suffer, owing to its small tonnage, by a heavy surge on the sea.

The breeze subsided a little towards noon, and set in from the south-west.
The pilot put up his poles, but took them down again within two hours,
as the wind freshened up anew.

Mr. Fogg and Aouda, happily unaffected by the roughness of the sea,
ate with a good appetite, Fix being invited to share their repast,
which he accepted with secret chagrin.  To travel at this man's
expense and live upon his provisions was not palatable to him.
Still, he was obliged to eat, and so he ate.

When the meal was over, he took Mr. Fogg apart, and said,
"sir"--this "sir" scorched his lips, and he had to control himself
to avoid collaring this "gentleman"--"sir, you have been very kind
to give me a passage on this boat.  But, though my means will not admit
of my expending them as freely as you, I must ask to pay my share--"

"Let us not speak of that, sir," replied Mr. Fogg.

"But, if I insist--"

"No, sir," repeated Mr. Fogg, in a tone which did not admit of a
reply.  "This enters into my general expenses."

Fix, as he bowed, had a stifled feeling, and, going forward,
where he ensconced himself, did not open his mouth for the rest of the day.

Meanwhile they were progressing famously, and John Bunsby was
in high hope.  He several times assured Mr. Fogg that they would
reach Shanghai in time; to which that gentleman responded
that he counted upon it.  The crew set to work in good earnest,
inspired by the reward to be gained.  There was not a sheet
which was not tightened not a sail which was not vigorously hoisted;
not a lurch could be charged to the man at the helm.  They worked
as desperately as if they were contesting in a Royal yacht regatta.

By evening, the log showed that two hundred and twenty miles had been
accomplished from Hong Kong, and Mr. Fogg might hope that he would be able
to reach Yokohama without recording any delay in his journal; in which case,
the many misadventures which had overtaken him since he left London
would not seriously affect his journey.

The Tankadere entered the Straits of Fo-Kien, which separate
the island of Formosa from the Chinese coast, in the small hours
of the night, and crossed the Tropic of Cancer.  The sea was very
rough in the straits, full of eddies formed by the counter-currents,
and the chopping waves broke her course, whilst it became very difficult
to stand on deck.

At daybreak the wind began to blow hard again, and the heavens
seemed to predict a gale.  The barometer announced a speedy change,
the mercury rising and falling capriciously; the sea also,
in the south-east, raised long surges which indicated a tempest.
The sun had set the evening before in a red mist,
in the midst of the phosphorescent scintillations of the ocean.

John Bunsby long examined the threatening aspect of the heavens,
muttering indistinctly between his teeth.  At last he said in a low voice
to Mr. Fogg, "Shall I speak out to your honour?"

"Of course."

"Well, we are going to have a squall."

"Is the wind north or south?" asked Mr. Fogg quietly.

"South.  Look! a typhoon is coming up."

"Glad it's a typhoon from the south, for it will carry us forward."

"Oh, if you take it that way," said John Bunsby, "I've nothing more to say."
John Bunsby's suspicions were confirmed.  At a less advanced season of the year
the typhoon, according to a famous meteorologist, would have passed away
like a luminous cascade of electric flame; but in the winter equinox
it was to be feared that it would burst upon them with great violence.

The pilot took his precautions in advance.  He reefed all sail,
the pole-masts were dispensed with; all hands went forward to the bows.
A single triangular sail, of strong canvas, was hoisted as a storm-jib,
so as to hold the wind from behind.  Then they waited.

John Bunsby had requested his passengers to go below; but this
imprisonment in so narrow a space, with little air, and the boat
bouncing in the gale, was far from pleasant.  Neither Mr. Fogg,
Fix, nor Aouda consented to leave the deck.

The storm of rain and wind descended upon them towards eight o'clock.
With but its bit of sail, the Tankadere was lifted like a feather by a wind,
an idea of whose violence can scarcely be given.  To compare her speed
to four times that of a locomotive going on full steam would be below
the truth.

The boat scudded thus northward during the whole day, borne on
by monstrous waves, preserving always, fortunately, a speed equal
to theirs.  Twenty times she seemed almost to be submerged by
these mountains of water which rose behind her; but the adroit
management of the pilot saved her.  The passengers were often
bathed in spray, but they submitted to it philosophically.
Fix cursed it, no doubt; but Aouda, with her eyes fastened upon
her protector, whose coolness amazed her, showed herself worthy
of him, and bravely weathered the storm.  As for Phileas Fogg,
it seemed just as if the typhoon were a part of his programme.

Up to this time the Tankadere had always held her course to the north;
but towards evening the wind, veering three quarters, bore down from
the north-west.  The boat, now lying in the trough of the waves,
shook and rolled terribly; the sea struck her with fearful violence.
At night the tempest increased in violence.  John Bunsby saw the approach
of darkness and the rising of the storm with dark misgivings.
He thought awhile, and then asked his crew if it was not time to slacken speed.
After a consultation he approached Mr. Fogg, and said, "I think, your honour,
that we should do well to make for one of the ports on the coast."

"I think so too."

"Ah!" said the pilot.  "But which one?"

"I know of but one," returned Mr. Fogg tranquilly.

"And that is--"

"Shanghai."

The pilot, at first, did not seem to comprehend; he could
scarcely realise so much determination and tenacity.
Then he cried, "Well--yes!  Your honour is right.  To Shanghai!"

So the Tankadere kept steadily on her northward track.

The night was really terrible; it would be a miracle if the
craft did not founder.  Twice it could have been all over with her
if the crew had not been constantly on the watch.  Aouda was exhausted,
but did not utter a complaint.  More than once Mr. Fogg rushed
to protect her from the violence of the waves.

Day reappeared.  The tempest still raged with undiminished fury;
but the wind now returned to the south-east.  It was a favourable change,
and the Tankadere again bounded forward on this mountainous sea,
though the waves crossed each other, and imparted shocks and counter-shocks
which would have crushed a craft less solidly built.  From time to time
the coast was visible through the broken mist, but no vessel was in sight.
The Tankadere was alone upon the sea.

There were some signs of a calm at noon, and these became more distinct
as the sun descended toward the horizon.  The tempest had been as brief
as terrific.  The passengers, thoroughly exhausted, could now eat a little,
and take some repose.

The night was comparatively quiet.  Some of the sails were again hoisted,
and the speed of the boat was very good.  The next morning at dawn
they espied the coast, and John Bunsby was able to assert that they were
not one hundred miles from Shanghai.  A hundred miles, and only one day
to traverse them!  That very evening Mr. Fogg was due at Shanghai,
if he did not wish to miss the steamer to Yokohama.  Had there been no storm,
during which several hours were lost, they would be at this moment within
thirty miles of their destination.

The wind grew decidedly calmer, and happily the sea fell with it.
All sails were now hoisted, and at noon the Tankadere was within
forty-five miles of Shanghai.  There remained yet six hours
in which to accomplish that distance.  All on board feared
that it could not be done, and every one--Phileas Fogg, no doubt,
excepted--felt his heart beat with impatience.  The boat must keep up
an average of nine miles an hour, and the wind was becoming calmer
every moment!  It was a capricious breeze, coming from the coast,
and after it passed the sea became smooth.  Still, the Tankadere
was so light, and her fine sails caught the fickle zephyrs so well,
that, with the aid of the currents John Bunsby found himself at six o'clock
not more than ten miles from the mouth of Shanghai River.  Shanghai itself
is situated at least twelve miles up the stream.  At seven they were still
three miles from Shanghai.  The pilot swore an angry oath; the reward of
two hundred pounds was evidently on the point of escaping him.  He looked
at Mr. Fogg.  Mr. Fogg was perfectly tranquil; and yet his whole fortune
was at this moment at stake.

At this moment, also, a long black funnel, crowned with wreaths of smoke,
appeared on the edge of the waters.  It was the American steamer,
leaving for Yokohama at the appointed time.

"Confound her!" cried John Bunsby, pushing back the rudder
with a desperate jerk.

"Signal her!" said Phileas Fogg quietly.

A small brass cannon stood on the forward deck of the Tankadere,
for making signals in the fogs.  It was loaded to the muzzle;
but just as the pilot was about to apply a red-hot coal to the touchhole,
Mr. Fogg said, "Hoist your flag!"

The flag was run up at half-mast, and, this being the signal of distress,
it was hoped that the American steamer, perceiving it, would change her
course a little, so as to succour the pilot-boat.

"Fire!" said Mr. Fogg.  And the booming of the little cannon
resounded in the air.




Chapter XXII

IN WHICH PASSEPARTOUT FINDS OUT THAT, EVEN AT THE ANTIPODES,
IT IS CONVENIENT TO HAVE SOME MONEY IN ONE'S POCKET


The Carnatic, setting sail from Hong Kong at half-past six on the
7th of November, directed her course at full steam towards Japan.
She carried a large cargo and a well-filled cabin of passengers.
Two state-rooms in the rear were, however, unoccupied--those which
had been engaged by Phileas Fogg.

The next day a passenger with a half-stupefied eye, staggering gait,
and disordered hair, was seen to emerge from the second cabin,
and to totter to a seat on deck.

It was Passepartout; and what had happened to him was as follows:
Shortly after Fix left the opium den, two waiters had lifted
the unconscious Passepartout, and had carried him to the bed
reserved for the smokers.  Three hours later, pursued even
in his dreams by a fixed idea, the poor fellow awoke,
and struggled against the stupefying influence of the narcotic.
The thought of a duty unfulfilled shook off his torpor,
and he hurried from the abode of drunkenness.
Staggering and holding himself up by keeping against the walls,
falling down and creeping up again, and irresistibly impelled
by a kind of instinct, he kept crying out, "The Carnatic! the Carnatic!"

The steamer lay puffing alongside the quay, on the point of starting.
Passepartout had but few steps to go; and, rushing upon the plank,
he crossed it, and fell unconscious on the deck, just as the Carnatic
was moving off.  Several sailors, who were evidently accustomed
to this sort of scene, carried the poor Frenchman down into the second cabin,
and Passepartout did not wake until they were one hundred and fifty miles
away from China.  Thus he found himself the next morning on the deck
of the Carnatic, and eagerly inhaling the exhilarating sea-breeze.
The pure air sobered him.  He began to collect his sense, which he found
a difficult task; but at last he recalled the events of the evening before,
Fix's revelation, and the opium-house.

"It is evident," said he to himself, "that I have been abominably drunk!
What will Mr. Fogg say?  At least I have not missed the steamer,
which is the most important thing."

Then, as Fix occurred to him: "As for that rascal, I hope we
are well rid of him, and that he has not dared, as he proposed,
to follow us on board the Carnatic.  A detective on the track
of Mr. Fogg, accused of robbing the Bank of England!  Pshaw!
Mr. Fogg is no more a robber than I am a murderer."

Should he divulge Fix's real errand to his master?  Would it
do to tell the part the detective was playing.  Would it not be
better to wait until Mr. Fogg reached London again, and then
impart to him that an agent of the metropolitan police had been
following him round the world, and have a good laugh over it?
No doubt; at least, it was worth considering.  The first thing to
do was to find Mr. Fogg, and apologise for his singular behaviour.

Passepartout got up and proceeded, as well as he could with
the rolling of the steamer, to the after-deck.  He saw no one
who resembled either his master or Aouda.  "Good!"  muttered he;
"Aouda has not got up yet, and Mr. Fogg has probably found some
partners at whist."

He descended to the saloon.  Mr. Fogg was not there.
Passepartout had only, however, to ask the purser the number
of his master's state-room.  The purser replied that he
did not know any passenger by the name of Fogg.

"I beg your pardon," said Passepartout persistently.  "He is a tall gentleman,
quiet, and not very talkative, and has with him a young lady--"

"There is no young lady on board," interrupted the purser.
"Here is a list of the passengers; you may see for yourself."

Passepartout scanned the list, but his master's name was not upon it.
All at once an idea struck him.

"Ah! am I on the Carnatic?"

"Yes."

"On the way to Yokohama?"

"Certainly."

Passepartout had for an instant feared that he was on the wrong boat;
but, though he was really on the Carnatic, his master was not there.

He fell thunderstruck on a seat.  He saw it all now.
He remembered that the time of sailing had been changed,
that he should have informed his master of that fact,
and that he had not done so.  It was his fault, then,
that Mr. Fogg and Aouda had missed the steamer.
Yes, but it was still more the fault of the traitor who,
in order to separate him from his master, and detain
the latter at Hong Kong, had inveigled him into getting drunk!
He now saw the detective's trick; and at this moment Mr. Fogg
was certainly ruined, his bet was lost, and he himself perhaps
arrested and imprisoned!  At this thought Passepartout tore his hair.
Ah, if Fix ever came within his reach, what a settling of accounts
there would be!

After his first depression, Passepartout became calmer,
and began to study his situation.  It was certainly not
an enviable one.  He found himself on the way to Japan,
and what should he do when he got there?  His pocket was empty;
he had not a solitary shilling not so much as a penny.
His passage had fortunately been paid for in advance;
and he had five or six days in which to decide upon his future course.
He fell to at meals with an appetite, and ate for Mr. Fogg, Aouda,
and himself.  He helped himself as generously as if Japan were a desert,
where nothing to eat was to be looked for.

At dawn on the 13th the Carnatic entered the port of Yokohama.
This is an important port of call in the Pacific, where all the
mail-steamers, and those carrying travellers between North America,
China, Japan, and the Oriental islands put in.  It is situated
in the bay of Yeddo, and at but a short distance from that
second capital of the Japanese Empire, and the residence of the Tycoon,
the civil Emperor, before the Mikado, the spiritual Emperor,
absorbed his office in his own.  The Carnatic anchored at the quay
near the custom-house, in the midst of a crowd of ships bearing
the flags of all nations.

Passepartout went timidly ashore on this so curious territory
of the Sons of the Sun.  He had nothing better to do than,
taking chance for his guide, to wander aimlessly through the streets
of Yokohama.  He found himself at first in a thoroughly European quarter,
the houses having low fronts, and being adorned with verandas,
beneath which he caught glimpses of neat peristyles.  This quarter occupied,
with its streets, squares, docks, and warehouses, all the space between
the "promontory of the Treaty" and the river.  Here, as at Hong Kong
and Calcutta, were mixed crowds of all races Americans and English,
Chinamen and Dutchmen, mostly merchants ready to buy or sell anything.
The Frenchman felt himself as much alone among them as if he had dropped
down in the midst of Hottentots.

He had, at least, one resource to call on the French and English consuls
at Yokohama for assistance.  But he shrank from telling the story
of his adventures, intimately connected as it was with that of his master;
and, before doing so, he determined to exhaust all other means of aid.
As chance did not favour him in the European quarter, he penetrated
that inhabited by the native Japanese, determined, if necessary,
to push on to Yeddo.

The Japanese quarter of Yokohama is called Benten, after the
goddess of the sea, who is worshipped on the islands round about.
There Passepartout beheld beautiful fir and cedar groves, sacred
gates of a singular architecture, bridges half hid in the midst
of bamboos and reeds, temples shaded by immense cedar-trees,
holy retreats where were sheltered Buddhist priests and sectaries
of Confucius, and interminable streets, where a perfect harvest of
rose-tinted and red-cheeked children, who looked as if they had been
cut out of Japanese screens, and who were playing in the midst
of short-legged poodles and yellowish cats, might have been gathered.

The streets were crowded with people.  Priests were passing
in processions, beating their dreary tambourines; police and
custom-house officers with pointed hats encrusted with lac and
carrying two sabres hung to their waists; soldiers, clad in blue
cotton with white stripes, and bearing guns; the Mikado's guards,
enveloped in silken doubles, hauberks and coats of mail;
and numbers of military folk of all ranks--for the military
profession is as much respected in Japan as it is despised
in China--went hither and thither in groups and pairs.
Passepartout saw, too, begging friars, long-robed pilgrims,
and simple civilians, with their warped and jet-black hair,
big heads, long busts, slender legs, short stature, and complexions
varying from copper-colour to a dead white, but never yellow,
like the Chinese, from whom the Japanese widely differ.
He did not fail to observe the curious equipages--carriages and palanquins,
barrows supplied with sails, and litters made of bamboo; nor the women--
whom he thought not especially handsome--who took little steps with their
little feet, whereon they wore canvas shoes, straw sandals, and clogs
of worked wood, and who displayed tight-looking eyes, flat chests,
teeth fashionably blackened, and gowns crossed with silken scarfs,
tied in an enormous knot behind an ornament which the modern
Parisian ladies seem to have borrowed from the dames of Japan.

Passepartout wandered for several hours in the midst of this motley crowd,
looking in at the windows of the rich and curious shops, the jewellery
establishments glittering with quaint Japanese ornaments, the restaurants
decked with streamers and banners, the tea-houses, where the odorous beverage
was being drunk with saki, a liquor concocted from the fermentation of rice,
and the comfortable smoking-houses, where they were puffing, not opium,
which is almost unknown in Japan, but a very fine, stringy tobacco.
He went on till he found himself in the fields, in the midst of vast
rice plantations.  There he saw dazzling camellias expanding themselves,
with flowers which were giving forth their last colours and perfumes,
not on bushes, but on trees, and within bamboo enclosures, cherry, plum,
and apple trees, which the Japanese cultivate rather for their blossoms
than their fruit, and which queerly-fashioned, grinning scarecrows
protected from the sparrows, pigeons, ravens, and other voracious birds.
On the branches of the cedars were perched large eagles; amid the foliage
of the weeping willows were herons, solemnly standing on one leg;
and on every hand were crows, ducks, hawks, wild birds, and a
multitude of cranes, which the Japanese consider sacred,
and which to their minds symbolise long life and prosperity.

As he was strolling along, Passepartout espied some violets among the shrubs.

"Good!" said he; "I'll have some supper."

But, on smelling them, he found that they were odourless.

"No chance there," thought he.

The worthy fellow had certainly taken good care to eat as
hearty a breakfast as possible before leaving the Carnatic;
but, as he had been walking about all day, the demands of hunger
were becoming importunate.  He observed that the butchers stalls
contained neither mutton, goat, nor pork; and, knowing also that
it is a sacrilege to kill cattle, which are preserved solely for farming,
he made up his mind that meat was far from plentiful in Yokohama--
nor was he mistaken; and, in default of butcher's meat,
he could have wished for a quarter of wild boar or deer,
a partridge, or some quails, some game or fish, which, with rice,
the Japanese eat almost exclusively.  But he found it necessary
to keep up a stout heart, and to postpone the meal he craved till
the following morning.  Night came, and Passepartout re-entered
the native quarter, where he wandered through the streets,
lit by vari-coloured lanterns, looking on at the dancers,
who were executing skilful steps and boundings, and the astrologers
who stood in the open air with their telescopes.  Then he came
to the harbour, which was lit up by the resin torches of the fishermen,
who were fishing from their boats.

The streets at last became quiet, and the patrol, the officers
of which, in their splendid costumes, and surrounded by their suites,
Passepartout thought seemed like ambassadors, succeeded the bustling crowd.
Each time a company passed, Passepartout chuckled, and said to himself:
"Good! another Japanese embassy departing for Europe!"




Chapter XXIII

IN WHICH PASSEPARTOUT'S NOSE BECOMES OUTRAGEOUSLY LONG


The next morning poor, jaded, famished Passepartout said to
himself that he must get something to eat at all hazards, and the
sooner he did so the better.  He might, indeed, sell his watch;
but he would have starved first.  Now or never he must use the
strong, if not melodious voice which nature had bestowed upon him.
He knew several French and English songs, and resolved to try them
upon the Japanese, who must be lovers of music, since they were
for ever pounding on their cymbals, tam-tams, and tambourines, and
could not but appreciate European talent.

It was, perhaps, rather early in the morning to get up a
concert, and the audience prematurely aroused from their slumbers,
might not possibly pay their entertainer with coin bearing the
Mikado's features.  Passepartout therefore decided to wait several
hours; and, as he was sauntering along, it occurred to him that he
would seem rather too well dressed for a wandering artist.  The
idea struck him to change his garments for clothes more in harmony
with his project; by which he might also get a little money to
satisfy the immediate cravings of hunger.  The resolution taken,
it remained to carry it out.

It was only after a long search that Passepartout discovered a
native dealer in old clothes, to whom he applied for an exchange.
The man liked the European costume, and ere long Passepartout
issued from his shop accoutred in an old Japanese coat, and a sort
of one-sided turban, faded with long use.  A few small pieces of silver,
moreover, jingled in his pocket.

Good!" thought he.  "I will imagine I am at the Carnival!"

His first care, after being thus "Japanesed," was to enter a tea-house
of modest appearance, and, upon half a bird and a little rice,
to breakfast like a man for whom dinner was as yet a problem to be solved.

"Now," thought he, when he had eaten heartily, "I mustn't lose my head.
I can't sell this costume again for one still more Japanese.  I must
consider how to leave this country of the Sun, of which I shall not retain
the most delightful of memories, as quickly as possible."

It occurred to him to visit the steamers which were about to
leave for America.  He would offer himself as a cook or servant,
in payment of his passage and meals.  Once at San Francisco,
he would find some means of going on.  The difficulty was,
how to traverse the four thousand seven hundred miles
of the Pacific which lay between Japan and the New World.

Passepartout was not the man to let an idea go begging,
and directed his steps towards the docks.  But, as he approached
them, his project, which at first had seemed so simple, began to grow
more and more formidable to his mind.  What need would they have
of a cook or servant on an American steamer, and what confidence would
they put in him, dressed as he was?  What references could he give?

As he was reflecting in this wise, his eyes fell upon an immense
placard which a sort of clown was carrying through the streets.
This placard, which was in English, read as follows:

          ACROBATIC JAPANESE TROUPE,
   HONOURABLE WILLIAM BATULCAR, PROPRIETOR,
           LAST REPRESENTATIONS,
PRIOR TO THEIR DEPARTURE TO THE UNITED STATES,
                  OF THE
        LONG NOSES!   LONG NOSES!
UNDER THE DIRECT PATRONAGE OF THE GOD TINGOU!
           GREAT ATTRACTION!

"The United States!" said Passepartout; "that's just what I want!"

He followed the clown, and soon found himself once more
in the Japanese quarter.  A quarter of an hour later
he stopped before a large cabin, adorned with several
clusters of streamers, the exterior walls of which
were designed to represent, in violent colours
and without perspective, a company of jugglers.

This was the Honourable William Batulcar's establishment.
That gentleman was a sort of Barnum, the director of a troupe
of mountebanks, jugglers, clowns, acrobats, equilibrists,
and gymnasts, who, according to the placard, was giving
his last performances before leaving the Empire of the Sun
for the States of the Union.

Passepartout entered and asked for Mr. Batulcar, who straightway
appeared in person.

"What do you want?" said he to Passepartout, whom he at first
took for a native.

"Would you like a servant, sir?" asked Passepartout.

"A servant!" cried Mr. Batulcar, caressing the thick grey beard
which hung from his chin.  "I already have two who are obedient
and faithful, have never left me, and serve me for their nourishment
and here they are," added he, holding out his two robust arms,
furrowed with veins as large as the strings of a bass-viol.

"So I can be of no use to you?"

"None."

"The devil!  I should so like to cross the Pacific with you!"

"Ah!" said the Honourable Mr. Batulcar.  "You are no more a Japanese
than I am a monkey!  Who are you dressed up in that way?"

"A man dresses as he can."

"That's true.  You are a Frenchman, aren't you?"

"Yes; a Parisian of Paris."

"Then you ought to know how to make grimaces?"

"Why," replied Passepartout, a little vexed that his nationality
should cause this question, "we Frenchmen know how to make grimaces,
it is true but not any better than the Americans do."

"True.  Well, if I can't take you as a servant, I can as a clown.
You see, my friend, in France they exhibit foreign clowns,
and in foreign parts French clowns."

"Ah!"

"You are pretty strong, eh?"

"Especially after a good meal."

"And you can sing?"

"Yes," returned Passepartout, who had formerly been wont
to sing in the streets.

"But can you sing standing on your head, with a top spinning
on your left foot, and a sabre balanced on your right?"

"Humph!  I think so," replied Passepartout, recalling the exercises
of his younger days.

"Well, that's enough," said the Honourable William Batulcar.

The engagement was concluded there and then.

Passepartout had at last found something to do.  He was engaged
to act in the celebrated Japanese troupe.  It was not a very dignified
position, but within a week he would be on his way to San Francisco.

The performance, so noisily announced by the Honourable Mr. Batulcar,
was to commence at three o'clock, and soon the deafening instruments
of a Japanese orchestra resounded at the door.  Passepartout,
though he had not been able to study or rehearse a part,
was designated to lend the aid of his sturdy shoulders
in the great exhibition of the "human pyramid," executed
by the Long Noses of the god Tingou.  This "great attraction"
was to close the performance.

Before three o'clock the large shed was invaded by the spectators,
comprising Europeans and natives, Chinese and Japanese, men, women
and children, who precipitated themselves upon the narrow benches
and into the boxes opposite the stage.  The musicians took up a position
inside, and were vigorously performing on their gongs, tam-tams, flutes,
bones, tambourines, and immense drums.

The performance was much like all acrobatic displays; but it must be
confessed that the Japanese are the first equilibrists in the world.

One, with a fan and some bits of paper, performed the graceful
trick of the butterflies and the flowers; another traced in the air,
with the odorous smoke of his pipe, a series of blue words,
which composed a compliment to the audience; while a third juggled
with some lighted candles, which he extinguished successively
as they passed his lips, and relit again without interrupting
for an instant his juggling.  Another reproduced the most singular
combinations with a spinning-top; in his hands the revolving tops
seemed to be animated with a life of their own in their
interminable whirling; they ran over pipe-stems, the edges of sabres,
wires and even hairs stretched across the stage; they turned around
on the edges of large glasses, crossed bamboo ladders, dispersed into
all the corners, and produced strange musical effects by the combination
of their various pitches of tone.  The jugglers tossed them in the air,
threw them like shuttlecocks with wooden battledores, and yet they kept
on spinning; they put them into their pockets, and took them out
still whirling as before.

It is useless to describe the astonishing performances of the acrobats
and gymnasts.  The turning on ladders, poles, balls, barrels, &c.,
was executed with wonderful precision.

But the principal attraction was the exhibition of the Long Noses,
a show to which Europe is as yet a stranger.

The Long Noses form a peculiar company, under the direct patronage
of the god Tingou.  Attired after the fashion of the Middle Ages,
they bore upon their shoulders a splendid pair of wings;
but what especially distinguished them was the long noses
which were fastened to their faces, and the uses which they made of them.
These noses were made of bamboo, and were five, six, and even ten feet long,
some straight, others curved, some ribboned, and some having imitation warts
upon them.  It was upon these appendages, fixed tightly on their real noses,
that they performed their gymnastic exercises.  A dozen of these sectaries
of Tingou lay flat upon their backs, while others, dressed to represent
lightning-rods, came and frolicked on their noses, jumping from one to another,
and performing the most skilful leapings and somersaults.

As a last scene, a "human pyramid" had been announced, in which
fifty Long Noses were to represent the Car of Juggernaut.
But, instead of forming a pyramid by mounting each other's shoulders,
the artists were to group themselves on top of the noses.
It happened that the performer who had hitherto formed the base
of the Car had quitted the troupe, and as, to fill this part,
only strength and adroitness were necessary, Passepartout
had been chosen to take his place.

The poor fellow really felt sad when--melancholy reminiscence
of his youth!--he donned his costume, adorned with vari-coloured wings,
and fastened to his natural feature a false nose six feet long.
But he cheered up when he thought that this nose was winning
him something to eat.

He went upon the stage, and took his place beside the rest
who were to compose the base of the Car of Juggernaut.
They all stretched themselves on the floor, their noses pointing
to the ceiling.  A second group of artists disposed themselves on
these long appendages, then a third above these, then a fourth,
until a human monument reaching to the very cornices of the theatre
soon arose on top of the noses.  This elicited loud applause,
in the midst of which the orchestra was just striking up a deafening air,
when the pyramid tottered, the balance was lost, one of the lower
noses vanished from the pyramid, and the human monument was
shattered like a castle built of cards!

It was Passepartout's fault.  Abandoning his position,
clearing the footlights without the aid of his wings, and,
clambering up to the right-hand gallery, he fell at the feet of
one of the spectators, crying, "Ah, my master! my master!"

"You here?"

"Myself."

"Very well; then let us go to the steamer, young man!"

Mr. Fogg, Aouda, and Passepartout passed through the lobby
of the theatre to the outside, where they encountered
the Honourable Mr. Batulcar, furious with rage.  He demanded damages
for the "breakage" of the pyramid; and Phileas Fogg appeased him
by giving him a handful of banknotes.

At half-past six, the very hour of departure, Mr. Fogg and Aouda,
followed by Passepartout, who in his hurry had retained his wings,
and nose six feet long, stepped upon the American steamer.




Chapter XXIV

DURING WHICH MR. FOGG AND PARTY CROSS THE PACIFIC OCEAN


What happened when the pilot-boat came in sight of Shanghai will
be easily guessed.  The signals made by the Tankadere had been
seen by the captain of the Yokohama steamer, who, espying the flag
at half-mast, had directed his course towards the little craft.
Phileas Fogg, after paying the stipulated price of his passage to
John Busby, and rewarding that worthy with the additional sum of
five hundred and fifty pounds, ascended the steamer with Aouda
and Fix; and they started at once for Nagasaki and Yokohama.

They reached their destination on the morning of the 14th of November.
Phileas Fogg lost no time in going on board the Carnatic, where he learned,
to Aouda's great delight--and perhaps to his own, though he betrayed
no emotion--that Passepartout, a Frenchman, had really arrived on her
the day before.

The San Francisco steamer was announced to leave that very evening,
and it became necessary to find Passepartout, if possible, without delay.
Mr. Fogg applied in vain to the French and English consuls, and,
after wandering through the streets a long time, began to despair
of finding his missing servant.  Chance, or perhaps a kind of presentiment,
at last led him into the Honourable Mr. Batulcar's theatre.  He certainly
would not have recognised Passepartout in the eccentric mountebank's costume;
but the latter, lying on his back, perceived his master in the gallery.
He could not help starting, which so changed the position of his nose
as to bring the "pyramid" pell-mell upon the stage.

All this Passepartout learned from Aouda, who recounted to him
what had taken place on the voyage from Hong Kong to Shanghai
on the Tankadere, in company with one Mr. Fix.

Passepartout did not change countenance on hearing this name.
He thought that the time had not yet arrived to divulge to his
master what had taken place between the detective and himself;
and, in the account he gave of his absence, he simply excused himself
for having been overtaken by drunkenness, in smoking opium
at a tavern in Hong Kong.

Mr. Fogg heard this narrative coldly, without a word; and then
furnished his man with funds necessary to obtain clothing more
in harmony with his position.  Within an hour the Frenchman had
cut off his nose and parted with his wings, and retained nothing
about him which recalled the sectary of the god Tingou.

The steamer which was about to depart from Yokohama to San Francisco
belonged to the Pacific Mail Steamship Company, and was named
the General Grant.  She was a large paddle-wheel steamer
of two thousand five hundred tons; well equipped and very fast.
The massive walking-beam rose and fell above the deck;
at one end a piston-rod worked up and down; and at the other
was a connecting-rod which, in changing the rectilinear motion
to a circular one, was directly connected with the shaft of the paddles.
The General Grant was rigged with three masts, giving a large capacity
for sails, and thus materially aiding the steam power.  By making
twelve miles an hour, she would cross the ocean in twenty-one days.
Phileas Fogg was therefore justified in hoping that he would reach
San Francisco by the 2nd of December, New York by the 11th,
and London on the 20th--thus gaining several hours on the fatal date
of the 21st of December.

There was a full complement of passengers on board, among them English,
many Americans, a large number of coolies on their way to California,
and several East Indian officers, who were spending their vacation
in making the tour of the world.  Nothing of moment happened on the voyage;
the steamer, sustained on its large paddles, rolled but little,
and the Pacific almost justified its name.  Mr. Fogg was as calm
and taciturn as ever.  His young companion felt herself more and more
attached to him by other ties than gratitude; his silent but generous nature
impressed her more than she thought; and it was almost unconsciously that
she yielded to emotions which did not seem to have the least effect upon
her protector.  Aouda took the keenest interest in his plans, and became
impatient at any incident which seemed likely to retard his journey.

She often chatted with Passepartout, who did not fail to perceive
the state of the lady's heart; and, being the most faithful of domestics,
he never exhausted his eulogies of Phileas Fogg's honesty, generosity,
and devotion.  He took pains to calm Aouda's doubts of a successful
termination of the journey, telling her that the most difficult part
of it had passed, that now they were beyond the fantastic countries
of Japan and China, and were fairly on their way to civilised places again.
A railway train from San Francisco to New York, and a transatlantic steamer
from New York to Liverpool, would doubtless bring them to the end of this
impossible journey round the world within the period agreed upon.

On the ninth day after leaving Yokohama, Phileas Fogg had traversed exactly
one half of the terrestrial globe.  The General Grant passed, on the 23rd
of November, the one hundred and eightieth meridian, and was at the very
antipodes of London.  Mr. Fogg had, it is true, exhausted fifty-two
of the eighty days in which he was to complete the tour, and there were
only twenty-eight left.  But, though he was only half-way by the
difference of meridians, he had really gone over two-thirds of the
whole journey; for he had been obliged to make long circuits from
London to Aden, from Aden to Bombay, from Calcutta to Singapore,
and from Singapore to Yokohama.  Could he have followed without
deviation the fiftieth parallel, which is that of London,
the whole distance would only have been about twelve thousand miles;
whereas he would be forced, by the irregular methods of locomotion,
to traverse twenty-six thousand, of which he had, on the 23rd of November,
accomplished seventeen thousand five hundred.  And now the course was
a straight one, and Fix was no longer there to put obstacles in their way!

It happened also, on the 23rd of November, that Passepartout
made a joyful discovery.  It will be remembered that the obstinate
fellow had insisted on keeping his famous family watch at London time,
and on regarding that of the countries he had passed through as quite false
and unreliable.  Now, on this day, though he had not changed the hands,
he found that his watch exactly agreed with the ship's chronometers.
His triumph was hilarious.  He would have liked to know what Fix
would say if he were aboard!

"The rogue told me a lot of stories," repeated Passepartout,
"about the meridians, the sun, and the moon!  Moon, indeed!
moonshine more likely!  If one listened to that sort of people,
a pretty sort of time one would keep!  I was sure that the sun
would some day regulate itself by my watch!"

Passepartout was ignorant that, if the face of his watch had
been divided into twenty-four hours, like the Italian clocks,
he would have no reason for exultation; for the hands of his watch
would then, instead of as now indicating nine o'clock in the morning,
indicate nine o'clock in the evening, that is, the twenty-first hour
after midnight precisely the difference between London time and that
of the one hundred and eightieth meridian.  But if Fix had been able
to explain this purely physical effect, Passepartout would not have admitted,
even if he had comprehended it.  Moreover, if the detective had been on board
at that moment, Passepartout would have joined issue with him on a quite
different subject, and in an entirely different manner.

Where was Fix at that moment?

He was actually on board the General Grant.

On reaching Yokohama, the detective, leaving Mr. Fogg, whom he expected
to meet again during the day, had repaired at once to the English consulate,
where he at last found the warrant of arrest.  It had followed him from Bombay,
and had come by the Carnatic, on which steamer he himself was supposed to be.
Fix's disappointment may be imagined when he reflected that the warrant was
now useless.  Mr. Fogg had left English ground, and it was now necessary
to procure his extradition!

"Well," thought Fix, after a moment of anger, "my warrant is not good here,
but it will be in England.  The rogue evidently intends to return to his
own country, thinking he has thrown the police off his track.  Good!
I will follow him across the Atlantic.  As for the money, heaven grant
there may be some left!  But the fellow has already spent in travelling,
rewards, trials, bail, elephants, and all sorts of charges, more than
five thousand pounds.  Yet, after all, the Bank is rich!"

His course decided on, he went on board the General Grant,
and was there when Mr. Fogg and Aouda arrived.  To his utter
amazement, he recognised Passepartout, despite his theatrical disguise.
He quickly concealed himself in his cabin, to avoid an awkward explanation,
and hoped--thanks to the number of passengers--to remain unperceived
by Mr. Fogg's servant.

On that very day, however, he met Passepartout face to face
on the forward deck.  The latter, without a word,
made a rush for him, grasped him by the throat,
and, much to the amusement of a group of Americans,
who immediately began to bet on him, administered
to the detective a perfect volley of blows,
which proved the great superiority of French
over English pugilistic skill.

When Passepartout had finished, he found himself relieved
and comforted.  Fix got up in a somewhat rumpled condition,
and, looking at his adversary, coldly said, "Have you done?"

"For this time--yes."

"Then let me have a word with you."

"But I--"

"In your master's interests."

Passepartout seemed to be vanquished by Fix's coolness, for he quietly
followed him, and they sat down aside from the rest of the passengers.

"You have given me a thrashing," said Fix.  "Good, I expected it.
Now, listen to me.  Up to this time I have been Mr. Fogg's adversary.
I am now in his game."

"Aha!" cried Passepartout; "you are convinced he is an honest man?"

"No," replied Fix coldly, "I think him a rascal.  Sh! don't budge,
and let me speak.  As long as Mr. Fogg was on English ground,
it was for my interest to detain him there until my warrant
of arrest arrived.  I did everything I could to keep him back.
I sent the Bombay priests after him, I got you intoxicated at Hong Kong,
I separated you from him, and I made him miss the Yokohama steamer."

Passepartout listened, with closed fists.

"Now," resumed Fix, "Mr. Fogg seems to be going back to England.
Well, I will follow him there.  But hereafter I will do as much
to keep obstacles out of his way as I have done up to this time
to put them in his path.  I've changed my game, you see,
and simply because it was for my interest to change it.
Your interest is the same as mine; for it is only in England
that you will ascertain whether you are in the service of a criminal
or an honest man."

Passepartout listened very attentively to Fix,
and was convinced that he spoke with entire good faith.

"Are we friends?" asked the detective.

"Friends?--no," replied Passepartout; "but allies, perhaps.
At the least sign of treason, however, I'll twist your neck for you."

"Agreed," said the detective quietly.

Eleven days later, on the 3rd of December, the General Grant
entered the bay of the Golden Gate, and reached San Francisco.

Mr. Fogg had neither gained nor lost a single day.




Chapter XXV

IN WHICH A SLIGHT GLIMPSE IS HAD OF SAN FRANCISCO


It was seven in the morning when Mr. Fogg, Aouda, and Passepartout
set foot upon the American continent, if this name can be given to
the floating quay upon which they disembarked.  These quays,
rising and falling with the tide, thus facilitate the loading
and unloading of vessels.  Alongside them were clippers of all sizes,
steamers of all nationalities, and the steamboats, with several decks
rising one above the other, which ply on the Sacramento and its tributaries.
There were also heaped up the products of a commerce which extends to Mexico,
Chili, Peru, Brazil, Europe, Asia, and all the Pacific islands.

Passepartout, in his joy on reaching at last the American continent,
thought he would manifest it by executing a perilous vault in fine style;
but, tumbling upon some worm-eaten planks, he fell through them.
Put out of countenance by the manner in which he thus "set foot"
upon the New World, he uttered a loud cry, which so frightened
the innumerable cormorants and pelicans that are always perched
upon these movable quays, that they flew noisily away.

Mr. Fogg, on reaching shore, proceeded to find out at what hour the first
train left for New York, and learned that this was at six o'clock p.m.;
he had, therefore, an entire day to spend in the Californian capital.
Taking a carriage at a charge of three dollars, he and Aouda entered it,
while Passepartout mounted the box beside the driver, and they set out
for the International Hotel.

From his exalted position Passepartout observed with much curiosity
the wide streets, the low, evenly ranged houses, the Anglo-Saxon
Gothic churches, the great docks, the palatial wooden and brick warehouses,
the numerous conveyances, omnibuses, horse-cars, and upon the side-walks,
not only Americans and Europeans, but Chinese and Indians.  Passepartout
was surprised at all he saw.  San Francisco was no longer the legendary city
of 1849--a city of banditti, assassins, and incendiaries, who had flocked
hither in crowds in pursuit of plunder; a paradise of outlaws, where they
gambled with gold-dust, a revolver in one hand and a bowie-knife in the other:
it was now a great commercial emporium.

The lofty tower of its City Hall overlooked the whole panorama
of the streets and avenues, which cut each other at right-angles,
and in the midst of which appeared pleasant, verdant squares,
while beyond appeared the Chinese quarter, seemingly imported
from the Celestial Empire in a toy-box.  Sombreros and red shirts
and plumed Indians were rarely to be seen; but there were silk hats
and black coats everywhere worn by a multitude of nervously active,
gentlemanly-looking men.  Some of the streets-- especially Montgomery Street,
which is to San Francisco what Regent Street is to London,
the Boulevard des Italiens to Paris, and Broadway to New York--
were lined with splendid and spacious stores, which exposed
in their windows the products of the entire world.

When Passepartout reached the International Hotel,
it did not seem to him as if he had left England at all.

The ground floor of the hotel was occupied by a large bar,
a sort of restaurant freely open to all passers-by, who might
partake of dried beef, oyster soup, biscuits, and cheese,
without taking out their purses.  Payment was made only for the ale,
porter, or sherry which was drunk.  This seemed "very American"
to Passepartout.  The hotel refreshment-rooms were comfortable,
and Mr. Fogg and Aouda, installing themselves at a table,
were abundantly served on diminutive plates by negroes of darkest hue.

After breakfast, Mr. Fogg, accompanied by Aouda, started for
the English consulate to have his passport visaed.  As he was
going out, he met Passepartout, who asked him if it would not be well,
before taking the train, to purchase some dozens of Enfield rifles
and Colt's revolvers.  He had been listening to stories of attacks
upon the trains by the Sioux and Pawnees.  Mr. Fogg thought it
a useless precaution, but told him to do as he thought best,
and went on to the consulate.

He had not proceeded two hundred steps, however, when, "by the
greatest chance in the world," he met Fix.  The detective seemed
wholly taken by surprise.  What!  Had Mr. Fogg and himself
crossed the Pacific together, and not met on the steamer!
At least Fix felt honoured to behold once more the gentleman
to whom he owed so much, and, as his business recalled him to Europe,
he should be delighted to continue the journey in such pleasant company.

Mr. Fogg replied that the honour would be his; and the detective--
who was determined not to lose sight of him--begged permission
to accompany them in their walk about San Francisco--a request
which Mr. Fogg readily granted.

They soon found themselves in Montgomery Street, where a great
crowd was collected; the side-walks, street, horsecar rails,
the shop-doors, the windows of the houses, and even the roofs,
were full of people.  Men were going about carrying large posters,
and flags and streamers were floating in the wind; while loud cries
were heard on every hand.

"Hurrah for Camerfield!"

"Hurrah for Mandiboy!"

It was a political meeting; at least so Fix conjectured, who said to Mr. Fogg,
"Perhaps we had better not mingle with the crowd.  There may be danger in it."

"Yes," returned Mr. Fogg; "and blows, even if they are political
are still blows."

Fix smiled at this remark; and, in order to be able to see without
being jostled about, the party took up a position on the top of a flight
of steps situated at the upper end of Montgomery Street.  Opposite them,
on the other side of the street, between a coal wharf and a petroleum warehouse,
a large platform had been erected in the open air, towards which the current
of the crowd seemed to be directed.

For what purpose was this meeting?  What was the occasion of this
excited assemblage?  Phileas Fogg could not imagine.  Was it to nominate
some high official--a governor or member of Congress?  It was not improbable,
so agitated was the multitude before them.

Just at this moment there was an unusual stir in the human mass.
All the hands were raised in the air.  Some, tightly closed,
seemed to disappear suddenly in the midst of the cries--an energetic way,
no doubt, of casting a vote.  The crowd swayed back, the banners and flags
wavered, disappeared an instant, then reappeared in tatters.
The undulations of the human surge reached the steps,
while all the heads floundered on the surface like a sea
agitated by a squall.  Many of the black hats disappeared,
and the greater part of the crowd seemed to have diminished in height.

"It is evidently a meeting," said Fix, "and its object must be
an exciting one.  I should not wonder if it were about the Alabama,
despite the fact that that question is settled."

"Perhaps," replied Mr. Fogg, simply.

"At least, there are two champions in presence of each other,
the Honourable Mr. Camerfield and the Honourable Mr. Mandiboy."

Aouda, leaning upon Mr. Fogg's arm, observed the tumultuous scene
with surprise, while Fix asked a man near him what the cause of it all was.
Before the man could reply, a fresh agitation arose; hurrahs and excited
shouts were heard; the staffs of the banners began to be used
as offensive weapons; and fists flew about in every direction.
Thumps were exchanged from the tops of the carriages and omnibuses
which had been blocked up in the crowd.  Boots and shoes went whirling
through the air, and Mr. Fogg thought he even heard the crack of revolvers
mingling in the din, the rout approached the stairway, and flowed over
the lower step.  One of the parties had evidently been repulsed;
but the mere lookers-on could not tell whether Mandiboy or Camerfield
had gained the upper hand.

"It would be prudent for us to retire," said Fix, who was anxious
that Mr. Fogg should not receive any injury, at least until
they got back to London.  "If there is any question about England
in all this, and we were recognised, I fear it would go hard with us."

"An English subject--" began Mr. Fogg.

He did not finish his sentence; for a terrific hubbub now arose
on the terrace behind the flight of steps where they stood,
and there were frantic shouts of, "Hurrah for Mandiboy!  Hip, hip, hurrah!"

It was a band of voters coming to the rescue of their allies,
and taking the Camerfield forces in flank.  Mr. Fogg, Aouda,
and Fix found themselves between two fires; it was too late to escape.
The torrent of men, armed with loaded canes and sticks, was irresistible.
Phileas Fogg and Fix were roughly hustled in their attempts to protect
their fair companion; the former, as cool as ever, tried to defend himself
with the weapons which nature has placed at the end of every Englishman's arm,
but in vain.  A big brawny fellow with a red beard, flushed face,
and broad shoulders, who seemed to be the chief of the band,
raised his clenched fist to strike Mr. Fogg, whom he would have given
a crushing blow, had not Fix rushed in and received it in his stead.
An enormous bruise immediately made its appearance under the detective's
silk hat, which was completely smashed in.

"Yankee!" exclaimed Mr. Fogg, darting a contemptuous look at the ruffian.

"Englishman!" returned the other.  "We will meet again!"

"When you please."

"What is your name?"

"Phileas Fogg.  And yours?"

"Colonel Stamp Proctor."

The human tide now swept by, after overturning Fix, who speedily
got upon his feet again, though with tattered clothes.  Happily,
he was not seriously hurt.  His travelling overcoat was divided
into two unequal parts, and his trousers resembled those of certain Indians,
which fit less compactly than they are easy to put on.
Aouda had escaped unharmed, and Fix alone bore marks
of the fray in his black and blue bruise.

"Thanks," said Mr. Fogg to the detective,
as soon as they were out of the crowd.

"No thanks are necessary," replied.  Fix; "but let us go."

"Where?"

"To a tailor's."

Such a visit was, indeed, opportune.  The clothing of both Mr. Fogg
and Fix was in rags, as if they had themselves been actively engaged
in the contest between Camerfield and Mandiboy.  An hour after,
they were once more suitably attired, and with Aouda returned
to the International Hotel.

Passepartout was waiting for his master, armed with half a dozen
six-barrelled revolvers.  When he perceived Fix, he knit his brows;
but Aouda having, in a few words, told him of their adventure,
his countenance resumed its placid expression.  Fix evidently
was no longer an enemy, but an ally; he was faithfully keeping his word.

Dinner over, the coach which was to convey the passengers and their luggage
to the station drew up to the door.  As he was getting in, Mr. Fogg
said to Fix, "You have not seen this Colonel Proctor again?"

"No."

"I will come back to America to find him," said Phileas Fogg calmly.
"It would not be right for an Englishman to permit himself to be treated
in that way, without retaliating."

The detective smiled, but did not reply.  It was clear that Mr. Fogg
was one of those Englishmen who, while they do not tolerate duelling at home,
fight abroad when their honour is attacked.

At a quarter before six the travellers reached the station,
and found the train ready to depart.  As he was about to enter it,
Mr. Fogg called a porter, and said to him: "My friend,
was there not some trouble to-day in San Francisco?"

"It was a political meeting, sir," replied the porter.

"But I thought there was a great deal of disturbance in the streets."

"It was only a meeting assembled for an election."

"The election of a general-in-chief, no doubt?" asked Mr. Fogg.

"No, sir; of a justice of the peace."

Phileas Fogg got into the train, which started off at full speed.




Chapter XXVI

IN WHICH PHILEAS FOGG AND PARTY TRAVEL BY THE PACIFIC RAILROAD


"From ocean to ocean"--so say the Americans; and these four words
compose the general designation of the "great trunk line"
which crosses the entire width of the United States.
The Pacific Railroad is, however, really divided into two distinct lines:
the Central Pacific, between San Francisco and Ogden, and the Union Pacific,
between Ogden and Omaha.  Five main lines connect Omaha with New York.

New York and San Francisco are thus united by an uninterrupted metal ribbon,
which measures no less than three thousand seven hundred and eighty-six miles.
Between Omaha and the Pacific the railway crosses a territory which is still
infested by Indians and wild beasts, and a large tract which the Mormons,
after they were driven from Illinois in 1845, began to colonise.

The journey from New York to San Francisco consumed, formerly,
under the most favourable conditions, at least six months.
It is now accomplished in seven days.

It was in 1862 that, in spite of the Southern Members of Congress,
who wished a more southerly route, it was decided to lay the road
between the forty-first and forty-second parallels.  President Lincoln
himself fixed the end of the line at Omaha, in Nebraska.  The work was
at once commenced, and pursued with true American energy; nor did the
rapidity with which it went on injuriously affect its good execution.
The road grew, on the prairies, a mile and a half a day.  A locomotive,
running on the rails laid down the evening before, brought the rails
to be laid on the morrow, and advanced upon them as fast as they were
put in position.

The Pacific Railroad is joined by several branches in Iowa, Kansas,
Colorado, and Oregon.  On leaving Omaha, it passes along the left bank
of the Platte River as far as the junction of its northern branch,
follows its southern branch, crosses the Laramie territory and the
Wahsatch Mountains, turns the Great Salt Lake, and reaches Salt Lake City,
the Mormon capital, plunges into the Tuilla Valley, across the American Desert,
Cedar and Humboldt Mountains, the Sierra Nevada, and descends, via Sacramento,
to the Pacific--its grade, even on the Rocky Mountains, never exceeding
one hundred and twelve feet to the mile.

Such was the road to be traversed in seven days, which would enable
Phileas Fogg--at least, so he hoped--to take the Atlantic steamer
at New York on the 11th for Liverpool.

The car which he occupied was a sort of long omnibus on eight wheels,
and with no compartments in the interior.  It was supplied with two rows
of seats, perpendicular to the direction of the train on either side
of an aisle which conducted to the front and rear platforms.
These platforms were found throughout the train, and the passengers
were able to pass from one end of the train to the other.
It was supplied with saloon cars, balcony cars, restaurants,
and smoking-cars; theatre cars alone were wanting, and they will
have these some day.

Book and news dealers, sellers of edibles, drinkables, and cigars,
who seemed to have plenty of customers, were continually circulating
in the aisles.

The train left Oakland station at six o'clock.  It was already night,
cold and cheerless, the heavens being overcast with clouds which seemed
to threaten snow.  The train did not proceed rapidly; counting the stoppages,
it did not run more than twenty miles an hour, which was a sufficient speed,
however, to enable it to reach Omaha within its designated time.

There was but little conversation in the car, and soon many of the passengers
were overcome with sleep.  Passepartout found himself beside the detective;
but he did not talk to him.  After recent events, their relations with each
other had grown somewhat cold; there could no longer be mutual sympathy or
intimacy between them.  Fix's manner had not changed; but Passepartout was very
reserved, and ready to strangle his former friend on the slightest provocation.

Snow began to fall an hour after they started, a fine snow, however,
which happily could not obstruct the train; nothing could be seen
from the windows but a vast, white sheet, against which the smoke
of the locomotive had a greyish aspect.

At eight o'clock a steward entered the car and announced that
the time for going to bed had arrived; and in a few minutes
the car was transformed into a dormitory.  The backs of the seats
were thrown back, bedsteads carefully packed were rolled out by
an ingenious system, berths were suddenly improvised, and each traveller
had soon at his disposition a comfortable bed, protected from curious eyes
by thick curtains.  The sheets were clean and the pillows soft.
It only remained to go to bed and sleep which everybody did--
while the train sped on across the State of California.

The country between San Francisco and Sacramento is not very hilly.
The Central Pacific, taking Sacramento for its starting-point,
extends eastward to meet the road from Omaha.  The line from San Francisco
to Sacramento runs in a north-easterly direction, along the American River,
which empties into San Pablo Bay.  The one hundred and twenty miles between
these cities were accomplished in six hours, and towards midnight, while
fast asleep, the travellers passed through Sacramento; so that they saw nothing
of that important place, the seat of the State government, with its fine quays,
its broad streets, its noble hotels, squares, and churches.

The train, on leaving Sacramento, and passing the junction, Roclin, Auburn,
and Colfax, entered the range of the Sierra Nevada.  'Cisco was reached
at seven in the morning; and an hour later the dormitory was transformed
into an ordinary car, and the travellers could observe the picturesque
beauties of the mountain region through which they were steaming.
The railway track wound in and out among the passes, now approaching
the mountain-sides, now suspended over precipices, avoiding abrupt angles
by bold curves, plunging into narrow defiles, which seemed to have
no outlet.  The locomotive, its great funnel emitting a weird light,
with its sharp bell, and its cow-catcher extended like a spur,
mingled its shrieks and bellowings with the noise of torrents and cascades,
and twined its smoke among the branches of the gigantic pines.

There were few or no bridges or tunnels on the route.  The railway
turned around the sides of the mountains, and did not attempt to violate
nature by taking the shortest cut from one point to another.

The train entered the State of Nevada through the Carson Valley
about nine o'clock, going always northeasterly; and at midday reached Reno,
where there was a delay of twenty minutes for breakfast.

From this point the road, running along Humboldt River,
passed northward for several miles by its banks; then it
turned eastward, and kept by the river until it reached
the Humboldt Range, nearly at the extreme eastern limit of Nevada.

Having breakfasted, Mr. Fogg and his companions resumed their places
in the car, and observed the varied landscape which unfolded itself
as they passed along the vast prairies, the mountains lining the horizon,
and the creeks, with their frothy, foaming streams.  Sometimes a great herd
of buffaloes, massing together in the distance, seemed like a moveable dam.
These innumerable multitudes of ruminating beasts often form an
insurmountable obstacle to the passage of the trains; thousands
of them have been seen passing over the track for hours together,
in compact ranks.  The locomotive is then forced to stop and wait
till the road is once more clear.

This happened, indeed, to the train in which Mr. Fogg was travelling.
About twelve o'clock a troop of ten or twelve thousand head of buffalo
encumbered the track.  The locomotive, slackening its speed, tried to clear
the way with its cow-catcher; but the mass of animals was too great.
The buffaloes marched along with a tranquil gait, uttering now and then
deafening bellowings.  There was no use of interrupting them, for,
having taken a particular direction, nothing can moderate and change
their course; it is a torrent of living flesh which no dam could contain.

The travellers gazed on this curious spectacle from the platforms;
but Phileas Fogg, who had the most reason of all to be in a hurry,
remained in his seat, and waited philosophically until it should please
the buffaloes to get out of the way.

Passepartout was furious at the delay they occasioned, and longed
to discharge his arsenal of revolvers upon them.

"What a country!" cried he.  "Mere cattle stop the trains, and go by
in a procession, just as if they were not impeding travel!  Parbleu!
I should like to know if Mr. Fogg foresaw this mishap in his programme!
And here's an engineer who doesn't dare to run the locomotive
into this herd of beasts!"

The engineer did not try to overcome the obstacle, and he was wise.
He would have crushed the first buffaloes, no doubt, with the cow-catcher;
but the locomotive, however powerful, would soon have been checked,
the train would inevitably have been thrown off the track,
and would then have been helpless.

The best course was to wait patiently, and regain the lost time
by greater speed when the obstacle was removed.  The procession
of buffaloes lasted three full hours, and it was night before
the track was clear.  The last ranks of the herd were now passing over
the rails, while the first had already disappeared below the southern horizon.

It was eight o'clock when the train passed through the defiles
of the Humboldt Range, and half-past nine when it penetrated Utah,
the region of the Great Salt Lake, the singular colony of the Mormons.




Chapter XXVII

IN WHICH PASSEPARTOUT UNDERGOES, AT A SPEED OF TWENTY MILES AN HOUR,
A COURSE OF MORMON HISTORY


During the night of the 5th of December, the train ran south-easterly
for about fifty miles; then rose an equal distance in a north-easterly
direction, towards the Great Salt Lake.

Passepartout, about nine o'clock, went out upon the platform to take the air.
The weather was cold, the heavens grey, but it was not snowing.
The sun's disc, enlarged by the mist, seemed an enormous ring of gold,
and Passepartout was amusing himself by calculating its value
in pounds sterling, when he was diverted from this interesting study
by a strange-looking personage who made his appearance on the platform.

This personage, who had taken the train at Elko, was tall and dark,
with black moustache, black stockings, a black silk hat, a black waistcoat,
black trousers, a white cravat, and dogskin gloves.  He might have been
taken for a clergyman.  He went from one end of the train to the other,
and affixed to the door of each car a notice written in manuscript.

Passepartout approached and read one of these notices, which stated that
Elder William Hitch, Mormon missionary, taking advantage of his presence
on train No. 48, would deliver a lecture on Mormonism in car No. 117,
from eleven to twelve o'clock; and that he invited all who were desirous
of being instructed concerning the mysteries of the religion of the
"Latter Day Saints" to attend.

"I'll go," said Passepartout to himself.  He knew nothing
of Mormonism except the custom of polygamy, which is its foundation.

The news quickly spread through the train, which contained
about one hundred passengers, thirty of whom, at most,
attracted by the notice, ensconced themselves in car No. 117.
Passepartout took one of the front seats.  Neither Mr. Fogg
nor Fix cared to attend.

At the appointed hour Elder William Hitch rose, and, in an irritated voice,
as if he had already been contradicted, said, "I tell you that Joe Smith
is a martyr, that his brother Hiram is a martyr, and that the persecutions
of the United States Government against the prophets will also make a martyr
of Brigham Young.  Who dares to say the contrary?"

No one ventured to gainsay the missionary, whose excited tone contrasted
curiously with his naturally calm visage.  No doubt his anger arose
from the hardships to which the Mormons were actually subjected.
The government had just succeeded, with some difficulty, in reducing
these independent fanatics to its rule.  It had made itself master of Utah,
and subjected that territory to the laws of the Union, after imprisoning
Brigham Young on a charge of rebellion and polygamy.  The disciples
of the prophet had since redoubled their efforts, and resisted,
by words at least, the authority of Congress.  Elder Hitch, as is seen,
was trying to make proselytes on the very railway trains.

Then, emphasising his words with his loud voice and frequent gestures,
he related the history of the Mormons from Biblical times: how that,
in Israel, a Mormon prophet of the tribe of Joseph published the annals
of the new religion, and bequeathed them to his son Mormon;
how, many centuries later, a translation of this precious book,
which was written in Egyptian, was made by Joseph Smith, junior,
a Vermont farmer, who revealed himself as a mystical prophet in 1825;
and how, in short, the celestial messenger appeared to him
in an illuminated forest, and gave him the annals of the Lord.

Several of the audience, not being much interested in
the missionary's narrative, here left the car; but Elder Hitch,
continuing his lecture, related how Smith, junior, with his father,
two brothers, and a few disciples, founded the church of the
"Latter Day Saints," which, adopted not only in America,
but in England, Norway and Sweden, and Germany, counts many artisans,
as well as men engaged in the liberal professions, among its members;
how a colony was established in Ohio, a temple erected there at a
cost of two hundred thousand dollars, and a town built at Kirkland;
how Smith became an enterprising banker, and received from a simple mummy
showman a papyrus scroll written by Abraham and several famous Egyptians.

The Elder's story became somewhat wearisome, and his audience
grew gradually less, until it was reduced to twenty passengers.
But this did not disconcert the enthusiast, who proceeded with
the story of Joseph Smith's bankruptcy in 1837, and how his ruined
creditors gave him a coat of tar and feathers; his reappearance
some years afterwards, more honourable and honoured than ever,
at Independence, Missouri, the chief of a flourishing colony
of three thousand disciples, and his pursuit thence by outraged Gentiles,
and retirement into the Far West.

Ten hearers only were now left, among them honest Passepartout,
who was listening with all his ears.  Thus he learned that,
after long persecutions, Smith reappeared in Illinois,
and in 1839 founded a community at Nauvoo, on the Mississippi,
numbering twenty-five thousand souls, of which he became mayor,
chief justice, and general-in-chief; that he announced himself,
in 1843, as a candidate for the Presidency of the United States;
and that finally, being drawn into ambuscade at Carthage,
he was thrown into prison, and assassinated by a band of men
disguised in masks.

Passepartout was now the only person left in the car, and the Elder,
looking him full in the face, reminded him that, two years after
the assassination of Joseph Smith, the inspired prophet, Brigham Young,
his successor, left Nauvoo for the banks of the Great Salt Lake, where,
in the midst of that fertile region, directly on the route of the emigrants
who crossed Utah on their way to California, the new colony, thanks to
the polygamy practised by the Mormons, had flourished beyond expectations.

"And this," added Elder William Hitch, "this is why the jealousy of Congress
has been aroused against us!  Why have the soldiers of the Union invaded
the soil of Utah?  Why has Brigham Young, our chief, been imprisoned,
in contempt of all justice?  Shall we yield to force?  Never!
Driven from Vermont, driven from Illinois, driven from Ohio,
driven from Missouri, driven from Utah, we shall yet find some
independent territory on which to plant our tents.  And you,
my brother," continued the Elder, fixing his angry eyes
upon his single auditor, "will you not plant yours there,
too, under the shadow of our flag?"

"No!" replied Passepartout courageously, in his turn retiring
from the car, and leaving the Elder to preach to vacancy.

During the lecture the train had been making good progress,
and towards half-past twelve it reached the northwest border
of the Great Salt Lake.  Thence the passengers could observe
the vast extent of this interior sea, which is also called the Dead Sea,
and into which flows an American Jordan.  It is a picturesque expanse,
framed in lofty crags in large strata, encrusted with white salt--
a superb sheet of water, which was formerly of larger extent than now,
its shores having encroached with the lapse of time, and thus at once
reduced its breadth and increased its depth.

The Salt Lake, seventy miles long and thirty-five wide,
is situated three miles eight hundred feet above the sea.
Quite different from Lake Asphaltite, whose depression
is twelve hundred feet below the sea, it contains considerable salt,
and one quarter of the weight of its water is solid matter,
its specific weight being 1,170, and, after being distilled, 1,000.
Fishes are, of course, unable to live in it, and those which descend
through the Jordan, the Weber, and other streams soon perish.

The country around the lake was well cultivated, for the Mormons
are mostly farmers; while ranches and pens for domesticated animals,
fields of wheat, corn, and other cereals, luxuriant prairies,
hedges of wild rose, clumps of acacias and milk-wort,
would have been seen six months later.  Now the ground
was covered with a thin powdering of snow.

The train reached Ogden at two o'clock, where it rested for six hours,
Mr. Fogg and his party had time to pay a visit to Salt Lake City,
connected with Ogden by a branch road; and they spent two hours
in this strikingly American town, built on the pattern of other cities
of the Union, like a checker-board, "with the sombre sadness of right-angles,"
as Victor Hugo expresses it.  The founder of the City of the Saints
could not escape from the taste for symmetry which distinguishes
the Anglo-Saxons.  In this strange country, where the people
are certainly not up to the level of their institutions,
everything is done "squarely"--cities, houses, and follies.

The travellers, then, were promenading, at three o'clock,
about the streets of the town built between the banks of the
Jordan and the spurs of the Wahsatch Range.  They saw few
or no churches, but the prophet's mansion, the court-house,
and the arsenal, blue-brick houses with verandas and porches,
surrounded by gardens bordered with acacias, palms, and locusts.
A clay and pebble wall, built in 1853, surrounded the town;
and in the principal street were the market and several hotels
adorned with pavilions.  The place did not seem thickly populated.
The streets were almost deserted, except in the vicinity of the temple,
which they only reached after having traversed several quarters
surrounded by palisades.  There were many women, which was easily
accounted for by the "peculiar institution" of the Mormons;
but it must not be supposed that all the Mormons are polygamists.
They are free to marry or not, as they please; but it is worth noting
that it is mainly the female citizens of Utah who are anxious to marry,
as, according to the Mormon religion, maiden ladies are not admitted
to the possession of its highest joys.  These poor creatures seemed
to be neither well off nor happy.  Some--the more well-to-do, no doubt--
wore short, open, black silk dresses, under a hood or modest shawl;
others were habited in Indian fashion.

Passepartout could not behold without a certain fright these women,
charged, in groups, with conferring happiness on a single Mormon.
His common sense pitied, above all, the husband.  It seemed to him
a terrible thing to have to guide so many wives at once across
the vicissitudes of life, and to conduct them, as it were,
in a body to the Mormon paradise with the prospect of seeing them
in the company of the glorious Smith, who doubtless was the chief ornament
of that delightful place, to all eternity.  He felt decidedly repelled
from such a vocation, and he imagined--perhaps he was mistaken--
that the fair ones of Salt Lake City cast rather alarming glances
on his person.  Happily, his stay there was but brief.  At four the party
found themselves again at the station, took their places in the train,
and the whistle sounded for starting.  Just at the moment, however,
that the locomotive wheels began to move, cries of "Stop! stop!" were heard.

Trains, like time and tide, stop for no one.  The gentleman
who uttered the cries was evidently a belated Mormon.  He was
breathless with running.  Happily for him, the station had neither
gates nor barriers.  He rushed along the track, jumped on the rear
platform of the train, and fell, exhausted, into one of the seats.

Passepartout, who had been anxiously watching this amateur gymnast,
approached him with lively interest, and learned that he had taken flight
after an unpleasant domestic scene.

When the Mormon had recovered his breath, Passepartout ventured
to ask him politely how many wives he had; for, from the manner
in which he had decamped, it might be thought that he had twenty at least.

"One, sir," replied the Mormon, raising his arms heavenward
--"one, and that was enough!"




Chapter XXVIII

IN WHICH PASSEPARTOUT DOES NOT SUCCEED IN MAKING ANYBODY LISTEN TO REASON


The train, on leaving Great Salt Lake at Ogden, passed northward
for an hour as far as Weber River, having completed nearly nine
hundred miles from San Francisco.  From this point it took
an easterly direction towards the jagged Wahsatch Mountains.
It was in the section included between this range and the
Rocky Mountains that the American engineers found the most
formidable difficulties in laying the road, and that the government
granted a subsidy of forty-eight thousand dollars per mile,
instead of sixteen thousand allowed for the work done on the plains.
But the engineers, instead of violating nature, avoided its difficulties
by winding around, instead of penetrating the rocks.  One tunnel only,
fourteen thousand feet in length, was pierced in order to arrive
at the great basin.

The track up to this time had reached its highest elevation at
the Great Salt Lake.  From this point it described a long curve,
descending towards Bitter Creek Valley, to rise again to the
dividing ridge of the waters between the Atlantic and the Pacific.
There were many creeks in this mountainous region, and it was necessary
to cross Muddy Creek, Green Creek, and others, upon culverts.

Passepartout grew more and more impatient as they went on,
while Fix longed to get out of this difficult region, and was more
anxious than Phileas Fogg himself to be beyond the danger of delays
and accidents, and set foot on English soil.

At ten o'clock at night the train stopped at Fort Bridger station,
and twenty minutes later entered Wyoming Territory, following the
valley of Bitter Creek throughout.  The next day, 7th December,
they stopped for a quarter of an hour at Green River station.
Snow had fallen abundantly during the night, but, being mixed with rain,
it had half melted, and did not interrupt their progress.  The bad weather,
however, annoyed Passepartout; for the accumulation of snow, by blocking
the wheels of the cars, would certainly have been fatal to Mr. Fogg's tour.

"What an idea!" he said to himself.  "Why did my master make
this journey in winter?  Couldn't he have waited for the good
season to increase his chances?"

While the worthy Frenchman was absorbed in the state of the sky
and the depression of the temperature, Aouda was experiencing
fears from a totally different cause.

Several passengers had got off at Green River, and were walking up and down
the platforms; and among these Aouda recognised Colonel Stamp Proctor,
the same who had so grossly insulted Phileas Fogg at the San Francisco meeting.
Not wishing to be recognised, the young woman drew back from the window,
feeling much alarm at her discovery.  She was attached to the man who,
however coldly, gave her daily evidences of the most absolute devotion.
She did not comprehend, perhaps, the depth of the sentiment with which
her protector inspired her, which she called gratitude, but which,
though she was unconscious of it, was really more than that.
Her heart sank within her when she recognised the man whom
Mr. Fogg desired, sooner or later, to call to account for his conduct.
Chance alone, it was clear, had brought Colonel Proctor on this train;
but there he was, and it was necessary, at all hazards, that Phileas Fogg
should not perceive his adversary.

Aouda seized a moment when Mr. Fogg was asleep to tell Fix and Passepartout
whom she had seen.

"That Proctor on this train!" cried Fix.  "Well, reassure yourself,
madam; before he settles with Mr. Fogg; he has got to deal with me!
It seems to me that I was the more insulted of the two."

"And, besides," added Passepartout, "I'll take charge of him,
colonel as he is."

"Mr. Fix," resumed Aouda, "Mr. Fogg will allow no one to avenge him.
He said that he would come back to America to find this man.
Should he perceive Colonel Proctor, we could not prevent a collision
which might have terrible results.  He must not see him."

"You are right, madam," replied Fix; "a meeting between them
might ruin all.  Whether he were victorious or beaten, Mr. Fogg
would be delayed, and--"

"And," added Passepartout, "that would play the game of the gentlemen
of the Reform Club.  In four days we shall be in New York.  Well,
if my master does not leave this car during those four days,
we may hope that chance will not bring him face to face with this
confounded American.  We must, if possible, prevent his stirring out of it."

The conversation dropped.  Mr. Fogg had just woke up,
and was looking out of the window.  Soon after Passepartout,
without being heard by his master or Aouda, whispered to the detective,
"Would you really fight for him?"

"I would do anything," replied Fix, in a tone which betrayed determined will,
"to get him back living to Europe!"

Passepartout felt something like a shudder shoot through his frame,
but his confidence in his master remained unbroken.

Was there any means of detaining Mr. Fogg in the car, to avoid a meeting
between him and the colonel?  It ought not to be a difficult task,
since that gentleman was naturally sedentary and little curious.
The detective, at least, seemed to have found a way; for, after a few moments,
he said to Mr. Fogg, "These are long and slow hours, sir, that we are passing
on the railway."

"Yes," replied Mr. Fogg; "but they pass."

"You were in the habit of playing whist," resumed Fix, "on the steamers."

"Yes; but it would be difficult to do so here.  I have neither cards
nor partners."

"Oh, but we can easily buy some cards, for they are sold
on all the American trains.  And as for partners, if madam plays--"

"Certainly, sir," Aouda quickly replied; "I understand whist.
It is part of an English education."

"I myself have some pretensions to playing a good game.
Well, here are three of us, and a dummy--"

"As you please, sir," replied Phileas Fogg, heartily glad
to resume his favourite pastime even on the railway.

Passepartout was dispatched in search of the steward,
and soon returned with two packs of cards, some pins,
counters, and a shelf covered with cloth.

The game commenced.  Aouda understood whist sufficiently well,
and even received some compliments on her playing from Mr. Fogg.
As for the detective, he was simply an adept, and worthy of being
matched against his present opponent.

"Now," thought Passepartout, "we've got him.  He won't budge."

At eleven in the morning the train had reached the dividing ridge of the waters
at Bridger Pass, seven thousand five hundred and twenty-four feet above
the level of the sea, one of the highest points attained by the track
in crossing the Rocky Mountains.  After going about two hundred miles,
the travellers at last found themselves on one of those vast plains
which extend to the Atlantic, and which nature has made so propitious
for laying the iron road.

On the declivity of the Atlantic basin the first streams,
branches of the North Platte River, already appeared.
The whole northern and eastern horizon was bounded by the immense
semi-circular curtain which is formed by the southern portion
of the Rocky Mountains, the highest being Laramie Peak.
Between this and the railway extended vast plains,
plentifully irrigated.  On the right rose the lower spurs
of the mountainous mass which extends southward to the sources
of the Arkansas River, one of the great tributaries of the Missouri.

At half-past twelve the travellers caught sight for an instant of Fort Halleck,
which commands that section; and in a few more hours the Rocky Mountains
were crossed.  There was reason to hope, then, that no accident would mark
the journey through this difficult country.  The snow had ceased falling,
and the air became crisp and cold.  Large birds, frightened by the locomotive,
rose and flew off in the distance.  No wild beast appeared on the plain.
It was a desert in its vast nakedness.

After a comfortable breakfast, served in the car, Mr. Fogg and his partners had
just resumed whist, when a violent whistling was heard, and the train stopped.
Passepartout put his head out of the door, but saw nothing to cause the delay;
no station was in view.

Aouda and Fix feared that Mr. Fogg might take it into his head to get out;
but that gentleman contented himself with saying to his servant,
"See what is the matter."

Passepartout rushed out of the car.  Thirty or forty passengers
had already descended, amongst them Colonel Stamp Proctor.

The train had stopped before a red signal which blocked the way.
The engineer and conductor were talking excitedly with a signal-man,
whom the station-master at Medicine Bow, the next stopping place,
had sent on before.  The passengers drew around and took part
in the discussion, in which Colonel Proctor, with his insolent manner,
was conspicuous.

Passepartout, joining the group, heard the signal-man say,
"No! you can't pass.  The bridge at Medicine Bow is shaky,
and would not bear the weight of the train."

This was a suspension-bridge thrown over some rapids, about a
mile from the place where they now were.  According to the
signal-man, it was in a ruinous condition, several of the iron
wires being broken; and it was impossible to risk the passage.
He did not in any way exaggerate the condition of the bridge.
It may be taken for granted that, rash as the Americans usually are,
when they are prudent there is good reason for it.

Passepartout, not daring to apprise his master of what he heard,
listened with set teeth, immovable as a statue.

"Hum!" cried Colonel Proctor; "but we are not going to stay here,
I imagine, and take root in the snow?"

"Colonel," replied the conductor, "we have telegraphed to Omaha for a train,
but it is not likely that it will reach Medicine Bow is less than six hours."

"Six hours!" cried Passepartout.

"Certainly," returned the conductor, "besides, it will take us as long
as that to reach Medicine Bow on foot."

"But it is only a mile from here," said one of the passengers.

"Yes, but it's on the other side of the river."

"And can't we cross that in a boat?" asked the colonel.

"That's impossible.  The creek is swelled by the rains.  It is a rapid,
and we shall have to make a circuit of ten miles to the north to find a ford."

The colonel launched a volley of oaths, denouncing the railway
company and the conductor; and Passepartout, who was furious,
was not disinclined to make common cause with him.  Here was
an obstacle, indeed, which all his master's banknotes could not remove.

There was a general disappointment among the passengers, who,
without reckoning the delay, saw themselves compelled to trudge
fifteen miles over a plain covered with snow.  They grumbled and
protested, and would certainly have thus attracted Phileas Fogg's
attention if he had not been completely absorbed in his game.

Passepartout found that he could not avoid telling his master what
had occurred, and, with hanging head, he was turning towards the car,
when the engineer a true Yankee, named Forster called out,
"Gentlemen, perhaps there is a way, after all, to get over."

"On the bridge?" asked a passenger.

"On the bridge."

"With our train?"

"With our train."

Passepartout stopped short, and eagerly listened to the engineer.

"But the bridge is unsafe," urged the conductor.

"No matter," replied Forster; "I think that by putting on the
very highest speed we might have a chance of getting over."

"The devil!" muttered Passepartout.

But a number of the passengers were at once attracted by the
engineer's proposal, and Colonel Proctor was especially delighted,
and found the plan a very feasible one.  He told stories about
engineers leaping their trains over rivers without bridges,
by putting on full steam; and many of those present avowed
themselves of the engineer's mind.

"We have fifty chances out of a hundred of getting over," said one.

"Eighty! ninety!"

Passepartout was astounded, and, though ready to attempt anything to get
over Medicine Creek, thought the experiment proposed a little too American.
"Besides," thought he, "there's a still more simple way, and it does not even
occur to any of these people!  Sir," said he aloud to one of the passengers,
"the engineer's plan seems to me a little dangerous, but--"

"Eighty chances!" replied the passenger, turning his back on him.

"I know it," said Passepartout, turning to another passenger,
"but a simple idea--"

"Ideas are no use," returned the American, shrugging his shoulders,
"as the engineer assures us that we can pass."

"Doubtless," urged Passepartout, "we can pass, but perhaps it would
be more prudent--"

"What!  Prudent!" cried Colonel Proctor, whom this word seemed
to excite prodigiously.  "At full speed, don't you see, at full speed!"

"I know--I see," repeated Passepartout; "but it would be, if not more prudent,
since that word displeases you, at least more natural--"

"Who!  What!  What's the matter with this fellow?" cried several.

The poor fellow did not know to whom to address himself.

"Are you afraid?" asked Colonel Proctor.

"I afraid?  Very well; I will show these people that a Frenchman
can be as American as they!"

"All aboard!" cried the conductor.

"Yes, all aboard!" repeated Passepartout, and immediately.
"But they can't prevent me from thinking that it would be more natural
for us to cross the bridge on foot, and let the train come after!"

But no one heard this sage reflection, nor would anyone have acknowledged
its justice.  The passengers resumed their places in the cars.
Passepartout took his seat without telling what had passed.
The whist-players were quite absorbed in their game.

The locomotive whistled vigorously; the engineer, reversing the steam,
backed the train for nearly a mile--retiring, like a jumper, in order
to take a longer leap.  Then, with another whistle, he began to move forward;
the train increased its speed, and soon its rapidity became frightful;
a prolonged screech issued from the locomotive; the piston worked up and down
twenty strokes to the second.  They perceived that the whole train, rushing
on at the rate of a hundred miles an hour, hardly bore upon the rails at all.

And they passed over!  It was like a flash.  No one saw the bridge.
The train leaped, so to speak, from one bank to the other,
and the engineer could not stop it until it had gone five miles
beyond the station.  But scarcely had the train passed the river,
when the bridge, completely ruined, fell with a crash into the rapids
of Medicine Bow.




Chapter XXIX

IN WHICH CERTAIN INCIDENTS ARE NARRATED
WHICH ARE ONLY TO BE MET WITH ON AMERICAN RAILROADS


The train pursued its course, that evening, without interruption,
passing Fort Saunders, crossing Cheyne Pass, and reaching Evans Pass.
The road here attained the highest elevation of the journey,
eight thousand and ninety-two feet above the level of the sea.
The travellers had now only to descend to the Atlantic by limitless plains,
levelled by nature.  A branch of the "grand trunk" led off southward to Denver,
the capital of Colorado.  The country round about is rich in gold and silver,
and more than fifty thousand inhabitants are already settled there.

Thirteen hundred and eighty-two miles had been passed over from San Francisco,
in three days and three nights; four days and nights more would probably
bring them to New York.  Phileas Fogg was not as yet behind-hand.

During the night Camp Walbach was passed on the left; Lodge Pole Creek
ran parallel with the road, marking the boundary between the territories
of Wyoming and Colorado.  They entered Nebraska at eleven, passed near
Sedgwick, and touched at Julesburg, on the southern branch of the Platte River.

It was here that the Union Pacific Railroad was inaugurated on
the 23rd of October, 1867, by the chief engineer, General Dodge.
Two powerful locomotives, carrying nine cars of invited guests,
amongst whom was Thomas C. Durant, vice-president of the road,
stopped at this point; cheers were given, the Sioux and Pawnees
performed an imitation Indian battle, fireworks were let off,
and the first number of the Railway Pioneer was printed by a press
brought on the train.  Thus was celebrated the inauguration
of this great railroad, a mighty instrument of progress
and civilisation, thrown across the desert, and destined to link
together cities and towns which do not yet exist.  The whistle
of the locomotive, more powerful than Amphion's lyre, was about
to bid them rise from American soil.

Fort McPherson was left behind at eight in the morning,
and three hundred and fifty-seven miles had yet to be traversed
before reaching Omaha.  The road followed the capricious windings
of the southern branch of the Platte River, on its left bank.
At nine the train stopped at the important town of North Platte,
built between the two arms of the river, which rejoin each other
around it and form a single artery a large tributary whose waters
empty into the Missouri a little above Omaha.

The one hundred and first meridian was passed.

Mr. Fogg and his partners had resumed their game; no one--not even the dummy--
complained of the length of the trip.  Fix had begun by winning several
guineas, which he seemed likely to lose; but he showed himself a not less
eager whist-player than Mr. Fogg.  During the morning, chance distinctly
favoured that gentleman.  Trumps and honours were showered upon his hands.

Once, having resolved on a bold stroke, he was on the point of playing a spade,
when a voice behind him said, "I should play a diamond."

Mr. Fogg, Aouda, and Fix raised their heads, and beheld Colonel Proctor.

Stamp Proctor and Phileas Fogg recognised each other at once.

"Ah! it's you, is it, Englishman?" cried the colonel;
"it's you who are going to play a spade!"

"And who plays it," replied Phileas Fogg coolly,
throwing down the ten of spades.

"Well, it pleases me to have it diamonds,"
replied Colonel Proctor, in an insolent tone.

He made a movement as if to seize the card which had just been played,
adding, "You don't understand anything about whist."

"Perhaps I do, as well as another," said Phileas Fogg, rising.

"You have only to try, son of John Bull," replied the colonel.

Aouda turned pale, and her blood ran cold.  She seized Mr. Fogg's
arm and gently pulled him back.  Passepartout was ready to pounce
upon the American, who was staring insolently at his opponent.
But Fix got up, and, going to Colonel Proctor said, "You forget
that it is I with whom you have to deal, sir; for it was I
whom you not only insulted, but struck!"

"Mr. Fix," said Mr. Fogg, "pardon me, but this affair is mine,
and mine only.  The colonel has again insulted me, by insisting
that I should not play a spade, and he shall give me satisfaction for it."

"When and where you will," replied the American, "and with whatever
weapon you choose."

Aouda in vain attempted to retain Mr. Fogg; as vainly did the
detective endeavour to make the quarrel his.  Passepartout wished
to throw the colonel out of the window, but a sign from his master
checked him.  Phileas Fogg left the car, and the American followed
him upon the platform.  "Sir," said Mr. Fogg to his adversary,
"I am in a great hurry to get back to Europe, and any delay whatever
will be greatly to my disadvantage."

"Well, what's that to me?" replied Colonel Proctor.

"Sir," said Mr. Fogg, very politely, "after our meeting at San Francisco,
I determined to return to America and find you as soon as I had completed
the business which called me to England."

"Really!"

"Will you appoint a meeting for six months hence?"

"Why not ten years hence?"

"I say six months," returned Phileas Fogg; "and I shall be
at the place of meeting promptly."

"All this is an evasion," cried Stamp Proctor.  "Now or never!"

"Very good.  You are going to New York?"

"No."

"To Chicago?"

"No."

"To Omaha?"

"What difference is it to you?  Do you know Plum Creek?"

"No," replied Mr. Fogg.

"It's the next station.  The train will be there in an hour,
and will stop there ten minutes.  In ten minutes several
revolver-shots could be exchanged."

"Very well," said Mr. Fogg.  "I will stop at Plum Creek."

"And I guess you'll stay there too," added the American insolently.

"Who knows?" replied Mr. Fogg, returning to the car as coolly as usual.
He began to reassure Aouda, telling her that blusterers were never
to be feared, and begged Fix to be his second at the approaching duel,
a request which the detective could not refuse.  Mr. Fogg resumed
the interrupted game with perfect calmness.

At eleven o'clock the locomotive's whistle announced that they were
approaching Plum Creek station.  Mr. Fogg rose, and, followed by Fix,
went out upon the platform.  Passepartout accompanied him, carrying
a pair of revolvers.  Aouda remained in the car, as pale as death.

The door of the next car opened, and Colonel Proctor appeared on the platform,
attended by a Yankee of his own stamp as his second.  But just as the
combatants were about to step from the train, the conductor hurried up,
and shouted, "You can't get off, gentlemen!"

"Why not?" asked the colonel.

"We are twenty minutes late, and we shall not stop."

"But I am going to fight a duel with this gentleman."

"I am sorry," said the conductor; "but we shall be off at once.
There's the bell ringing now."

The train started.

"I'm really very sorry, gentlemen," said the conductor.
"Under any other circumstances I should have been happy to oblige you.
But, after all, as you have not had time to fight here,
why not fight as we go along?

"That wouldn't be convenient, perhaps, for this gentleman,"
said the colonel, in a jeering tone.

"It would be perfectly so," replied Phileas Fogg.

"Well, we are really in America," thought Passepartout,
"and the conductor is a gentleman of the first order!"

So muttering, he followed his master.

The two combatants, their seconds, and the conductor passed through
the cars to the rear of the train.  The last car was only occupied
by a dozen passengers, whom the conductor politely asked if they would
not be so kind as to leave it vacant for a few moments, as two gentlemen
had an affair of honour to settle.  The passengers granted the request
with alacrity, and straightway disappeared on the platform.

The car, which was some fifty feet long, was very convenient
for their purpose.  The adversaries might march on each other
in the aisle, and fire at their ease.  Never was duel more easily
arranged.  Mr. Fogg and Colonel Proctor, each provided with two
six-barrelled revolvers, entered the car.  The seconds, remaining
outside, shut them in.  They were to begin firing at the first
whistle of the locomotive.  After an interval of two minutes,
what remained of the two gentlemen would be taken from the car.

Nothing could be more simple.  Indeed, it was all so simple
that Fix and Passepartout felt their hearts beating as if they
would crack.  They were listening for the whistle agreed upon,
when suddenly savage cries resounded in the air, accompanied
by reports which certainly did not issue from the car where
the duellists were.  The reports continued in front and the whole
length of the train.  Cries of terror proceeded from the interior
of the cars.

Colonel Proctor and Mr. Fogg, revolvers in hand, hastily quitted
their prison, and rushed forward where the noise was most clamorous.
They then perceived that the train was attacked by a band of Sioux.

This was not the first attempt of these daring Indians, for more than
once they had waylaid trains on the road.  A hundred of them had,
according to their habit, jumped upon the steps without stopping
the train, with the ease of a clown mounting a horse at full gallop.

The Sioux were armed with guns, from which came the reports,
to which the passengers, who were almost all armed, responded
by revolver-shots.

The Indians had first mounted the engine, and half stunned
the engineer and stoker with blows from their muskets.
A Sioux chief, wishing to stop the train, but not knowing
how to work the regulator, had opened wide instead of closing
the steam-valve, and the locomotive was plunging forward
with terrific velocity.

The Sioux had at the same time invaded the cars, skipping like
enraged monkeys over the roofs, thrusting open the doors,
and fighting hand to hand with the passengers.  Penetrating the
baggage-car, they pillaged it, throwing the trunks out of the train.
The cries and shots were constant.  The travellers defended
themselves bravely; some of the cars were barricaded,
and sustained a siege, like moving forts, carried along
at a speed of a hundred miles an hour.

Aouda behaved courageously from the first.  She defended herself
like a true heroine with a revolver, which she shot through the broken
windows whenever a savage made his appearance.  Twenty Sioux had fallen
mortally wounded to the ground, and the wheels crushed those who fell
upon the rails as if they had been worms.  Several passengers,
shot or stunned, lay on the seats.

It was necessary to put an end to the struggle, which had lasted
for ten minutes, and which would result in the triumph of the Sioux
if the train was not stopped.  Fort Kearney station, where there was
a garrison, was only two miles distant; but, that once passed,
the Sioux would be masters of the train between Fort Kearney
and the station beyond.

The conductor was fighting beside Mr. Fogg, when he was shot and fell.
At the same moment he cried, "Unless the train is stopped in five minutes,
we are lost!"

"It shall be stopped," said Phileas Fogg, preparing to rush from the car.

"Stay, monsieur," cried Passepartout; "I will go."

Mr. Fogg had not time to stop the brave fellow, who, opening a door
unperceived by the Indians, succeeded in slipping under the car;
and while the struggle continued and the balls whizzed across each
other over his head, he made use of his old acrobatic experience,
and with amazing agility worked his way under the cars, holding on
to the chains, aiding himself by the brakes and edges of the sashes,
creeping from one car to another with marvellous skill,
and thus gaining the forward end of the train.

There, suspended by one hand between the baggage-car and the tender,
with the other he loosened the safety chains; but, owing to the traction,
he would never have succeeded in unscrewing the yoking-bar,
had not a violent concussion jolted this bar out.  The train,
now detached from the engine, remained a little behind,
whilst the locomotive rushed forward with increased speed.

Carried on by the force already acquired, the train still moved
for several minutes; but the brakes were worked and at last they stopped,
less than a hundred feet from Kearney station.

The soldiers of the fort, attracted by the shots, hurried up;
the Sioux had not expected them, and decamped in a body before
the train entirely stopped.

But when the passengers counted each other on the station platform
several were found missing; among others the courageous Frenchman,
whose devotion had just saved them.



Chapter XXX

IN WHICH PHILEAS FOGG SIMPLY DOES HIS DUTY


Three passengers including Passepartout had disappeared.  Had they been
killed in the struggle?  Were they taken prisoners by the Sioux?
It was impossible to tell.

There were many wounded, but none mortally.  Colonel Proctor was one
of the most seriously hurt; he had fought bravely, and a ball had entered
his groin.  He was carried into the station with the other wounded passengers,
to receive such attention as could be of avail.

Aouda was safe; and Phileas Fogg, who had been in the thickest
of the fight, had not received a scratch.  Fix was slightly
wounded in the arm.  But Passepartout was not to be found,
and tears coursed down Aouda's cheeks.

All the passengers had got out of the train, the wheels
of which were stained with blood.  From the tyres and spokes
hung ragged pieces of flesh.  As far as the eye could reach
on the white plain behind, red trails were visible.  The last Sioux
were disappearing in the south, along the banks of Republican River.

Mr. Fogg, with folded arms, remained motionless.  He had a serious
decision to make.  Aouda, standing near him, looked at him without speaking,
and he understood her look.  If his servant was a prisoner, ought he not
to risk everything to rescue him from the Indians?  "I will find him,
living or dead," said he quietly to Aouda.

"Ah, Mr.--Mr. Fogg!" cried she, clasping his hands
and covering them with tears.

"Living," added Mr. Fogg, "if we do not lose a moment."

Phileas Fogg, by this resolution, inevitably sacrificed himself;
he pronounced his own doom.  The delay of a single day would make
him lose the steamer at New York, and his bet would be certainly lost.
But as he thought, "It is my duty," he did not hesitate.

The commanding officer of Fort Kearney was there.  A hundred
of his soldiers had placed themselves in a position to defend
the station, should the Sioux attack it.

"Sir," said Mr. Fogg to the captain, "three passengers have disappeared."

"Dead?" asked the captain.

"Dead or prisoners; that is the uncertainty which must be solved.
Do you propose to pursue the Sioux?"

"That's a serious thing to do, sir," returned the captain.
"These Indians may retreat beyond the Arkansas, and I cannot
leave the fort unprotected."

"The lives of three men are in question, sir," said Phileas Fogg.

"Doubtless; but can I risk the lives of fifty men to save three?"

"I don't know whether you can, sir; but you ought to do so."

"Nobody here," returned the other, "has a right to teach me my duty."

"Very well," said Mr. Fogg, coldly.  "I will go alone."

"You, sir!" cried Fix, coming up; "you go alone in pursuit of the Indians?"

"Would you have me leave this poor fellow to perish--
him to whom every one present owes his life?  I shall go."

"No, sir, you shall not go alone," cried the captain,
touched in spite of himself.  "No! you are a brave man.
Thirty volunteers!" he added, turning to the soldiers.

The whole company started forward at once.  The captain had
only to pick his men.  Thirty were chosen, and an old sergeant
placed at their head.

"Thanks, captain," said Mr. Fogg.

"Will you let me go with you?" asked Fix.

"Do as you please, sir.  But if you wish to do me a favour,
you will remain with Aouda.  In case anything should happen to me--"

A sudden pallor overspread the detective's face.  Separate himself
from the man whom he had so persistently followed step by step!
Leave him to wander about in this desert!  Fix gazed attentively
at Mr. Fogg, and, despite his suspicions and of the struggle
which was going on within him, he lowered his eyes before that calm
and frank look.

"I will stay," said he.

A few moments after, Mr. Fogg pressed the young woman's hand, and,
having confided to her his precious carpet-bag, went off with the sergeant
and his little squad.  But, before going, he had said to the soldiers,
"My friends, I will divide five thousand dollars among you, if we save
the prisoners."

It was then a little past noon.

Aouda retired to a waiting-room, and there she waited alone,
thinking of the simple and noble generosity, the tranquil courage
of Phileas Fogg.  He had sacrificed his fortune, and was now
risking his life, all without hesitation, from duty, in silence.

Fix did not have the same thoughts, and could scarcely conceal
his agitation.  He walked feverishly up and down the platform,
but soon resumed his outward composure.  He now saw the folly of which
he had been guilty in letting Fogg go alone.  What!  This man,
whom he had just followed around the world, was permitted now to
separate himself from him!  He began to accuse and abuse himself,
and, as if he were director of police, administered to himself
a sound lecture for his greenness.

"I have been an idiot!" he thought, "and this man will see it.
He has gone, and won't come back!  But how is it that I, Fix,
who have in my pocket a warrant for his arrest, have been
so fascinated by him?  Decidedly, I am nothing but an ass!"

So reasoned the detective, while the hours crept by all too slowly.
He did not know what to do.  Sometimes he was tempted to tell Aouda all;
but he could not doubt how the young woman would receive his confidences.
What course should he take?  He thought of pursuing Fogg across
the vast white plains; it did not seem impossible that he might overtake him.
Footsteps were easily printed on the snow!  But soon, under a new sheet,
every imprint would be effaced.

Fix became discouraged.  He felt a sort of insurmountable longing
to abandon the game altogether.  He could now leave Fort Kearney station,
and pursue his journey homeward in peace.

Towards two o'clock in the afternoon, while it was snowing hard,
long whistles were heard approaching from the east.  A great shadow,
preceded by a wild light, slowly advanced, appearing still larger
through the mist, which gave it a fantastic aspect.  No train
was expected from the east, neither had there been time for the succour
asked for by telegraph to arrive; the train from Omaha to San Francisco
was not due till the next day.  The mystery was soon explained.

The locomotive, which was slowly approaching with deafening whistles,
was that which, having been detached from the train, had continued
its route with such terrific rapidity, carrying off the unconscious
engineer and stoker.  It had run several miles, when, the fire becoming
low for want of fuel, the steam had slackened; and it had finally stopped
an hour after, some twenty miles beyond Fort Kearney.  Neither the engineer
nor the stoker was dead, and, after remaining for some time in their swoon,
had come to themselves.  The train had then stopped.  The engineer, when he
found himself in the desert, and the locomotive without cars, understood
what had happened.  He could not imagine how the locomotive had become
separated from the train; but he did not doubt that the train left behind
was in distress.

He did not hesitate what to do.  It would be prudent to continue
on to Omaha, for it would be dangerous to return to the train,
which the Indians might still be engaged in pillaging.
Nevertheless, he began to rebuild the fire in the furnace;
the pressure again mounted, and the locomotive returned,
running backwards to Fort Kearney.  This it was which was whistling
in the mist.

The travellers were glad to see the locomotive resume its
place at the head of the train.  They could now continue
the journey so terribly interrupted.

Aouda, on seeing the locomotive come up, hurried out of the station,
and asked the conductor, "Are you going to start?"

"At once, madam."

"But the prisoners, our unfortunate fellow-travellers--"

"I cannot interrupt the trip," replied the conductor.
"We are already three hours behind time."

"And when will another train pass here from San Francisco?"

"To-morrow evening, madam."

"To-morrow evening!  But then it will be too late!  We must wait--"

"It is impossible," responded the conductor.  "If you wish to go,
please get in."

"I will not go," said Aouda.

Fix had heard this conversation.  A little while before, when there
was no prospect of proceeding on the journey, he had made up his mind
to leave Fort Kearney; but now that the train was there, ready to start,
and he had only to take his seat in the car, an irresistible influence
held him back.  The station platform burned his feet, and he could not stir.
The conflict in his mind again began; anger and failure stifled him.
He wished to struggle on to the end.

Meanwhile the passengers and some of the wounded, among them
Colonel Proctor, whose injuries were serious, had taken their
places in the train.  The buzzing of the over-heated boiler was
heard, and the steam was escaping from the valves.  The engineer
whistled, the train started, and soon disappeared, mingling
its white smoke with the eddies of the densely falling snow.

The detective had remained behind.

Several hours passed.  The weather was dismal, and it was very cold.
Fix sat motionless on a bench in the station; he might have been
thought asleep.  Aouda, despite the storm, kept coming out
of the waiting-room, going to the end of the platform,
and peering through the tempest of snow, as if to pierce
the mist which narrowed the horizon around her, and to hear,
if possible, some welcome sound.  She heard and saw nothing.
Then she would return, chilled through, to issue out again
after the lapse of a few moments, but always in vain.

Evening came, and the little band had not returned.  Where could they be?
Had they found the Indians, and were they having a conflict with them,
or were they still wandering amid the mist?  The commander of the fort
was anxious, though he tried to conceal his apprehensions.
As night approached, the snow fell less plentifully,
but it became intensely cold.  Absolute silence rested on the plains.
Neither flight of bird nor passing of beast troubled the perfect calm.

Throughout the night Aouda, full of sad forebodings, her heart
stifled with anguish, wandered about on the verge of the plains.
Her imagination carried her far off, and showed her innumerable dangers.
What she suffered through the long hours it would be impossible to describe.

Fix remained stationary in the same place, but did not sleep.
Once a man approached and spoke to him, and the detective
merely replied by shaking his head.

Thus the night passed.  At dawn, the half-extinguished disc of the sun
rose above a misty horizon ; but it was now possible to recognise objects
two miles off.  Phileas Fogg and the squad had gone southward;
in the south all was still vacancy.  It was then seven o'clock.

The captain, who was really alarmed, did not know what course to take.

Should he send another detachment to the rescue of the first?
Should he sacrifice more men, with so few chances of saving those
already sacrificed?  His hesitation did not last long, however.
Calling one of his lieutenants, he was on the point of ordering
a reconnaissance, when gunshots were heard.  Was it a signal?
The soldiers rushed out of the fort, and half a mile off they
perceived a little band returning in good order.

Mr. Fogg was marching at their head, and just behind him were
Passepartout and the other two travellers, rescued from the Sioux.

They had met and fought the Indians ten miles south of Fort Kearney.
Shortly before the detachment arrived.  Passepartout and his companions
had begun to struggle with their captors, three of whom the Frenchman
had felled with his fists, when his master and the soldiers hastened up
to their relief.

All were welcomed with joyful cries.  Phileas Fogg distributed
the reward he had promised to the soldiers, while Passepartout,
not without reason, muttered to himself, "It must certainly be
confessed that I cost my master dear!"

Fix, without saying a word, looked at Mr. Fogg, and it would have
been difficult to analyse the thoughts which struggled within him.
As for Aouda, she took her protector's hand and pressed it in her own,
too much moved to speak.

Meanwhile, Passepartout was looking about for the train; he thought
he should find it there, ready to start for Omaha, and he hoped
that the time lost might be regained.

"The train! the train!" cried he.

"Gone," replied Fix.

"And when does the next train pass here?" said Phileas Fogg.

"Not till this evening."

"Ah!" returned the impassible gentleman quietly.




Chapter XXXI

IN WHICH FIX, THE DETECTIVE,
CONSIDERABLY FURTHERS THE INTERESTS OF PHILEAS FOGG


Phileas Fogg found himself twenty hours behind time.
Passepartout, the involuntary cause of this delay, was desperate.
He had ruined his master!

At this moment the detective approached Mr. Fogg, and,
looking him intently in the face, said:

"Seriously, sir, are you in great haste?"

"Quite seriously."

"I have a purpose in asking," resumed Fix.  "Is it absolutely
necessary that you should be in New York on the 11th, before nine o'clock
in the evening, the time that the steamer leaves for Liverpool?"

"It is absolutely necessary."

"And, if your journey had not been interrupted by these Indians,
you would have reached New York on the morning of the 11th?"

"Yes; with eleven hours to spare before the steamer left."

"Good! you are therefore twenty hours behind.  Twelve from twenty
leaves eight.  You must regain eight hours.  Do you wish to try to do so?"

"On foot?" asked Mr. Fogg.

"No; on a sledge," replied Fix.  "On a sledge with sails.
A man has proposed such a method to me."

It was the man who had spoken to Fix during the night, and
whose offer he had refused.

Phileas Fogg did not reply at once; but Fix, having pointed out the man,
who was walking up and down in front of the station, Mr. Fogg went up to him.
An instant after, Mr. Fogg and the American, whose name was Mudge,
entered a hut built just below the fort.

There Mr. Fogg examined a curious vehicle, a kind of frame on two long beams,
a little raised in front like the runners of a sledge, and upon which there
was room for five or six persons.  A high mast was fixed on the frame, held
firmly by metallic lashings, to which was attached a large brigantine sail.
This mast held an iron stay upon which to hoist a jib-sail.  Behind, a sort
of rudder served to guide the vehicle.  It was, in short, a sledge rigged
like a sloop.  During the winter, when the trains are blocked up by the snow,
these sledges make extremely rapid journeys across the frozen plains from one
station to another.  Provided with more sails than a cutter, and with the wind
behind them, they slip over the surface of the prairies with a speed equal
if not superior to that of the express trains.

Mr. Fogg readily made a bargain with the owner of this land-craft.
The wind was favourable, being fresh, and blowing from the west.
The snow had hardened, and Mudge was very confident of being able
to transport Mr. Fogg in a few hours to Omaha.  Thence the trains
eastward run frequently to Chicago and New York.  It was not impossible
that the lost time might yet be recovered; and such an opportunity
was not to be rejected.

Not wishing to expose Aouda to the discomforts of travelling
in the open air, Mr. Fogg proposed to leave her with Passepartout
at Fort Kearney, the servant taking upon himself to escort her
to Europe by a better route and under more favourable conditions.
But Aouda refused to separate from Mr. Fogg, and Passepartout
was delighted with her decision; for nothing could induce him
to leave his master while Fix was with him.

It would be difficult to guess the detective's thoughts.  Was this
conviction shaken by Phileas Fogg's return, or did he still regard him
as an exceedingly shrewd rascal, who, his journey round the world completed,
would think himself absolutely safe in England?  Perhaps Fix's opinion
of Phileas Fogg was somewhat modified; but he was nevertheless resolved
to do his duty, and to hasten the return of the whole party to England
as much as possible.

At eight o'clock the sledge was ready to start.  The passengers
took their places on it, and wrapped themselves up closely
in their travelling-cloaks.  The two great sails were hoisted,
and under the pressure of the wind the sledge slid over the hardened
snow with a velocity of forty miles an hour.

The distance between Fort Kearney and Omaha, as the birds fly,
is at most two hundred miles.  If the wind held good, the distance
might be traversed in five hours; if no accident happened the sledge
might reach Omaha by one o'clock.

What a journey!  The travellers, huddled close together, could not speak
for the cold, intensified by the rapidity at which they were going.
The sledge sped on as lightly as a boat over the waves.  When the breeze
came skimming the earth the sledge seemed to be lifted off the ground
by its sails.  Mudge, who was at the rudder, kept in a straight line,
and by a turn of his hand checked the lurches which the vehicle
had a tendency to make.  All the sails were up, and the jib
was so arranged as not to screen the brigantine.  A top-mast was hoisted,
and another jib, held out to the wind, added its force to the other sails.
Although the speed could not be exactly estimated, the sledge could not
be going at less than forty miles an hour.

"If nothing breaks," said Mudge, "we shall get there!"

Mr. Fogg had made it for Mudge's interest to reach Omaha
within the time agreed on, by the offer of a handsome reward.

The prairie, across which the sledge was moving in a straight
line, was as flat as a sea.  It seemed like a vast frozen lake.
The railroad which ran through this section ascended from the
south-west to the north-west by Great Island, Columbus,
an important Nebraska town, Schuyler, and Fremont, to Omaha.
It followed throughout the right bank of the Platte River.
The sledge, shortening this route, took a chord of the arc
described by the railway.  Mudge was not afraid of being stopped
by the Platte River, because it was frozen.  The road, then, was quite
clear of obstacles, and Phileas Fogg had but two things to fear--
an accident to the sledge, and a change or calm in the wind.

But the breeze, far from lessening its force, blew as if to
bend the mast, which, however, the metallic lashings held firmly.
These lashings, like the chords of a stringed instrument,
resounded as if vibrated by a violin bow.  The sledge slid along
in the midst of a plaintively intense melody.

"Those chords give the fifth and the octave," said Mr. Fogg.

These were the only words he uttered during the journey.
Aouda, cosily packed in furs and cloaks, was sheltered
as much as possible from the attacks of the freezing wind.
As for Passepartout, his face was as red as the sun's disc
when it sets in the mist, and he laboriously inhaled the biting air.
With his natural buoyancy of spirits, he began to hope again.
They would reach New York on the evening, if not on the morning,
of the 11th, and there was still some chances that it would be before
the steamer sailed for Liverpool.

Passepartout even felt a strong desire to grasp his ally, Fix, by the hand.
He remembered that it was the detective who procured the sledge,
the only means of reaching Omaha in time; but, checked by some presentiment,
he kept his usual reserve.  One thing, however, Passepartout would
never forget, and that was the sacrifice which Mr. Fogg had made,
without hesitation, to rescue him from the Sioux.  Mr. Fogg had risked
his fortune and his life. No!  His servant would never forget that!

While each of the party was absorbed in reflections so different,
the sledge flew past over the vast carpet of snow.
The creeks it passed over were not perceived.  Fields and streams
disappeared under the uniform whiteness.  The plain was absolutely deserted.
Between the Union Pacific road and the branch which unites Kearney
with Saint Joseph it formed a great uninhabited island.
Neither village, station, nor fort appeared.  From time to time
they sped by some phantom-like tree, whose white skeleton twisted
and rattled in the wind.  Sometimes flocks of wild birds rose,
or bands of gaunt, famished, ferocious prairie-wolves ran howling
after the sledge.  Passepartout, revolver in hand, held himself ready
to fire on those which came too near.  Had an accident then happened
to the sledge, the travellers, attacked by these beasts, would have been
in the most terrible danger; but it held on its even course, soon gained
on the wolves, and ere long left the howling band at a safe distance behind.

About noon Mudge perceived by certain landmarks that he was
crossing the Platte River.  He said nothing, but he felt certain
that he was now within twenty miles of Omaha.  In less than an
hour he left the rudder and furled his sails, whilst the sledge,
carried forward by the great impetus the wind had given it,
went on half a mile further with its sails unspread.

It stopped at last, and Mudge, pointing to a mass of roofs
white with snow, said: "We have got there!"

Arrived!  Arrived at the station which is in daily communication,
by numerous trains, with the Atlantic seaboard!

Passepartout and Fix jumped off, stretched their stiffened limbs,
and aided Mr. Fogg and the young woman to descend from the sledge.
Phileas Fogg generously rewarded Mudge, whose hand Passepartout
warmly grasped, and the party directed their steps to the Omaha
railway station.

The Pacific Railroad proper finds its terminus at this
important Nebraska town.  Omaha is connected with
Chicago by the Chicago and Rock Island Railroad,
which runs directly east, and passes fifty stations.

A train was ready to start when Mr. Fogg and his party reached
the station, and they only had time to get into the cars.
They had seen nothing of Omaha; but Passepartout confessed
to himself that this was not to be regretted, as they were not
travelling to see the sights.

The train passed rapidly across the State of Iowa, by Council Bluffs,
Des Moines, and Iowa City.  During the night it crossed the Mississippi
at Davenport, and by Rock Island entered Illinois.  The next day,
which was the 10th, at four o'clock in the evening, it reached Chicago,
already risen from its ruins, and more proudly seated than ever
on the borders of its beautiful Lake Michigan.

Nine hundred miles separated Chicago from New York; but trains
are not wanting at Chicago.  Mr. Fogg passed at once from one
to the other, and the locomotive of the Pittsburgh, Fort Wayne,
and Chicago Railway left at full speed, as if it fully comprehended
that that gentleman had no time to lose.  It traversed Indiana,
Ohio, Pennsylvania, and New Jersey like a flash, rushing through
towns with antique names, some of which had streets and car-tracks,
but as yet no houses.  At last the Hudson came into view; and,
at a quarter-past eleven in the evening of the 11th,
the train stopped in the station on the right bank of the river,
before the very pier of the Cunard line.

The China, for Liverpool, had started three-quarters of an hour before!




Chapter XXXII

IN WHICH PHILEAS FOGG ENGAGES IN A DIRECT STRUGGLE WITH BAD FORTUNE


The China, in leaving, seemed to have carried off Phileas Fogg's
last hope.  None of the other steamers were able to serve his projects.
The Pereire, of the French Transatlantic Company, whose admirable steamers
are equal to any in speed and comfort, did not leave until the 14th;
the Hamburg boats did not go directly to Liverpool or London, but to Havre;
and the additional trip from Havre to Southampton would render Phileas Fogg's
last efforts of no avail.  The Inman steamer did not depart till the next day,
and could not cross the Atlantic in time to save the wager.

Mr. Fogg learned all this in consulting his Bradshaw,
which gave him the daily movements of the trans-Atlantic steamers.

Passepartout was crushed; it overwhelmed him to lose the boat
by three-quarters of an hour.  It was his fault, for,
instead of helping his master, he had not ceased putting obstacles
in his path!  And when he recalled all the incidents of the tour,
when he counted up the sums expended in pure loss and on his own account,
when he thought that the immense stake, added to the heavy charges
of this useless journey, would completely ruin Mr. Fogg,
he overwhelmed himself with bitter self-accusations.  Mr. Fogg,
however, did not reproach him; and, on leaving the Cunard pier,
only said: "We will consult about what is best to-morrow.  Come."

The party crossed the Hudson in the Jersey City ferryboat,
and drove in a carriage to the St. Nicholas Hotel, on Broadway.
Rooms were engaged, and the night passed, briefly to Phileas Fogg,
who slept profoundly, but very long to Aouda and the others,
whose agitation did not permit them to rest.

The next day was the 12th of December.  From seven in the morning
of the 12th to a quarter before nine in the evening of the 21st
there were nine days, thirteen hours, and forty-five minutes.
If Phileas Fogg had left in the China, one of the fastest steamers
on the Atlantic, he would have reached Liverpool, and then London,
within the period agreed upon.

Mr. Fogg left the hotel alone, after giving Passepartout instructions
to await his return, and inform Aouda to be ready at an instant's notice.
He proceeded to the banks of the Hudson, and looked about among the vessels
moored or anchored in the river, for any that were about to depart.
Several had departure signals, and were preparing to put to sea
at morning tide; for in this immense and admirable port there is not one day
in a hundred that vessels do not set out for every quarter of the globe.
But they were mostly sailing vessels, of which, of course, Phileas Fogg
could make no use.

He seemed about to give up all hope, when he espied, anchored at the Battery,
a cable's length off at most, a trading vessel, with a screw, well-shaped,
whose funnel, puffing a cloud of smoke, indicated that she was getting ready
for departure.

Phileas Fogg hailed a boat, got into it, and soon found himself on board
the Henrietta, iron-hulled, wood-built above.  He ascended to the deck,
and asked for the captain, who forthwith presented himself.  He was a man
of fifty, a sort of sea-wolf, with big eyes, a complexion of oxidised copper,
red hair and thick neck, and a growling voice.

"The captain?" asked Mr. Fogg.

"I am the captain."

"I am Phileas Fogg, of London."

"And I am Andrew Speedy, of Cardiff."

"You are going to put to sea?"

"In an hour."

"You are bound for--"

"Bordeaux."

"And your cargo?"

"No freight.  Going in ballast."

"Have you any passengers?"

"No passengers.  Never have passengers.  Too much in the way."

"Is your vessel a swift one?"

"Between eleven and twelve knots.  The Henrietta, well known."

"Will you carry me and three other persons to Liverpool?"

"To Liverpool?  Why not to China?"

"I said Liverpool."

"No!"

"No?"

"No.  I am setting out for Bordeaux, and shall go to Bordeaux."

"Money is no object?"

"None."

The captain spoke in a tone which did not admit of a reply.

"But the owners of the Henrietta--" resumed Phileas Fogg.

"The owners are myself," replied the captain.  "The vessel belongs to me."

"I will freight it for you."

"No."

"I will buy it of you."

"No."

Phileas Fogg did not betray the least disappointment; but the
situation was a grave one.  It was not at New York as at Hong Kong,
nor with the captain of the Henrietta as with the captain of the Tankadere.
Up to this time money had smoothed away every obstacle.  Now money failed.

Still, some means must be found to cross the Atlantic on a boat,
unless by balloon--which would have been venturesome,
besides not being capable of being put in practice.
It seemed that Phileas Fogg had an idea, for he said to the captain,
"Well, will you carry me to Bordeaux?"

"No, not if you paid me two hundred dollars."

"I offer you two thousand."

"Apiece?"

"Apiece."

"And there are four of you?"

"Four."

Captain Speedy began to scratch his head.  There were eight thousand dollars
to gain, without changing his route; for which it was well worth conquering
the repugnance he had for all kinds of passengers.  Besides, passenger's
at two thousand dollars are no longer passengers, but valuable merchandise.
"I start at nine o'clock," said Captain Speedy, simply.  "Are you and your
party ready?"

"We will be on board at nine o'clock," replied, no less simply, Mr. Fogg.

It was half-past eight.  To disembark from the Henrietta, jump into a hack,
hurry to the St. Nicholas, and return with Aouda, Passepartout, and even
the inseparable Fix was the work of a brief time, and was performed by
Mr. Fogg with the coolness which never abandoned him.  They were on board
when the Henrietta made ready to weigh anchor.

When Passepartout heard what this last voyage was going to cost,
he uttered a prolonged "Oh!" which extended throughout his vocal gamut.

As for Fix, he said to himself that the Bank of England would certainly
not come out of this affair well indemnified.  When they reached England,
even if Mr. Fogg did not throw some handfuls of bank-bills into the sea,
more than seven thousand pounds would have been spent!




Chapter XXXIII

IN WHICH PHILEAS FOGG SHOWS HIMSELF EQUAL TO THE OCCASION


An hour after, the Henrietta passed the lighthouse which marks the
entrance of the Hudson, turned the point of Sandy Hook, and put to
sea.  During the day she skirted Long Island, passed Fire Island,
and directed her course rapidly eastward.

At noon the next day, a man mounted the bridge to ascertain the
vessel's position.  It might be thought that this was Captain Speedy.
Not the least in the world.  It was Phileas Fogg, Esquire.
As for Captain Speedy, he was shut up in his cabin under lock and key,
and was uttering loud cries, which signified an anger at once pardonable
and excessive.

What had happened was very simple.  Phileas Fogg wished
to go to Liverpool, but the captain would not carry him there.
Then Phileas Fogg had taken passage for Bordeaux, and, during
the thirty hours he had been on board, had so shrewdly managed
with his banknotes that the sailors and stokers, who were only
an occasional crew, and were not on the best terms with the captain,
went over to him in a body.  This was why Phileas Fogg was in command
instead of Captain Speedy; why the captain was a prisoner in his cabin;
and why, in short, the Henrietta was directing her course towards Liverpool.
It was very clear, to see Mr. Fogg manage the craft, that he had been a sailor.

How the adventure ended will be seen anon.  Aouda was anxious, though she
said nothing.  As for Passepartout, he thought Mr. Fogg's manoeuvre
simply glorious.  The captain had said "between eleven and twelve knots,"
and the Henrietta confirmed his prediction.

If, then--for there were "ifs" still--the sea did not become
too boisterous, if the wind did not veer round to the east,
if no accident happened to the boat or its machinery, the Henrietta
might cross the three thousand miles from New York to Liverpool
in the nine days, between the 12th and the 21st of December.
It is true that, once arrived, the affair on board the Henrietta,
added to that of the Bank of England, might create more difficulties
for Mr. Fogg than he imagined or could desire.

During the first days, they went along smoothly enough.  The sea was
not very unpropitious, the wind seemed stationary in the north-east,
the sails were hoisted, and the Henrietta ploughed across the waves
like a real trans-Atlantic steamer.

Passepartout was delighted.  His master's last exploit, the consequences
of which he ignored, enchanted him.  Never had the crew seen so jolly
and dexterous a fellow.  He formed warm friendships with the sailors,
and amazed them with his acrobatic feats.  He thought they managed
the vessel like gentlemen, and that the stokers fired up like heroes.
His loquacious good-humour infected everyone.  He had forgotten the past,
its vexations and delays.  He only thought of the end, so nearly accomplished;
and sometimes he boiled over with impatience, as if heated by the furnaces
of the Henrietta.  Often, also, the worthy fellow revolved around Fix,
looking at him with a keen, distrustful eye; but he did not speak to him,
for their old intimacy no longer existed.

Fix, it must be confessed, understood nothing of what was going on.
The conquest of the Henrietta, the bribery of the crew, Fogg managing
the boat like a skilled seaman, amazed and confused him.  He did not know
what to think.  For, after all, a man who began by stealing fifty-five thousand
pounds might end by stealing a vessel; and Fix was not unnaturally inclined
to conclude that the Henrietta under Fogg's command, was not going to Liverpool
at all, but to some part of the world where the robber, turned into a pirate,
would quietly put himself in safety.  The conjecture was at least a plausible
one, and the detective began to seriously regret that he had embarked
on the affair.

As for Captain Speedy, he continued to howl and growl in his cabin;
and Passepartout, whose duty it was to carry him his meals,
courageous as he was, took the greatest precautions.  Mr. Fogg
did not seem even to know that there was a captain on board.

On the 13th they passed the edge of the Banks of Newfoundland,
a dangerous locality; during the winter, especially, there are
frequent fogs and heavy gales of wind.  Ever since the evening
before the barometer, suddenly falling, had indicated an approaching
change in the atmosphere; and during the night the temperature varied,
the cold became sharper, and the wind veered to the south-east.

This was a misfortune.  Mr. Fogg, in order not to deviate from his course,
furled his sails and increased the force of the steam; but the vessel's speed
slackened, owing to the state of the sea, the long waves of which broke against
the stern.  She pitched violently, and this retarded her progress.
The breeze little by little swelled into a tempest, and it was to be feared
that the Henrietta might not be able to maintain herself upright on the waves.

Passepartout's visage darkened with the skies, and for two days the poor
fellow experienced constant fright.  But Phileas Fogg was a bold mariner,
and knew how to maintain headway against the sea; and he kept on his course,
without even decreasing his steam.  The Henrietta, when she could not rise
upon the waves, crossed them, swamping her deck, but passing safely.
Sometinies the screw rose out of the water, beating its protruding end,
when a mountain of water raised the stern above the waves; but the craft
always kept straight ahead.

The wind, however, did not grow as boisterous as might have been feared;
it was not one of those tempests which burst, and rush on with a speed
of ninety miles an hour.  It continued fresh, but, unhappily, it remained
obstinately in the south-east, rendering the sails useless.

The 16th of December was the seventy-fifth day since Phileas Fogg's
departure from London, and the Henrietta had not yet been seriously delayed.
Half of the voyage was almost accomplished, and the worst localities
had been passed.  In summer, success would have been well-nigh certain.
In winter, they were at the mercy of the bad season.  Passepartout
said nothing; but he cherished hope in secret, and comforted himself
with the reflection that, if the wind failed them, they might still
count on the steam.

On this day the engineer came on deck, went up to Mr. Fogg, and
began to speak earnestly with him.  Without knowing why it was
a presentiment, perhaps Passepartout became vaguely uneasy.
He would have given one of his ears to hear with the other what
the engineer was saying.  He finally managed to catch a few words,
and was sure he heard his master say, "You are certain of what you tell me?"

"Certain, sir," replied the engineer.  "You must remember that,
since we started, we have kept up hot fires in all our furnaces,
and, though we had coal enough to go on short steam from New York to
Bordeaux, we haven't enough to go with all steam from New York to Liverpool."
"I will consider," replied Mr. Fogg.

Passepartout understood it all; he was seized with mortal anxiety.
The coal was giving out!  "Ah, if my master can get over that,"
muttered he, "he'll be a famous man!"  He could not help imparting
to Fix what he had overheard.

"Then you believe that we really are going to Liverpool?"

"Of course."

"Ass!" replied the detective, shrugging his shoulders and turning on his heel.

Passepartout was on the point of vigorously resenting the epithet,
the reason of which he could not for the life of him comprehend;
but he reflected that the unfortunate Fix was probably very much
disappointed and humiliated in his self-esteem, after having so
awkwardly followed a false scent around the world, and refrained.

And now what course would Phileas Fogg adopt?  It was difficult
to imagine.  Nevertheless he seemed to have decided upon one,
for that evening he sent for the engineer, and said to him,
"Feed all the fires until the coal is exhausted."

A few moments after, the funnel of the Henrietta vomited forth torrents
of smoke.  The vessel continued to proceed with all steam on;
but on the 18th, the engineer, as he had predicted, announced
that the coal would give out in the course of the day.

"Do not let the fires go down," replied Mr. Fogg.
"Keep them up to the last.  Let the valves be filled."

Towards noon Phileas Fogg, having ascertained their position,
called Passepartout, and ordered him to go for Captain Speedy.
It was as if the honest fellow had been commanded to unchain a tiger.
He went to the poop, saying to himself, "He will be like a madman!"

In a few moments, with cries and oaths, a bomb appeared on the poop-deck.
The bomb was Captain Speedy.  It was clear that he was on the point
of bursting.  "Where are we?"  were the first words his anger permitted
him to utter.  Had the poor man be an apoplectic, he could never have
recovered from his paroxysm of wrath.

"Where are we?" he repeated, with purple face.

"Seven hundred and seven miles from Liverpool,"
replied Mr. Fogg, with imperturbable calmness.

"Pirate!" cried Captain Speedy.

"I have sent for you, sir--"

"Pickaroon!"

"--sir," continued Mr. Fogg, "to ask you to sell me your vessel."

"No!  By all the devils, no!"

"But I shall be obliged to burn her."

"Burn the Henrietta!"

"Yes; at least the upper part of her.  The coal has given out."

"Burn my vessel!" cried Captain Speedy, who could scarcely
pronounce the words.  "A vessel worth fifty thousand dollars!"

"Here are sixty thousand," replied Phileas Fogg, handing the
captain a roll of bank-bills.  This had a prodigious effect
on Andrew Speedy.  An American can scarcely remain unmoved
at the sight of sixty thousand dollars.  The captain forgot
in an instant his anger, his imprisonment, and all his grudges
against his passenger.  The Henrietta was twenty years old;
it was a great bargain.  The bomb would not go off after all.
Mr. Fogg had taken away the match.

"And I shall still have the iron hull," said the captain in a softer tone.

"The iron hull and the engine.  Is it agreed?"

"Agreed."

And Andrew Speedy, seizing the banknotes, counted them
and consigned them to his pocket.

During this colloquy, Passepartout was as white as a sheet,
and Fix seemed on the point of having an apoplectic fit.
Nearly twenty thousand pounds had been expended, and Fogg
left the hull and engine to the captain, that is,
near the whole value of the craft!  It was true, however,
that fifty-five thousand pounds had been stolen from the Bank.

When Andrew Speedy had pocketed the money, Mr. Fogg said to him,
"Don't let this astonish you, sir.  You must know that I shall
lose twenty thousand pounds, unless I arrive in London by
a quarter before nine on the evening of the 21st of December.
I missed the steamer at New York, and as you refused to take me to Liverpool--"

"And I did well!" cried Andrew Speedy; "for I have gained at
least forty thousand dollars by it!"  He added, more sedately,
"Do you know one thing, Captain--"

"Fogg."

"Captain Fogg, you've got something of the Yankee about you."

And, having paid his passenger what he considered a high compliment,
he was going away, when Mr. Fogg said, "The vessel now belongs to me?"

"Certainly, from the keel to the truck of the masts--all the wood, that is."

"Very well.  Have the interior seats, bunks, and frames pulled down,
and burn them."

It was necessary to have dry wood to keep the steam up
to the adequate pressure, and on that day the poop, cabins,
bunks, and the spare deck were sacrificed.  On the next day,
the 19th of December, the masts, rafts, and spars were burned;
the crew worked lustily, keeping up the fires.  Passepartout hewed, cut,
and sawed away with all his might.  There was a perfect rage for demolition.

The railings, fittings, the greater part of the deck, and top sides
disappeared on the 20th, and the Henrietta was now only a flat hulk.
But on this day they sighted the Irish coast and Fastnet Light.
By ten in the evening they were passing Queenstown.  Phileas Fogg
had only twenty-four hours more in which to get to London;
that length of time was necessary to reach Liverpool, with all steam on.
And the steam was about to give out altogether!

"Sir," said Captain Speedy, who was now deeply interested in
Mr. Fogg's project, "I really commiserate you.  Everything is
against you.  We are only opposite Queenstown."

"Ah," said Mr. Fogg, "is that place where we see the lights Queenstown?"

"Yes."

"Can we enter the harbour?"

"Not under three hours.  Only at high tide."

"Stay," replied Mr. Fogg calmly, without betraying in his features
that by a supreme inspiration he was about to attempt once more
to conquer ill-fortune.

Queenstown is the Irish port at which the trans-Atlantic steamers
stop to put off the mails.  These mails are carried to Dublin
by express trains always held in readiness to start; from Dublin
they are sent on to Liverpool by the most rapid boats,
and thus gain twelve hours on the Atlantic steamers.

Phileas Fogg counted on gaining twelve hours in the same way.
Instead of arriving at Liverpool the next evening by the Henrietta,
he would be there by noon, and would therefore have time to reach London
before a quarter before nine in the evening.

The Henrietta entered Queenstown Harbour at one o'clock in the morning,
it then being high tide; and Phileas Fogg, after being grasped heartily
by the hand by Captain Speedy, left that gentleman on the levelled hulk
of his craft, which was still worth half what he had sold it for.

The party went on shore at once.  Fix was greatly tempted
to arrest Mr. Fogg on the spot; but he did not.  Why?  What struggle
was going on within him?  Had he changed his mind about "his man"?
Did he understand that he had made a grave mistake?  He did not,
however, abandon Mr. Fogg.  They all got upon the train, which was
just ready to start, at half-past one; at dawn of day they were
in Dublin; and they lost no time in embarking on a steamer which,
disdaining to rise upon the waves, invariably cut through them.

Phileas Fogg at last disembarked on the Liverpool quay,
at twenty minutes before twelve, 21st December.  He was only
six hours distant from London.

But at this moment Fix came up, put his hand upon Mr. Fogg's shoulder,
and, showing his warrant, said, "You are really Phileas Fogg?"

"I am."

"I arrest you in the Queen's name!"




Chapter XXXIV

IN WHICH PHILEAS FOGG AT LAST REACHES LONDON


Phileas Fogg was in prison.  He had been shut up in the Custom House,
and he was to he transferred to London the next day.

Passepartout, when he saw his master arrested, would have
fallen upon Fix had he not been held back by some policemen.
Aouda was thunderstruck at the suddenness of an event which
she could not understand.  Passepartout explained to her how
it was that the honest and courageous Fogg was arrested as a robber.
The young woman's heart revolted against so heinous a charge,
and when she saw that she could attempt to do nothing to save
her protector, she wept bitterly.

As for Fix, he had arrested Mr. Fogg because it was his duty,
whether Mr. Fogg were guilty or not.

The thought then struck Passepartout, that he was the cause of this
new misfortune!  Had he not concealed Fix's errand from his master?
When Fix revealed his true character and purpose, why had he not told
Mr. Fogg?  If the latter had been warned, he would no doubt have given
Fix proof of his innocence, and satisfied him of his mistake; at least,
Fix would not have continued his journey at the expense and on the heels
of his master, only to arrest him the moment he set foot on English soil.
Passepartout wept till he was blind, and felt like blowing his brains out.

Aouda and he had remained, despite the cold, under the portico
of the Custom House.  Neither wished to leave the place;
both were anxious to see Mr. Fogg again.

That gentleman was really ruined, and that at the moment
when he was about to attain his end.  This arrest was fatal.
Having arrived at Liverpool at twenty minutes before
twelve on the 21st of December, he had till a quarter before nine
that evening to reach the Reform Club, that is, nine hours and a quarter;
the journey from Liverpool to London was six hours.

If anyone, at this moment, had entered the Custom House,
he would have found Mr. Fogg seated, motionless, calm, and without
apparent anger, upon a wooden bench.  He was not, it is true,
resigned; but this last blow failed to force him into an outward
betrayal of any emotion.  Was he being devoured by one of those
secret rages, all the more terrible because contained, and which
only burst forth, with an irresistible force, at the last moment?
No one could tell.  There he sat, calmly waiting--for what?
Did he still cherish hope?  Did he still believe, now that the door
of this prison was closed upon him, that he would succeed?

However that may have been, Mr. Fogg carefully put his watch
upon the table, and observed its advancing hands.  Not a word
escaped his lips, but his look was singularly set and stern.
The situation, in any event, was a terrible one, and might be
thus stated: if Phileas Fogg was honest he was ruined; if he
was a knave, he was caught.

Did escape occur to him?  Did he examine to see if there were
any practicable outlet from his prison?  Did he think of escaping
from it?  Possibly; for once he walked slowly around the room.
But the door was locked, and the window heavily barred with
iron rods.  He sat down again, and drew his journal from his pocket.
On the line where these words were written, "21st December,
Saturday, Liverpool," he added, "80th day, 11.40 a.m.," and waited.

The Custom House clock struck one.  Mr. Fogg observed that his watch
was two hours too fast.

Two hours!  Admitting that he was at this moment taking an
express train, he could reach London and the Reform Club
by a quarter before nine, p.m.  His forehead slightly wrinkled.

At thirty-three minutes past two he heard a singular noise outside,
then a hasty opening of doors.  Passepartout's voice was audible,
and immediately after that of Fix.  Phileas Fogg's eyes brightened
for an instant.

The door swung open, and he saw Passepartout, Aouda, and Fix,
who hurried towards him.

Fix was out of breath, and his hair was in disorder.  He could not speak.
"Sir," he stammered, "sir--forgive me--most-- unfortunate resemblance--
robber arrested three days ago--you are free!"

Phileas Fogg was free!  He walked to the detective, looked him steadily
in the face, and with the only rapid motion he had ever made in his life,
or which he ever would make, drew back his arms, and with the precision
of a machine knocked Fix down.

"Well hit!" cried Passepartout, "Parbleu! that's what
you might call a good application of English fists!"

Fix, who found himself on the floor, did not utter a word.
He had only received his deserts.  Mr. Fogg, Aouda, and Passepartout
left the Custom House without delay, got into a cab, and in a few
moments descended at the station.

Phileas Fogg asked if there was an express train
about to leave for London.  It was forty minutes past two.
The express train had left thirty-five minutes before.
Phileas Fogg then ordered a special train.

There were several rapid locomotives on hand; but the railway arrangements
did not permit the special train to leave until three o'clock.

At that hour Phileas Fogg, having stimulated the engineer by
the offer of a generous reward, at last set out towards London
with Aouda and his faithful servant.

It was necessary to make the journey in five hours and a half;
and this would have been easy on a clear road throughout.
But there were forced delays, and when Mr. Fogg stepped
from the train at the terminus, all the clocks in London
were striking ten minutes before nine."

Having made the tour of the world, he was behind-hand
five minutes.  He had lost the wager!




Chapter XXXV

IN WHICH PHILEAS FOGG DOES NOT HAVE TO
REPEAT HIS ORDERS TO PASSEPARTOUT TWICE


The dwellers in Saville Row would have been surprised the next day,
if they had been told that Phileas Fogg had returned home.
His doors and windows were still closed, no appearance of change was visible.

After leaving the station, Mr. Fogg gave Passepartout instructions
to purchase some provisions, and quietly went to his domicile.

He bore his misfortune with his habitual tranquillity.
Ruined!  And by the blundering of the detective!  After having
steadily traversed that long journey, overcome a hundred obstacles,
braved many dangers, and still found time to do some good on his way,
to fail near the goal by a sudden event which he could not have foreseen,
and against which he was unarmed; it was terrible!  But a few pounds were
left of the large sum he had carried with him.  There only remained
of his fortune the twenty thousand pounds deposited at Barings,
and this amount he owed to his friends of the Reform Club.
So great had been the expense of his tour that, even had he won,
it would not have enriched him; and it is probable that he had not sought
to enrich himself, being a man who rather laid wagers for honour's sake
than for the stake proposed.  But this wager totally ruined him.

Mr. Fogg's course, however, was fully decided upon; he knew what remained
for him to do.

A room in the house in Saville Row was set apart for Aouda,
who was overwhelmed with grief at her protector's misfortune.
From the words which Mr. Fogg dropped, she saw that he was
meditating some serious project.

Knowing that Englishmen governed by a fixed idea sometimes resort
to the desperate expedient of suicide, Passepartout kept a narrow watch
upon his master, though he carefully concealed the appearance of so doing.

First of all, the worthy fellow had gone up to his room, and had extinguished
the gas burner, which had been burning for eighty days.  He had found
in the letter-box a bill from the gas company, and he thought it more
than time to put a stop to this expense, which he had been doomed to bear.

The night passed.  Mr. Fogg went to bed, but did he sleep?
Aouda did not once close her eyes.  Passepartout watched
all night, like a faithful dog, at his master's door.

Mr. Fogg called him in the morning, and told him to get
Aouda's breakfast, and a cup of tea and a chop for himself.
He desired Aouda to excuse him from breakfast and dinner,
as his time would be absorbed all day in putting his affairs to rights.
In the evening he would ask permission to have a few moment's
conversation with the young lady.

Passepartout, having received his orders, had nothing to do but obey them.
He looked at his imperturbable master, and could scarcely bring his mind
to leave him.  His heart was full, and his conscience tortured by remorse;
for he accused himself more bitterly than ever of being the cause
of the irretrievable disaster.  Yes! if he had warned Mr. Fogg,
and had betrayed Fix's projects to him, his master would certainly
not have given the detective passage to Liverpool, and then--

Passepartout could hold in no longer.

"My master!  Mr. Fogg!" he cried, "why do you not curse me?
It was my fault that--"

"I blame no one," returned Phileas Fogg, with perfect calmness.  "Go!"

Passepartout left the room, and went to find Aouda,
to whom he delivered his master's message.

"Madam," he added, "I can do nothing myself--nothing!
I have no influence over my master; but you, perhaps--"

"What influence could I have?" replied Aouda.  "Mr. Fogg
is influenced by no one.  Has he ever understood that my gratitude
to him is overflowing?  Has he ever read my heart?  My friend,
he must not be left alone an instant!  You say he is going to
speak with me this evening?"

"Yes, madam; probably to arrange for your protection and comfort in England."

"We shall see," replied Aouda, becoming suddenly pensive.

Throughout this day (Sunday) the house in Saville Row was as if uninhabited,
and Phileas Fogg, for the first time since he had lived in that house,
did not set out for his club when Westminster clock struck half-past eleven.

Why should he present himself at the Reform?  His friends no longer expected
him there.  As Phileas Fogg had not appeared in the saloon on the
evening before (Saturday, the 21st of December, at a quarter before nine),
he had lost his wager.  It was not even necessary that he should go to
his bankers for the twenty thousand pounds; for his antagonists already
had his cheque in their hands, and they had only to fill it out
and send it to the Barings to have the amount transferred to their credit.

Mr. Fogg, therefore, had no reason for going out, and so
he remained at home.  He shut himself up in his room,
and busied himself putting his affairs in order.
Passepartout continually ascended and descended the stairs.
The hours were long for him. He listened at his master's door,
and looked through the keyhole, as if he had a perfect right so to do,
and as if he feared that something terrible might happen at any moment.
Sometimes he thought of Fix, but no longer in anger.  Fix, like all
the world, had been mistaken in Phileas Fogg, and had only done his duty
in tracking and arresting him; while he, Passepartout. . . .
This thought haunted him, and he never ceased cursing his miserable folly.

Finding himself too wretched to remain alone, he knocked at Aouda's door,
went into her room, seated himself, without speaking, in a corner,
and looked ruefully at the young woman. Aouda was still pensive.

About half-past seven in the evening Mr. Fogg sent to know
if Aouda would receive him, and in a few moments he found himself
alone with her.

Phileas Fogg took a chair, and sat down near the fireplace,
opposite Aouda.  No emotion was visible on his face.
Fogg returned was exactly the Fogg who had gone away;
there was the same calm, the same impassibility.

He sat several minutes without speaking; then, bending his eyes on Aouda,
"Madam," said he, "will you pardon me for bringing you to England?"

"I, Mr. Fogg!" replied Aouda, checking the pulsations of her heart.

"Please let me finish," returned Mr. Fogg.  "When I decided to
bring you far away from the country which was so unsafe for you,
I was rich, and counted on putting a portion of my fortune
at your disposal; then your existence would have been free and happy.
But now I am ruined."

"I know it, Mr. Fogg," replied Aouda; "and I ask you in my turn,
will you forgive me for having followed you, and--who knows?--for having,
perhaps, delayed you, and thus contributed to your ruin?"

"Madam, you could not remain in India, and your safety could
only be assured by bringing you to such a distance that your
persecutors could not take you."

"So, Mr. Fogg," resumed Aouda, "not content with rescuing me
from a terrible death, you thought yourself bound to secure
my comfort in a foreign land?"

"Yes, madam; but circumstances have been against me.
Still, I beg to place the little I have left at your service."

"But what will become of you, Mr. Fogg?"

"As for me, madam," replied the gentleman, coldly, "I have need of nothing."

"But how do you look upon the fate, sir, which awaits you?"

"As I am in the habit of doing."

"At least," said Aouda, "want should not overtake a man like you.
Your friends--"

"I have no friends, madam."

"Your relatives--"

"I have no longer any relatives."

"I pity you, then, Mr. Fogg, for solitude is a sad thing,
with no heart to which to confide your griefs.  They say,
though, that misery itself, shared by two sympathetic souls,
may be borne with patience."

"They say so, madam."

"Mr. Fogg," said Aouda, rising and seizing his hand, "do you wish
at once a kinswoman and friend?  Will you have me for your wife?"

Mr. Fogg, at this, rose in his turn.  There was an unwonted
light in his eyes, and a slight trembling of his lips.
Aouda looked into his face.  The sincerity, rectitude, firmness,
and sweetness of this soft glance of a noble woman, who could dare
all to save him to whom she owed all, at first astonished,
then penetrated him.  He shut his eyes for an instant,
as if to avoid her look.  When he opened them again,
"I love you!" he said, simply.  "Yes, by all that is holiest,
I love you, and I am entirely yours!"

"Ah!" cried Aouda, pressing his hand to her heart.

Passepartout was summoned and appeared immediately.  Mr. Fogg
still held Aouda's hand in his own; Passepartout understood,
and his big, round face became as radiant as the tropical sun
at its zenith.

Mr. Fogg asked him if it was not too late to notify
the Reverend Samuel Wilson, of Marylebone parish, that evening.

Passepartout smiled his most genial smile, and said,
"Never too late."

It was five minutes past eight.

"Will it be for to-morrow, Monday?"

"For to-morrow, Monday," said Mr. Fogg, turning to Aouda.

"Yes; for to-morrow, Monday," she replied.

Passepartout hurried off as fast as his legs could carry him.




Chapter XXXVI

IN WHICH PHILEAS FOGG'S NAME IS ONCE MORE AT A PREMIUM ON 'CHANGE


It is time to relate what a change took place in English
public opinion when it transpired that the real bankrobber,
a certain James Strand, had been arrested, on the 17th day of December,
at Edinburgh.  Three days before, Phileas Fogg had been a criminal,
who was being desperately followed up by the police; now he was an
honourable gentleman, mathematically pursuing his eccentric journey
round the world.

The papers resumed their discussion about the wager; all those
who had laid bets, for or against him, revived their interest,
as if by magic; the "Phileas Fogg bonds" again became negotiable,
and many new wagers were made.  Phileas Fogg's name was once more
at a premium on 'Change.

His five friends of the Reform Club passed these three days in
a state of feverish suspense.  Would Phileas Fogg, whom they had
forgotten, reappear before their eyes!  Where was he at this moment?
The 17th of December, the day of James Strand's arrest,
was the seventy-sixth since Phileas Fogg's departure,
and no news of him had been received.  Was he dead?
Had he abandoned the effort, or was he continuing his journey
along the route agreed upon?  And would he appear on Saturday,
the 21st of December, at a quarter before nine in the evening,
on the threshold of the Reform Club saloon?

The anxiety in which, for three days, London society existed,
cannot be described.  Telegrams were sent to America and Asia
for news of Phileas Fogg.  Messengers were dispatched to the house
in Saville Row morning and evening.  No news.  The police were
ignorant what had become of the detective, Fix, who had so
unfortunately followed up a false scent.  Bets increased,
nevertheless, in number and value.  Phileas Fogg, like a
racehorse, was drawing near his last turning-point.  The bonds
were quoted, no longer at a hundred below par, but at twenty,
at ten, and at five; and paralytic old Lord Albemarle bet even
in his favour.

A great crowd was collected in Pall Mall and the neighbouring
streets on Saturday evening; it seemed like a multitude of brokers
permanently established around the Reform Club.  Circulation
was impeded, and everywhere disputes, discussions, and financial
transactions were going on.  The police had great difficulty in
keeping back the crowd, and as the hour when Phileas Fogg
was due approached, the excitement rose to its highest pitch.

The five antagonists of Phileas Fogg had met in the great saloon of the club.
John Sullivan and Samuel Fallentin, the bankers, Andrew Stuart, the engineer,
Gauthier Ralph, the director of the Bank of England, and Thomas Flanagan,
the brewer, one and all waited anxiously.

When the clock indicated twenty minutes past eight, Andrew Stuart got up,
saying, "Gentlemen, in twenty minutes the time agreed upon between Mr. Fogg
and ourselves will have expired."

"What time did the last train arrive from Liverpool?"  asked Thomas Flanagan.

"At twenty-three minutes past seven," replied Gauthier Ralph;
"and the next does not arrive till ten minutes after twelve."

"Well, gentlemen," resumed Andrew Stuart, "if Phileas Fogg
had come in the 7:23 train, he would have got here by this time.
We can, therefore, regard the bet as won."

"Wait; don't let us be too hasty," replied Samuel Fallentin.
"You know that Mr. Fogg is very eccentric.  His punctuality
is well known; he never arrives too soon, or too late; and I
should not be surprised if he appeared before us at the last minute."

"Why," said Andrew Stuart nervously, "if I should see him,
I should not believe it was he."

"The fact is," resumed Thomas Flanagan, "Mr. Fogg's project
was absurdly foolish.  Whatever his punctuality, he could not
prevent the delays which were certain to occur; and a delay
of only two or three days would be fatal to his tour."

"Observe, too," added John Sullivan, "that we have received no
intelligence from him, though there are telegraphic lines all
along is route."

"He has lost, gentleman," said Andrew Stuart, "he has a hundred times lost!
You know, besides, that the China the only steamer he could have taken
from New York to get here in time arrived yesterday.  I have seen a list
of the passengers, and the name of Phileas Fogg is not among them.
Even if we admit that fortune has favoured him, he can scarcely
have reached America.  I think he will be at least twenty days behind-hand,
and that Lord Albemarle will lose a cool five thousand."

"It is clear," replied Gauthier Ralph; "and we have nothing to do
but to present Mr. Fogg's cheque at Barings to-morrow."

At this moment, the hands of the club clock pointed
to twenty minutes to nine.

"Five minutes more," said Andrew Stuart.

The five gentlemen looked at each other.  Their anxiety was becoming intense;
but, not wishing to betray it, they readily assented to Mr. Fallentin's
proposal of a rubber.

"I wouldn't give up my four thousand of the bet," said Andrew Stuart,
as he took his seat, "for three thousand nine hundred and ninety-nine."

The clock indicated eighteen minutes to nine.

The players took up their cards, but could not keep their eyes
off the clock.  Certainly, however secure they felt,
minutes had never seemed so long to them!

"Seventeen minutes to nine," said Thomas Flanagan, as he cut the cards
which Ralph handed to him.

Then there was a moment of silence.  The great saloon was perfectly quiet; but
the murmurs of the crowd outside were heard, with now and then a shrill cry.
The pendulum beat the seconds, which each player eagerly counted,
as he listened, with mathematical regularity.

"Sixteen minutes to nine!" said John Sullivan, in a voice which betrayed
his emotion.

One minute more, and the wager would be won.  Andrew Stuart
and his partners suspended their game.  They left their cards,
and counted the seconds.

At the fortieth second, nothing.  At the fiftieth, still nothing.

At the fifty-fifth, a loud cry was heard in the street,
followed by applause, hurrahs, and some fierce growls.

The players rose from their seats.

At the fifty-seventh second the door of the saloon opened;
and the pendulum had not beat the sixtieth second when
Phileas Fogg appeared, followed by an excited crowd
who had forced their way through the club doors,
and in his calm voice, said, "Here I am, gentlemen!"




Chapter XXXVII

IN WHICH IT IS SHOWN THAT PHILEAS FOGG GAINED NOTHING BY HIS
TOUR AROUND THE WORLD, UNLESS IT WERE HAPPINESS


Yes; Phileas Fogg in person.

The reader will remember that at five minutes past eight in the evening--
about five and twenty hours after the arrival of the travellers in London--
Passepartout had been sent by his master to engage the services of
the Reverend Samuel Wilson in a certain marriage ceremony,
which was to take place the next day.

Passepartout went on his errand enchanted.  He soon
reached the clergyman's house, but found him not at home.
Passepartout waited a good twenty minutes, and when he left
the reverend gentleman, it was thirty-five minutes past eight.
But in what a state he was!  With his hair in disorder,
and without his hat, he ran along the street as never man
was seen to run before, overturning passers-by,
rushing over the sidewalk like a waterspout.

In three minutes he was in Saville Row again,
and staggered back into Mr. Fogg's room.

He could not speak.

"What is the matter?" asked Mr. Fogg.

"My master!" gasped Passepartout--"marriage--impossible--"

"Impossible?"

"Impossible--for to-morrow."

"Why so?"

"Because to-morrow--is Sunday!"

"Monday," replied Mr. Fogg.

"No--to-day is Saturday."

"Saturday?  Impossible!"

"Yes, yes, yes, yes!" cried Passepartout.  "You have made a mistake
of one day!  We arrived twenty-four hours ahead of time;
but there are only ten minutes left!"

Passepartout had seized his master by the collar,
and was dragging him along with irresistible force.

Phileas Fogg, thus kidnapped, without having time to think,
left his house, jumped into a cab, promised a hundred pounds
to the cabman, and, having run over two dogs and overturned
five carriages, reached the Reform Club.

The clock indicated a quarter before nine when he appeared
in the great saloon.

Phileas Fogg had accomplished the journey round the world in eighty days!

Phileas Fogg had won his wager of twenty thousand pounds!

How was it that a man so exact and fastidious could have made
this error of a day?  How came he to think that he had arrived
in London on Saturday, the twenty-first day of December,
when it was really Friday, the twentieth, the seventy-ninth day
only from his departure?

The cause of the error is very simple.

Phileas Fogg had, without suspecting it, gained one day on his journey,
and this merely because he had travelled constantly eastward; he would,
on the contrary, have lost a day had he gone in the opposite direction,
that is, westward.

In journeying eastward he had gone towards the sun, and the days therefore
diminished for him as many times four minutes as he crossed degrees
in this direction.  There are three hundred and sixty degrees
on the circumference of the earth; and these three hundred and sixty degrees,
multiplied by four minutes, gives precisely twenty-four hours--that is,
the day unconsciously gained.  In other words, while Phileas Fogg,
going eastward, saw the sun pass the meridian eighty times,
his friends in London only saw it pass the meridian seventy-nine times.
This is why they awaited him at the Reform Club on Saturday,
and not Sunday, as Mr. Fogg thought.

And Passepartout's famous family watch, which had always kept London time,
would have betrayed this fact, if it had marked the days as well as
the hours and the minutes!

Phileas Fogg, then, had won the twenty thousand pounds; but,
as he had spent nearly nineteen thousand on the way, the pecuniary
gain was small.  His object was, however, to be victorious,
and not to win money.  He divided the one thousand pounds
that remained between Passepartout and the unfortunate Fix,
against whom he cherished no grudge.  He deducted, however,
from Passepartout's share the cost of the gas which had burned
in his room for nineteen hundred and twenty hours,
for the sake of regularity.

That evening, Mr. Fogg, as tranquil and phlegmatic as ever,
said to Aouda: "Is our marriage still agreeable to you?"

"Mr. Fogg," replied she, "it is for me to ask that question.
You were ruined, but now you are rich again."

"Pardon me, madam; my fortune belongs to you.  If you had not
suggested our marriage, my servant would not have gone to
the Reverend Samuel Wilson's, I should not have been apprised
of my error, and--"

"Dear Mr. Fogg!" said the young woman.

"Dear Aouda!" replied Phileas Fogg.

It need not be said that the marriage took place forty-eight hours after,
and that Passepartout, glowing and dazzling, gave the bride away.
Had he not saved her, and was he not entitled to this honour?

The next day, as soon as it was light, Passepartout rapped
vigorously at his master's door.  Mr. Fogg opened it, and asked,
"What's the matter, Passepartout?"

"What is it, sir?  Why, I've just this instant found out--"

"What?"

"That we might have made the tour of the world in only seventy-eight days."

"No doubt," returned Mr. Fogg, "by not crossing India.  But if
I had not crossed India, I should not have saved Aouda;
she would not have been my wife, and--"

Mr. Fogg quietly shut the door.

Phileas Fogg had won his wager, and had made his journey
around the world in eighty days.  To do this he had employed
every means of conveyance--steamers, railways, carriages, yachts,
trading-vessels, sledges, elephants.  The eccentric gentleman
had throughout displayed all his marvellous qualities of coolness
and exactitude.  But what then?  What had he really gained by all
this trouble?  What had he brought back from this long and weary journey?

Nothing, say you?  Perhaps so; nothing but a charming woman,
who, strange as it may appear, made him the happiest of men!

Truly, would you not for less than that make the tour around the world?


End of Around the World in 80 Days


###################################################################################

                                      1864

                      A JOURNEY TO THE CENTER OF THE EARTH

                                 by Jules Verne









CHAPTER_1
                       CHAPTER 1
              My Uncle Makes a Discovery
-
  LOOKING back to all that has occurred to me since that eventful day,
I am scarcely able to believe in the reality of my adventures. They
were truly so wonderful that even now I am bewildered when I think
of them.
  My uncle was a German, having married my mother's sister, an
Englishwoman. Being very much attached to his fatherless nephew, he
invited me to study under him in his home in the fatherland. This home
was in a large town, and my uncle a professor of philosophy,
chemistry, geology, mineralogy, and many other ologies.
  One day, after passing some hours in the laboratory- my uncle
being absent at the time- I suddenly felt the necessity of
renovating the tissues- i.e., I was hungry, and was about to rouse
up our old French cook, when my uncle, Professor Von Hardwigg,
suddenly opened the street door, and came rushing upstairs.
  Now Professor Hardwigg, my worthy uncle, is by no means a bad sort
of man; he is, however, choleric and original. To bear with him
means to obey; and scarcely had his heavy feet resounded within our
joint domicile than he shouted for me to attend upon him.
                                                    {CHAPTER_1 ^paragraph 5}
  "Harry- Harry- Harry-"
  I hastened to obey, but before I could reach his room, jumping three
steps at a time, he was stamping his right foot upon the landing.
  "Harry!" he cried, in a frantic tone, "are you coming up?"
  Now to tell the truth, at that moment I was far more interested in
the question as to what was to constitute our dinner than in any
problem of science; to me soup was more interesting than soda, an
omelette more tempting than arithmetic, and an artichoke of ten
times more value than any amount of asbestos.
  But my uncle was not a man to be kept waiting; so adjourning
therefore all minor questions, I presented myself before him.
                                                   {CHAPTER_1 ^paragraph 10}
  He was a very learned man. Now most persons in this category
supply themselves with information, as peddlers do with goods, for the
benefit of others, and lay up stores in order to diffuse them abroad
for the benefit of society in general. Not so my excellent uncle,
Professor Hardwigg; he studied, he consumed the midnight oil, he pored
over heavy tomes, and digested huge quartos and folios in order to
keep the knowledge acquired to himself.
  There was a reason, and it may be regarded as a good one, why my
uncle objected to display his learning more than was absolutely
necessary: he stammered; and when intent upon explaining the phenomena
of the heavens, was apt to find himself at fault, and allude in such a
vague way to sun, moon, and stars that few were able to comprehend his
meaning. To tell the honest truth, when the right word would not come,
it was generally replaced by a very powerful adjective.
  In connection with the sciences there are many almost
unpronounceable names- names very much resembling those of Welsh
villages; and my uncle being very fond of using them, his habit of
stammering was not thereby improved. In fact, there were periods in
his discourse when he would finally give up and swallow his
discomfiture- in a glass of water.
  As I said, my uncle, Professor Hardwigg, was a very learned man; and
I now add a most kind relative. I was bound to him by the double
ties of affection and interest. I took deep interest in all his
doings, and hoped some day to be almost as learned myself. It was a
rare thing for me to be absent from his lectures. Like him, I
preferred mineralogy to all the other sciences. My anxiety was to gain
real knowledge of the earth. Geology and mineralogy were to us the
sole objects of life, and in connection with these studies many a fair
specimen of stone, chalk, or metal did we break with our hammers.
  Steel rods, loadstones, glass pipes, and bottles of various acids
were oftener before us than our meals. My uncle Hardwigg was once
known to classify six hundred different geological specimens by
their weight, hardness, fusibility, sound, taste, and smell.
                                                   {CHAPTER_1 ^paragraph 15}
  He corresponded with all the great, learned, and scientific men of
the age. I was, therefore, in constant communication with, at all
events the letters of, Sir Humphry Davy, Captain Franklin, and other
great men.
  But before I state the subject on which my uncle wished to confer
with me, I must say a word about his personal appearance. Alas! my
readers will see a very different portrait of him at a future time,
after he has gone through the fearful adventures yet to be related.
  My uncle was fifty years old; tall, thin, and wiry. Large spectacles
hid, to a certain extent, his vast, round, and goggle eyes, while
his nose was irreverently compared to a thin file. So much indeed
did it resemble that useful article, that a compass was said in his
presence to have made considerable N (Nasal) deviation.
  The truth being told, however, the only article really attracted
to my uncle's nose was tobacco.
  Another peculiarity of his was, that he always stepped a yard at a
time, clenched his fists as if he were going to hit you, and was, when
in one of his peculiar humors, very far from a pleasant companion.
                                                   {CHAPTER_1 ^paragraph 20}
  It is further necessary to observe that he lived in a very nice
house, in that very nice street, the Konigstrasse at Hamburg. Though
lying in the center of a town, it was perfectly rural in its aspect-
half wood, half bricks, with old-fashioned gables- one of the few
old houses spared by the great fire of 1842.
  When I say a nice house, I mean a handsome house- old, tottering,
and not exactly comfortable to English notions: a house a little off
the perpendicular and inclined to fall into the neighboring canal;
exactly the house for a wandering artist to depict; all the more
that you could scarcely see it for ivy and a magnificent old tree
which grew over the door.
  My uncle was rich; his house was his own property, while he had a
considerable private income. To my notion the best part of his
possessions was his god-daughter, Gretchen. And the old cook, the
young lady, the Professor and I were the sole inhabitants.
  I loved mineralogy, I loved geology. To me there was nothing like
pebbles- and if my uncle had been in a little less of a fury, we
should have been the happiest of families. To prove the excellent
Hardwigg's impatience, I solemnly declare that when the flowers in the
drawing-room pots began to grow, he rose every morning at four o'clock
to make them grow quicker by pulling the leaves!
  Having described my uncle, I will now give an account of our
interview.
                                                   {CHAPTER_1 ^paragraph 25}
  He received me in his study; a perfect museum, containing every
natural curiosity that can well be imagined- minerals, however,
predominating. Every one was familiar to me, having been catalogued by
my own hand. My uncle, apparently oblivious of the fact that he had
summoned me to his presence, was absorbed in a book. He was
particularly fond of early editions, tall copies, and unique works.
  "Wonderful!" he cried, tapping his forehead. "Wonderful- wonderful!"
  It was one of those yellow-leaved volumes now rarely found on
stalls, and to me it appeared to possess but little value. My uncle,
however, was in raptures.
  He admired its binding, the clearness of its characters, the ease
with which it opened in his hand, and repeated aloud, half a dozen
times, that it was very, very old.
  To my fancy he was making a great fuss about nothing, but it was not
my province to say so. On the contrary, I professed considerable
interest in the subject, and asked him what it was about.
                                                   {CHAPTER_1 ^paragraph 30}
  "It is the Heims-Kringla of Snorre Tarleson,"he said, "the
celebrated Icelandic author of the twelfth century- it is a true and
correct account of the Norwegian princes who reigned in Iceland."
  My next question related to the language in which it was written.
I hoped at all events it was translated into German. My uncle was
indignant at the very thought, and declared he wouldn't give a penny
for a translation. His delight was to have found the original work
in the Icelandic tongue, which he declared to be one of the most
magnificent and yet simple idioms in the world- while at the same time
its grammatical combinations were the most varied known to students.
  "About as easy as German? was my insidious remark.
  My uncle shrugged his shoulders.
  "The letters at all events," I said, "are rather difficult of
comprehension."
                                                   {CHAPTER_1 ^paragraph 35}
  "It is a Runic manuscript, the language of the original population
of Iceland, invented by Odin himself," cried my uncle, angry at my
ignorance.
  I was about to venture upon some misplaced joke on the subject, when
a small scrap of parchment fell out of the leaves. Like a hungry man
snatching at a morsel of bread the Professor seized it. It was about
five inches by three and was scrawled over in the most extraordinary
fashion.
  The lines shown here are an exact facsimile of what was written on
the venerable piece of parchment-and have wonderful importance, as
they induced my uncle to undertake the most wonderful series of
adventures which ever fell to the lot of human beings. (See
illustration.)
  My uncle looked keenly at the document for some moments and then
declared that it was Runic. The letters were similar to those in the
book, but then what did they mean? This was exactly what I wanted to
know.
  Now as I had a strong conviction that the Runic alphabet and dialect
were simply an invention to mystify poor human nature, I was delighted
to find that my uncle knew as much about the matter as I did- which
was nothing. At all events the tremulous motion of his fingers made me
think so.
                                                   {CHAPTER_1 ^paragraph 40}
  "And yet," he muttered to himself, "it is old Icelandic, I am sure
of it."
  And my uncle ought to have known, for he was a perfect polyglot
dictionary in himself. He did not pretend, like a certain learned
pundit, to speak the two thousand languages and four thousand idioms
made use of in different parts of the globe, but he did know all the
more important ones.
  It is a matter of great doubt to me now, to what violent measures my
uncle's impetuosity might have led him, had not the clock struck
two, and our old French cook called out to let us know that dinner was
on the table.
  "Bother the dinner!" cried my uncle.
  But as I was hungry, I sallied forth to the dining room, where I
took up my usual quarters. Out of politeness I waited three minutes,
but no sign of my uncle, the Professor. I was surprised. He was not
usually so blind to the pleasure of a good dinner. It was the acme
of German luxury- parsley soup, a ham omelette with sorrel
trimmings, an oyster of veal stewed with prunes, delicious fruit,
and sparkling Moselle. For the sake of poring over this musty old
piece of parchment, my uncle forbore to share our meal. To satisfy
my conscience, I ate for both.
                                                   {CHAPTER_1 ^paragraph 45}
  The old cook and housekeeper was nearly out of her mind. After
taking so much trouble, to find her master not appear at dinner was to
her a sad disappointment- which, as she occasionally watched the havoc
I was making on the viands, became also alarm. If my uncle were to
come to table after all?
  Suddenly, just as I had consumed the last apple and drunk the last
glass of wine, a terrible voice was heard at no great distance. It was
my uncle roaring for me to come to him. I made very nearly one leap of
it- so loud, so fierce was his tone.

CHAPTER_2
                     CHAPTER 2
             The Mysterious Parchment
-
  "I DECLARE," cried my uncle, striking the table fiercely with his
fist, "I declare to you it is Runic- and contains some wonderful
secret, which I must get at, at any price."
  I was about to reply when he stopped me.
  "Sit down," he said, quite fiercely, "and write to my dictation."
  I obeyed.
                                                    {CHAPTER_2 ^paragraph 5}
  "I will substitute," he said, "a letter of our alphabet for that
of the Runic: we will then see what that will produce. Now, begin
and make no mistakes."
  The dictation commenced with the following incomprehensible result:
-
         mm.rnlls    esreuel    seecJde
         sgtssmf     unteief    niedrke
                                                   {CHAPTER_2 ^paragraph 10}
         kt,samn     atrateS    Saodrrn
         emtnaeI     nuaect     rrilSa
         Atvaar      .nscrc     ieaabs
         ccdrmi      eeutul     frantu
         dt,iac      oseibo     KediiY
                                                   {CHAPTER_2 ^paragraph 15}
-
  Scarcely giving me time to finish, my uncle snatched the document
from my hands and examined it with the most rapt and deep attention.
  "I should like to know what it means," he said, after a long period.
  I certainly could not tell him, nor did he expect me to- his
conversation being uniformly answered by himself.
  "I declare it puts me in mind of a cryptograph," he cried,
"unless, indeed, the letters have been written without any real
meaning; and yet why take so much trouble? Who knows but I may be on
the verge of some great discovery?"
                                                   {CHAPTER_2 ^paragraph 20}
  My candid opinion was that it was all rubbish! But this opinion I
kept carefully to myself, as my uncle's choler was not pleasant to
bear. All this time he was comparing the book with the parchment.
  "The manuscript volume and the smaller document are written in
different hands," he said, "the cryptograph is of much later date than
the book; there is an undoubted proof of the correctness of my
surmise. [An irrefragable proof I took it to be.] The first letter
is a double M, which was only added to the Icelandic language in the
twelfth century- this makes the parchment two hundred years
posterior to the volume."
  The circumstances appeared very probable and very logical, but it
was all surmise to me.
  "To me it appears probable that this sentence was written by some
owner of the book. Now who was the owner, is the next important
question. Perhaps by great good luck it may be written somewhere in
the volume."
  With these words Professor Hardwigg took off his spectacles, and,
taking a powerful magnifying glass, examined the book carefully.
                                                   {CHAPTER_2 ^paragraph 25}
  On the fly leaf was what appeared to be a blot of ink, but on
examination proved to be a line of writing almost effaced by time.
This was what he sought; and, after some considerable time, he made
out these letters:

  (See illustration.)

  "Arne Saknussemm!" he cried in a joyous and triumphant tone, "that
is not only an Icelandic name, but of a learned professor of the
sixteenth century, a celebrated alchemist."
  I bowed as a sign of respect.
  "These alchemists," he continued, "Avicenna, Bacon, Lully,
Paracelsus, were the true, the only learned men of the day. They
made surprising discoveries. May not this Saknussemm, nephew mine,
have hidden on this bit of parchment some astounding invention? I
believe the cryptograph to have a profound meaning- which I must
make out."
  My uncle walked about the room in a state of excitement almost
impossible to describe.
                                                   {CHAPTER_2 ^paragraph 30}
  "It may be so, sir," I timidly observed, "but why conceal it from
posterity, if it be a useful, a worthy discovery?"
  "Why- how should I know? Did not Galileo make a secret of his
discoveries in connection with Saturn? But we shall see. Until I
discover the meaning of this sentence I will neither eat nor sleep."
  "My dear uncle-" I began.
  "Nor you neither," he added.
  It was lucky I had taken double allowance that day.
                                                   {CHAPTER_2 ^paragraph 35}
  "In the first place," he continued, "there must be a clue to the
meaning. If we could find that, the rest would be easy enough."
  I began seriously to reflect. The prospect of going without food and
sleep was not a promising one, so I determined to do my best to
solve the mystery. My uncle, meanwhile, went on with his soliloquy.
  "The way to discover it is easy enough. In this document there are
one hundred and thirty-two letters, giving seventy-nine consonants
to fifty-three vowels. This is about the proportion found in most
southern languages, the idioms of the north being much more rich in
consonants. We may confidently predict, therefore, that we have to
deal with a southern dialect."
  Nothing could be more logical.
  "Now said Professor Hardwigg, "to trace the particular language."
                                                   {CHAPTER_2 ^paragraph 40}
  "As Shakespeare says, 'that is the question,"' was my rather
satirical reply.
  "This man Saknussemm he continued, "was a very learned man: now as
he did not write in the language of his birthplace, he probably,
like most learned men of the sixteenth century, wrote in Latin. If,
however, I prove wrong in this guess, we must try Spanish, French,
Italian, Greek, and even Hebrew. My own opinion, though, is
decidedly in favor of Latin."
  This proposition startled me. Latin was my favorite study, and it
seemed sacrilege to believe this gibberish to belong to the country of
Virgil.
  "Barbarous Latin, in all probability," continued my uncle, "but
still Latin."
  "Very probably," I replied, not to contradict him.
                                                   {CHAPTER_2 ^paragraph 45}
  "Let us see into the matter," continued my uncle; "here you see we
have a series of one hundred and thirty-two letters, apparently thrown
pell-mell upon paper, without method or organization. There are
words which are composed wholly of consonants, such as mm.rnlls,
others which are nearly all vowels, the fifth, for instance, which
is unteief, and one of the last oseibo. This appears an
extraordinary combination. Probably we shall find that the phrase is
arranged according to some mathematical plan. No doubt a certain
sentence has been written out and then jumbled up- some plan to
which some figure is the clue. Now, Harry, to show your English wit-
what is that figure?"
  I could give him no hint. My thoughts were indeed far away. While he
was speaking I had caught sight of the portrait of my cousin Gretchen,
and was wondering when she would return.
  We were affianced, and loved one another very sincerely.But my
uncle, who never thought even of such sublunary matters, knew
nothing of this. Without noticing my abstraction, the Professor
began reading the puzzling cryptograph all sorts of ways, according to
some theory of his own. Presently, rousing my wandering attention,
he dictated one precious attempt to me.
  I mildly handed it over to him. It read as follows:
-
                                                   {CHAPTER_2 ^paragraph 50}
      mmessunkaSenrA.icefdoK.segnittamurtn
      ecertserrette,rotaivsadua,ednecsedsadne
      lacartniiilrJsiratracSarbmutabiledmek
      meretarcsilucoYsleffenSnI
-
                                                   {CHAPTER_2 ^paragraph 55}
  I could scarcely keep from laughing, while my uncle, on the
contrary, got in a towering passion, struck the table with his fist,
darted out of the room, out of the house, and then taking to his heels
was presently lost to sight.

CHAPTER_3
                     CHAPTER 3
              An Astounding Discovery
-
  WHAT is the matter?" cried the cook, entering the room; "when will
master have his dinner?"
  "Never."
  "And, his supper?"
  "I don't know. He says he will eat no more, neither shall I. My
uncle has determined to fast and make me fast until he makes out
this abominable inscription," I replied.
                                                    {CHAPTER_3 ^paragraph 5}
  "You will be starved to death," she said.
  I was very much of the same opinion, but not liking to say so,
sent her away, and began some of my usual work of classification.
But try as I might, nothing could keep me from thinking alternately of
the stupid manuscript and of the pretty Gretchen.
  Several times I thought of going out, but my uncle would have been
angry at my absence. At the end of an hour, my allotted task was done.
How to pass the time? I began by lighting my pipe. Like all other
students, I delighted in tobacco; and, seating myself in the great
armchair, I began to think.
  Where was my uncle? I could easily imagine him tearing along some
solitary road, gesticulating, talking to himself, cutting the air with
his cane, and still thinking of the absurd bit of hieroglyphics. Would
he hit upon some clue? Would he come home in better humor? While these
thoughts were passing through my brain, I mechanically took up the
execrable puzzle and tried every imaginable way of grouping the
letters. I put them together by twos, by threes, fours, and fives-
in vain. Nothing intelligible came out, except that the fourteenth,
fifteenth, and sixteenth made ice in English; the eighty-fourth,
eighty-fifth, and eighty-sixth, the word sir; then at last I seemed to
find the Latin words rota, mutabile, ira, nec, atra.
  "Ha! there seems to be some truth in my uncle's notion, thought I.
                                                   {CHAPTER_3 ^paragraph 10}
  Then again I seemed to find the word luco, which means sacred
wood. Then in the third line I appeared to make out labiled, a perfect
Hebrew word, and at the last the syllables mere, are, mer, which
were French.
  It was enough to drive one mad. Four different idioms in this absurd
phrase. What connection could there be between ice, sir, anger, cruel,
sacred wood, changing, mother, are, and sea? The first and the last
might, in a sentence connected with Iceland, mean sea of ice. But what
of the rest of this monstrous cryptograph?
  I was, in fact, fighting against an insurmountable difficulty; my
brain was almost on fire; my eyes were strained with staring at the
parchment; the whole absurd collection of letters appeared to dance
before my vision in a number of black little groups. My mind was
possessed with temporary hallucination- I was stifling. I wanted
air. Mechanically I fanned myself with the document, of which now I
saw the back and then the front.
  Imagine my surprise when glancing at the back of the wearisome
puzzle, the ink having gone through, I clearly made out Latin words,
and among others craterem and terrestre.
  I had discovered the secret!
                                                   {CHAPTER_3 ^paragraph 15}
  It came upon me like a flash of lightning. I had got the clue. All
you had to do to understand the document was to read it backwards. All
the ingenious ideas of the Professor were realized; he had dictated it
rightly to me; by a mere accident I had discovered what he so much
desired.
  My delight, my emotion may be imagined, my eyes were dazzled and I
trembled so that at first I could make nothing of it. One look,
however, would tell me all I wished to know.
  "Let me read," I said to myself, after drawing a long breath.
  I spread it before me on the table, I passed my finger over each
letter, I spelled it through; in my excitement I read it out.
  What horror and stupefaction took possession of my soul. I was
like a man who had received a knock-down blow. Was it possible that
I really read the terrible secret, and it had really been
accomplished! A man had dared to do- what?
                                                   {CHAPTER_3 ^paragraph 20}
  No living being should ever know.
  "Never!" cried I, jumping up. "Never shall my uncle be made aware of
the dread secret. He would be quite capable of undertaking the
terrible journey. Nothing would check him, nothing stop him. Worse, he
would compel me to accompany him, and we should be lost forever. But
no; such folly and madness cannot be allowed."
  I was almost beside myself with rage and fury.
  "My worthy uncle is already nearly mad," I cried aloud. "This
would finish him. By some accident he may make the discovery; in which
case, we are both lost. Perish the fearful secret- let the flames
forever bury it in oblivion."
  I snatched up book and parchment, and was about to cast them into
the fire, when the door opened and my uncle entered.
                                                   {CHAPTER_3 ^paragraph 25}
  I had scarcely time to put down the wretched documents before my
uncle was by my side. He was profoundly absorbed. His thoughts were
evidently bent on the terrible parchment. Some new combination had
probably struck him while taking his walk.
  He seated himself in his armchair, and with a pen began to make an
algebraical calculation. I watched him with anxious eyes. My flesh
crawled as it became probable that he would discover the secret.
  His combinations I knew now were useless, I having discovered the
one only clue. For three mortal hours he continued without speaking
a word, without raising his head, scratching, rewriting, calculating
over and over again. I knew that in time he must hit upon the right
phrase. The letters of every alphabet have only a certain number of
combinations. But then years might elapse before he would arrive at
the correct solution.
  Still time went on; night came, the sounds in the streets ceased-
and still my uncle went on, not even answering our worthy cook when
she called us to supper.
  I did not dare to leave him, so waved her away, and at last fell
asleep on the sofa.
                                                   {CHAPTER_3 ^paragraph 30}
  When I awoke my uncle was still at work. His red eyes, his pallid
countenance, his matted hair, his feverish hands, his hectically
flushed cheeks, showed how terrible had been his struggle with the
impossible, and what fearful fatigue he had undergone during that long
sleepless night. It made me quite ill to look at him. Though he was
rather severe with me, I loved him, and my heart ached at his
sufferings. He was so overcome by one idea that he could not even
get in a passion! All his energies were focused on one point. And I
knew that by speaking one little word all this suffering would
cease. I could not speak it.
  My heart was, nevertheless, inclining towards him. Why, then, did
I remain silent? In the interest of my uncle himself.
  "Nothing shall make me speak," I muttered. "He will want to follow
in the footsteps of the other! I know him well. His imagination is a
perfect volcano, and to make discoveries in the interests of geology
he would sacrifice his life. I will therefore be silent and strictly
keep the secret I have discovered. To reveal it would be suicidal.
He would not only rush, himself, to destruction, but drag me with
him."
  I crossed my arms, looked another way and smoked- resolved never
to speak.
  When our cook wanted to go out to market, or on any other errand,
she found the front door locked and the key taken away. Was this
done purposely or not? Surely Professor Hardwigg did not intend the
old woman and myself to become martyrs to his obstinate will. Were
we to be starved to death? A frightful recollection came to my mind.
Once we had fed on bits and scraps for a week while he sorted some
curiosities. It gave me the cramp even to think of it!
                                                   {CHAPTER_3 ^paragraph 35}
  I wanted my breakfast, and I saw no way of getting it. Still my
resolution held good. I would starve rather than yield. But the cook
began to take me seriously to task. What was to be done? She could not
go out; and I dared not.
  My uncle continued counting and writing; his imagination seemed to
have translated him to the skies. He neither thought of eating nor
drinking. In this way twelve o'clock came round. I was hungry, and
there was nothing in the house. The cook had eaten the last bit of
bread. This could not go on. It did, however, until two, when my
sensations were terrible. After all, I began to think the document
very absurd. Perhaps it might only be a gigantic hoax. Besides, some
means would surely be found to keep my uncle back from attempting
any such absurd expedition. On the other hand, if he did attempt
anything so quixotic, I should not be compelled to accompany him.
Another line of reasoning partially decided me. Very likely he would
make the discovery himself when I should have suffered starvation
for nothing. Under the influence of hunger this reasoning appeared
admirable. I determined to tell all.
  The question now arose as to how it was to be done. I was still
dwelling on the thought, when he rose and put on his hat.
  What! go out and lock us in? Never!
  "Uncle," I began.
                                                   {CHAPTER_3 ^paragraph 40}
  He did not appear even to hear me.
  "Professor Hardwigg," I cried.
  "What," he retorted, "did you speak?"
  "How about the key?"
  "What key- the key of the door?
                                                   {CHAPTER_3 ^paragraph 45}
  "No- of these horrible hieroglyphics?
  He looked at me from under his spectacles, and started at the odd
expression of my face. Rushing forward, he clutched me by the arm
and keenly examined my countenance. His very look was an
interrogation.
  I simply nodded.
  With an incredulous shrug of the shoulders, he turned upon his heel.
Undoubtedly he thought I had gone mad.
  "I have made a very important discovery."
                                                   {CHAPTER_3 ^paragraph 50}
  His eyes flashed with excitement. His hand was lifted in a
menacing attitude. For a moment neither of us spoke. It is hard to say
which was most excited.
  "You don't mean to say that you have any idea of the meaning of
the scrawl?"
  "I do," was my desperate reply. "Look at the sentence as dictated by
you."
  "Well," but it means nothing," was the angry answer.
  "Nothing if you read from left to right, but mark, if from right
to left-"
                                                   {CHAPTER_3 ^paragraph 55}
  "Backwards!" cried my uncle, in wild amazement. "Oh most cunning
Saknussemm; and I to be such a blockhead!"
  He snatched up the document, gazed at it with haggard eye, and
read it out as I had done.
  It read as follows:
-
      In Sneffels Yoculis craterem kem delibat
                                                   {CHAPTER_3 ^paragraph 60}
      umbra Scartaris Julii intra calendas descende,
      audas viator, et terrestre centrum attinges.
      Kod feci. Arne Saknussemm
-
  Which dog Latin being translated, reads as follows:
                                                   {CHAPTER_3 ^paragraph 65}
-
  Descend into the crater of Yocul of Sneffels, which the shade of
Scartaris caresses, before the kalends of July, audacious traveler,
and you will reach the center of the earth. I did it.
                                            ARNE SAKNUSSEMM
-
  My uncle leaped three feet from the ground with joy. He looked
radiant and handsome. He rushed about the room wild with delight and
satisfaction. He knocked over tables and chairs. He threw his books
about until at last, utterly exhausted, he fell into his armchair.
                                                   {CHAPTER_3 ^paragraph 70}
  "What's o'clock?" he asked.
  "About three."
  "My dinner does not seem to have done me much good," he observed.
"Let me have something to eat. We can then start at once. Get my
portmanteau ready."
  "What for?"
  "And your own," he continued. "We start at once."
                                                   {CHAPTER_3 ^paragraph 75}
  My horror may be conceived. I resolved however to show no fear.
Scientific reasons were the only ones likely to influence my uncle.
Now, there were many against this terrible journey. The very idea of
going down to the center of the earth was simply absurd. I
determined therefore to argue the point after dinner.
  My uncle's rage was now directed against the cook for having no
dinner ready. My explanation however satisfied him, and having
gotten the key, she soon contrived to get sufficient to satisfy our
voracious appetites.
  During the repast my uncle was rather gay than otherwise. He made
some of those peculiar jokes which belong exclusively to the
learned. As soon, however, as dessert was over, he called me to his
study. We each took a chair on opposite sides of the table.
  "Henry," he said, in a soft and winning voice; "I have always
believed you ingenious, and you have rendered me a service never to be
forgotten. Without you, this great, this wondrous discovery would
never have been made. It is my duty, therefore, to insist on your
sharing the glory."
  "He is in a good humor," thought I; "I'll soon let him know my
opinion of glory."
                                                   {CHAPTER_3 ^paragraph 80}
  "In the first place," he continued, "you must keep the whole
affair a profound secret. There is no more envious race of men than
scientific discoverers. Many would start on the same journey. At all
events, we will be the first in the field."
  "I doubt your having many competitors," was my reply.
  "A man of real scientific acquirements would be delighted at the
chance. We should find a perfect stream of pilgrims on the traces of
Arne Saknussemm, if this document were once made public."
  "But, my dear sir, is not this paper very likely to be a hoax?" I
urged.
  "The book in which we find it is sufficient proof of its
authenticity," he replied.
                                                   {CHAPTER_3 ^paragraph 85}
  "I thoroughly allow that the celebrated Professor wrote the lines,
but only, I believe, as a kind of mystification," was my answer.
  Scarcely were the words out of my mouth, when I was sorry I had
uttered them. My uncle looked at me with a dark and gloomy scowl,
and I began to be alarmed for the results of our conversation. His
mood soon changed, however, and a smile took the place of a frown.
  "We shall see," he remarked, with decisive emphasis.
  "But see, what is all this about Yocul, and Sneffels, and this
Scartaris? I have never heard anything about them."
  "The very point to which I am coming. I lately received from my
friend Augustus Peterman, of Leipzig, a map. Take down the third atlas
from the second shelf, series Z, plate 4."
                                                   {CHAPTER_3 ^paragraph 90}
  I rose, went to the shelf, and presently returned with the volume
indicated.
  "This," said my uncle, "is one of the best maps of Iceland. I
believe it will settle all your doubts, difficulties and objections."
  With a grim hope to the contrary, I stooped over the map.

CHAPTER_4
                      CHAPTER 4
               We Start on the Journey
-
  YOU see, the whole island is composed of volcanoes," said the
Professor, "and remark carefully that they all bear the name of Yocul.
The word is Icelandic, and means a glacier. In most of the lofty
mountains of that region the volcanic eruptions come forth from
icebound caverns. Hence the name applied to every volcano on this
extraordinary island."
  "But what does this word Sneffels mean?"
  To this question I expected no rational answer. I was mistaken.
  "Follow my finger to the western coast of Iceland, there you see
Reykjavik, its capital. Follow the direction of one of its innumerable
fjords or arms of the sea, and what do you see below the sixty-fifth
degree of latitude?"
                                                    {CHAPTER_4 ^paragraph 5}
  "A peninsula- very like a thighbone in shape.
  "And in the center of it-?"
  "A mountain."
  "Well," that's Sneffels."
  I had nothing to say.
                                                   {CHAPTER_4 ^paragraph 10}
  "That is Sneffels- a mountain about five thousand feet in height,
one of the most remarkable in the whole island, and certainly doomed
to be the most celebrated in the world, for through its crater we
shall reach the center of the earth."
  "Impossible!" cried I, startled and shocked at the thought.
  "Why impossible?" said Professor Hardwigg in his severest tones.
  "Because its crater is choked with lava, by burning rocks- by
infinite dangers."
  "But if it be extinct?"
                                                   {CHAPTER_4 ^paragraph 15}
  "That would make a difference."
  "Of course it would. There are about three hundred volcanoes on
the whole surface of the globe- but the greater number are extinct. Of
these Sneffels is one. No eruption has occurred since 1219- in fact it
has ceased to be a volcano at all."
  After this what more could I say? Yes,- I thought of another
objection.
  "But what is all this about Scartaris and the kalends of July- ?"
  My uncle reflected deeply. Presently he gave forth the result of his
reflections in a sententious tone. "What appears obscure to you, to me
is light. This very phrase shows how particular Saknussemm is in his
directions. The Sneffels mountain has many craters. He is careful
therefore to point the exact one which is the highway into the
Interior of the Earth. He lets us know, for this purpose, that about
the end of the month of June, the shadow of Mount Scartaris falls upon
the one crater. There can be no doubt about the matter."
                                                   {CHAPTER_4 ^paragraph 20}
  My uncle had an answer for everything.
  "I accept all your explanations"' I said "and Saknussemm is right.
He found out the entrance to the bowels of the earth, he has indicated
correctly, but that he or anyone else ever followed up the discovery
is madness to suppose."
  "Why so, young man?"
  "All scientific teaching, theoretical and practical, shows it to
be impossible."
  "I care nothing for theories," retorted my uncle.
                                                   {CHAPTER_4 ^paragraph 25}
  "But is it not well-known that heat increases one degree for every
seventy feet you descend into the earth? Which gives a fine idea of
the central heat. All the matters which compose the globe are in a
state of incandescence; even gold, platinum, and the hardest rocks are
in a state of fusion. What would become of us?"
  "Don't be alarmed at the heat, my boy."
  "How so?"
  "Neither you nor anybody else know anything about the real state
of the earth's interior. All modern experiments tend to explode the
older theories. Were any such heat to exist, the upper crust of the
earth would be shattered to atoms, and the world would be at an end."
  A long, learned and not uninteresting discussion followed, which
ended in this wise:
                                                   {CHAPTER_4 ^paragraph 30}
  "I do not believe in the dangers and difficulties which you,
Henry, seem to multiply; and the only way to learn, is like Arne
Saknussemm, to go and see."
  "Well," cried I, overcome at last, "let us go and see. Though how we
can do that in the dark is another mystery."
  "Fear nothing. We shall overcome these, and many other difficulties.
Besides, as we approach the center, I expect to find it luminous-"
  "Nothing is impossible."
  "And now that we have come to a thorough understanding, not a word
to any living soul. Our success depends on secrecy and dispatch."
                                                   {CHAPTER_4 ^paragraph 35}
  Thus ended our memorable conference, which roused a perfect fever in
me. Leaving my uncle, I went forth like one possessed. Reaching the
banks of the Elbe, I began to think. Was all I had heard really and
truly possible? Was my uncle in his sober senses, and could the
interior of the earth be reached? Was I the victim of a madman, or was
he a discoverer of rare courage and grandeur of conception?
  To a certain extent I was anxious to be off. I was afraid my
enthusiasm would cool. I determined to pack up at once. At the end
of an hour, however, on my way home, I found that my feelings had very
much changed.
  "I'm all abroad," I cried; "'tis a nightmare- I must have dreamed
it."
  At this moment I came face to face with Gretchen, whom I warmly
embraced.
  "So you have come to meet me," she said; "how good of you. But
what is the matter?"
                                                   {CHAPTER_4 ^paragraph 40}
  Well, it was no use mincing the matter, I told her all. She listened
with awe, and for some minutes she could not speak.
  "Well?" I at last said, rather anxiously.
  "What a magnificent journey. If I were only a man! A journey
worthy of the nephew of Professor Hardwigg. I should look upon it as
an honor to accompany him."
  "My dear Gretchen, I thought you would be the first to cry out
against this mad enterprise."
  "No; on the contrary, I glory in it. It is magnificent, splendid- an
idea worthy of my father. Henry Lawson, I envy you."
                                                   {CHAPTER_4 ^paragraph 45}
  This was, as it were, conclusive. The final blow of all.
  When we entered the house we found my uncle surrounded by workmen
and porters, who were packing up. He was pulling and hauling at a
bell.
  "Where have you been wasting your time? Your portmanteau is not
packed- my papers are not in order- the precious tailor has not
brought my clothes, nor my gaiters- the key of my carpet bag is gone!"
  I looked at him stupefied. And still he tugged away at the bell.
  "We are really off, then?" I said.
                                                   {CHAPTER_4 ^paragraph 50}
  "Yes- of course, and yet you go out for a stroll, unfortunate boy!"
  "And when do we go?
  "The day after tomorrow, at daybreak."
  I heard no more; but darted off to my little bedchamber and locked
myself in. There was no doubt about it now. My uncle had been hard
at work all the afternoon. The garden was full of ropes, rope ladders,
torches, gourds, iron clamps, crowbars, alpenstocks, and pickaxes-
enough to load ten men.
  I passed a terrible night. I was called early the next day to
learn that the resolution of my uncle was unchanged and irrevocable. I
also found my cousin and affianced wife as warm on the subject as
was her father.
                                                   {CHAPTER_4 ^paragraph 55}
  Next day, at five o'clock in the morning, the post chaise was at the
door. Gretchen and the old cook received the keys of the house; and,
scarcely pausing to wish anyone good-by, we started on our adventurous
journey into the center of the earth.

CHAPTER_5
                     CHAPTER 5
             First Lessons in Climbing
-
  AT Altona, a suburb of Hamburg, is the Chief Station of the Kiel
railway, which was to take us to the shores of the Belt. In twenty
minutes from the moment of our departure we were in Holstein, and
our carriage entered the station. Our heavy luggage was taken out,
weighed, labeled, and placed in a huge van. We then took our
tickets, and exactly at seven o'clock were seated opposite each
other in a firstclass railway carriage.
  My uncle said nothing. He was too busy examining his papers, among
which of course was the famous parchment, and some letters of
introduction from the Danish consul which were to pave the way to an
introduction to the Governor of Iceland. My only amusement was looking
out of the window. But as we passed through a flat though fertile
country, this occupation was slightly monotonous. In three hours we
reached Kiel, and our baggage was at once transferred to the steamer.
  We had now a day before us, a delay of about ten hours. Which fact
put my uncle in a towering passion. We had nothing to do but to walk
about the pretty town and bay. At length, however, we went on board,
and at half past ten were steaming down the Great Belt. It was a
dark night, with a strong breeze and a rough sea, nothing being
visible but the occasional fires on shore, with here and there a
lighthouse. At seven in the morning we left Korsor, a little town on
the western side of Seeland.
  Here we took another railway, which in three hours brought us to the
capital, Copenhagen, where, scarcely taking time for refreshment, my
uncle hurried out to present one of his letters of introduction. It
was to the director of the Museum of Antiquities, who, having been
informed that we were tourists bound for Iceland, did all he could
to assist us. One wretched hope sustained me now. Perhaps no vessel
was bound for such distant parts.
                                                    {CHAPTER_5 ^paragraph 5}
  Alas! a little Danish schooner, the Valkyrie, was to sail on the
second of June for Reykjavik. The captain, M. Bjarne, was on board,
and was rather surprised at the energy and cordiality with which his
future passenger shook him by the hand. To him a voyage to Iceland was
merely a matter of course. My uncle, on the other hand, considered the
event of sublime importance. The honest sailor took advantage of the
Professor's enthusiasm to double the fare.
  "On Tuesday morning at seven o'clock be on board," said M. Bjarne,
handing us our receipts.
  "Excellent! Capital! Glorious!" remarked my uncle as we sat down
to a late breakfast; "refresh yourself, my boy, and we will take a run
through the town."
  Our meal concluded, we went to the Kongens-Nye-Torw; to the king's
magnificent palace; to the beautiful bridge over the canal near the
Museum; to the immense cenotaph of Thorwaldsen with its hideous
naval groups; to the castle of Rosenberg; and to all the other lions
of the place- none of which my uncle even saw, so absorbed was he in
his anticipated triumphs.
  But one thing struck his fancy, and that was a certain singular
steeple situated on the Island of Amak, which is the southeast quarter
of the city of Copenhagen. My uncle at once ordered me to turn my
steps that way, and accordingly we went on board the steam ferry
boat which does duty on the canal, and very soon reached the noted
dockyard quay.
                                                   {CHAPTER_5 ^paragraph 10}
  In the first instance we crossed some narrow streets, where we met
numerous groups of galley slaves, with particolored trousers, grey and
yellow, working under the orders and the sticks of severe taskmasters,
and finally reached the Vor-Frelser's-Kirk.
  This church exhibited nothing remarkable in itself; in fact, the
worthy Professor had only been attracted to it by one circumstance,
which was, that its rather elevated steeple started from a circular
platform, after which there was an exterior staircase, which wound
round to the very summit.
  "Let us ascend," said my uncle.
  "But I never could climb church towers," I cried, "I am subject to
dizziness in my head."
  "The very reason why you should go up. I want to cure you of a bad
habit."
                                                   {CHAPTER_5 ^paragraph 15}
  "But, my good sir-"
  "I tell you to come. What is the use of wasting so much valuable
time?"
  It was impossible to dispute the dictatorial commands of my uncle. I
yielded with a groan. On payment of a fee, a verger gave us the key.
He, for one, was not partial to the ascent. My uncle at once showed me
the way, running up the steps like a schoolboy. I followed as well
as I could, though no sooner was I outside the tower, than my head
began to swim. There was nothing of the eagle about me. The earth
was enough for me, and no ambitious desire to soar ever entered my
mind. Still things did not go badly until I had ascended 150 steps,
and was near the platform, when I began to feel the rush of cold
air. I could scarcely stand, when clutching the railings, I looked
upwards. The railing was frail enough, but nothing to those which
skirted the terrible winding staircase, that appeared, from where I
stood, to ascend to the skies.
  "Now then, Henry."
  "I can't do it!" I cried, in accents of despair.
                                                   {CHAPTER_5 ^paragraph 20}
  "Are you, after all, a coward, sir?" said my uncle in a pitiless
tone. "Go up, I say!"
  To this there was no reply possible. And yet the keen air acted
violently on my nervous system; sky, earth, all seemed to swim
round, while the steeple rocked like a ship. My legs gave way like
those of a drunken man. I crawled upon my hands and knees; I hauled
myself up slowly, crawling like a snake. Presently I closed my eyes,
and allowed myself to be dragged upwards.
  "Look around you," said my uncle in a stern voice, "heaven knows
what profound abysses you may have to look down. This is excellent
practice."
  Slowly, and shivering all the while with cold, I opened my eyes.
What then did I see? My first glance was upwards at the cold fleecy
clouds, which as by some optical delusion appeared to stand still,
while the steeple, the weathercock, and our two selves were carried
swiftly along. Far away on one side could be seen the grassy plain,
while on the other lay the sea bathed in translucent light. The
Sund, or Sound as we call it, could be discovered beyond the point
of Elsinore, crowded with white sails, which, at that distance
looked like the wings of seagulls; while to the east could be made out
the far-off coast of Sweden. The whole appeared a magic panorama.
  But faint and bewildered as I was, there was no remedy for it.
Rise and stand up I must. Despite my protestations my first lesson
lasted quite an hour. When, nearly two hours later, I reached the
bosom of mother earth, I was like a rheumatic old man bent double with
pain.
                                                   {CHAPTER_5 ^paragraph 25}
  "Enough for one day," said my uncle, rubbing his hands, "we will
begin again tomorrow."
  There was no remedy. My lessons lasted five days, and at the end
of that period, I ascended blithely enough, and found myself able to
look down into the depths below without even winking, and with some
degree of pleasure.

CHAPTER_6
                     CHAPTER 6
              Our Voyage to Iceland
-
  THE hour of departure came at last. The night before, the worthy Mr.
Thompson brought us the most cordial letters of introduction for Baron
Trampe, Governor of Iceland, for M. Pictursson, coadjutor to the
bishop, and for M. Finsen, mayor of the town of Reykjavik. In
return, my uncle nearly crushed his hands, so warmly did he shake
them.
  On the second of the month, at two in the morning, our precious
cargo of luggage was taken on board the good ship Valkyrie. We
followed, and were very politely introduced by the captain to a
small cabin with two standing bed places, neither very well ventilated
nor very comfortable. But in the cause of science men are expected
to suffer.
  "Well," and have we a fair wind?" cried my uncle, in his most
mellifluous accents.
  "An excellent wind!" replied Captain Bjarne; "we shall leave the
Sound, going free with all sails set."
                                                    {CHAPTER_6 ^paragraph 5}
  A few minutes afterwards, the schooner started before the wind,
under all the canvas she could carry, and entered the channel. An hour
later, the capital of Denmark seemed to sink into the waves, and we
were at no great distance from the coast of Elsinore. My uncle was
delighted; for myself, moody and dissatisfied, I appeared almost to
expect a glimpse of the ghost of Hamlet.
  "Sublime madman thought I, "you doubtless would approve our
proceedings. You might perhaps even follow us to the center of the
earth, there to resolve your eternal doubts."
  But no ghost or anything else appeared upon the ancient walls. The
fact is, the castle is much later than the time of the heroic prince
of Denmark. It is now the residence of the keeper of the Strait of the
Sound, and through that Sound more than fifteen thousand vessels of
all nations pass every year.
  The castle of Kronborg soon disappeared in the murky atmosphere,
as well as the tower of Helsinborg, which raises its head on the
Swedish Bank. And here the schooner began to feel in earnest the
breezes of the Kattegat. The Valkyrie was swift enough, but with all
sailing boats there is the same uncertainty. Her cargo was coal,
furniture, pottery, woolen clothing, and a load of corn. As usual, the
crew was small, five Danes doing the whole of the work.
  "How long will the voyage last?" asked my uncle.
                                                   {CHAPTER_6 ^paragraph 10}
  "Well," I should think about ten days," replied the skipper,
"unless, indeed, we meet with some northeast gales among the Faroe
Islands."
  "At all events, there will be no very considerable delay," cried the
impatient Professor.
  "No, Mr. Hardwigg," said the captain, "no fear of that. At all
events, we shall get there some day."
  Towards evening the schooner doubled Cape Skagen, the northernmost
part of Denmark, crossed the Skagerrak during the night- skirted the
extreme point of Norway through the gut of Cape Lindesnes, and then
reached the Northern Seas. Two days later we were not far from the
coast of Scotland, somewhere near what Danish sailors call
Peterhead, and then the Valkyrie stretched out direct for the Faroe
Islands, between Orkney and Shetland. Our vessel now felt the full
force of the ocean waves, and the wind shifting, we with great
difficulty made the Faroe Isles. On the eighth day, the captain made
out Myganness, the westernmost of the isles, and from that moment
headed direct for Portland, a cape on the southern shores of the
singular island for which we were bound.
  The voyage offered no incident worthy of record. I bore it very
well, but my uncle to his great annoyance, and even shame, was
remarkably seasick! This mal de mer troubled him the more that it
prevented him from questioning Captain Bjarne as to the subject of
Sneffels, as to the means of communication, and the facilities of
transport. All these explanations he had to adjourn to the period of
his arrival. His time, meanwhile, was spent lying in bed groaning, and
dwelling anxiously on the hoped-for termination of the voyage. I
didn't pity him.
                                                   {CHAPTER_6 ^paragraph 15}
  On the eleventh day we sighted Cape Portland, over which towered
Mount Myrdals Yokul, which, the weather being clear, we made out
very readily. The cape itself is nothing but a huge mount of granite
standing naked and alone to meet the Atlantic waves. The Valkyrie kept
off the coast, steering to the westward. On all sides were to be
seen whole "schools" of whales and sharks. After some hours we came in
sight of a solitary rock in the ocean, forming a mighty vault, through
which the foaming waves poured with intense fury. The islets of
Westman appeared to leap from the ocean, being so low in the water
as scarcely to be seen until you were right upon them. From that
moment the schooner was steered to the westward in order to round Cape
Reykjanes, the western point of Iceland.
  My uncle, to his great disgust, was unable even to crawl on deck, so
heavy a sea was on, and thus lost the first view of the Land of
Promise. Forty-eight hours later, after a storm which drove us far
to sea under bare poles, we came once more in sight of land, and
were boarded by a pilot, who, after three hours of dangerous
navigation, brought the schooner safely to an anchor in the bay of
Faxa before Reykjavik.
  My uncle came out of his cabin pale, haggard, thin, but full of
enthusiasm, his eyes dilated with pleasure and satisfaction. Nearly
the whole population of the town was on foot to see us land. The
fact was, that scarcely any one of them but expected some goods by the
periodical vessel.
  Professor Hardwigg was in haste to leave his prison, or rather as he
called it, his hospital; but before he attempted to do so, he caught
hold of my hand, led me to the quarterdeck of the schooner, took my
arm with his left hand, and pointed inland with his right, over the
northern part of the bay, to where rose a high two-peaked mountain-
a double cone covered with eternal snow.
  "Behold he whispered in an awe-stricken voice, behold- Mount
Sneffels!"
                                                   {CHAPTER_6 ^paragraph 20}
  Then without further remark, he put his finger to his lips,
frowned darkly, and descended into the small boat which awaited us.
I followed, and in a few minutes we stood upon the soil of
mysterious Iceland!
  Scarcely were we fairly on shore when there appeared before us a man
of excellent appearance, wearing the costume of a military officer. He
was, however, but a civil servant, a magistrate, the governor of the
island- Baron Trampe. The Professor knew whom he had to deal with.
He therefore handed him the letters from Copenhagen, and a brief
conversation in Danish followed, to which I of course was a
stranger, and for a very good reason, for I did not know the
language in which they conversed. I afterwards heard, however, that
Baron Trampe placed himself entirely at the beck and call of Professor
Hardwigg.
  My uncle was most graciously received by M. Finsen, the mayor, who
as far as costume went, was quite as military as the governor, but
also from character and occupation quite as pacific. As for his
coadjutor, M. Pictursson, he was absent on an episcopal visit to the
northern portion of the diocese. We were therefore compelled to
defer the pleasure of being presented to him. His absence was,
however, more than compensated by the presence of M. Fridriksson,
professor of natural science in the college of Reykjavik, a man of
invaluable ability. This modest scholar spoke no languages save
Icelandic and Latin. When, therefore, he addressed himself to me in
the language of Horace, we at once came to understand one another.
He was, in fact, the only person that I did thoroughly understand
during the whole period of my residence in this benighted island.
  Out of three rooms of which his house was composed, two were
placed at our service, and in a few hours we were installed with all
our baggage, the amount of which rather astonished the simple
inhabitants of Reykjavik.
  "Now, Harry," said my uncle, rubbing his hands, "an goes well, the
worse difficulty is now over."
                                                   {CHAPTER_6 ^paragraph 25}
  "How the worse difficulty over?" I cried in fresh amazement.
  "Doubtless. Here we are in Iceland. Nothing more remains but to
descend into the bowels of the earth."
  "Well, sir, to a certain extent you are right. We have only to go
down- but, as far as I am concerned, that is not the question. I
want to know how we are to get up again."
  "That is the least part of the business, and does not in any way
trouble me. In the meantime, there is not an hour to lose. I am
about to visit the public library. Very likely I may find there some
manuscripts from the hand of Saknussemm. I shall be glad to consult
them."
  "In the meanwhile," I replied, "I will take a walk through the town.
Will you not likewise do so?"
                                                   {CHAPTER_6 ^paragraph 30}
  "I feel no interest in the subject," said my uncle. "What for me
is curious in this island, is not what is above the surface, but
what is below."
  I bowed by way of reply, put on my hat and furred cloak, and went
out.
  It was not an easy matter to lose oneself in the two streets of
Reykjavik; I had therefore no need to ask my way. The town lies on a
flat and marshy plain, between two hills. A vast field of lava
skirts it on one side, falling away in terraces towards the sea. On
the other hand is the large bay of Faxa, bordered on the north by
the enormous glacier of Sneffels, and in which bay the Valkyrie was
then the only vessel at anchor. Generally there were one or two
English or French gunboats, to watch and protect the fisheries in
the offing. They were now, however, absent on duty.
  The longest of the streets of Reykjavik runs parallel to the
shore. In this street the merchants and traders live in wooden huts
made with beams of wood, painted red- mere log huts, such as you
find in the wilds of America. The other street, situated more to the
west, runs toward a little lake between the residences of the bishop
and the other personages not engaged in commerce.
  I had soon seen all I wanted of these weary and dismal
thoroughfares. Here and there was a strip of discolored turf, like
an old worn-out bit of woolen carpet; and now and then a bit of
kitchen garden, in which grew potatoes, cabbage, and lettuce, almost
diminutive enough to suggest the idea of Lilliput.
                                                   {CHAPTER_6 ^paragraph 35}
  In the center of the new commercial street, I found the public
cemetery, enclosed by an earthen wall. Though not very large, it
appeared not likely to be filled for centuries. From hence I went to
the house of the Governor- a mere hut in comparison with the Mansion
House of Hamburg- but a palace alongside the other Icelandic houses.
Between the little lake and the town was the church, built in simple
Protestant style, and composed of calcined stones, thrown up by
volcanic action. I have not the slightest doubt that in high winds its
red tiles were blown out, to the great annoyance of the pastor and
congregation. Upon an eminence close at hand was the national
school, in which were taught Hebrew, English, French, and Danish.
  In three hours my tour was complete. The general impression upon
my mind was sadness. No trees, no vegetation, so to speak- on all
sides volcanic peaks- the huts of turf and earth- more like roofs than
houses. Thanks to the heat of these residences, grass grows on the
roof, which grass is carefully cut for hay. I saw but few
inhabitants during my excursion, but I met a crowd on the beach,
drying, salting and loading codfish, the principal article of
exportation. The men appeared robust but heavy; fair-haired like
Germans, but of pensive mien- exiles of a higher scale in the ladder
of humanity than the Eskimos, but, I thought, much more unhappy, since
with superior perceptions they are compelled to live within the limits
of the Polar Circle.
  Sometimes they gave vent to a convulsive laugh, but by no chance did
they smile. Their costume consists of a coarse capote of black wool,
known in Scandinavian countries as the "vadmel," a broad-brimmed
hat, trousers of red serge, and a piece of leather tied with strings
for a shoe- a coarse kind of moccasin. The women, though sad-looking
and mournful, had rather agreeable features, without much
expression. They wear a bodice and petticoat of somber vadmel. When
unmarried they wear a little brown knitted cap over a crown of plaited
hair; but when married, they cover their heads with a colored
handkerchief, over which they tie a white scarf.

CHAPTER_7
                     CHAPTER 7
            Conversation and Discovery
-
  WHEN I returned, dinner was ready. This meal was devoured by my
worthy relative with avidity and voracity. His shipboard diet had
turned his interior into a perfect gulf. The repast, which was more
Danish than Icelandic, was in itself nothing, but the excessive
hospitality of our host made us enjoy it doubly.
  The conversation turned upon scientific matters, and M.
Fridriksson asked my uncle what he thought of the public library.
  "Library, sir?" cried my uncle; "it appears to me a collection of
useless odd volumes, and a beggarly amount of empty shelves."
  "What!" cried M. Fridriksson; "why, we have eight thousand volumes
of most rare and valuable works- some in the Scandinavian language,
besides all the new publications from Copenhagen."
                                                    {CHAPTER_7 ^paragraph 5}
  "Eight thousand volumes, my dear sir- why, where are they?" cried my
uncle.
  "Scattered over the country, Professor Hardwigg. We are very
studious, my dear sir, though we do live in Iceland. Every farmer,
every laborer, every fisherman can both read and write- and we think
that books instead of being locked up in cupboards, far from the sight
of students, should be distributed as widely as possible. The books of
our library are therefore passed from hand to hand without returning
to the library shelves perhaps for years."
  "Then when foreigners visit you, there is nothing for them to see?"
  "Well," sir, foreigners have their own libraries, and our first
consideration is, that our humbler classes should be highly
educated. Fortunately, the love of study is innate in the Icelandic
people. In 1816 we founded a Literary Society and Mechanics'
Institute; many foreign scholars of eminence are honorary members;
we publish books destined to educate our people, and these books
have rendered valuable services to our country. Allow me to have the
honor, Professor Hardwigg, to enroll you as an honorary member?"
  My uncle, who already belonged to nearly every literary and
scientific institution in Europe, immediately yielded to the amiable
wishes of good M. Fridriksson.
                                                   {CHAPTER_7 ^paragraph 10}
  "And now," he said, after many expressions of gratitude and good
will, "if you will tell me what books you expected to find, perhaps
I may be of some assistance to you."
  I watched my uncle keenly. For a minute or two he hesitated, as if
unwilling to speak; to speak openly was, perhaps, to unveil his
projects. Nevertheless, after some reflection, he made up his mind.
  "Well," M. Fridriksson," he said in an easy, unconcerned kind of
way, "I was desirous of ascertaining, if among other valuable works,
you had any of the learned Arne Saknussemm."
  "Arne Saknussemm!" cried the Professor of Reykjavik; "you speak of
one of the most distinguished scholars of the sixteenth century, of
the great naturalist, the great alchemist, the great traveler."
  "Exactly so."
                                                   {CHAPTER_7 ^paragraph 15}
  "One of the most distinguished men connected with Icelandic
science and literature."
  "As you say, sir-"
  "A man illustrious above all."
  "Yes, sir, all this is true, but his works?"
  "We have none of them."
                                                   {CHAPTER_7 ^paragraph 20}
  "Not in Iceland?"
  "There are none in Iceland or elsewhere," answered the other, sadly.
  "Why so?"
  "Because Arne Saknussemm was persecuted for heresy, and in 1573
his works were publicly burnt at Copenhagen, by the hands of the
common hangman."
  "Very good! capital!" murmured my uncle, to the great astonishment
of the worthy Icelander.
                                                   {CHAPTER_7 ^paragraph 25}
  "You said, sir-"
  "Yes, yes, all is clear, I see the link in the chain; everything
is explained, and I now understand why Arne Saknussemm, put out of
court, forced to hide his magnificent discoveries, was compelled to
conceal beneath the veil of an incomprehensible cryptograph, the
secret-"
  "What secret?"
  "A secret- which," stammered my uncle.
  "Have you discovered some wonderful manuscript?" cried M.
Fridriksson.
                                                   {CHAPTER_7 ^paragraph 30}
  "No! no, I was carried away by my enthusiasm. A mere supposition."
  "Very good, sir. But, really, to turn to another subject, I hope you
will not leave our island without examining into its mineralogical
riches."
  "Well," the fact is, I am rather late. So many learned men have been
here before me."
  "Yes, yes, but there is still much to be done," cried M.
Fridriksson.
  "You think so," said my uncle, his eyes twinkling with hidden
satisfaction.
                                                   {CHAPTER_7 ^paragraph 35}
  "Yes, you have no idea how many unknown mountains, glaciers,
volcanoes there are which remain to be studied. Without moving from
where we sit, I can show you one. Yonder on the edge of the horizon,
you see Sneffels."
  "Oh yes, Sneffels," said my uncle.
  "One of the most curious volcanoes in existence, the crater of which
has been rarely visited."
  "Extinct?"
  "Extinct, any time these five hundred years," was the ready reply.
                                                   {CHAPTER_7 ^paragraph 40}
  "Well," said my uncle, who dug his nails into his flesh, and pressed
his knees tightly together to prevent himself leaping up with joy.
"I have a great mind to begin my studies with an examination of the
geological mysteries of this Mount Seffel- Feisel- what do you call
it?"
  "Sneffels, my dear sir."
  This portion of the conversation took place in Latin, and I
therefore understood all that had been said. I could scarcely keep
my countenance when I found my uncle so cunningly concealing his
delight and satisfaction. I must confess that his artful grimaces, put
on to conceal his happiness, made him look like a new Mephistopheles.
  "Yes, yes," he continued, "your proposition delights me. I will
endeavor to climb to the summit of Sneffels, and, if possible, will
descend into its crater."
  "I very much regret," continued M. Fridriksson, "that my
occupation will entirely preclude the possibility of my accompanying
you. It would have been both pleasurable and profitable if I could
have spared the time."
                                                   {CHAPTER_7 ^paragraph 45}
  "No, no, a thousand times no," cried my uncle. "I do not wish to
disturb the serenity of any man. I thank you, however, with all my
heart. The presence of one so learned as yourself, would no doubt have
been most useful, but the duties of your office and profession
before everything."
  In the innocence of his simple heart, our host did not perceive
the irony of these remarks.
  "I entirely approve your project," continued the Icelander after
some further remarks. "It is a good idea to begin by examining this
volcano. You will make a harvest of curious observations. In the first
place, how do you propose to get to Sneffels?"
  "By sea. I shall cross the bay. Of course that is the most rapid
route."
  "Of course. But still it cannot be done."
                                                   {CHAPTER_7 ^paragraph 50}
  "Why?"
  "We have not an available boat in all Reykjavik," replied the other.
  "What is to be done?"
  "You must go by land along the coast. It is longer, but much more
interesting."
  "Then I must have a guide."
                                                   {CHAPTER_7 ^paragraph 55}
  "Of course; and I have your very man."
  "Somebody on whom I can depend."
  "Yes, an inhabitant of the peninsula on which Sneffels is
situated. He is a very shrewd and worthy man, with whom you will be
pleased. He speaks Danish like a Dane."
  "When can I see him- today?"
  "No, tomorrow; he will not be here before."
                                                   {CHAPTER_7 ^paragraph 60}
  "Tomorrow be it," replied my uncle, with a deep sigh.
  The conversation ended by compliments on both sides. During the
dinner my uncle had learned much as to the history of Arne Saknussemm,
the reasons for his mysterious and hieroglyphical document. He also
became aware that his host would not accompany him on his
adventurous expedition, and that next day we should have a guide.

CHAPTER_8
                     CHAPTER 8
                    Off at Last
-
  THAT evening I took a brief walk on the shore near Reykjavik,
after which I returned to an early sleep on my bed of coarse planks,
where I slept the sleep of the just. When I awoke I heard my uncle
speaking loudly in the next room. I rose hastily and joined him. He
was talking in Danish with a man of tall stature, and of perfectly
Herculean build. This man appeared to be possessed of very great
strength. His eyes, which started rather prominently from a very large
head, the face belonging to which was simple and naive, appeared
very quick and intelligent. Very long hair, which even in England
would have been accounted exceedingly red, fell over his athletic
shoulders. This native of Iceland was active and supple in appearance,
though he scarcely moved his arms, being in fact one of those men
who despise the habit of gesticulation common to southern people.
  Everything in this man's manner revealed a calm and phlegmatic
temperament. There was nothing indolent about him, but his
appearance spoke of tranquillity. He was one of those who never seemed
to expect anything from anybody, who liked to work when he thought
proper, and whose philosophy nothing could astonish or trouble.
  I began to comprehend his character, simply from the way in which he
listened to the wild and impassioned verbiage of my worthy uncle.
While the excellent Professor spoke sentence after sentence, he
stood with folded arms, utterly still, motionless to all my uncle's
gesticulations. When he wanted to say No he moved his head from left
to right; when he acquiesced he nodded, so slightly that you could
scarcely see the undulation of his head. This economy of motion was
carried to the length of avarice.
  Judging from his appearance I should have been a long time before
I had suspected him to be what he was, a mighty hunter. Certainly
his manner was not likely to frighten the game. How, then, did he
contrive to get at his prey?
                                                    {CHAPTER_8 ^paragraph 5}
  My surprise was slightly modified when I knew that this tranquil and
solemn personage was only a hunter of the eider duck, the down of
which is, after all, the greatest source of the Icelanders' wealth.
  In the early days of summer, the female of the eider, a pretty
sort of duck, builds its nest amid the rocks of the fjords- the name
given to all narrow gulfs in Scandinavian countries- with which
every part of the island is indented. No sooner has the eider duck
made her nest than she lines the inside of it with the softest down
from her breast. Then comes the hunter or trader, taking away the
nest, the poor bereaved female begins her task over again, and this
continues as long as any eider down is to be found.
  When she can find no more the male bird sets to work to see what
he can do. As, however, his down is not so soft, and has therefore
no commercial value, the hunter does not take the trouble to rob him
of his nest lining. The nest is accordingly finished, the eggs are
laid, the little ones are born, and next year the harvest of eider
down is again collected.
  Now, as the eider duck never selects steep rocks or aspects to build
its nest, but rather sloping and low cliffs near to the sea, the
Icelandic hunter can carry on his trade operations without much
difficulty. He is like a farmer who has neither to plow, to sow, nor
to harrow, only to collect his harvest.
  This grave, sententious, silent person, as phlegmatic as an
Englishman on the French stage, was named Hans Bjelke. He had called
upon us in consequence of the recommendation of M. Fridriksson. He
was, in fact, our future guide. It struck me that had I sought the
world over, I could not have found a greater contradiction to my
impulsive uncle.
                                                   {CHAPTER_8 ^paragraph 10}
  They, however, readily understood one another. Neither of them had
any thought about money; one was ready to take all that was offered
him, the other ready to offer anything that was asked. It may
readily be conceived, then, that an understanding was soon come to
between them.
  Now, the understanding was, that he was to take us to the village of
Stapi, situated on the southern slope of the peninsula of Sneffels, at
the very foot of the volcano. Hans, the guide, told us the distance
was about twenty-two miles, a journey which my uncle supposed would
take about two days.
  But when my uncle came to understand that they were Danish miles, of
eight thousand yards each, he was obliged to be more moderate in his
ideas, and, considering the horrible roads we had to follow, to
allow eight or ten days for the journey.
  Four horses were prepared for us, two to carry the baggage, and
two to bear the important weight of myself and uncle. Hans declared
that nothing ever would make him climb on the back of any animal. He
knew every inch of that part of the coast, and promised to take us the
very shortest way.
  His engagement with my uncle was by no means to cease with our
arrival at Stapi; he was further to remain in his service during the
whole time required for the completion of his scientific
investigations, at the fixed salary of three rix-dollars a week, being
exactly fourteen shillings and twopence, minus one farthing, English
currency. One stipulation, however, was made by the guide- the money
was to be paid to him every Saturday night, failing which, his
engagement was at an end.
                                                   {CHAPTER_8 ^paragraph 15}
  The day of our departure was fixed. My uncle wished to hand the
eider-down hunter an advance, but he refused in one emphatic word-
  "Efter."
  Which being translated from Icelandic into plain English means-
"After."
  The treaty concluded, our worthy guide retired without another word.
  "A splendid fellow," said my uncle; "only he little suspects the
marvelous part he is about to play in the history of the world."
                                                   {CHAPTER_8 ^paragraph 20}
  "You mean, then," I cried in amazement, "that he should accompany
us?"
  "To the interior of the earth, yes," replied my uncle. "Why not?"
  There were yet forty-eight hours to elapse before we made our
final start. To my great regret, our whole time was taken up in making
preparations for our journey. All our industry and ability were
devoted to packing every object in the most advantageous manner- the
instruments on one side, the arms on the other, the tools here and the
provisions there. There were, in fact, four distinct groups.
  The instruments were of course of the best manufacture:
  1. A centigrade thermometer of Eigel, counting up to 150 degrees,
which to me did not appear half enough- or too much. Too hot by
half, if the degree of heat was to ascend so high- in which case we
should certainly be cooked- not enough, if we wanted to ascertain
the exact temperature of springs or metal in a state of fusion.
                                                   {CHAPTER_8 ^paragraph 25}
  2. A manometer worked by compressed air, an instrument used to
ascertain the upper atmospheric pressure on the level of the ocean.
Perhaps a common barometer would not have done as well, the
atmospheric pressure being likely to increase in proportion as we
descended below the surface of the earth.
  3. A first-class chronometer made by Boissonnas, of Geneva, set at
the meridian of Hamburg, from which Germans calculate, as the
English do from Greenwich, and the French from Paris.
  4. Two compasses, one for horizontal guidance, the other to
ascertain the dip.
  5. A night glass.
  6. Two Ruhmkorff coils, which, by means of a current of electricity,
would ensure us a very excellent, easily carried, and certain means of
obtaining light.*
                                                   {CHAPTER_8 ^paragraph 30}
-
  *The Ruhmkorff coil is used to obtain currents of induced
electricity of great intensity. It consists of a coil of copper
wire, insulated by being covered with silk, surrounded by another coil
of fine wire, also insulated, in which a momentary current is
induced when a current is passed through the inner coil from a voltaic
battery. When the apparatus is in action, the gas becomes luminous,
and produces a white and continued light. The battery and wire are
carried in a leather bag, which the traveler fastens by a strap to his
shoulders. The lantern is in front, and enables the benighted wanderer
to see in the most profound obscurity. He may venture without fear
of explosion into the midst of the most inflammable gases, and the
lantern will burn beneath the deepest waters. H. D. Ruhmkorff, an able
and learned chemist, discovered the induction coil. In 1864 he won the
quinquennial French prize of L2,000 for this ingenious application
of electricity. A voltaic battery, so called from Volta, its designed,
is an apparatus consisting of a series of metal plates arranged in
pairs and subjected to the action of saline solutions for producing
currents of electricity.
-
  7. A voltaic battery on the newest principle.
  Our arms consisted of two rifles, with two revolving six-shooters.
Why these arms were provided it was impossible for me to say. I had
every reason to believe that we had neither wild beasts nor savage
natives to fear. My uncle, on the other hand, was quite as devoted
to his arsenal as to his collection of instruments, and above all
was very careful with his provision of fulminating or gun cotton,
warranted to keep in any climate, and of which the expansive force was
known to be greater than that of ordinary gunpowder.
                                                   {CHAPTER_8 ^paragraph 35}
  Our tools consisted of two pickaxes, two crowbars, a silken
ladder, three iron-shod Alpine poles, a hatchet, a hammer, a dozen
wedges, some pointed pieces of iron, and a quantity of strong rope.
You may conceive that the whole made a tolerable parcel, especially
when I mention that the ladder itself was three hundred feet long!
  Then there came the important question of provisions. The hamper was
not very large but tolerably satisfactory, for I knew that in
concentrated essence of meat and biscuit there was enough to last
six months. The only liquid provided by my uncle was Schiedam. Of
water, not a drop. We had, however, an ample supply of gourds, and
my uncle counted on finding water, and enough to fill them, as soon as
we commenced our downward journey. My remarks as to the temperature,
the quality, and even as to the possibility of none being found,
remained wholly without effect.
  To make up the exact list of our traveling gear- for the guidance of
future travelers- add, that we carried a medicine and surgical chest
with all apparatus necessary for wounds, fractures and blows; lint,
scissors, lancets- in fact, a perfect collection of horrible looking
instruments; a number of vials containing ammonia, alcohol, ether,
Goulard water, aromatic vinegar, in fact, every possible and
impossible drug- finally, all the materials for working the
Ruhmkorff coil!
  My uncle had also been careful to lay in a goodly supply of tobacco,
several flasks of very fine gunpowder, boxes of tinder, besides a
large belt crammed full of notes and gold. Good boots rendered
watertight were to be found to the number of six in the tool box.
  "My boy, with such clothing, with such boots, and such general
equipment," said my uncle, in a state of rapturous delight, "we may
hope to travel far."
                                                   {CHAPTER_8 ^paragraph 40}
  It took a whole day to put all these matters in order. In the
evening we dined with Baron Trampe, in company with the Mayor of
Reykjavik, and Doctor Hyaltalin, the great medical man of Iceland.
M. Fridriksson was not present, and I was afterwards sorry to hear
that he and the governor did not agree on some matters connected
with the administration of the island. Unfortunately, the
consequence was, that I did not understand a word that was said at
dinner- a kind of semiofficial reception. One thing I can say, my
uncle never left off speaking.
  The next day our labor came to an end. Our worthy host delighted
my uncle, Professor Hardwigg, by giving him a good map of Iceland, a
most important and precious document for a mineralogist.
  Our last evening was spent in a long conversation with M.
Fridriksson, whom I liked very much- the more that I never expected to
see him or anyone else again. After this agreeable way of spending
an hour or so, I tried to sleep. In vain; with the exception of a
few dozes, my night was miserable.
  At five o'clock in the morning I was awakened from the only real
half hour's sleep of the night by the loud neighing of horses under my
window. I hastily dressed myself and went down into the street. Hans
was engaged in putting the finishing stroke to our baggage, which he
did in a silent, quiet way that won my admiration, and yet he did it
admirably well. My uncle wasted a great deal of breath in giving him
directions, but worthy Hans took not the slightest notice of his
words.
  At six o'clock all our preparations were completed, and M.
Fridriksson shook hands heartily with us. My uncle thanked him warmly,
in the Icelandic language, for his kind hospitality, speaking truly
from the heart.
                                                   {CHAPTER_8 ^paragraph 45}
  As for myself I put together a few of my best Latin phrases and paid
him the highest compliments I could. This fraternal and friendly
duty performed, we sallied forth and mounted our horses.
  As soon as we were quite ready, M. Fridriksson advanced, and by
way of farewell, called after me in the words of Virgil- words which
appeared to have been made for us, travelers starting for an uncertain
destination:
  "Et quacunque viam dederit fortuna sequamur."
  ("And whichsoever way thou goest, may fortune follow!")

CHAPTER_9
                     CHAPTER 9
             We Meet with adventures
-
  THE weather was overcast but settled, when we commenced our
adventurous and perilous journey. We had neither to fear fatiguing
heat nor drenching rain. It was, in fact, real tourist weather.
  As there was nothing I liked better than horse exercise, the
pleasure of riding through an unknown country caused the early part of
our enterprise to be particularly agreeable to me.
  I began to enjoy the exhilarating delight of traveling, a life of
desire, gratification and liberty. The truth is, that my spirits
rose so rapidly, that I began to be indifferent to what had once
appeared to be a terrible journey.
  "After all," I said to myself, "what do I risk? Simply to take a
journey through a curious country, to climb a remarkable mountain, and
if the worst comes to the worst, to descend into the crater of an
extinct volcano."
                                                    {CHAPTER_9 ^paragraph 5}
  There could be no doubt that this was all this terrible Saknussemm
had done. As to the existence of a gallery, or of subterraneous
passages leading into the interior of the earth, the idea was simply
absurd, the hallucination of a distempered imagination. All, then,
that may be required of me I will do cheerfully, and will create no
difficulty.
  It was just before we left Reykjavik that I came to this decision.
  Hans, our extraordinary guide, went first, walking with a steady,
rapid, unvarying step. Our two horses with the luggage followed of
their own accord, without requiring whip or spur. My uncle and I
came behind, cutting a very tolerable figure upon our small but
vigorous animals.
  Iceland is one of the largest islands in Europe. It contains
thirty thousand square miles of surface, and has about seventy
thousand inhabitants. Geographers have divided it into four parts, and
we had to cross the southwest quarter which in the vernacular is
called Sudvestr Fjordungr.
  Hans, on taking his departure from Reykjavik, had followed the
line of the sea. We took our way through poor and sparse meadows,
which made a desperate effort every year to show a little green.
They very rarely succeed in a good show of yellow.
                                                   {CHAPTER_9 ^paragraph 10}
  The rugged summits of the rocky hills were dimly visible on the edge
of the horizon, through the misty fogs; every now and then some
heavy flakes of snow showed conspicuous in the morning light, while
certain lofty and pointed rocks were first lost in the grey low
clouds, their summits clearly visible above, like jagged reefs
rising from a troublous sea.
  Every now and then a spur of rock came down through the arid ground,
leaving us scarcely room to pass. Our horses, however, appeared not
only well acquainted with the country, but by a kind of instinct, knew
which was the best road. My uncle had not even the satisfaction of
urging forward his steed by whip, spur, or voice. It was utterly
useless to show any signs of impatience. I could not help smiling to
see him look so big on his little horse; his long legs now and then
touching the ground made him look like a six-footed centaur.
  "Good beast, good beast," he would cry. "I assure you, "Good
beast, good beast, Henry, that I begin to think no animal is more
intelligent than an Icelandic horse. Snow, tempest, impracticable
roads, rocks, icebergs- nothing stops him. He is brave; he is sober;
he is safe; he never makes a false step; never glides or slips from
his path. I dare to say that if any river, any fjord has to be
crossed- and I have no doubt there will be many- you will see him
enter the water without hesitation like an amphibious like an
amphibious animal, and reach the opposite side in safety. We must not,
however, attempt to hurry him; we must allow him to have his own
way, and I will undertake to say that between us we shall do our ten
leagues a day."
  "We may do so," was my reply, "but what about our worthy guide?"
  "I have not the slightest anxiety about him: that sort of people
go ahead without knowing even what they are about. Look at Hans. He
moves so little that it is impossible for him to become fatigued.
Besides, if he were to complain of weariness, he could have the loan
of my horse. I should have a violent attack of the cramp if I were not
to have some sort of exercise. My arms are right- but my legs are
getting a little stiff."
                                                   {CHAPTER_9 ^paragraph 15}
  All this while we were advancing at a rapid pace. The country we had
reached was already nearly a desert. Here and there could be seen an
isolated farm, some solitary bur, or Icelandic house, built of wood,
earth, fragments of lava- looking like beggars on the highway of life.
These wretched and miserable huts excited in us such pity that we felt
half disposed to leave alms at every door. In this country there are
no roads, paths are nearly unknown, and vegetation, poor as it was,
slowly as it reached perfection, soon obliterated all traces of the
few travelers who passed from place to place.
  Nevertheless, this division of the province, situated only a few
miles from the capital, is considered one of the best cultivated and
most thickly peopled in all Iceland. What, then, must be the state
of the less known and more distant parts of the island? After
traveling fully half a Danish mile, we had met neither a farmer at the
door of his hut, nor even a wandering shepherd with his wild and
savage flock.
  A few stray cows and sheep were only seen occasionally. What,
then, must we expect when we come to the upheaved regions- to the
districts broken and roughened from volcanic eruptions and
subterraneous commotions?
  We were to learn this all in good time. I saw, however, on
consulting the map, that we avoided a good deal of this rough country,
by following the winding and desolate shores of the sea. In reality,
the great volcanic movement of the island, and all its attendant
phenomena, are concentrated in the interior of the island; there,
horizontal layers or strata of rocks, piled one upon the other,
eruptions of basaltic origin, and streams of lava, have given this
country a kind of supernatural reputation.
  Little did I expect, however, the spectacle which awaited us when we
reached the peninsula of Sneffels, where agglomerations of nature's
ruins form a kind of terrible chaos.
                                                   {CHAPTER_9 ^paragraph 20}
  Some two hours or more after we had left the city of Reykjavik, we
reached the little town called Aoalkirkja, or the principal church. It
consists simply of a few houses- not what in England or Germany we
should call a hamlet.
  Hans stopped here one half hour. He shared our frugal breakfast,
answered Yes, and No to my uncle's questions as to the nature of the
road, and at last when asked where we were to pass the night was as
laconic as usual.
  "Gardar!" was his one-worded reply.
  I took occasion to consult the map, to see where Gardar was to be
found. After looking keenly I found a small town of that name on the
borders of the Hvalfjord, about four miles from Reykjavik. I pointed
this out to my uncle, who made a very energetic grimace.
  "Only four miles out of twenty-two? Why it is only a little walk."
                                                   {CHAPTER_9 ^paragraph 25}
  He was about to make some energetic observation to the guide, but
Hans, without taking the slightest notice of him, went in front of the
horses, and walked ahead with the same imperturbable phlegm he had
always exhibited.
  Three hours later, still traveling over those apparently
interminable and sandy prairies, we were compelled to go round the
Kollafjord, an easier and shorter cut than crossing the gulfs. Shortly
after we entered a place of communal jurisdiction called Ejulberg, and
the clock of which would then have struck twelve, if any Icelandic
church had been rich enough to possess so valuable and useful an
article. These sacred edifices are, however, very much like these
people, who do without watches- and never miss them.
  Here the horses were allowed to take some rest and refreshment, then
following a narrow strip of shore between high rocks and the sea, they
took us without further halt to the Aoalkirkja of Brantar, and after
another mile to Saurboer Annexia, a chapel of ease, situated on the
southern bank of the Hvalfjord.
  It was four o'clock in the evening and we had traveled four Danish
miles, about equal to twenty English.
  The fjord was in this place about half a mile in width. The sweeping
and broken waves came rolling in upon the pointed rocks; the gulf
was surrounded by rocky walls- a mighty cliff, three thousand feet
in height, remarkable for its brown strata, separated here and there
by beds of tufa of a reddish hue. Now, whatever may have been the
intelligence of our horses, I had not the slightest reliance upon
them, as a means of crossing a stormy arm of the sea. To ride over
salt water upon the back of a little horse seemed to me absurd.
                                                   {CHAPTER_9 ^paragraph 30}
  "If they are really intelligent," I said to myself, "they will
certainly not make the attempt. In any case, I shall trust rather to
my own intelligence than theirs."
  But my uncle was in no humor to wait. He dug his heels into the
sides of his steed, and made for the shore. His horse went to the very
edge of the water, sniffed at the approaching wave and retreated.
  My uncle, who was, sooth to say, quite as obstinate as the beast
he bestrode, insisted on his making the desired advance. This
attempt was followed by a new refusal on the part of the horse which
quietly shook his head. This demonstration of rebellion was followed
by a volley of words and a stout application of whipcord; also
followed by kicks on the part of the horse, which threw its head and
heels upwards and tried to throw his rider. At length the sturdy
little pony, spreading out his legs, in a stiff and ludicrous
attitude, got from under the Professor's legs, and left him
standing, with both feet on a separate stone, like the Colossus of
Rhodes.
  "Wretched animal!" cried my uncle, suddenly transformed into a
foot passenger- and as angry and ashamed as a dismounted cavalry
officer on the field of battle.
  "Farja," said the guide, tapping him familiarly on the shoulder.
                                                   {CHAPTER_9 ^paragraph 35}
  "What, a ferry boat!
  "Der," answered Hans, pointing to where lay the boat in
question-"there."
  "Well," I cried, quite delighted with the information; "so it is."
  "Why did you not say so before," cried my uncle; "why not start at
once?"
  "Tidvatten," said the guide.
                                                   {CHAPTER_9 ^paragraph 40}
  "What does he say?" I asked, considerably puzzled by the delay and
the dialogue.
  "He says tide," replied my uncle, translating the Danish word for my
information.
  "Of course I understand- we must wait till the tide serves."
  "For bida?" asked my uncle.
  "Ja," replied Hans.
                                                   {CHAPTER_9 ^paragraph 45}
  My uncle frowned, stamped his feet and then followed the horses to
where the boat lay.
  I thoroughly understood and appreciated the necessity for waiting,
before crossing the fjord, for that moment when the sea at its highest
point is in a state of slack water. As neither the ebb nor flow can
then be felt, the ferry boat was in no danger of being carried out
to sea, or dashed upon the rocky coast.
  The favorable moment did not come until six o'clock in the
evening. Then my uncle, myself, and guide, two boatmen and the four
horses got into a very awkward flat-bottom boat. Accustomed as I had
been to the steam ferry boats of the Elbe, I found the long oars of
the boatmen but sorry means of locomotion. We were more than an hour
in crossing the fjord; but at length the passage was concluded without
accident.
  Half an hour later we reached Gardar.

CHAPTER_10
                     CHAPTER 10
               Traveling in Iceland
-
  IT ought, one would have thought, to have been night, even in the
sixty-fifth parallel of latitude; but still the nocturnal illumination
did not surprise me. For in Iceland, during the months of June and
July, the sun never sets.
  The temperature, however, was very much lower than I expected. I was
cold, but even that did not affect me so much as ravenous hunger.
Welcome indeed, therefore, was the hut which hospitably opened its
doors to us.
  It was merely the house of a peasant, but in the matter of
hospitality, it was worthy of being the palace of a king. As we
alighted at the door the master of the house came forward, held out
his hand, and without any further ceremony, signaled to us to follow
him.
  We followed him, for to accompany him was impossible. A long,
narrow, gloomy passage led into the interior of this habitation,
made from beams roughly squared by the ax. This passage gave ingress
to every room. The chambers were four in number- the kitchen, the
workshop, where the weaving was carried on, the general sleeping
chamber of the family, and the best room, to which strangers were
especially invited. My uncle, whose lofty stature had not been taken
into consideration when the house was built, contrived to knock his
head against the beams of the roof.
                                                   {CHAPTER_10 ^paragraph 5}
  We were introduced into our chamber, a kind of large room with a
hard earthen floor, and lighted by a window, the panes of which were
made of a sort of parchment from the intestines of sheep- very far
from transparent.
  The bedding was composed of dry hay thrown into two long red
wooden boxes, ornamented with sentences painted in Icelandic. I really
had no idea that we should be made so comfortable. There was one
objection to the house, and that was, the very powerful odor of
dried fish, of macerated meat, and of sour milk, which three
fragrances combined did not at all suit my olfactory nerves.
  As soon as we had freed ourselves from our heavy traveling
costume, the voice of our host was heard calling to us to come into
the kitchen, the only room in which the Icelanders ever make any fire,
no matter how cold it may be.
  My uncle, nothing loath, hastened to obey this hospitable and
friendly invitation. I followed.
  The kitchen chimney was made on an antique model. A large stone
standing in the middle of the room was the fireplace; above, in the
roof, was a hole for the smoke to pass through. This apartment was
kitchen, parlor and dining room all in one.
                                                  {CHAPTER_10 ^paragraph 10}
  On our entrance, our worthy host, as if he had not seen us before,
advanced ceremoniously, uttered a word which means "be happy," and
then kissed both of us on the cheek.
  His wife followed, pronounced the same word, with the same
ceremonial, then the husband and wife, placing their right hands
upon their hearts, bowed profoundly.
  This excellent Icelandic woman was the mother of nineteen
children, who, little and big, rolled, crawled, and walked about in
the midst of volumes of smoke arising from the angular fireplace in
the middle of the room. Every now and then I could see a fresh white
head, and a slightly melancholy expression of countenance, peering
at me through the vapor.
  Both my uncle and myself, however, were very friendly with the whole
party, and before we were aware of it, there were three or four of
these little ones on our shoulders, as many on our boxes, and the rest
hanging about our legs. Those who could speak kept crying out
saellvertu in every possible and impossible key. Those who did not
speak only made all the more noise.
  This concert was interrupted by the announcement of supper. At
this moment our worthy guide, the eider-duck hunter, came in after
seeing to the feeding and stabling of the horses- which consisted in
letting them loose to browse on the stunted green of the Icelandic
prairies. There was little for them to eat, but moss and some very dry
and innutritious grass; next day they were ready before the door, some
time before we were.
                                                  {CHAPTER_10 ^paragraph 15}
  "Welcome," said Hans.
  Then tranquilly, with the air of an automaton, without any more
expression in one kiss than another, he embraced the host and
hostess and their nineteen children.
  This ceremony concluded to the satisfaction of all parties, we all
sat down to table, that is twenty-four of us, somewhat crowded.
Those who were best off had only two juveniles on their knees.
  As soon, however, as the inevitable soup was placed on the table,
the natural taciturnity, common even to Icelandic babies, prevailed
over all else. Our host filled our plates with a portion of lichen
soup of Iceland moss, of by no means disagreeable flavor, an
enormous lump of fish floating in sour butter. After that there came
some skyr, a kind of curds and whey, served with biscuits and
juniper-berry juice. To drink, we had blanda, skimmed milk with water.
I was hungry, so hungry, that by way of dessert I finished up with a
basin of thick oaten porridge.
  As soon as the meal was over, the children disappeared, whilst the
grown people sat around the fireplace, on which was placed turf,
heather, cow dung and dried fish-bones. As soon as everybody was
sufficiently warm, a general dispersion took place, all retiring to
their respective couches. Our hostess offered to pull off our
stockings and trousers, according to the custom of the country, but as
we graciously declined to be so honored, she left us to our bed of dry
fodder.
                                                  {CHAPTER_10 ^paragraph 20}
  Next day, at five in the morning, we took our leave of these
hospitable peasants. My uncle had great difficulty in making them
accept a sufficient and proper remuneration.
  Hans then gave the signal to start.
  We had scarcely got a hundred yards from Gardar, when the
character of the country changed. The soil began to be marshy and
boggy, and less favorable to progress. To the right, the range of
mountains was prolonged indefinitely like a great system of natural
fortifications, of which we skirted the glacis. We met with numerous
streams and rivulets which it was necessary to ford, and that
without wetting our baggage. As we advanced, the deserted appearance
increased, and yet now and then we could see human shadows flitting in
the distance. When a sudden turn of the track brought us within easy
reach of one of these specters, I felt a sudden impulse of disgust
at the sight of a swollen head, with shining skin, utterly without
hair, and whose repulsive and revolting wounds could be seen through
his rags. The unhappy wretches never came forward to beg; on the
contrary, they ran away; not so quick, however, but that Hans was able
to salute them with the universal saellvertu.
  "Spetelsk," said he.
  "A leper," explained my uncle.
                                                  {CHAPTER_10 ^paragraph 25}
  The very sound of such a word caused a feeling of repulsion. The
horrible affliction known as leprosy, which has almost vanished before
the effects of modern science, is common in Iceland. It is not
contagious but hereditary, so that marriage is strictly prohibited
to these unfortunate creatures.
  These poor lepers did not tend to enliven our journey, the scene
of which was inexpressibly sad and lonely. The very last tufts of
grassy vegetation appeared to die at our feet. Not a tree was to be
seen, except a few stunted willows about as big as blackberry
bushes. Now and then we watched a falcon soaring in the grey and misty
air, taking his flight towards warmer and sunnier regions. I could not
help feeling a sense of melancholy come over me. I sighed for my own
Native Land, and wished to be back with Gretchen.
  We were compelled to cross several little fjords, and at last came
to a real gulf. The tide was at its height, and we were able to go
over at once, and reach the hamlet of Alftanes, about a mile farther.
  That evening, after fording the Alfa and the Heta, two rivers rich
in trout and pike, we were compelled to pass the night in a deserted
house, worthy of being haunted by all the fays of Scandinavian
mythology. The King of Cold had taken up his residence there, and made
us feel his presence all night.
  The following day was remarkable by its lack of any particular
incidents. Always the same damp and swampy soil; the same dreary
uniformity; the same sad and monotonous aspect of scenery. In the
evening, having accomplished the half of our projected journey, we
slept at the Annexia of Krosolbt.
                                                  {CHAPTER_10 ^paragraph 30}
  For a whole mile we had under our feet nothing but lava. This
disposition of the soil is called hraun: the crumbled lava on the
surface was in some instances like ship cables stretched out
horizontally, in others coiled up in heaps; an immense field of lava
came from the neighboring mountains, all extinct volcanoes, but
whose remains showed what once they had been. Here and there could
be made out the steam from hot water springs.
  There was no time, however, for us to take more than a cursory
view of these phenomena. We had to go forward with what speed we
might. Soon the soft and swampy soil again appeared under the feet
of our horses, while at every hundred yards we came upon one or more
small lakes. Our journey was now in a westerly direction; we had, in
fact, swept round the great bay of Faxa, and the twin white summits of
Sneffels rose to the clouds at a distance of less than five miles.
  The horses now advanced rapidly. The accidents and difficulties of
the soil no longer checked them. I confess that fatigue began to
tell severely upon me; but my uncle was as firm and as hard as he
had been on the first day. I could not help admiring both the
excellent Professor and the worthy guide; for they appeared to
regard this rugged expedition as a mere walk!
  On Saturday, the 20th June, at six o'clock in the evening, we
reached Budir, a small town picturesquely situated on the shore of the
ocean; and here the guide asked for his money. My uncle settled with
him immediately. It was now the family of Hans himself, that is to
say, his uncles, his cousins-german, who offered us hospitality. We
were exceedingly well received, and without taking too much
advantage of the goodness of these worthy people, I should have
liked very much to have rested with them after the fatigues of the
journey. But my uncle, who did not require rest, had no idea of
anything of the kind; and despite the fact that next day was Sunday, I
was compelled once more to mount my steed.
  The soil was again affected by the neighborhood of the mountains,
whose granite peered out of the ground like tops of an old oak. We
were skirting the enormous base of the mighty volcano. My uncle
never took his eyes from off it; he could not keep from gesticulating,
and looking at it with a kind of sullen defiance as much as to say
"That is the giant I have made up my mind to conquer."
                                                  {CHAPTER_10 ^paragraph 35}
  After four hours of steady traveling, the horses stopped of
themselves before the door of the presbytery of Stapi.

CHAPTER_11
                     CHAPTER 11
              We Reach Mount Sneffels
-
  STAPI is a town consisting of thirty huts, built on a large plain of
lava, exposed to the rays of the sun, reflected from the volcano. It
stretches its humble tenements along the end of a little fjord,
surrounded by a basaltic wall of the most singular character.
  Basalt is a brown rock of igneous origin. It assumes regular
forms, which astonish by their singular appearance. Here we found
Nature proceeding geometrically, and working quite after a human
fashion, as if she had employed the plummet line, the compass and
the rule. If elsewhere she produces grand artistic effects by piling
up huge masses without order or connection- if elsewhere we see
truncated cones, imperfect pyramids, with an odd succession of
lines; here, as if wishing to give a lesson in regularity, and
preceding the architects of the early ages, she has erected a severe
order of architecture, which neither the splendors of Babylon nor
the marvels of Greece ever surpassed.
  I had often heard of the Giant's Causeway in Ireland, and of
Fingal's Cave in one of the Hebrides, but the grand spectacle of a
real basaltic formation had never yet come before my eyes.
  This at Stapi gave us an idea of one in all its wonderful beauty and
grace.
                                                   {CHAPTER_11 ^paragraph 5}
  The wall of the fjord, like nearly the whole of the peninsula,
consisted of a series of vertical columns, in height about thirty
feet. These upright pillars of stone, of the finest proportions,
supported an archivault of horizontal columns which formed a kind of
half-vaulted roof above the sea. At certain intervals, and below
this natural basin, the eye was pleased and surprised by the sight
of oval openings through which the outward waves came thundering in
volleys of foam. Some banks of basalt, torn from their fastenings by
the fury of the waves, lay scattered on the ground like the ruins of
an ancient temple- ruins eternally young, over which the storms of
ages swept without producing any perceptible effect!
  This was the last stage of our journey. Hans had brought us along
with fidelity and intelligence, and I began to feel somewhat more
comfortable when I reflected that he was to accompany us still farther
on our way.
  When we halted before the house of the Rector, a small and
incommodious cabin, neither handsome nor more comfortable than those
of his neighbors, I saw a man in the act of shoeing a horse, a
hammer in his hand, and a leathern apron tied round his waist.
  "Be happy," said the eider-down hunter, using his national
salutation in his own language.
  "God dag- good day!" replied the former, in excellent Danish.
                                                  {CHAPTER_11 ^paragraph 10}
  "Kyrkoherde," cried Hans, turning round and introducing him to my
uncle.
  "The Rector," repeated the worthy Professor; "it appears, my dear
Harry, that this worthy man is the Rector, and is not above doing
his own work."
  During the speaking of these words the guide intimated to the
Kyrkoherde what was the true state of the case. The good man,
ceasing from his occupation, gave a kind of halloo, upon which a
tall woman, almost a giantess, came out of the hut. She was at least
six feet high, which in that region is something considerable.
  My first impression was one of horror. I thought she had come to
give us the Icelandic kiss. I had, however, nothing to fear, for she
did not even show much inclination to receive us into her house.
  The room devoted to strangers appeared to me to be by far the
worst in the presbytery; it was narrow, dirty and offensive. There
was, however, no choice about the matter. The Rector had no notion
of practicing the usual cordial and antique hospitality. Far from
it. Before the day was over, I found we had to deal with a blacksmith,
a fisherman, a hunter, a carpenter, anything but a clergyman. It
must be said in his favor that we had caught him on a weekday;
probably he appeared to greater advantage on the Sunday.
                                                  {CHAPTER_11 ^paragraph 15}
  These poor priests receive from the Danish Government a most
ridiculously inadequate salary, and collect one quarter of the tithe
of their parish- not more than sixty marks current, or about L3 10s.
sterling. Hence the necessity of working to live. In truth, we soon
found that our host did not count civility among the cardinal virtues.
  My uncle soon became aware of the kind of man he had to deal with.
Instead of a worthy and learned scholar, he found a dull
ill-mannered peasant. He therefore resolved to start on his great
expedition as soon as possible. He did not care about fatigue, and
resolved to spend a few days in the mountains.
  The preparations for our departure were made the very next day after
our arrival at Stapi; Hans now hired three Icelanders to take the
place of the horses- which could no longer carry our luggage. When,
however, these worthy islanders had reached the bottom of the
crater, they were to go back and leave us to ourselves. This point was
settled before they would agree to start.
  On this occasion, my uncle partly confided in Hans, the eider-duck
hunter, and gave him to understand that it was his intention to
continue his exploration of the volcano to the last possible limits.
  Hans listened calmly, and then nodded his head. To go there, or
elsewhere, to bury himself in the bowels of the earth, or to travel
over its summits, was all the same to him! As for me, amused and
occupied by the incidents of travel, I had begun to forget the
inevitable future; but now I was once more destined to realize the
actual state of affairs. What was to be done? Run away? But if I
really had intended to leave Professor Hardwigg to his fate, it should
have been at Hamburg and not at the foot of Sneffels.
                                                  {CHAPTER_11 ^paragraph 20}
  One idea, above all others, began to trouble me: a very terrible
idea, and one calculated to shake the nerves of a man even less
sensitive than myself.
  "Let us consider the matter," I said to myself; "we are going to
ascend the Sneffels mountain. Well and good. We are about to pay a
visit to the very bottom of the crater. Good, still. Others have
done it and did not perish from that course.
  "That, however, is not the whole matter to be considered. If a
road does really present itself by which to descend into the dark
and subterraneous bowels of Mother Earth, if this thrice unhappy
Saknussemm has really told the truth, we shall be most certainly
lost in the midst of the labyrinth of subterraneous galleries of the
volcano. Now, we have no evidence to prove that Sneffels is really
extinct. What proof have we that an eruption is not shortly about to
take place? Because the monster has slept soundly since 1219, does
it follow that he is never to wake?
  "If he does wake what is to become of us?"
  These were questions worth thinking about, and upon them I reflected
long and deeply. I could not lie down in search of sleep without
dreaming of eruptions. The more I thought, the more I objected to be
reduced to the state of dross and ashes.
                                                  {CHAPTER_11 ^paragraph 25}
  I could stand it no longer; so I determined at last to submit the
whole case to my uncle, in the most adroit manner possible, and
under the form of some totally irreconcilable hypothesis.
  I sought him. I laid before him my fears, and then drew back in
order to let him get his passion over at his ease.
  "I have been thinking about the matter," he said, in the quietest
tone in the world.
  What did he mean? Was he at last about to listen to the voice of
reason? Did he think of suspending his projects? It was almost too
much happiness to be true.
  I however made no remark. In fact, I was only too anxious not to
interrupt him, and allowed him to reflect at his leisure. After some
moments he spoke out.
                                                  {CHAPTER_11 ^paragraph 30}
  "I have been thinking about the matter," he resumed. "Ever since
we have been at Stapi, my mind has been almost solely occupied with
the grave question which has been submitted to me by yourself- for
nothing would be unwiser and more inconsistent than to act with
imprudence."
  "I heartily agree with you, my dear uncle," was my somewhat
hopeful rejoinder.
  "It is now six hundred years since Sneffels has spoken, but though
now reduced to a state of utter silence, he may speak again. New
volcanic eruptions are always preceded by perfectly well-known
phenomena. I have closely examined the inhabitants of this region; I
have carefully studied the soil, and I beg to tell you emphatically,
my dear Harry, there will be no eruption at present."
  As I listened to his positive affirmations, I was stupefied and
could say nothing.
  "I see you doubt my word," said my uncle; "follow me."
                                                  {CHAPTER_11 ^paragraph 35}
  I obeyed mechanically.
  Leaving the presbytery, the Professor took a road through an opening
in the basaltic rock, which led far away from the sea. We were soon in
open country, if we could give such a name to a place all covered with
volcanic deposits. The whole land seemed crushed under the weight of
enormous stones- of trap, of basalt, of granite, of lava, and of all
other volcanic substances.
  I could see many spouts of steam rising in the air. These white
vapors, called in the Icelandic language "reykir," come from hot water
fountains, and indicate by their violence the volcanic activity of the
soil. Now the sight of these appeared to justify my apprehension. I
was, therefore, all the more surprised and mortified when my uncle
thus addressed me.
  "You see all this smoke, Harry, my boy?"
  "Yes, sir."
                                                  {CHAPTER_11 ^paragraph 40}
  "Well, as long as you see them thus, you have nothing to fear from
the volcano."
  "How can that be?"
  "Be careful to remember this," continued the Professor. "At the
approach of an eruption these spouts of vapor redouble their activity-
to disappear altogether during the period of volcanic eruption; for
the elastic fluids, no longer having the necessary tension, seek
refuge in the interior of the crater, instead of escaping through
the fissures of the earth. If, then, the steam remains in its normal
or habitual state, if their energy does not increase, and if you add
to this, the remark that the wind is not replaced by heavy atmospheric
pressure and dead calm, you may be quite sure that there is no fear of
any immediate eruption."
  "But-"
  "Enough, my boy. When science has sent forth her fiat- it is only to
hear and obey."
                                                  {CHAPTER_11 ^paragraph 45}
  I came back to the house quite downcast and disappointed. My uncle
had completely defeated me with his scientific arguments.
Nevertheless, I had still one hope, and that was, when once we were at
the bottom of the crater, that it would be impossible in default of
a gallery or tunnel, to descend any deeper; and this, despite all
the learned Saknussemms in the world.
  I passed the whole of the following night with a nightmare on my
chest! and, after unheard-of miseries and tortures, found myself in
the very depths of the earth, from which I was suddenly launched
into planetary space, under the form of an eruptive rock!
  Next day, June 23d, Hans calmly awaited us outside the presbytery
with his three companions loaded with provisions, tools, and
instruments. Two iron-shod poles, two guns, and two large game bags,
were reserved for my uncle and myself. Hans, who was a man who never
forgot even the minutest precautions, had added to our baggage a large
skin full of water, as an addition to our gourds. This assured us
water for eight days.
  It was nine o'clock in the morning when we were quite ready. The
rector and his huge wife or servant, I never knew which, stood at
the door to see us off. They appeared to be about to inflict on us the
usual final kiss of the Icelanders. To our supreme astonishment
their adieu took the shape of a formidable bill, in which they even
counted the use of the pastoral house, really and truly the most
abominable and dirty place I ever was in. The worthy couple cheated
and robbed us like a Swiss innkeeper, and made us feel, by the sum
we had to pay, the splendors of their hospitality.
  My uncle, however, paid without bargaining. A man who had made up
his mind to undertake a voyage into the Interior of the Earth, is
not the man to haggle over a few miserable rix-dollars.
                                                  {CHAPTER_11 ^paragraph 50}
  This important matter settled, Hans gave the signal for departure,
and some few moments later we had left Stapi.

CHAPTER_12
                     CHAPTER 12
           The Ascent of Mount Sneffels
-
  THE huge volcano which was the first stage of our daring
experiment is above five thousand feet high. Sneffels is the
termination of a long range of volcanic mountains, of a different
character to the system of the island itself. One of its peculiarities
is its two huge pointed summits. From whence we started it was
impossible to make out the real outlines of the peak against the
grey field of sky. All we could distinguish was a vast dome of
white, which fell downwards from the head of the giant.
  The commencement of the great undertaking filled me with awe. Now
that we had actually started, I began to believe in the reality of the
undertaking!
  Our party formed quite a procession. We walked in single file,
preceded by Hans, the imperturbable eider-duck hunter. He calmly led
us by narrow paths where two persons could by no possibility walk
abreast. Conversation was wholly impossible. We had all the more
opportunity to reflect and admire the awful grandeur of the scene
around.
  Beyond the extraordinary basaltic wall of the fjord of Stapi we
found ourselves making our way through fibrous turf, over which grew a
scanty vegetation of grass, the residuum of the ancient vegetation
of the swampy peninsula. The vast mass of this combustible, the
field of which as yet is utterly unexplored, would suffice to warm
Iceland for a whole century. This mighty turf pit, measured from the
bottom of certain ravines, is often not less than seventy feet deep,
and presents to the eye the view of successive layers of black
burned-up rocky detritus, separated by thin streaks of porous
sandstone.
                                                   {CHAPTER_12 ^paragraph 5}
  The grandeur of the spectacle was undoubted, as well as its arid and
deserted air.
  As a true nephew of the great Professor Hardwigg, and despite my
preoccupation and doleful fears of what was to come, I observed with
great interest the vast collection of mineralogical curiosities spread
out before me in this vast museum of natural history. Looking back
to my recent studies, I went over in thought the whole geological
history of Iceland.
  This extraordinary and curious island must have made its
appearance from out of the great world of waters at a comparatively
recent date. Like the coral islands of the Pacific, it may, for
aught we know, be still rising by slow and imperceptible degrees.
  If this really be the case, its origin can be attributed to only one
cause- that of the continued action of subterranean fires.
  This was a happy thought.
                                                  {CHAPTER_12 ^paragraph 10}
  If so, if this were true, away with the theories of Sir Humphry
Davy; away with the authority of the parchment of Arne Saknussemm; the
wonderful pretensions to discovery on the part of my uncle- and to our
journey!
  All must end in smoke.
  Charmed with the idea, I began more carefully to look about me. A
serious study of the soil was necessary to negative or confirm my
hypothesis. I took in every item of what I saw, and I began to
comprehend the succession of phenomena which had preceded its
formation.
  Iceland, being absolutely without sedimentary soil, is composed
exclusively of volcanic tufa; that is to say, of an agglomeration of
stones and of rocks of a porous texture. Long before the existence
of volcanoes, it was composed of a solid body of massive trap rock
lifted bodily and slowly out of the sea, by the action of the
centrifugal force at work in the earth.
  The internal fires, however, had not as yet burst their bounds and
flooded the exterior cake of Mother Earth with hot and raging lava.
                                                  {CHAPTER_12 ^paragraph 15}
  My readers must excuse this brief and somewhat pedantic geological
lecture. But it is necessary to the complete understanding of what
follows.
  At a later period in the world's history, a huge and mighty
fissure must, reasoning by analogy, have been dug diagonally from
the southwest to the northeast of the island, through which by degrees
flowed the volcanic crust. The great and wondrous phenomenon then went
on without violence- the outpouring was enormous, and the seething
fused matter, ejected from the bowels of the earth, spread slowly
and peacefully in the form of vast level plains, or what are called
mamelons or mounds.
  It was at this epoch that the rocks called feldspars, syenites,
and porphyries appeared.
  But as a natural consequence of this overflow, the depth of the
island increased. It can readily be believed what an enormous quantity
of elastic fluids were piled up within its center, when at last it
afforded no other openings, after the process of cooling the crust had
taken place.
  At length a time came when despite the enormous thickness and weight
of the upper crust, the mechanical forces of the combustible gases
below became so great, that they actually upheaved the weighty back
and made for themselves huge and gigantic shafts. Hence the
volcanoes which suddenly arose through the upper crust, and next the
craters, which burst forth at the summit of these new creations.
                                                  {CHAPTER_12 ^paragraph 20}
  It will be seen that the first phenomena in connection with the
formation of the island were simply eruptive; to these, however,
shortly succeeded the volcanic phenomena.
  Through the newly formed openings, escaped the marvelous mass of
basaltic stones with which the plain we were now crossing was covered.
We were trampling our way over heavy rocks of dark grey color,
which, while cooling, had been moulded into six-sided prisms. In the
"back distance" we could see a number of flattened cones, which
formerly were so many fire-vomiting mouths.
  After the basaltic eruption was appeased and set at rest, the
volcano, the force of which increased with that of the extinct
craters, gave free passage to the fiery overflow of lava, and to the
mass of cinders and pumice stone, now scattered over the sides of
the mountain, like disheveled hair on the shoulders of a Bacchante.
  Here, in a nutshell, I had the whole history of the phenomena from
which Iceland arose. All take their rise in the fierce action of
interior fires, and to believe that the central mass did not remain in
a state of liquid fire, white hot, was simply and purely madness.
  This being satisfactorily proved (Q.E.D.), what insensate folly to
pretend to penetrate into the interior of the mighty earth!
                                                  {CHAPTER_12 ^paragraph 25}
  This mental lecture delivered to myself while proceeding on a
journey, did me good. I was quite reassured as to the fate of our
enterprise; and therefore went, like a brave soldier mounting a
bristling battery, to the assault of old Sneffels.
  As we advanced, the road became every moment more difficult. The
soil was broken and dangerous. The rocks broke and gave way under
our feet, and we had to be scrupulously careful in order to avoid
dangerous and constant falls.
  Hans advanced as calmly as if he had been walking over Salisbury
Plain; sometimes he would disappear behind huge blocks of stone, and
we momentarily lost sight of him. There was a little period of anxiety
and then there was a shrill whistle, just to tell us where to look for
him.
  Occasionally he would take it into his head to stop to pick up lumps
of rock, and silently pile them up into small heaps, in order that
we might not lose our way on our return.
  He had no idea of the journey we were about to undertake.
                                                  {CHAPTER_12 ^paragraph 30}
  At all events, the precaution was a good one; though how utterly
useless and unnecessary- but I must not anticipate.
  Three hours of terrible fatigue, walking incessantly, had only
brought us to the foot of the great mountain. This will give some
notion of what we had still to undergo.
  Suddenly, however, Hans cried a halt- that is, he made signs to that
effect- and a summary kind of breakfast was laid out on the lava
before us. My uncle, who now was simply Professor Hardwigg, was so
eager to advance, that he bolted his food like a greedy clown. This
halt for refreshment was also a halt for repose. The Professor was
therefore compelled to wait the good pleasure of his imperturbable
guide, who did not give the signal for departure for a good hour.
  The three Icelanders, who were as taciturn as their comrade, did not
say a word; but went on eating and drinking very quietly and soberly.
  From this, our first real stage, we began to ascend the slopes of
the Sneffels volcano. Its magnificent snowy nightcap, as we began to
call it, by an optical delusion very common in mountains, appeared
to me to be close at hand; and yet how many long weary hours must
elapse before we reached its summit. What unheard-of fatigue must we
endure!
                                                  {CHAPTER_12 ^paragraph 35}
  The stones on the mountain side, held together by no cement of soil,
bound together by no roots or creeping herbs, gave way continually
under our feet, and went rushing below into the plains, like a
series of small avalanches.
  In certain places the sides of this stupendous mountain were at an
angle so steep that it was impossible to climb upwards, and we were
compelled to get round these obstacles as best we might.
  Those who understand Alpine climbing will comprehend our
difficulties. Often we were obliged to help each other along by
means of our climbing poles.
  I must say this for my uncle, that he stuck as close to me as
possible. He never lost sight of me, and on many occasions his arm
supplied me with firm and solid support. He was strong, wiry, and
apparently insensible to fatigue. Another great advantage with him was
that he had the innate sentiment of equilibrium- for he never
slipped or failed in his steps. The Icelanders, though heavily loaded,
climbed with the agility of mountaineers.
  Looking up, every now and then, at the height of the great volcano
of Sneffels, it appeared to me wholly impossible to reach to the
summit on that side; at all events, if the angle of inclination did
not speedily change.
                                                  {CHAPTER_12 ^paragraph 40}
  Fortunately, after an hour of unheard-of fatigues, and of
gymnastic exercises that would have been trying to an acrobat, we came
to a vast field of ice, which wholly surrounded the bottom of the cone
of the volcano. The natives called it the tablecloth, probably from
some such reason as the dwellers in the Cape of Good Hope call their
mountain Table Mountain, and their roads Table Bay.
  Here, to our mutual surprise, we found an actual flight of stone
steps, which wonderfully assisted our ascent. This singular flight
of stairs was, like everything else, volcanic. It had been formed by
one of those torrents of stones cast up by the eruptions, and of which
the Icelandic name is stina. If this singular torrent had not been
checked in its descent by the peculiar shape of the flanks of the
mountain, it would have swept into the sea, and would have formed
new islands.
  Such as it was, it served us admirably. The abrupt character of
the slopes momentarily increased, but these remarkable stone steps,
a little less difficult than those of the Egyptian pyramids, were
the one simple natural means by which we were enabled to proceed.
  About seven in the evening of that day, after having clambered up
two thousand of these rough steps, we found ourselves overlooking a
kind of spur or projection of the mountain- a sort of buttress upon
which the conelike crater, properly so called, leaned for support.
  The ocean lay beneath us at a depth of more than three thousand
two hundred feet- a grand and mighty spectacle. We had reached the
region of eternal snows.
                                                  {CHAPTER_12 ^paragraph 45}
  The cold was keen, searching and intense. The wind blew with
extraordinary violence. I was utterly exhausted.
  My worthy uncle, the Professor, saw clearly that my legs refused
further service, and that, in fact, I was utterly exhausted. Despite
his hot and feverish impatience, he decided, with a sigh, upon a halt.
He called the eider-duck hunter to his side. That worthy, however,
shook his head.
  "Ofvanfor," was his sole spoken reply.
  "It appears," says my uncle with a woebegone look, "that we must
go higher."
  He then turned to Hans, and asked him to give some reason for this
decisive response.
                                                  {CHAPTER_12 ^paragraph 50}
  "Mistour," replied the guide.
  "Ja, mistour- yes, the mistour," cried one of the Icelandic guides
in a terrified tone.
  It was the first time he had spoken.
  "What does this mysterious word signify?" I anxiously inquired.
  "Look," said my uncle.
                                                  {CHAPTER_12 ^paragraph 55}
  I looked down upon the plain below, and I saw a vast, a prodigious
volume of pulverized pumice stone, of sand, of dust, rising to the
heavens in the form of a mighty waterspout. It resembled the fearful
phenomenon of a similar character known to the travelers in the desert
of the great Sahara.
  The wind was driving it directly towards that side of Sneffels on
which we were perched. This opaque veil standing up between us and the
sun projected a deep shadow on the flanks of the mountain. If this
sand spout broke over us, we must all be infallibly destroyed, crushed
in its fearful embraces. This extraordinary phenomenon, very common
when the wind shakes the glaciers, and sweeps over the arid plains, is
in the Icelandic tongue called "mistour."
  "Hastigt, hastigt!" cried our guide.
  Now I certainly knew nothing of Danish, but I thoroughly
understood that his gestures were meant to quicken us.
  The guide turned rapidly in a direction which would take us to the
back of the crater, all the while ascending slightly.
                                                  {CHAPTER_12 ^paragraph 60}
  We followed rapidly, despite our excessive fatigue.
  A quarter of an hour later Hans paused to enable us to look back.
The mighty whirlwind of sand was spreading up the slope of the
mountain to the very spot where we had proposed to halt. Huge stones
were caught up, cast into the air, and thrown about as during an
eruption. We were happily a little out of the direction of the wind,
and therefore out of reach of danger. But for the precaution and
knowledge of our guide, our dislocated bodies, our crushed and
broken limbs, would have been cast to the wind, like dust from some
unknown meteor.
  Hans, however, did not think it prudent to pass the night on the
bare side of the cone. We therefore continued our journey in a
zigzag direction. The fifteen hundred feet which remained to be
accomplished took us at least five hours. The turnings and windings,
the no-thoroughfares, the marches and marches, turned that
insignificant distance into at least three leagues. I never felt
such misery, fatigue and exhaustion in my life. I was ready to faint
from hunger and cold. The rarefied air at the same time painfully
acted upon my lungs.
  At last, when I thought myself at my last gasp, about eleven at
night, it being in that region quite dark, we reached the summit of
Mount Sneffels! It was in an awful mood of mind, that despite my
fatigue, before I descended into the crater which was to shelter us
for the night, I paused to behold the sun rise at midnight on the very
day of its lowest declension, and enjoyed the spectacle of its ghastly
pale rays cast upon the isle which lay sleeping at our feet!
  I no longer wondered at people traveling all the way from England to
Norway to behold this magical and wondrous spectacle.

CHAPTER_13
                     CHAPTER 13
              The Shadow of Scartaris
-
  OUR supper was eaten with ease and rapidity, after which everybody
did the best he could for himself within the hollow of the crater. The
bed was hard, the shelter unsatisfactory, the situation painful- lying
in the open air, five thousand feet above the level of the sea!
  Nevertheless, it has seldom happened to me to sleep so well as I did
on that particular night. I did not even dream. So much for the
effects of what my uncle called "wholesome fatigue."
  Next day, when we awoke under the rays of a bright and glorious sun,
we were nearly frozen by the keen air. I left my granite couch and
made one of the party to enjoy a view of the magnificent spectacle
which developed itself, panorama-like, at our feet.
  I stood upon the lofty summit of Mount Sneffels' southern peak.
Thence I was able to obtain a view of the greater part of the
island. The optical delusion, common to all lofty heights, raised
the shores of the island, while the central portions appeared
depressed. It was by no means too great a flight of fancy to believe
that a giant picture was stretched out before me. I could see the deep
valleys that crossed each other in every direction. I could see
precipices looking like sides of wells, lakes that seemed to be
changed into ponds, ponds that looked like puddles, and rivers that
were transformed into petty brooks. To my right were glaciers upon
glaciers, and multiplied peaks, topped with light clouds of smoke.
                                                   {CHAPTER_13 ^paragraph 5}
  The undulation of these infinite numbers of mountains, whose snowy
summits make them look as if covered by foam, recalled to my
remembrance the surface of a storm-beaten ocean. If I looked towards
the west, the ocean lay before me in all its majestic grandeur, a
continuation as it were, of these fleecy hilltops.
  Where the earth ended and the sea began it was impossible for the
eye to distinguish.
  I soon felt that strange and mysterious sensation which is
awakened in the mind when looking down from lofty hilltops, and now
I was able to do so without any feeling of nervousness, having
fortunately hardened myself to that kind of sublime contemplation.
  I wholly forgot who I was, and where I was. I became intoxicated
with a sense of lofty sublimity, without thought of the abysses into
which my daring was soon about to plunge me. I was presently, however,
brought back to the realities of life by the arrival of the
Professor and Hans, who joined me upon the lofty summit of the peak.
  My uncle, turning in a westerly direction, pointed out to me a light
cloud of vapor, a kind of haze, with a faint outline of land rising
out of the waters.
                                                  {CHAPTER_13 ^paragraph 10}
  "Greenland!" said he.
  "Greenland?" cried I in reply.
  "Yes," continued my uncle, who always when explaining anything spoke
as if he were in a professor's chair; "we are not more than
thirty-five leagues distant from that wonderful land. When the great
annual breakup of the ice takes place, white bears come over to
Iceland, carried by the floating masses of ice from the north. This,
however, is a matter of little consequence. We are now on the summit
of the great, the transcendent Sneffels, and here are its two peaks,
north and south. Hans will tell you the name by which the people of
Iceland call that on which we stand."
  My uncle turned to the imperturbable guide, who nodded, and spoke as
usual- one word.
  "Scartaris."
                                                  {CHAPTER_13 ^paragraph 15}
  My uncle looked at me with a proud and triumphant glance.
  "A crater," he said, "you hear?"
  I did hear, but I was totally unable to make reply.
  The crater of Mount Sneffels represented an inverted cone, the
gaping orifice apparently half a mile across; the depth indefinite
feet. Conceive what this hole must have been like when full of flame
and thunder and lightning. The bottom of the funnel-shaped hollow
was about five hundred feet in circumference, by which it will be seen
that the slope from the summit to the bottom was very gradual, and
we were therefore clearly able to get there without much fatigue or
difficulty. Involuntarily, I compared this crater to an enormous
loaded cannon; and the comparison completely terrified me.
  "To descend into the interior of a cannon," I thought to myself,
"when perhaps it is loaded, and will go off at the least shock, is the
act of a madman."
                                                  {CHAPTER_13 ^paragraph 20}
  But there was no longer any opportunity for me to hesitate. Hans,
with a perfectly calm and indifferent air, took his usual post at
the head of the adventurous little band. I followed without uttering a
syllable.
  I felt like the lamb led to the slaughter.
  In order to render the descent less difficult, Hans took his way
down the interior of the cone in rather a zigzag fashion, making, as
the sailors say, long tracks to the eastward, followed by equally long
ones to the west. It was necessary to walk through the midst of
eruptive rocks, some of which, shaken in their balance, went rolling
down with thundering clamor to the bottom of the abyss. These
continual falls awoke echoes of singular power and effect.
  Many portions of the cone consisted of inferior glaciers. Hans,
whenever he met with one of these obstacles, advanced with a great
show of precaution, sounding the soil with his long iron pole in order
to discover fissures and layers of deep soft snow. In many doubtful or
dangerous places, it became necessary for us to be tied together by
a long rope in order that should any one of us be unfortunate enough
to slip, he would be supported by his companions. This connecting link
was doubtless a prudent precaution, but not by any means unattended
with danger.
  Nevertheless, and despite all the manifold difficulties of the
descent, along slopes with which our guide was wholly unacquainted, we
made considerable progress without accident. One of our great
parcels of rope slipped from one of the Iceland porters, and rushed by
a short cut to the bottom of the abyss.
                                                  {CHAPTER_13 ^paragraph 25}
  By midday we were at the end of our journey. I looked upwards, and
saw only the upper orifice of the cone, which served as a circular
frame to a very small portion of the sky- a portion which seemed to me
singularly beautiful. Should I ever again gaze on that lovely sunlit
sky!
  The only exception to this extraordinary landscape, was the Peak
of Scartaris, which seemed lost in the great void of the heavens.
  The bottom of the crater was composed of three separate shafts,
through which, during periods of eruption, when Sneffels was in
action, the great central furnace sent forth its burning lava and
poisonous vapors. Each of these chimneys or shafts gaped
open-mouthed in our path. I kept as far away from them as possible,
not even venturing to take the faintest peep downwards.
  As for the Professor, after a rapid examination of their disposition
and characteristics, he became breathless and panting. He ran from one
to the other like a delighted schoolboy, gesticulating wildly, and
uttering incomprehensible and disjointed phrases in all sorts of
languages.
  Hans, the guide, and his humbler companions seated themselves on
some piles of lava and looked silently on. They clearly took my
uncle for a lunatic; and- waited the result.
                                                  {CHAPTER_13 ^paragraph 30}
  Suddenly the Professor uttered a wild, unearthly cry. At first I
imagined he had lost his footing, and was falling headlong into one of
the yawning gulfs. Nothing of the kind. I saw him, his arms spread out
to their widest extent, his legs stretched apart, standing upright
before an enormous pedestal, high enough and black enough to bear a
gigantic statue of Pluto. His attitude and mien were that of a man
utterly stupefied. But his stupefaction was speedily changed to the
wildest joy.
  "Harry! Harry! come here!" he cried; "make haste- wonderful-
wonderful!"
  Unable to understand what he meant, I turned to obey his commands.
Neither Hans nor the other Icelanders moved a step.
  "Look!" said the Professor, in something of the manner of the French
general, pointing out the pyramids to his army.
  And fully partaking his stupefaction, if not his joy, I read on
the eastern side of the huge block of stone, the same characters, half
eaten away by the corrosive action of time, the name, to me a thousand
times accursed-

  (See illustration.)

                                                  {CHAPTER_13 ^paragraph 35}
  "Arne Saknussemm!" cried my uncle, "now, unbeliever, do you begin to
have faith?"
  It was totally impossible for me to answer a single word. I went
back to my pile of lava, in a state of silent awe. The evidence was
unanswerable, overwhelming!
  In a few moments, however, my thoughts were far away, back in my
German home, with Gretchen and the old cook. What would I have given
for one of my cousin's smiles, for one of the ancient domestic's
omelettes, and for my own feather bed!
  How long I remained in this state I know not. All I can say is, that
when at last I raised my head from between my hands, there remained at
the bottom of the crater only myself, my uncle and Hans. The Icelandic
porters had been dismissed and were now descending the exterior slopes
of Mount Sneffels, on their way to Stapi. How heartily did I wish
myself with them!
  Hans slept tranquilly at the foot of a rock in a kind of rill of
lava, where he had made himself a rough and ready bed. MY uncle was
walking about the bottom of the crater like a wild beast in a cage.
I had no desire, neither had I the strength, to move from my recumbent
position. Taking example by the guide, I gave way to a kind of painful
somnolency, during which I seemed both to hear and feel continued
heavings and shudderings in the mountain.
                                                  {CHAPTER_13 ^paragraph 40}
  In this way we passed our first night in the interior of a crater.
  Next morning, a grey, cloudy, heavy sky hung like a funereal pall
over the summit of the volcanic cone. I did not notice it so much from
the obscurity that reigned around us, as from the rage with which my
uncle was devoured.
  I fully understood the reason, and again a glimpse of hope made my
heart leap with joy. I will briefly explain the cause.
  Of the three openings which yawned beneath our steps, only one could
have been followed by the adventurous Saknussemm. According to the
words of the learned Icelander, it was only to be known by that one
particular mentioned in the cryptograph, that the shadow of
Scartaris fell upon it, just touching its mouth in the last days of
the month of June.
  We were, in fact, to consider the pointed peak as the stylus of an
immense sun-dial, the shadow of which pointed on one given day, like
the inexorable finger of fate, to the yawning chasm which led into the
interior of the earth.
                                                  {CHAPTER_13 ^paragraph 45}
  Now, as often happens in these regions, should the sun fail to burst
through the clouds, no shadow. Consequently, no chance of
discovering the right aperture. We had already reached the 25th
June. If the kindly heavens would only remain densely clouded for
six more days, we should have to put off our voyage of discovery for
another year, when certainly there would be one person fewer in the
party. I already had sufficient of the mad and monstrous enterprise.
  It would be utterly impossible to depict the impotent rage of
Professor Hardwigg. The day passed away, and not the faintest
outline of a shadow could be seen at the bottom of the crater. Hans
the guide never moved from his place. He must have been curious to
know what we were about, if indeed he could believe we were about
anything. As for my uncle, he never addressed a word to me. He was
nursing his wrath to keep it warm! His eyes fixed on the black and
foggy atmosphere, his complexion hideous with suppressed passion.
Never had his eyes appeared so fierce, his nose so aquiline, his mouth
so hard and firm.
  On the 26th no change for the better. A mixture of rain and snow
fell during the whole day. Hans very quietly built himself a hut of
lava into which he retired like Diogenes into his tub. I took a
malicious delight in watching the thousand little cascades that flowed
down the side of the cone, carrying with them at times a stream of
stones into the "vasty deep" below.
  My uncle was almost frantic: to be sure, it was enough to make
even a patient man angry. He had reached to a certain extent the
goal of his desires, and yet he was likely to be wrecked in port.
  But if the heavens and the elements are capable of causing us much
pain and sorrow, there are two sides to a medal. And there was
reserved for Professor Hardwigg a brilliant and sudden surprise
which was to compensate him for all his sufferings.
                                                  {CHAPTER_13 ^paragraph 50}
  Next day the sky was still overcast, but on Sunday, the 28th, the
last day but two of the month, with a sudden change of wind and a
new moon there came a change of weather. The sun poured its beaming
rays to the very bottom of the crater.
  Each hillock, every rock, every stone, every asperity of the soil
had its share of the luminous effulgence, and its shadow fell
heavily on the soil. Among others, to his insane delight, the shadow
of Scartaris was marked and clear, and moved slowly with the radiant
start of day.
  My uncle moved with it in a state of mental ecstasy.
  At twelve o'clock exactly, when the sun had attained its highest
altitude for the day, the shadow fell upon the edge of the central
pit!
  "Here it is," gasped the Professor in an agony of joy, "here it
is- we have found it. Forward, my friends, into the Interior of the
Earth."
                                                  {CHAPTER_13 ^paragraph 55}
  I looked curiously at Hans to see what reply he would make to this
terrific announcement.
  "Forut," said the guide tranquilly.
  "Forward it is," answered my uncle, who was now in the seventh
heaven of delight.
  When we were quite ready, our watches indicated thirteen minutes
past one!

CHAPTER_14
                     CHAPTER 14
            The Real Journey Commences
-
  OUR real journey had now commenced. Hitherto our courage and
determination had overcome all difficulties. We were fatigued at
times; and that was all. Now we were about to encounter unknown and
fearful dangers.
  I had not as yet ventured to take a glimpse down the horrible
abyss into which in a few minutes more I was about to plunge. The
fatal moment had, however, at last arrived. I had still the option
of refusing or accepting a share in this foolish and audacious
enterprise. But I was ashamed to show more fear than the eider-duck
hunter. Hans seemed to accept the difficulties of the journey so
tranquilly, with such calm indifference, with such perfect
recklessness of all danger, that I actually blushed to appear less
of a man than he!
  Had I been alone with my uncle, I should certainly have sat down and
argued the point fully; but in the presence of the guide I held my
tongue. I gave one moment to the thought of my charming cousin, and
then I advanced to the mouth of the central shaft.
  It measured about a hundred feet in diameter, which made about three
hundred in circumference. I leaned over a rock which stood on its
edge, and looked down. My hair stood on end, my teeth chattered, my
limbs trembled. I seemed utterly to lose my center of gravity, while
my head was in a sort of whirl, like that of a drunken man. There is
nothing more powerful than this attraction towards an abyss. I was
about to fall headlong into the gaping well, when I was drawn back
by a firm and powerful hand. It was that of Hans. I had not taken
lessons enough at the Frelser's-Kirk of Copenhagen in the art of
looking down from lofty eminences without blinking!
                                                   {CHAPTER_14 ^paragraph 5}
  However, few as the minutes were during which I gazed down this
tremendous and even wondrous shaft, I had a sufficient glimpse of it
to give me some idea of its physical conformation. Its sides, which
were almost as perpendicular as those of a well, presented numerous
projections which doubtless would assist our descent.
  It was a sort of wild and savage staircase, without bannister or
fence. A rope fastened above, near the surface, would certainly
support our weight and enable us to reach the bottom, but how, when we
had arrived at its utmost depth, were we to loosen it above? This was,
I thought, a question of some importance.
  My uncle, however, was one of those men who are nearly always
prepared with expedients. He hit upon a very simple method of
obviating this difficulty. He unrolled a cord about as thick as my
thumb, and at least four hundred feet in length. He allowed about half
of it to go down the pit and catch in a hitch over a great block of
lava which stood on the edge of the precipice. This done, he threw the
second half after the first.
  Each of us could now descend by catching the two cords in one
hand. When about two hundred feet below, all the explorer had to do
was to let go one end and pull away at the other, when the cord
would come falling at his feet. In order to go down farther, all
that was necessary was to continue the same operation.
  This was a very excellent proposition, and no doubt, a correct
one. Going down appeared to me easy enough; it was the coming up again
that now occupied my thoughts.
                                                  {CHAPTER_14 ^paragraph 10}
  "Now," said my uncle, as soon as he had completed this important
preparation, "let us see about the baggage. It must be divided into
three separate parcels, and each of us must carry one on his back. I
allude to the more important and fragile articles."
  My worthy and ingenious uncle did not appear to consider that we
came under the denomination.
  "Hans," he continued, "you will take charge of the tools and some of
the provisions; you, Harry, must take possession of another third of
the provisions and of the arms. I will load myself with the rest of
the eatables, and with the more delicate instruments."
  "But," I exclaimed, "our clothes, this mass of cord and ladders- who
will undertake to carry them down?
  "They will go down of themselves."
                                                  {CHAPTER_14 ^paragraph 15}
  "And how so?" I asked.
  "You shall see."
  My uncle was not fond of half measures, nor did he like anything
in the way of hesitation. Giving his orders to Hans he had the whole
of the nonfragile articles made up into one bundle; and the packet,
firmly and solidly fastened, was simply pitched over the edge of the
gulf.
  I heard the moaning of the suddenly displaced air, and the noise
of falling stones. My uncle leaning over the abyss followed the
descent of his luggage with a perfectly self-satisfied air, and did
not rise until it had completely disappeared from sight.
  "Now then," he cried, "it is our turn."
                                                  {CHAPTER_14 ^paragraph 20}
  I put it in good faith to any man of common sense- was it possible
to hear this energetic cry without a shudder?
  The Professor fastened his case of instruments on his back. Hans
took charge of the tools, I of the arms. The descent then commenced in
the following order: Hans went first, my uncle followed, and I went
last. Our progress was made in profound silence- a silence only
troubled by the fall of pieces of rock, which breaking from the jagged
sides, fell with a roar into the depths below.
  I allowed myself to slide, so to speak, holding frantically on the
double cord with one hand and with the other keeping myself off the
rocks by the assistance of my iron-shod pole. One idea was all the
time impressed upon my brain. I feared that the upper support would
fail me. The cord appeared to me far too fragile to bear the weight of
three such persons as we were, with our luggage. I made as little
use of it as possible, trusting to my own agility and doing miracles
in the way of feats of dexterity and strength upon the projecting
shelves and spurs of lava which my feet seemed to clutch as strongly
as my hands.
  The guide went first, I have said, and when one of the slippery
and frail supports broke from under his feet he had recourse to his
usual monosyllabic way of speaking.
  "Gif akt-"
                                                  {CHAPTER_14 ^paragraph 25}
  "Attention- look out," repeated my uncle.
  In about half an hour we reached a kind of small terrace formed by a
fragment of rock projecting some distance from the sides of the shaft.
  Hans now began to haul upon the cord on one side only, the other
going as quietly upward as the other came down. It fell at last,
bringing with it a shower of small stones, lava and dust, a
disagreeable kind of rain or hail.
  While we were seated on this extraordinary bench I ventured once
more to look downwards. With a sigh I discovered that the bottom was
still wholly invisible. Were we, then, going direct to the interior of
the earth?
  The performance with the cord recommenced, and a quarter of an
hour later we had reached to the depth of another two hundred feet.
                                                  {CHAPTER_14 ^paragraph 30}
  I have very strong doubts if the most determined geologist would,
during that descent, have studied the nature of the different layers
of earth around him. I did not trouble my head much about the
matter; whether we were among the combustible carbon, Silurians, or
primitive soil, I neither knew nor cared to know.
  Not so the inveterate Professor. He must have taken notes all the
way down, for, at one of our halts, he began a brief lecture.
  "The farther we advance," said he, "the greater is my confidence
in the result. The disposition of these volcanic strata absolutely
confirms the theories of Sir Humphry Davy. We are still within the
region of the primordial soil, the soil in which took place the
chemical operation of metals becoming inflamed by coming in contact
with the air and water. I at once regret the old and now forever
exploded theory of a central fire. At all events, we shall soon know
the truth."
  Such was the everlasting conclusion to which he came. I, however,
was very far from being in humor to discuss the matter. I had
something else to think of. My silence was taken for consent; and
still we continued to go down.
  At the expiration of three hours, we were, to all appearance, as far
off as ever from the bottom of the well. When I looked upwards,
however, I could see that the upper orifice was every minute
decreasing in size. The sides of the shaft were getting closer and
closer together, we were approaching the regions of eternal night!
                                                  {CHAPTER_14 ^paragraph 35}
  And still we continued to descend!
  At length, I noticed that when pieces of stone were detached from
the sides of this stupendous precipice, they were swallowed up with
less noise than before. The final sound was sooner heard. We were
approaching the bottom of the abyss!
  As I had been very careful to keep account of an the changes of cord
which took place, I was able to tell exactly what was the depth we had
reached, as well as the time it had taken.
  We had shifted the rope twenty-eight times, each operation taking
a quarter of an hour, which in all made seven hours. To this had to be
added twenty-eight pauses; in all ten hours and a half. We started
at one, it was now, therefore, about eleven o'clock at night.
  It does not require great knowledge of arithmetic to know that
twenty-eight times two hundred feet makes five thousand six hundred
feet in all (more than an English mile).
                                                  {CHAPTER_14 ^paragraph 40}
  While I was making this mental calculation a voice broke the
silence. It was the voice of Hans.
  "Halt!" he cried.
  I checked myself very suddenly, just at the moment when I was
about to kick my uncle on the head.
  "We have reached the end of our journey," said the worthy
Professor in a satisfied tone.
  "What, the interior of the earth?" said I, slipping down to his
side.
                                                  {CHAPTER_14 ^paragraph 45}
  "No, you stupid fellow! but we have reached the bottom of the well.
  "And I suppose there is no farther progress to be made?" I hopefully
exclaimed.
  "Oh, yes, I can dimly see a sort of tunnel, which turns off
obliquely to the right. At all events, we must see about that
tomorrow. Let us sup now, and seek slumber as best we may."
  I thought it time, but made no observations on that point. I was
fairly launched on a desperate course, and all I had to do was to go
forward hopefully and trustingly.
  It was not even now quite dark, the light filtering down in a most
extraordinary manner.
                                                  {CHAPTER_14 ^paragraph 50}
  We opened the provision bag, ate a frugal supper, and each did his
best to find a bed amid the pile of stones, dirt, and lava which had
accumulated for ages at the bottom of the shaft.
  I happened to grope out the pile of ropes, ladders, and clothes
which we had thrown down; and upon them I stretched myself. After such
a day's labor, my rough bed seemed as soft as down!
  For a while I lay in a sort of pleasant trance.
  Presently, after lying quietly for some minutes, I opened my eyes
and looked upwards. As I did so I made out a brilliant little dot,
at the extremity of this long, gigantic telescope.
  It was a star without scintillating rays. According to my
calculation, it must be Beta in the constellation of the Little Bear.
                                                  {CHAPTER_14 ^paragraph 55}
  After this little bit of astronomical recreation, I dropped into a
sound sleep.

CHAPTER_15
                     CHAPTER 15
               We Continue Our Descent
-
  AT eight o'clock the next morning, a faint kind of dawn of day awoke
us. The thousand and one prisms of the lava collected the light as
it passed and brought it to us like a shower of sparks.
  We were able with ease to see objects around us.
  "Well, Harry, my boy," cried the delighted Professor, rubbing his
hands together, "what say you now? Did you ever pass a more tranquil
night in our house in the Konigstrasse? No deafening sounds of cart
wheels, no cries of hawkers, no bad language from boatmen or watermen!
  "Well, Uncle, we are quite at the bottom of this well- but to me
there is something terrible in this calm."
                                                   {CHAPTER_15 ^paragraph 5}
  "Why," said the Professor hotly, "one would say you were already
beginning to be afraid. How will you get on presently? Do you know,
that as yet, we have not penetrated one inch into the bowels of the
earth."
  "What can you mean, sir?" was my bewildered and astonished reply.
  "I mean to say that we have only just reached the soil of the island
itself. This long vertical tube, which ends at the bottom of the
crater of Sneffels, ceases here just about on a level with the sea."
  "Are you sure, sir?"
  "Quite sure. Consult the barometer."
                                                  {CHAPTER_15 ^paragraph 10}
  It was quite true that the mercury, after rising gradually in the
instrument, as long as our descent was taking place, had stopped
precisely at twenty-nine degrees.
  "You perceive," said the Professor, "we have as yet only to endure
the pressure of air. I am curious to replace the barometer by the
manometer."
  The barometer, in fact, was about to become useless-as soon as the
weight of the air was greater than what was calculated as above the
level of the ocean.
  "But," said I, "is it not very much to be feared that this
ever-increasing pressure may not in the end turn out very painful
and inconvenient?"
  "No," said he. "We shall descend very slowly, and our lungs will
be gradually accustomed to breathe compressed air. It is well known
that aeronauts have gone so high as to be nearly without air at all-
why, then, should we not accustom ourselves to breathe when we have,
say, a little too much of it? For myself, I am certain I shall
prefer it. Let us not lose a moment. Where is the packet which
preceded us in our descent?"
                                                  {CHAPTER_15 ^paragraph 15}
  I smilingly pointed it out to my uncle. Hans had not seen it, and
believed it caught somewhere above us: "Huppe" as he phrased it.
  "Now," said my uncle, "let us breakfast, and break fast like
people who have a long day's work before them."
  Biscuit and dried meat, washed down by some mouthfuls of water
flavored with Schiedam, was the material of our luxurious meal.
  As soon as it was finished, my uncle took from his pocket a notebook
destined to be filled by memoranda of our travels. He had already
placed his instruments in order, and this is what he wrote:
-
                                                  {CHAPTER_15 ^paragraph 20}
                 Monday, June 29th
    Chronometer, 8h. 17m. morning.
    Barometer, 29.6 inches.
    Thermometer, 6 degrees [43 degrees Fahr.]
    Direction, E.S.E.
                                                  {CHAPTER_15 ^paragraph 25}
-
  This last observation referred to the obscure gallery, and was
indicated to us by the compass.
  "Now, Harry," cried the Professor, in an enthusiastic tone of voice,
"we are truly about to take our first step into the Interior of the
Earth; never before visited by man since the first creation of the
world. You may consider, therefore, that at this precise moment our
travels really commence."
  As my uncle made this remark, he took in one hand the Ruhmkorff coil
apparatus, which hung round his neck, and with the other he put the
electric current into communication with the worm of the lantern.
And a bright light at once illumined that dark and gloomy tunnel!
  The effect was magical!
                                                  {CHAPTER_15 ^paragraph 30}
  Hans, who carried the second apparatus, had it also put into
operation. This ingenious application of electricity to practical
purposes enabled us to move along by the light of an artificial day,
amid even the flow of the most inflammable and combustible gases.
  "Forward!" cried my uncle. Each took up his burden. Hans went first,
my uncle followed, and I going third, we entered the somber gallery!
  Just as we were about to engulf ourselves in this dismal passage,
I lifted up my head, and through the tubelike shaft saw that Iceland
sky I was never to see again!
  Was it the last I should ever see of any sky?
  The stream of lava flowing from the bowels of the earth in 1219
had forced itself a passage through the tunnel. It lined the whole
of the inside with its thick and brilliant coating. The electric light
added very greatly to the brilliancy of the effect.
                                                  {CHAPTER_15 ^paragraph 35}
  The great difficulty of our journey now began. How were we to
prevent ourselves from slipping down the steeply inclined plane?
Happily some cracks, abrasures of the soil, and other
irregularities, served the place of steps; and we descended slowly;
allowing our heavy luggage to slip on before, at the end of a long
cord.
  But that which served as steps under our feet became in other places
stalactites. The lava, very porous in certain places, took the form of
little round blisters. Crystals of opaque quartz, adorned with
limpid drops of natural glass suspended to the roof like lusters,
seemed to take fire as we passed beneath them. One would have
fancied that the genii of romance were illuminating their
underground palaces to receive the sons of men.
  "Magnificent, glorious!" I cried in a moment of involuntary
enthusiasm, "What a spectacle, Uncle! Do you not admire these
variegated shades of lava, which run through a whole series of colors,
from reddish brown to pale yellow- by the most insensible degrees? And
these crystals, they appear like luminous globes."
  "You are beginning to see the charms of travel, Master Harry," cried
my uncle. "Wait a bit, until we advance farther. What we have as yet
discovered is nothing- onwards, my boy, onwards!
  It would have been a far more correct and appropriate expression,
had he said, "let us slide," for we were going down an inclined
plane with perfect ease. The compass indicated that we were moving
in a southeasterly direction. The flow of lava had never turned to the
right or the left. It had the inflexibility of a straight line.
                                                  {CHAPTER_15 ^paragraph 40}
  Nevertheless, to my surprise, we found no perceptible increase in
heat. This proved the theories of Humphry Davy to be founded on truth,
and more than once I found myself examining the thermometer in
silent astonishment.
  Two hours after our departure it only marked fifty-four degrees
Fahrenheit. I had every reason to believe from this that our descent
was far more horizontal than vertical. As for discovering the exact
depth to which we had attained, nothing could be easier. The Professor
as he advanced measured the angles of deviation and inclination; but
he kept the result of his observations to himself.
  About eight o'clock in the evening, my uncle gave the signal for
halting. Hans seated himself on the ground. The lamps were hung to
fissures in the lava rock. We were now in a large cavern where air was
not wanting. On the contrary, it abounded. What could be the cause
of this- to what atmospheric agitation could be ascribed this draught?
But this was a question which I did not care to discuss just then.
Fatigue and hunger made me incapable of reasoning. An unceasing
march of seven hours had not been kept up without great exhaustion.
I was really and truly worn out; and delighted enough I was to hear
the word Halt.
  Hans laid out some provisions on a lump of lava, and we each
supped with keen relish. One thing, however, caused us great
uneasiness- our water reserve was already half exhausted. My uncle had
full confidence in finding subterranean resources, but hitherto we had
completely failed in so doing. I could not help calling my uncle's
attention to the circumstance.
  "And you are surprised at this total absence of springs?" he said.
                                                  {CHAPTER_15 ^paragraph 45}
  "Doubtless- I am very uneasy on the point. We have certainly not
enough water to last us five days."
  "Be quite easy on that matter," continued my uncle. "I answer for it
we shall find plenty of water- in fact, far more than we shall want."
  "But when?"
  "When we once get through this crust of lava. How can you expect
springs to force their way through these solid stone walls?"
  "But what is there to prove that this concrete mass of lava does not
extend to the center of the earth? I don't think we have as yet done
much in a vertical way."
                                                  {CHAPTER_15 ^paragraph 50}
  "What puts that into your head, my boy?" asked my uncle mildly.
  "Well, it appears to me that if we had descended very far below
the level of the sea- we should find it rather hotter than we have."
  "According to your system," said my uncle; "but what does the
thermometer say?"
  "Scarcely fifteen degrees by Reaumur, which is only an increase of
nine since our departure."
  "Well, and what conclusion does that bring you to?" inquired the
Professor.
                                                  {CHAPTER_15 ^paragraph 55}
  "The deduction I draw from this is very simple. According to the
most exact observations, the augmentation of the temperature of the
interior of the earth is one degree for every hundred feet. But
certain local causes may considerably modify this figure. Thus at
Yakoust in Siberia, it has been remarked that the heat increases a
degree every thirty-six feet. The difference evidently depends on
the conductibility of certain rocks. In the neighborhood of an extinct
volcano, it has been remarked that the elevation of temperature was
only one degree in every five-and-twenty feet. Let us, then, go upon
this calculation- which is the most favorable- and calculate.
  "Calculate away, my boy."
  "Nothing easier," said I, pulling out my notebook and pencil.
"Nine times one hundred and twenty-five feet make a depth of eleven
hundred and twenty-five feet."
  "Archimedes could not have spoken more geometrically."
  "Well?"
                                                  {CHAPTER_15 ^paragraph 60}
  "Well, according to my observations, we are at least ten thousand
feet below the level of the sea."
  "Can it be possible?"
  "Either my calculation is correct, or there is no truth in figures."
  The calculations of the Professor were perfectly correct. We were
already six thousand feet deeper down in the bowels of the earth
than anyone had ever been before. The lowest known depth to which
man had hitherto penetrated was in the mines of Kitzbuhel, in the
Tirol, and those of Wurttemberg.
  The temperature, which should have been eighty-one, was in this
place only fifteen. This was a matter for serious consideration.

CHAPTER_16
                     CHAPTER 16
                The Eastern Tunnel
-
  THE next day was Tuesday, the 30th of June- and at six o'clock in
the morning we resumed our journey.
  We still continued to follow the gallery of lava, a perfect
natural pathway, as easy of descent as some of those inclined planes
which, in very old German houses, serve the purpose of staircases.
This went on until seventeen minutes past twelve, the precise
instant at which we rejoined Hans, who, having been somewhat in
advance, had suddenly stopped.
  "At last," cried my uncle, "we have reached the end of the shaft."
  I looked wonderingly about me. We were in the center of four cross
paths- somber and narrow tunnels. The question now arose as to which
it was wise to take; and this of itself was no small difficulty.
                                                   {CHAPTER_16 ^paragraph 5}
  My uncle, who did not wish to appear to have any hesitation about
the matter before myself or the guide, at once made up his mind. He
pointed quietly to the eastern tunnel; and, without delay, we
entered within its gloomy recesses.
  Besides, had he entertained any feeling of hesitation it might
have been prolonged indefinitely, for there was no indication by which
to determine on a choice. It was absolutely necessary to trust to
chance and good fortune!
  The descent of this obscure and narrow gallery was very gradual
and winding. Sometimes we gazed through a succession of arches, its
course very like the aisles of a Gothic cathedral. The great
artistic sculptors and builders of the Middle Ages might have here
completed their studies with advantage. Many most beautiful and
suggestive ideas of architectural beauty would have been discovered by
them. After passing through this phase of the cavernous way, we
suddenly came, about a mile farther on, upon a square system of
arch, adopted by the early Romans, projecting from the solid rock, and
keeping up the weight of the roof.
  Suddenly we would come upon a series of low subterranean tunnels
which looked like beaver holes, or the work of foxes- through whose
narrow and winding ways we had literally to crawl!
  The heat still remained at quite a supportable degree. With an
involuntary shudder, I reflected on what the heat must have been
when the volcano of Sneffels was pouring its smoke, flames, and
streams of boiling lava- all of which must have come up by the road we
were now following. I could imagine the torrents of hot seething stone
darting on, bubbling up with accompaniments of smoke, steam, and
sulphurous stench!
                                                  {CHAPTER_16 ^paragraph 10}
  "Only to think of the consequences," I mused, "if the old volcano
were once more to set to work."
  I did not communicate these rather unpleasant reflections to my
uncle. He not only would not have understood them, but would have been
intensely disgusted. His only idea was to go ahead. He walked, he
slid, he clambered over piles of fragments, he rolled down heaps of
broken lava, with an earnestness and conviction it was impossible
not to admire.
  At six o'clock in the evening, after a very wearisome journey, but
one not so fatiguing as before, we had made six miles towards the
southward, but had not gone more than a mile downwards.
  My uncle, as usual, gave the signal to halt. We ate our meal in
thoughtful silence, and then retired to sleep.
  Our arrangements for the night were very primitive and simple. A
traveling rug, in which each rolled himself, was all our bedding. We
had no necessity to fear cold or any unpleasant visit. Travelers who
bury themselves in the wilds and depths of the African desert, who
seek profit and pleasure in the forests of the New World, are
compelled to take it in turn to watch during the hours of sleep; but
in this region of the earth absolute solitude and complete security
reigned supreme.
                                                  {CHAPTER_16 ^paragraph 15}
  We had nothing to fear either from savages or from wild beasts.
  After a night's sweet repose, we awoke fresh and ready for action.
There being nothing to detain us, we started on our journey. We
continued to burrow through the lava tunnel as before. It was
impossible to make out through what soil we were making way. The
tunnel, moreover, instead of going down into the bowels of the
earth, became absolutely horizontal.
  I even thought, after some examination, that we were actually
tending upwards. About ten o'clock in the day this state of things
became so clear that, finding the change very fatiguing, I was obliged
to slacken my pace and finally come to a halt.
  "Well," said the Professor quickly, "what is the matter?"
  "The fact is, I am dreadfully tired," was my earnest reply.
                                                  {CHAPTER_16 ^paragraph 20}
  "What," cried my uncle, "tired after a three hours' walk, and by
so easy a road?"
  "Easy enough, I dare say, but very fatiguing."
  "But how can that be, when all we have to do is to go downwards."
  "I beg your pardon, sir. For some time I have noticed that we are
going upwards."
  "Upwards," cried my uncle, shrugging his shoulders, "how can that
be?"
                                                  {CHAPTER_16 ^paragraph 25}
  "There can be no doubt about it. For the last half hour the slopes
have been upward- and if we go on in this way much longer we shall
find ourselves back in Iceland."
  My uncle shook his head with the air of a man who does not want to
be convinced. I tried to continue the conversation. He would not
answer me, but once more gave the signal for departure. His silence
I thought was only caused by concentrated ill-temper.
  However this might be, I once more took up my load, and boldly and
resolutely followed Hans, who was now in advance of my uncle. I did
not like to be beaten or even distanced. I was naturally anxious not
to lose sight of my companions. The very idea of being left behind,
lost in that terrible labyrinth, made me shiver as with the ague.
  Besides, if the ascending path was more arduous and painful to
clamber, I had one source of secret consolation and delight. It was to
all appearance taking us back to the surface of the earth. That of
itself was hopeful. Every step I took confirmed me in my belief, and I
began already to build castles in the air in relation to my marriage
with my pretty little cousin.
  About twelve o'clock there was a great and sudden change in the
aspect of the rocky sides of the gallery. I first noticed it from
the diminution of the rays of light which cast back the reflection
of the lamp. From being coated with shining and resplendent lava, it
became living rock. The sides were sloping walls, which sometimes
became quite vertical.
                                                  {CHAPTER_16 ^paragraph 30}
  We were now in what the geological professors call a state of
transition, in the period of Silurian stones, so called because this
specimen of early formation is very common in England in the
counties formerly inhabited by the Celtic nation known as Silures.
  "I can see clearly now," I cried; "the sediment from the waters
which once covered the whole earth formed during the second period
of its existence these schists and these calcareous rocks. We are
turning our backs on the granite rocks, and are like people from
Hamburg who would go to Lubeck by way of Hanover."
  I might just as well have kept my observations to myself. My
geological enthusiasm got the better, however, of my cooler
judgment, and Professor Hardwigg heard my observations.
  "What is the matter now?" he said, in a tone of great gravity.
  "Well," cried I, "do you not see these different layers of
calcareous rocks and the first indication of slate strata?"
                                                  {CHAPTER_16 ^paragraph 35}
  "Well; what then?"
  "We have arrived at that period of the world's existence when the
first plants and the first animals made their appearance."
  "You think so?"
  "Yes, look; examine and judge for yourself."
  I induced the Professor with some difficulty to cast the light of
his lamp on the sides of the long winding gallery. I expected some
exclamation to burst from his lips. I was very much mistaken. The
worthy Professor never spoke a word.
                                                  {CHAPTER_16 ^paragraph 40}
  It was impossible to say whether he understood me or not. Perhaps it
was possible that in his pride- my uncle and a learned professor- he
did not like to own that he was wrong in having chosen the eastern
tunnel, or was he determined at any price to go to the end of it? It
was quite evident we had left the region of lava, and that the road by
which we were going could not take us back to the great crater of
Mount Sneffels.
  As we went along I could not help ruminating on the whole
question, and asked myself if I did not lay too great a stress on
these sudden and peculiar modifications of the earth's crust.
  After all, I was very likely to be mistaken- and it was within the
range of probability and possibility that we were not making our way
through the strata of rocks which I believed I recognized piled on the
lower layer of granitic formation.
  "At all events, if I am right," I thought to myself, "I must
certainly find some remains of primitive plants, and it will be
absolutely necessary to give way to such indubitable evidence. Let
us have a good search."
  I accordingly lost no opportunity of searching, and had not gone
more than about a hundred yards, when the evidence I sought for
cropped up in the most incontestable manner before my eyes. It was
quite natural that I should expect to find these signs, for during the
Silurian period the seas contained no fewer than fifteen hundred
different animal and vegetable species. My feet, so long accustomed to
the hard and arid lava soil, suddenly found themselves treading on a
kind of soft dust, the remains of plants and shells.
                                                  {CHAPTER_16 ^paragraph 45}
  Upon the walls themselves I could clearly make out the outline, as
plain as a sun picture, of the fucus and the lycopods. The worthy
and excellent Professor Hardwigg could not of course make any
mistake about the matter; but I believe he deliberately closed his
eyes, and continued on his way with a firm and unalterable step.
  I began to think that he was carrying his obstinacy a great deal too
far. I could no longer act with prudence or composure. I stooped on
a sudden and picked up an almost perfect shell, which had
undoubtedly belonged to some animal very much resembling some of the
present day. Having secured the prize, I followed in the wake of my
uncle.
  "Do you see this?" I said.
  "Well, said the Professor, with the most imperturbable tranquillity,
"it is the shell of a crustaceous animal of the extinct order of the
trilobites; nothing more, I assure you."
  "But, cried I, much troubled at his coolness, "do you draw no
conclusion from it?"
                                                  {CHAPTER_16 ^paragraph 50}
  "Well, if I may ask, what conclusion do you draw from it yourself?"
  "Well, I thought-"
  "I know, my boy, what you would say, and you are right, perfectly
and incontestably right. We have finally abandoned the crust of lava
and the road by which the lava ascended. It is quite possible that I
may have been mistaken, but I shall be unable to discover my error
until I get to the end of this gallery."
  "You are quite right as far as that is concerned"' I replied, "and I
should highly approve of your decision, if we had not to fear the
greatest of all dangers."
  "And what is that?"
                                                  {CHAPTER_16 ^paragraph 55}
  "Want of water."
  "Well, my dear Henry, it can't be helped. We must put ourselves on
rations."
  And on he went.

CHAPTER_17
                     CHAPTER 17
                 Deeper and Deeper
-
  IN truth, we were compelled to put ourselves upon rations. Our
supply would certainly last not more than three days. I found this out
about supper time. The worst part of the matter was that, in what is
called the transition rocks, it was hardly to be expected we should
meet with water!
  I had read of the horrors of thirst, and I knew that where we
were, a brief trial of its sufferings would put an end to our
adventures- and our lives! But it was utterly useless to discuss the
matter with my uncle. He would have answered by some axiom from Plato.
  During the whole of next day we proceeded on our journey through
this interminable gallery, arch after arch, tunnel after tunnel. We
journeyed without exchanging a word. We had become as mute and
reticent as Hans, our guide.
  The road had no longer an upward tendency; at all events, if it had,
it was not to be made out very clearly. Sometimes there could be no
doubt that we were going downwards. But this inclination was
scarcely to be distinguished, and was by no means reassuring to the
Professor, because the character of the strata was in no wise
modified, and the transition character of the rocks became more and
more marked.
                                                   {CHAPTER_17 ^paragraph 5}
  It was a glorious sight to see how the electric light brought out
the sparkles in the walls of the calcareous rocks, and the old red
sandstone. One might have fancied oneself in one of those deep
cuttings in Devonshire, which have given their name to this kind of
soil. Some magnificent specimens of marble projected from the sides of
the gallery: some of an agate grey with white veins of variegated
character, others of a yellow spotted color, with red veins; farther
off might be seen samples of color in which cherry-tinted seams were
to be found in all their brightest shades.
  The greater number of these marbles were stamped with the marks of
primitive animals. Since the previous evening, nature and creation had
made considerable progress. Instead of the rudimentary trilobites, I
perceived the remains of a more perfect order. Among others, the
fish in which the eye of a geologist has been able to discover the
first form of the reptile.
  The Devonian seas were inhabited by a vast number of animals of this
species, which were deposited in tens of thousands in the rocks of new
formation.
  It was quite evident to me that we were ascending the scale of
animal life of which man forms the summit. My excellent uncle, the
Professor, appeared not to take notice of these warnings. He was
determined at any risk to proceed.
  He must have been in expectation of one of two things; either that a
vertical well was about to open under his feet, and thus allow him
to continue his descent, or that some insurmountable obstacle would
compel us to stop and go back by the road we had so long traveled. But
evening came again, and, to my horror, neither hope was doomed to be
realized!
                                                  {CHAPTER_17 ^paragraph 10}
  On Friday, after a night when I began to feel the gnawing agony of
thirst, and when in consequence appetite decreased, our little band
rose and once more followed the turnings and windings, the ascents and
descents, of this interminable gallery. All were silent and gloomy.
I could see that even my uncle had ventured too far.
  After about ten hours of further progress- a progress dull and
monotonous to the last degree- I remarked that the reverberation,
and reflection of our lamps upon the sides of the tunnel, had
singularly diminished. The marble, the schist, the calcareous rocks,
the red sandstone, had disappeared, leaving in their places a dark and
gloomy wall, somber and without brightness. When we reached a
remarkably narrow part of the tunnel, I leaned my left hand against
the rock.
  When I took my hand away, and happened to glance at it, it was quite
black. We had reached the coal strata of the Central Earth.
  "A coal mine!" I cried.
  "A coal mine without miners," responded my uncle, a little severely.
                                                  {CHAPTER_17 ^paragraph 15}
  "How can we tell?"
  "I can tell," replied my uncle, in a sharp and doctorial tone. "I am
perfectly certain that this gallery through successive layers of
coal was not cut by the hand of man. But whether it is the work of
nature or not is of little concern to us. The hour for our evening
meal has come- let us sup.
  Hans, the guide, occupied himself in preparing food. I had come to
that point when I could no longer eat. All I cared about were the
few drops of water which fell to my share. What I suffered it is
useless to record. The guide's gourd, not quite half full, was all
that was left for us three!
  Having finished their repast, my two companions laid themselves down
upon their rugs, and found in sleep a remedy for their fatigue and
sufferings. As for me, I could not sleep, I lay counting the hours
until morning.
  The next morning, Saturday, at six o'clock, we started again. Twenty
minutes later we suddenly came upon a vast excavation. From its mighty
extent I saw at once that the hand of man could have had nothing to do
with this coal mine; the vault above would have fallen in; as it
was, it was only held together by some miracle of nature.
                                                  {CHAPTER_17 ^paragraph 20}
  This mighty natural cavern was about a hundred feet wide, by about a
hundred and fifty high. The earth had evidently been cast apart by
some violent subterranean commotion. The mass, giving way to some
prodigious upheaving of nature, had split in two, leaving the vast gap
into which we inhabitants of the earth had penetrated for the first
time.
  The whole singular history of the coal period was written on those
dark and gloomy walls. A geologist would have been able easily to
follow the different phases of its formation. The seams of coal were
separated by strata of sandstone, a compact clay, which appeared to be
crushed down by the weight from above.
  At that period of the world which preceded the secondary epoch,
the earth was covered by a coating of enormous and rich vegetation,
due to the double action of tropical heat and perpetual humidity. A
vast atmospheric cloud of vapor surrounded the earth on all sides,
preventing the rays of the sun from ever reaching it.
  Hence the conclusion that these intense heats did not arise from
this new source of caloric.
  Perhaps even the star of day was not quite ready for its brilliant
work- to illumine a universe. Climates did not as yet exist, and a
level heat pervaded the whole surface of the globe- the same heat
existing at the North Pole as at the equator.
                                                  {CHAPTER_17 ^paragraph 25}
  Whence did it come? From the interior of the earth?
  In spite of all the learned theories of Professor Hardwigg, a fierce
and vehement fire certainly burned within the entrails of the great
spheroid. Its action was felt even to the very topmost crust of the
earth; the plants then in existence, being deprived of the vivifying
rays of the sun, had neither buds, nor flowers, nor odor, but their
roots drew a strong and vigorous life from the burning earth of
early days.
  There were but few of what may be called trees- only herbaceous
plants, immense turfs, briers, mosses, rare families, which,
however, in those days were counted by tens and tens of thousands.
  It is entirely to this exuberant vegetation that coal owes its
origin. The crust of the vast globe still yielded under the
influence of the seething, boiling mass, which was forever at work
beneath. Hence arose numerous fissures, and continual falling in of
the upper earth. The dense mass of plants being beneath the waters,
soon formed themselves into vast agglomerations.
  Then came about the action of natural chemistry; in the depths of
the ocean the vegetable mass at first became turf, then, thanks to the
influence of gases and subterranean fermentation, they underwent the
complete process of mineralization.
                                                  {CHAPTER_17 ^paragraph 30}
  In this manner, in early days, were formed those vast and prodigious
layers of coal, which an ever-increasing consumption must utterly
use up in about three centuries more, if people do not find some
more economic light than gas, and some cheaper motive power than
steam.
  All these reflections, the memories of my school studies, came to my
mind while I gazed upon these mighty accumulations of coal, whose
riches, however, are scarcely likely to be ever utilized. The
working of these mines could only be carried out at an expense that
would never yield a profit.
  The matter, however, is scarcely worthy consideration, when coal
is scattered over the whole surface of the globe, within a few yards
of the upper crust. As I looked at these untouched strata,
therefore, I knew they would remain as long as the world lasts.
  While we still continued our journey, I alone forgot the length of
the road, by giving myself up wholly to these geological
considerations. The temperature continued to be very much the same
as while we were traveling amid the lava and the schists. On the other
hand my sense of smell was much affected by a very powerful odor. I
immediately knew that the gallery was filled to overflowing with
that dangerous gas the miners call fire damp, the explosion of which
has caused such fearful and terrible accidents, making a hundred
widows and hundreds of orphans in a single hour.
  Happily, we were able to illumine our progress by means of the
Ruhmkorff apparatus. If we had been so rash and imprudent as to
explore this gallery, torch in hand, a terrible explosion would have
put an end to our travels, simply because no travelers would be left.
                                                  {CHAPTER_17 ^paragraph 35}
  Our excursion through this wondrous coal mine in the very bowels
of the earth lasted until evening. My uncle was scarcely able to
conceal his impatience and dissatisfaction at the road continuing
still to advance in a horizontal direction.
  The darkness, dense and opaque a few yards in advance and in the
rear, rendered it impossible to make out what was the length of the
gallery. For myself, I began to believe that it was simply
interminable, and would go on in the same manner for months.
  Suddenly, at six o'clock, we stood in front of a wall. To the right,
to the left above, below, nowhere was there any passage. We had
reached a spot where the rocks said in unmistakable accents- No
Thoroughfare.
  I stood stupefied. The guide simply folded his arms. My uncle was
silent.
  "Well, well, so much the better," cried my uncle, at last, "I now
know what we are about. We are decidedly not upon the road followed by
Saknussemm. All we have to do is to go back. Let us take one night's
good rest, and before three days are over, I promise you we shall have
regained the point where the galleries divided."
                                                  {CHAPTER_17 ^paragraph 40}
  "Yes, we may, if our strength lasts as long," I cried, in a
lamentable voice.
  "And why not?"
  "Tomorrow, among us three, there will not be a drop of water. It
is just gone."
  "And your courage with it," said my uncle, speaking in a severe
tone.
  What could I say? I turned round on my side, and from sheer
exhaustion fell into a heavy sleep disturbed by dreams of water! And I
awoke unrefreshed.
                                                  {CHAPTER_17 ^paragraph 45}
  I would have bartered a diamond mine for a glass of pure spring
water!

CHAPTER_18
                     CHAPTER 18
                  The Wrong Road!
-
  NEXT day, our departure took place at a very early hour. There was
no time for the least delay. According to my account, we had five
days' hard work to get back to the place where the galleries divided.
  I can never tell all the sufferings we endured upon our return. My
uncle bore them like a man who has been in the wrong- that is, with
concentrated and suppressed anger; Hans, with all the resignation of
his pacific character; and I- I confess that I did nothing but
complain, and despair. I had no heart for this bad fortune.
  But there was one consolation. Defeat at the outset would probably
upset the whole journey!
  As I had expected from the first, our supply of water gave
completely out on our first day's march. Our provision of liquids
was reduced to our supply of Schiedam; but this horrible- nay, I
will say it- this infernal liquor burnt the throat, and I could not
even bear the sight of it. I found the temperature to be stifling. I
was paralyzed with fatigue. More than once I was about to fall
insensible to the ground. The whole party then halted, and the
worthy Icelander and my excellent uncle did their best to console
and comfort me. I could, however, plainly see that my uncle was
contending painfully against the extreme fatigues of our journey,
and the awful torture generated by the absence of water.
                                                   {CHAPTER_18 ^paragraph 5}
  At length a time came when I ceased to recollect anything- when
all was one awfull hideous, fantastic dream!
  At last, on Tuesday, the seventh of the month of July, after
crawling on our hands and knees for many hours, more dead than
alive, we reached the point of junction between the galleries. I lay
like a log, an inert mass of human flesh on the arid lava soil. It was
then ten in the morning.
  Hans and my uncle, leaning against the wall, tried to nibble away at
some pieces of biscuit, while deep groans and sighs escaped from my
scorched and swollen lips. Then I fell off into a kind of deep
lethargy.
  Presently I felt my uncle approach, and lift me up tenderly in his
arms.
  "Poor boy," I heard him say in a tone of deep commiseration.
                                                  {CHAPTER_18 ^paragraph 10}
  I was profoundly touched by these words, being by no means
accustomed to signs of womanly weakness in the Professor. I caught his
trembling hands in mine and gave them a gentle pressure. He allowed me
to do so without resistance, looking at me kindly all the time. His
eyes were wet with tears.
  I then saw him take the gourd which he wore at his side. To my
surprise, or rather to my stupefaction, he placed it to my lips.
  "Drink, my boy," he said.
  Was it possible my ears had not deceived me? Was my uncle mad? I
looked at him, with, I am sure, quite an idiotic expression. I could
not believe him. I too much feared the counteraction of
disappointment.
  "Drink"' he said again.
                                                  {CHAPTER_18 ^paragraph 15}
  Had I heard aright? Before, however, I could ask myself the question
a second time, a mouthful of water cooled my parched lips and
throat- one mouthful, but I do believe it brought me back to life.
  I thanked my uncle by clasping my hands. My heart was too full to
speak.
  "Yes," said he, "one mouthful of water, the very last- do you
hear, my boy- the very last! I have taken care of it at the bottom
of my bottle as the apple of my eye. Twenty times, a hundred times,
I have resisted the fearful desire to drink it. But- no- no, Harry,
I saved it for you."
  "My dear uncle," I exclaimed, and the big tears rolled down my hot
and feverish cheeks.
  "Yes, my poor boy, I knew that when you reached this place, this
crossroad in the earth, you would fall down half dead, and I saved
my last drop of water in order to restore you.
                                                  {CHAPTER_18 ^paragraph 20}
  "Thanks," I cried; "thanks from my heart."
  As little as my thirst was really quenched, I had nevertheless
partially recovered my strength. The contracted muscles of my throat
relaxed- and the inflammation of my lips in some measure subsided.
At all events, I was able to speak.
  "Well," I said, "there can be no doubt now as to what we have to do.
Water has utterly failed us; our journey is therefore at an end. Let
us return."
  While I spoke thus, my uncle evidently avoided my face: he held down
his head; his eyes were turned in every possible direction but the
right one.
  "Yes," I continued, getting excited by my own words, we must go back
to Sneffels. May heaven give us strength to enable us once more to
revisit the light of day. Would that we now stood on the summit of the
crater."
                                                  {CHAPTER_18 ^paragraph 25}
  "Go back," said my uncle, speaking to himself, "and must it be so?"
  "Go back- yes, and without losing a single moment", I vehemently
cried.
  For some moments there was silence under that dark and gloomy vault.
  "So, my dear Harry," said the Professor in a very singular tone of
voice, "those few drops of water have not sufficed to restore your
energy and courage."
  "Courage!" I cried.
                                                  {CHAPTER_18 ^paragraph 30}
  "I see that you are quite as downcast as before- and still give
way to discouragement and despair."
  What, then, was the man made of, and what other projects were
entering his fertile and audacious brain!
  "You are not discouraged, sir?"
  "What! Give up just as we are on the verge of success?" he cried.
"Never, never shall it be said that Professor Hardwigg retreated."
  "Then we must make up our minds to perish," I cried with a
helpless sigh.
                                                  {CHAPTER_18 ^paragraph 35}
  "No, Harry, my boy, certainly not. Go, leave me, I am very far
from desiring your death. Take Hans with you. I will go on alone."
  "You ask us to leave you?"
  "Leave me, I say. I have undertaken this dangerous and perilous
adventure. I will carry it to the end- or I will never return to the
surface of Mother Earth. Go, Harry- once more I say to you- go!"
  My uncle as he spoke was terribly excited. His voice, which before
had been tender, almost womanly, became harsh and menacing. He
appeared to be struggling with desperate energy against the
impossible. I did not wish to abandon him at the bottom of that abyss,
while, on the other hand, the instinct of preservation told me to fly.
  Meanwhile, our guide was looking on with profound calmness and
indifference. He appeared to be an unconcerned party, and yet he
perfectly well knew what was going on between us. Our gestures
sufficiently indicated the different roads each wished to follow-and
which each tried to influence the other to undertake. But Hans
appeared not to take the slightest interest in what was really a
question of life and death for us all, but waited quite ready to
obey the signal which should say go aloft, or to resume his
desperate journey into the interior of the earth.
                                                  {CHAPTER_18 ^paragraph 40}
  How then I wished with all my heart and soul that I could make him
understand my words. My representations, my sighs and groans, the
earnest accents in which I should have spoken would have convinced
that cold, hard nature. Those fearful dangers and perils of which
the stolid guide had no idea, I would have pointed them out to him-
I would have, as it were, made him see and feel. Between us, we
might have convinced the obstinate Professor. If the worst had come to
the worst, we could have compelled him to return to the summit of
Sneffels.
  I quietly approached Hans. I caught his hand in mine. He never moved
a muscle. I indicated to him the road to the top of the crater. He
remained motionless. My panting form, my haggard countenance, must
have indicated the extent of my sufferings. The Icelander gently shook
his head and pointed to my uncle.
  "Master," he said.
  The word is Icelandic as well as English.
  "The master!" I cried, beside myself with fury- "madman! no- I
tell you he is not the master of our lives; we must fly! we must
drag him with us! do you hear me? Do you understand me, I say?"
                                                  {CHAPTER_18 ^paragraph 45}
  I have already explained that I held Hans by the arm. I tried to
make him rise from his seat. I struggled with him and tried to force
him away. My uncle now interposed.
  "My good Henry, be calm," he said. "You will obtain nothing from
my devoted follower; therefore, listen to what I have to say."
  I folded my arms, as well as I could, and looked my uncle full in
the face.
  "This wretched want of water," he said, "is the sole obstacle to the
success of my project. In the entire gallery, made of lava, schist,
and coal, it is true we found not one liquid molecule. It is quite
possible that we may be more fortunate in the western tunnel."
  My sole reply was to shake my head with an air of deep incredulity.
                                                  {CHAPTER_18 ^paragraph 50}
  "Listen to me to the end," said the Professor in his well-known
lecturing voice. "While you lay yonder without life or motion, I
undertook a reconnoitering journey into the conformation of this other
gallery. I have discovered that it goes directly downwards into the
bowels of the earth, and in a few hours will take us to the old
granitic formation. In this we shall undoubtedly find innumerable
springs. The nature of the rock makes this a mathematical certainty,
and instinct agrees with logic to say that it is so. Now, this is
the serious proposition which I have to make to you. When
Christopher Columbus asked of his men three days to discover the
land of promise, his men ill, terrified, and hopeless, yet gave him
three days- and the New World was discovered. Now I, the Christopher
Columbus of this subterranean region, only ask of you one more day.
If, when that time is expired, I have not found the water of which
we are in search, I swear to you, I will give up my mighty
enterprise and return to the earth's surface."
  Despite my irritation and despair, I knew how much it cost my
uncle to make this proposition, and to hold such conciliatory
language. Under the circumstances, what could I do but yield?
  "Well," I cried, "let it be as you wish, and may heaven reward
your superhuman energy. But as, unless we discover water, our hours
are numbered, let us lose no time, but go ahead."

CHAPTER_19
                     CHAPTER 19
                    A New Route
-
  OUR descent was now resumed by means of the second gallery. Hans
took up his post in front as usual. We had not gone more than a
hundred yards when the Professor carefully examined the walls.
  "This is the primitive formation- we are on the right road-
onwards is our hope!"
  When the whole earth got cool in the first hours of the world's
morning, the diminution of the volume of the earth produced a state of
dislocation in its upper crust, followed by ruptures, crevasses and
fissures. The passage was a fissure of this kind, through which,
ages ago, had flowed the eruptive granite. The thousand windings and
turnings formed an inextricable labyrinth through the ancient soil.
  As we descended, successions of layers composing the primitive
soil appeared with the utmost fidelity of detail. Geological science
considers this primitive soil as the base of the mineral crust, and it
has recognized that it is composed of three different strata or
layers, all resting on the immovable rock known as granite.
                                                   {CHAPTER_19 ^paragraph 5}
  No mineralogists had even found themselves placed in such a
marvelous position to study nature in all her real and naked beauty.
The sounding rod, a mere machine, could not bring to the surface of
the earth the objects of value for the study of its internal
structure, which we were about to see with our own eyes, to touch with
our own hands.
  Remember that I am writing this after the journey.
  Across the streak of the rocks, colored by beautiful green tints,
wound metallic threads of copper, of manganese, with traces of
platinum and gold. I could not help gazing at these riches buried in
the entrails of Mother Earth, and of which no man would have the
enjoyment to the end of time! These treasures- mighty and
inexhaustible, were buried in the morning of the earth's history, at
such awful depths, that no crowbar or pickax will ever drag them
from their tomb!
  The light of our Ruhmkorff's coil, increased tenfold by the myriad
of prismatic masses of rock, sent its jets of fire in every direction,
and I could fancy myself traveling through a huge hollow diamond,
the rays of which produced myriads of extraordinary effects.
  Towards six o'clock, this festival of light began sensibly and
visibly to decrease, and soon almost ceased. The sides of the
gallery assumed a crystallized tint, with a somber hue; white mica
began to commingle more freely with feldspar and quartz, to form
what may be called the true rock- the stone which is hard above all,
that supports, without being crushed, the four stories of the
earth's soil.
                                                  {CHAPTER_19 ^paragraph 10}
  We were walled by an immense prison of granite!
  It was now eight o'clock, and still there was no sign of water.
The sufferings I endured were horrible. My uncle now kept at the
head of our little column. Nothing could induce him to stop. I,
meanwhile, had but one real thought. My ear was keenly on the watch to
catch the sound of a spring. But no pleasant sound of falling water
fell upon my listening ear.
  But at last the time came when my limbs refused to carry me
longer. I contended heroically against the terrible tortures I
endured, because I did not wish to compel my uncle to halt. To him I
knew this would be the last fatal stroke.
  Suddenly I felt a deadly faintness come over me. My eyes could no
longer see; my knees shook. I gave one despairing cry- and fell!
  "Help, help, I am dying!
                                                  {CHAPTER_19 ^paragraph 15}
  My uncle turned and slowly retraced his steps. He looked at me
with folded arms, and then allowed one sentence to escape, in hollow
accents, from his lips:
  "All is over."
  The last thing I saw was a face fearfully distorted with pain and
sorrow; and then my eyes closed.
-
  When I again opened them, I saw my companions lying near me,
motionless, wrapped in their huge traveling rugs. Were they asleep
or dead? For myself, sleep was wholly out of the question. My fainting
fit over, I was wakeful as the lark. I suffered too much for sleep
to visit my eyelids- the more, that I thought myself sick unto
death- dying. The last words spoken by my uncle seemed to be buzzing
in my ears- all is over! And it was probable that he was right. In the
state of prostration to which I was reduced, it was madness to think
of ever again seeing the light of day.
                                                  {CHAPTER_19 ^paragraph 20}
  Above were miles upon miles of the earth's crust. As I thought of
it, I could fancy the whole weight resting on my shoulders. I was
crushed, annihilated! and exhausted myself in vain attempts to turn in
my granite bed.
  Hours upon hours passed away. A profound and terrible silence
reigned around us- a silence of the tomb. Nothing could make itself
heard through these gigantic walls of granite. The very thought was
stupendous.
  Presently, despite my apathy, despite the kind of deadly calm into
which I was cast, something aroused me. It was a slight but peculiar
noise. While I was watching intently, I observed that the tunnel was
becoming dark. Then gazing through the dim light that remained, I
thought I saw the Icelander taking his departure, lamp in hand.
  Why had he acted thus? Did Hans the guide mean to abandon us? My
uncle lay fast asleep- or dead. I tried to cry out, and arouse him. My
voice, feebly issuing from my parched and fevered lips, found no
echo in that fearful place. My throat was dry, my tongue stuck to
the roof of my mouth. The obscurity had by this time become intense,
and at last even the faint sound of the guide's footsteps was lost
in the blank distance. My soul seemed filled with anguish, and death
appeared welcome, only let it come quickly.
  "Hans is leaving us," I cried. "Hans- Hans, if you are a man, come
back."
                                                  {CHAPTER_19 ^paragraph 25}
  These words were spoken to myself. They could not be heard aloud.
Nevertheless, after the first few moments of terror were over, I was
ashamed of my suspicions against a man who hitherto had behaved so
admirably. Nothing in his conduct or character justified suspicion.
Moreover, a moment's reflection reassured me. His departure could
not be a flight. Instead of ascending the gallery, he was going deeper
down into the gulf. Had he had any bad design, his way would have been
upwards.
  This reasoning calmed me a little and I began to hope!
  The good, and peaceful, and imperturbable Hans would certainly not
have arisen from his sleep without some serious and grave motive.
Was he bent on a voyage of discovery? During the deep, still silence
of the night had he at last heard that sweet murmur about which we
were all so anxious?

CHAPTER_20
                     CHAPTER 20
              A Bitter Disappointment
-
  DURING a long, long, weary hour, there crossed my wildly delirious
brain all sorts of reasons as to what could have aroused our quiet and
faithful guide. The most absurd and ridiculous ideas passed through my
head, each more impossible than the other. I believe I was either half
or wholly mad.
  Suddenly, however, there arose, as it were from the depths of the
earth, a voice of comfort. It was the sound of footsteps! Hans was
returning.
  Presently the uncertain light began to shine upon the walls of the
passage, and then it came in view far down the sloping tunnel. At
length Hans himself appeared.
  He approached my uncle, placed his hand upon his shoulder, and
gently awakened him. My uncle, as soon as he saw who it was, instantly
arose.
                                                   {CHAPTER_20 ^paragraph 5}
  "Well!" exclaimed the Professor.
  "Vatten," said the hunter.
  I did not know a single word of the Danish language, and yet by a
sort of mysterious instinct I understood what the guide had said.
  "Water, water!" I cried, in a wild and frantic tone, clapping my
hands, and gesticulating like a madman.
  "Water!" murmured my uncle, in a voice of deep emotion and
gratitude. "Hvar?" ("Where?)
                                                  {CHAPTER_20 ^paragraph 10}
  "Nedat." ("Below.")
  "Where? below!" I understood every word. I had caught the hunter
by the hands, and I shook them heartily, while he looked on with
perfect calmness.
  The preparations for our departure did not take long, and we were
soon making a rapid descent into the tunnel.
  An hour later we had advanced a thousand yards, and descended two
thousand feet.
  At this moment I heard an accustomed and well-known sound running
along the floors of the granite rock- a kind of dull and sullen
roar, like that of a distant waterfall.
                                                  {CHAPTER_20 ^paragraph 15}
  During the first half hour of our advance, not finding the
discovered spring, my feelings of intense suffering appeared to
return. Once more I began to lose all hope. My uncle, however,
observing how downhearted I was again becoming, took up the
conversation.
  "Hans was right," he exclaimed enthusiastically; "that is the dull
roaring of a torrent."
  "A torrent," I cried, delighted at even hearing the welcome words.
  "There's not the slightest doubt about it he replied, "a
subterranean river is flowing beside us."
  I made no reply, but hastened on, once more animated by hope. I
began not even to feel the deep fatigue which hitherto had overpowered
me. The very sound of this glorious murmuring water already
refreshed me. We could hear it increasing in volume every moment.
The torrent, which for a long time could be heard flowing over our
heads, now ran distinctly along the left wall, roaring, rushing,
spluttering, and still falling.
                                                  {CHAPTER_20 ^paragraph 20}
  Several times I passed my hand across the rock hoping to find some
trace of humidity- of the slightest percolation. Alas! in vain.
  Again a half hour passed in the same weary toil. Again we advanced.
  It now became evident that the hunter, during his absence, had not
been able to carry his researches any farther. Guided by an instinct
peculiar to the dwellers in mountain regions and water finders, he
"smelt" the living spring through the rock. Still he had not seen
the precious liquid. He had neither quenched his own thirst, nor
brought us one drop in his gourd.
  Moreover, we soon made the disastrous discovery that, if our
progress continued, we should soon be moving away from the torrent,
the sound of which gradually diminished. We turned back. Hans halted
at the precise spot where the sound of the torrent appeared nearest.
  I could bear the suspense and suffering no longer, and seated myself
against the wall, behind which I could hear the water seething and
effervescing not two feet away. But a solid wall of granite still
separated us from it!
                                                  {CHAPTER_20 ^paragraph 25}
  Hans looked keenly at me, and, strange enough, for once I thought
I saw a smile on his imperturbable face.
  He rose from a stone on which be had been seated, and took up the
lamp. I could not help rising and following. He moved slowly along the
firm and solid granite wall. I watched him with mingled curiosity
and eagerness. Presently he halted and placed his ear against the
dry stone, moving slowly along and listening with the most extreme
care and attention. I understood at once that he was searching for the
exact spot where the torrent's roar was most plainly heard. This point
he soon found in the lateral wall on the left side, about three feet
above the level of the tunnel floor.
  I was in a state of intense excitement. I scarcely dared believe
what the eider-duck hunter was about to do. It was, however,
impossible in a moment more not to both understand and applaud, and
even to smother him in my embraces, when I saw him raise the heavy
crowbar and commence an attack upon the rock itself.
  "Saved!" I cried.
  "Yes," cried my uncle, even more excited and delighted than
myself; "Hans is quite right. Oh, the worthy, excellent man! We should
never have thought of such an idea."
                                                  {CHAPTER_20 ^paragraph 30}
  And nobody else, I think, would have done so. Such a process, simple
as it seemed, would most certainly not have entered our heads. Nothing
could be more dangerous than to begin to work with pickaxes in that
particular part of the globe. Supposing while he was at work a
break-up were to take place, and supposing the torrent once having
gained an inch were to take an ell, and come pouring bodily through
the broken rock!
  Not one of these dangers was chimerical. They were only too real.
But at that moment no fear of falling in of the roof, or even of
inundation was capable of stopping us. Our thirst was so intense
that to quench it we would have dug below the bed of old Ocean itself.
  Hans went quietly to work- a work which neither my uncle nor I would
have undertaken at any price. Our impatience was so great that if we
had once begun with pickax and crowbar, the rock would soon have split
into a hundred fragments. The guide, on the contrary, calm, ready,
moderate, wore away the hard rock by little steady blows of his
instrument, making no attempt at a larger hole than about six
inches. As I stood, I heard, or I thought I heard, the roar of the
torrent momentarily increasing in loudness, and at times I almost felt
the pleasant sensation of water upon my parched lips.
  At the end of what appeared an age, Hans had made a hole which
enabled his crowbar to enter two feet into the solid rock. He had been
at work exactly an hour. It appeared a dozen. I was getting wild
with impatience. My uncle began to think of using more violent
measures. I had the greatest difficulty in checking him. He had indeed
just got hold of his crowbar when a loud and welcome hiss was heard.
Then a stream, or rather jet, of water burst through the wall and came
out with such force as to hit the opposite side!
  Hans, the guide, who was half upset by the shock, was scarcely
able to keep down a cry of pain and grief. I understood his meaning
when, plunging my hands into the sparkling jet, I myself gave a wild
and frantic cry. The water was scalding hot!
                                                  {CHAPTER_20 ^paragraph 35}
  "Boiling," I cried, in bitter disappointment.
  "Well, never mind," said my uncle," it will soon get cool."
  The tunnel began to be filled by clouds of vapor, while a small
stream ran away into the interior of the earth. In a short time we had
some sufficiently cool to drink. We swallowed it in huge mouthfuls.
  Oh! what exalted delight- what rich and incomparable luxury! What
was this water, whence did it come? To us what was that? The simple
fact was- it was water; and, though still with a tingle of warmth
about it, it brought back to the heart, that life which, but for it,
must surely have faded away. I drank greedily, almost without
tasting it.
  When, however, I had almost quenched my ravenous thirst, I made a
discovery.
                                                  {CHAPTER_20 ^paragraph 40}
  "Why, it is chalybeate water!"
  "A most excellent stomachic," replied my uncle, "and highly
mineralized. Here is a journey worth twenty to Spa."
  "It's very good," I replied.
  "I should think so. Water found six miles under ground. There is a
peculiarly inky flavor about it, which is by no means disagreeable.
Hans may congratulate himself on having made a rare discovery. What do
you say, nephew, according to the usual custom of travelers, to name
the stream after him?"
  "Good," said I. And the name of "Hansbach" ("Hans Brook") was at
once agreed upon.
                                                  {CHAPTER_20 ^paragraph 45}
  Hans was not a bit more proud after hearing our determination than
he was before. After having taken a very small modicum of the
welcome refreshment, he had seated himself in a corner with his
usual imperturbable gravity.
  "Now," said I, "it is not worth while letting this water run to
waste."
  "What is the use," replied my uncle, "the source from which this
river rises is inexhaustible."
  "Never mind," I continued, "let us fill our goatskin and gourds, and
then try to stop the opening up."
  My advice, after some hesitation, was followed or attempted to be
followed. Hans picked up all the broken pieces of granite he had
knocked out, and using some tow he happened to have about him, tried
to shut up the fissure he had made in the wall. All he did was to
scald his hands. The pressure was too great, and all our attempts were
utter failures.
                                                  {CHAPTER_20 ^paragraph 50}
  "It is evident," I remarked, "that the upper surface of these
springs is situated at a very great height above- as we may fairly
infer from the great pressure of the jet."
  "That is by no means doubtful," replied my uncle, "if this column of
water is about thirty-two thousand feet high, the atmospheric pressure
must be something enormous. But a new idea has just struck me."
  "And what is that?"
  "Why be at so much trouble to close this aperture?"
  "Because-"
                                                  {CHAPTER_20 ^paragraph 55}
  I hesitated and stammered, having no real reason.
  "When our water bottles are empty, we are not at all sure that we
shall be able to fill them," observed my uncle.
  "I think that is very probable."
  "Well, then, let this water run. It will, of course, naturally
follow in our track, and will serve to guide and refresh us."
  "I think the idea a good one," I cried in reply, "and with this
rivulet as a companion, there is no further reason why we should not
succeed in our marvelous project."
                                                  {CHAPTER_20 ^paragraph 60}
  "Ah, my boy," said the Professor, laughing, "after all, you are
coming round."
  "More than that, I am now confident of ultimate success.
  "One moment, nephew mine. Let us begin by taking some hours of
repose."
  I had utterly forgotten that it was night. The chronometer, however,
informed me of the fact. Soon we were sufficiently restored and
refreshed, and had all fallen into a profound sleep.

CHAPTER_21
                     CHAPTER 21
                   Under the Ocean
-
  BY the next day we had nearly forgotten our past sufferings. The
first sensation I experienced was surprise at not being thirsty, and I
actually asked myself the reason. The running stream, which flowed
in rippling wavelets at my feet, was the satisfactory reply.
  We breakfasted with a good appetite, and then drank our fill of
the excellent water. I felt myself quite a new man, ready to go
anywhere my uncle chose to lead. I began to think. Why should not a
man as seriously convinced as my uncle, succeed, with so excellent a
guide as worthy Hans, and so devoted a nephew as myself? These were
the brilliant ideas which now invaded my brain. Had the proposition
now been made to go back to the summit of Mount Sneffels, I should
have declined the offer in a most indignant manner.
  But fortunately there was no question of going up. We were about
to descend farther into the interior of the earth.
  "Let us be moving," I cried, awakening the echoes of the old world.
                                                   {CHAPTER_21 ^paragraph 5}
  We resumed our march on Thursday at eight o'clock in the morning.
The great granite tunnel, as it went round by sinuous and winding
ways, presented every now and then sharp turns, and in fact all the
appearance of a labyrinth. Its direction, however, was in general
towards the southwest. My uncle made several pauses in order to
consult his compass.
  The gallery now began to trend downwards in a horizontal
direction, with about two inches of fall in every furlong. The
murmuring stream flowed quietly at our feet. I could not but compare
it to some familiar spirit, guiding us through the earth, and I
dabbled my fingers in its tepid water, which sang like a naiad as we
progressed. My good humor began to assume a mythological character.
  As for my uncle he began to complain of the horizontal character
of the road. His route, he found, began to be indefinitely
prolonged, instead of "sliding down the celestial ray," according to
his expression.
  But we had no choice; and as long as our road led towards the
center- however little progress we made, there was no reason to
complain.
  Moreover, from time to time the slopes were much greater, the
naiad sang more loudly, and we began to dip downwards in earnest.
                                                  {CHAPTER_21 ^paragraph 10}
  As yet, however, I felt no painful sensation. I had not got over the
excitement of the discovery of water.
  That day and the next we did a considerable amount of horizontal,
and relatively very little vertical, traveling.
  On Friday evening, the tenth of July, according to our estimation,
we ought to have been thirty leagues to the southeast of Reykjavik,
and about two leagues and a half deep. We now received a rather
startling surprise.
  Under our feet there opened a horrible well. My uncle was so
delighted that he actually clapped his hands- as he saw how steep
and sharp was the descent.
  "Ah, ah!" he cried, in rapturous delight; "this take us a long
way. Look at the projections of the rock. Hah!" he exclaimed, "it's
a fearful staircase!"
                                                  {CHAPTER_21 ^paragraph 15}
  Hans, however, who in all our troubles had never given up the ropes,
took care so to dispose of them as to prevent any accidents. Our
descent then began. I dare not call it a perilous descent, for I was
already too familiar with that sort of work to look upon it as
anything but a very ordinary affair.
  This well was a kind of narrow opening in the massive granite of the
kind known as a fissure. The contraction of the terrestrial
scaffolding, when it suddenly cooled, had been evidently the cause. If
it had ever served in former times as a kind of funnel through which
passed the eruptive masses vomited by Sneffels, I was at a loss to
explain how it had left no mark. We were, in fact, descending a
spiral, something like those winding staircases in use in modern
houses.
  We were compelled every quarter of an hour or thereabouts to sit
down in order to rest our legs. Our calves ached. We then seated
ourselves on some projecting rock with our legs hanging over, and
gossiped while we ate a mouthful- drinking still from the pleasantly
warm running stream which had not deserted us.
  It is scarcely necessary to say that in this curiously shaped
fissure the Hansbach had become a cascade to the detriment of its
size. It was still, however, sufficient, and more, for our wants.
Besides we knew that, as soon as the declivity ceased to be so abrupt,
the stream must resume its peaceful course. At this moment it reminded
me of my uncle, his impatience and rage, while when it flowed more
peacefully, I pictured to myself the placidity of the Icelandic guide.
  During the whole of two days, the sixth and seventh of July, we
followed the extraordinary spiral staircase of the fissure,
penetrating two leagues farther into the crust of the earth, which put
us five leagues below the level of the sea. On the eighth, however, at
twelve o'clock in the day, the fissure suddenly assumed a much more
gentle slope still trending in a southeast direction.
                                                  {CHAPTER_21 ^paragraph 20}
  The road now became comparatively easy, and at the same time
dreadfully monotonous. It would have been difficult for matters to
have turned out otherwise. Our peculiar journey had no chance of being
diversified by landscape and scenery. At all events, such was my idea.
  At length, on Wednesday the fifteenth, we were actually seven
leagues (twenty-one miles) below the surface of the earth, and fifty
leagues distant from the mountain of Sneffels. Though, if the truth be
told, we were very tired, our health had resisted all suffering, and
was in a most satisfactory state. Our traveler's box of medicaments
had not even been opened.
  My uncle was careful to note every hour the indications of the
compass, of the manometer, and of the thermometer, all which he
afterwards published in his elaborate philosophical and scientific
account of our remarkable voyage. He was therefore able to give an
exact relation of the situation. When, therefore, he informed me
that we were fifty leagues in a horizontal direction distant from
our starting point, I could not suppress a loud exclamation.
  "What is the matter now?" cried my uncle.
  "Nothing very important, only an idea has entered my head," was my
reply.
                                                  {CHAPTER_21 ^paragraph 25}
  "Well, out with it, My boy."
  "It is my opinion that if your calculations are correct we are no
longer under Iceland."
  "Do you think so?"
  "We can very easily find out," I replied, pulling out a map and
compasses.
  "You see," I said, after careful measurement, "that I am not
mistaken. We are far beyond Cape Portland; and those fifty leagues
to the southeast will take us into the open sea."
                                                  {CHAPTER_21 ^paragraph 30}
  "Under the open sea," cried my uncle, rubbing his hands with a
delighted air.
  "Yes," I cried, "no doubt old Ocean flows over our heads!"
  "Well, my dear boy, what can be more natural! Do you not know that
in the neighborhood of Newcastle there are coal mines which have
been worked far out under the sea?"
  Now my worthy uncle, the Professor, no doubt regarded this discovery
as a very simple fact, but to me the idea was by no means a pleasant
one. And yet when one came to think the matter over seriously, what
mattered it whether the plains and mountains of Iceland were suspended
over our devoted heads, or the mighty billows of the Atlantic Ocean?
The whole question rested on the solidity of the granite roof above
us. However, I soon got used to the ideal for the passage now level,
now running down, and still always to the southeast, kept going deeper
and deeper into the profound abysses of Mother Earth.
  Three days later, on the eighteenth day of July, on a Saturday, we
reached a kind of vast grotto. My uncle here paid Hans his usual
six-dollars, and it was decided that the next day should be a day of
rest.

CHAPTER_22
                     CHAPTER 22
                Sunday below Ground
-
  I AWOKE on Sunday morning without any sense of hurry and bustle
attendant on an immediate departure. Though the day to be devoted to
repose and reflection was spent under such strange circumstances,
and in so wonderful a place, the idea was a pleasant one. Besides,
we all began to get used to this kind of existence. I had almost
ceased to think of the sun, of the moon, of the stars, of the trees,
houses, and towns; in fact, about any terrestrial necessities. In
our peculiar position we were far above such reflections.
  The grotto was a vast and magnificent hall. Along its granitic
soil the stream flowed placidly and pleasantly. So great a distance
was it now from its fiery source that its water was scarcely lukewarm,
and could be drunk without delay or difficulty.
  After a frugal breakfast, the Professor made up his mind to devote
some hours to putting his notes and calculations in order.
  "In the first place," he said, "I have a good many to verify and
prove, in order that we may know our exact position. I wish to be able
on our return to the upper regions to make a map of our journey, a
kind of vertical section of the globe, which will be, as it were,
the profile of the expedition."
                                                   {CHAPTER_22 ^paragraph 5}
  "That would indeed be a curious work, Uncle; but can you make your
observations with anything like certainty and precision?"
  "I can. I have never on any occasion failed to note with great
care the angles and slopes. I am certain as to having made no mistake.
Take the compass and examine how she points."
  I looked at the instrument with care.
  "East one quarter southeast."
  "Very good," resumed the Professor, noting the observation, and
going through some rapid calculations. "I make out that we have
journeyed two hundred and fifty miles from the point of our
departure."
                                                  {CHAPTER_22 ^paragraph 10}
  "Then the mighty waves of the Atlantic are rolling over our heads?"
  "Certainly."
  "And at this very moment it is possible that fierce tempests are
raging above, and that men and ships are battling against the angry
blasts just over our heads?"
  "It is quite within the range of possibility," rejoined my uncle,
smiling.
  "And that whales are playing in shoals, thrashing the bottom of
the sea, the roof of our adamantine prison?"
                                                  {CHAPTER_22 ^paragraph 15}
  "Be quite at rest on that point; there is no danger of their
breaking through. But to return to our calculations. We are to the
southeast, two hundred and fifty miles from the base of Sneffels, and,
according to my preceding notes, I think we have gone sixteen
leagues in a downward direction."
  "Sixteen leagues- fifty miles!" I cried.
  "I am sure of it."
  "But that is the extreme limit allowed by science for the
thickness of the earth's crust," I replied, referring to my geological
studies.
  "I do not contravene that assertion," was his quiet answer.
                                                  {CHAPTER_22 ^paragraph 20}
  "And at this stage of our journey, according to all known laws on
the increase of heat, there should be here a temperature of fifteen
hundred degrees of Reaumur."
  "There should be- you say, my boy."
  "In which case this granite would not exist, but be in a state of
fusion."
  "But you perceive, my boy, that it is not so, and that facts, as
usual, are very stubborn things, overruling all theories."
  "I am forced to yield to the evidence of my senses, but I am
nevertheless very much surprised."
                                                  {CHAPTER_22 ^paragraph 25}
  "What heat does the thermometer really indicate?" continued the
philosopher.
  "Twenty-seven six-tenths."
  "So that science is wrong by fourteen hundred and seventy-four
degrees and four-tenths. According to which, it is demonstrated that
the proportional increase in temperature is an exploded error. Humphry
Davy here shines forth in all his glory. He is right, and I have acted
wisely to believe him. Have you any answer to make to this statement?"
  Had I chosen to have spoken, I might have said a great deal. I in no
way admitted the theory of Humphry Davy- I still held out for the
theory of proportional increase of heat, though I did not feel it.
  I was far more willing to allow that this chimney of an extinct
volcano was covered by lava of a kind refractory to heat- in fact a
bad conductor- which did not allow the great increase of temperature
to percolate through its sides. The hot water jet supported my view of
the matter.
                                                  {CHAPTER_22 ^paragraph 30}
  But without entering on a long and useless discussion, or seeking
for new arguments to controvert my uncle, I contented myself with
taking up facts as they were.
  "Well, sir, I take for granted that all your calculations are
correct, but allow me to draw from them a rigorous and definite
conclusion."
  "Go on, my boy- have your say," cried my uncle goodhumoredly.
  "At the place where we now are, under the latitude of Iceland, the
terrestrial depth is about fifteen hundred and eighty-three leagues."
  "Fifteen hundred eighty-three and a quarter."
                                                  {CHAPTER_22 ^paragraph 35}
  "Well, suppose we say sixteen hundred in round numbers. Now, out
of a voyage of sixteen hundred leagues we have completed sixteen."
  "As you say, what then?"
  "At the expense of a diagonal journey of no less than eighty-five
leagues."
  "Exactly."
  "We have been twenty days about it."
                                                  {CHAPTER_22 ^paragraph 40}
  "Exactly twenty days."
  "Now sixteen is the hundredth part of our contemplated expedition.
If we go on in this way we shall be two thousand days, that is about
five years and a half, going down."
  The Professor folded his arms, listened, but did not speak.
  "Without counting that if a vertical descent of sixteen leagues
costs us a horizontal of eighty-five, we shall have to go about
eight thousand leagues to the southeast, and we must therefore come
out somewhere in the circumference long before we can hope to reach
the center."
  "Bother your calculations," cried my uncle in one of his old
rages. "On what basis do they rest? How do you know that this
passage does not take us direct to the end we require? Moreover, I
have in my favor, fortunately, a precedent. What I have undertaken
to do, another has done, and he having succeeded, why should I not
be equally successful?"
                                                  {CHAPTER_22 ^paragraph 45}
  "I hope, indeed, you will, but still, I suppose I may be allowed
to-"
  "You are allowed to hold your tongue," cried Professor Hardwigg,
"when you talk so unreasonably as this."
  I saw at once that the old doctorial Professor was still alive in my
uncle- and fearful to rouse his angry passions, I dropped the
unpleasant subject.
  "Now, then," he explained, "consult the manometer. What does that
indicate?"
  "A considerable amount of pressure."
                                                  {CHAPTER_22 ^paragraph 50}
  "Very good. You see, then, that by descending slowly, and by
gradually accustoming ourselves to the density of this lower
atmosphere, we shall not suffer."
  "Well, I suppose not, except it may be a certain amount of pain in
the ears," was my rather grim reply.
  "That, my dear boy, is nothing, and you will easily get rid of
that source of discomfort by bringing the exterior air in
communication with the air contained in your lungs."
  "Perfectly," said I, for I had quite made up my mind in no wise to
contradict my uncle. "I should fancy almost that I should experience a
certain amount of satisfaction in making a plunge into this dense
atmosphere. Have you taken note of how wonderfully sound is
propagated?"
  "Of course I have. There can be no doubt that a journey into the
interior of the earth would be an excellent cure for deafness."
                                                  {CHAPTER_22 ^paragraph 55}
  "But then, Uncle," I ventured mildly to observe, "this density
will continue to increase."
  "Yes- according to a law which, however, is scarcely defined. It
is true that the intensity of weight will diminish just in
proportion to the depth to which we go. You know very well that it
is on the surface of the earth that its action is most powerfully
felt, while on the contrary, in the very center of the earth bodies
cease to have any weight at all."
  "I know that is the case, but as we progress will not the atmosphere
finally assume the density of water?"
  "I know it; when placed under the pressure of seven hundred and
ten atmospheres," cried my uncle with imperturbable gravity.
  "And when we are still lower down?" I asked with natural anxiety.
                                                  {CHAPTER_22 ^paragraph 60}
  "Well, lower down, the density will become even greater."
  "Then how shall we be able to make our way through this
atmospheric fog?"
  "Well, my worthy nephew, we must ballast ourselves by filling our
pockets with stones," said Professor Hardwigg.
  "Faith, Uncle, you have an answer for everything," was my only
reply.
  I began to feel that it was unwise of me to go any farther into
the wide field of hypotheses for I should certainly have revived
some difficulty, or rather impossibility, that would have enraged
the Professor.
                                                  {CHAPTER_22 ^paragraph 65}
  It was evident, nevertheless, that the air under a pressure which
might be multiplied by thousands of atmospheres, would end by becoming
perfectly solid, and that then admitting our bodies resisted the
pressure, we should have to stop, in spite of all the reasonings in
the world. Facts overcome all arguments.
  But I thought it best not to urge this argument. My uncle would
simply have quoted the example of Saknussemm. Supposing the learned
Icelander's journey ever really to have taken place- there was one
simple answer to be made:
  In the sixteenth century neither the barometer nor the manometer had
been invented- how, then, could Saknussemm have been able to
discover when he did reach the center of the earth?
  This unanswerable and learned objection I, however, kept to myself
and, bracing up my courage, awaited the course of events-little
aware of how adventurous yet were to be the incidents of our
remarkable journey.
  The rest of this day of leisure and repose was spent in
calculation and conversation. I made it a point to agree with the
Professor in everything; but I envied the perfect indifference of
Hans, who, without taking any such trouble about the cause and effect,
went blindly onwards wherever destiny chose to lead him.

CHAPTER_23
                     CHAPTER 23
                        Alone
-
  IT must in all truth be confessed, things as yet had gone on well,
and I should have acted in bad taste to have complained. If the true
medium of our difficulties did not increase, it was within the range
of possibility that we might ultimately reach the end of our
journey. Then what glory would be ours! I began in the newly aroused
ardor of my soul to speak enthusiastically to the Professor. Well, was
I serious? The whole state in which we existed was a mystery- and it
was impossible to know whether or not I was in earnest.
  For several days after our memorable halt, the slopes became more
rapid- some were even of a most frightful character- almost
vertical, so that we were forever going down into the solid interior
mass. During some days, we actually descended a league and a half,
even two leagues towards the center of the earth. The descents were
sufficiently perilous, and while we were engaged in them we learned
fully to appreciate the marvelous coolness of our guide, Hans. Without
him we should have been wholly lost. The grave and impassible
Icelander devoted himself to us with the most incomprehensible
sang-froid and ease; and, thanks to him, many a dangerous pass was got
over, where, but for him, we should inevitably have stuck fast.
  His silence increased every day. I think that we began to be
influenced by this peculiar trait in his character. It is certain that
the inanimate objects by which you are surrounded have a direct action
on the brain. It must be that a man who shuts himself up between
four walls must lose the faculty of associating ideas and words. How
many persons condemned to the horrors of solitary confinement have
gone mad- simply because the thinking faculties have lain dormant!
  During the two weeks that followed our last interesting
conversation, there occurred nothing worthy of being especially
recorded.
                                                   {CHAPTER_23 ^paragraph 5}
  I have, while writing these memoirs, taxed my memory in vain for one
incident of travel during this particular period.
  But the next event to be related is terrible indeed. Its very
memory, even now, makes my soul shudder, and my blood run cold.
  It was on the seventh of August. Our constant and successive
descents had taken us quite thirty leagues into the interior of the
earth, that is to say that there were above us thirty leagues,
nearly a hundred miles, of rocks, and oceans, and continents, and
towns, to say nothing of living inhabitants. We were in a
southeasterly direction, about two hundred leagues from Iceland.
  On that memorable day the tunnel had begun to assume an almost
horizontal course.
  I was on this occasion walking on in front. My uncle had charge of
one of the Ruhmkorff coils, I had possession of the other. By means of
its light I was busy examining the different layers of granite. I
was completely absorbed in my work.
                                                  {CHAPTER_23 ^paragraph 10}
  Suddenly halting and turning round, I found that I was alone!
  "Well," thought I to myself, "I have certainly been walking too
fast- or else Hans and my uncle have stopped to rest. The best thing I
can do is to go back and find them. Luckily, there is very little
ascent to tire me."
  I accordingly retraced my steps and, while doing so, walked for at
least a quarter of an hour. Rather uneasy, I paused and looked eagerly
around. Not a living soul. I called aloud. No reply. My voice was lost
amid the myriad cavernous echoes it aroused!
  I began for the first time to feel seriously uneasy. A cold shiver
shook my whole body, and perspiration, chill and terrible, burst
upon my skin.
  "I must be calm," I said, speaking aloud, as boys whistle to drive
away fear. "There can be no doubt that I shall find my companions.
There cannot be two roads. It is certain that I was considerably
ahead; all I have to do is to go back."
                                                  {CHAPTER_23 ^paragraph 15}
  Having come to this determination I ascended the tunnel for at least
half an hour, unable to decide if I had ever seen certain landmarks
before. Every now and then I paused to discover if any loud appeal was
made to me, well knowing that in that dense and intensified atmosphere
I should hear it a long way off. But no. The most extraordinary
silence reigned in this immense gallery. Only the echoes of my own
footsteps could be heard.
  At last I stopped. I could scarcely realize the fact of my
isolation. I was quite willing to think that I had made a mistake, but
not that I was lost. If I had made a mistake, I might find my way;
if lost- I shuddered to think of it.
  "Come, come," said I to myself, "since there is only one road, and
they must come by it, we shall at last meet. All I have to do is still
to go upwards. Perhaps, however, not seeing me, and forgetting I was
ahead, they may have gone back in search of me. Still, even in this
case, if I make haste, I shall get up to them. There can be no doubt
about the matter."
  But as I spoke these last words aloud, it would have been quite
clear to any listener- had there been one- that I was by no means
convinced of the fact. Moreover in order to associate together these
simple ideas and to reunite them under the form of reasoning, required
some time. I could not all at once bring my brain to think.
  Then another dread doubt fell upon my soul. After all, was I
ahead? Of course I was. Hans was no doubt following behind preceded by
my uncle. I perfectly recollected his having stopped for a moment to
strap his baggage on his shoulder. I now remembered this trifling
detail. It was, I believe, just at that very moment that I had
determined to continue My route.
                                                  {CHAPTER_23 ^paragraph 20}
  "Again," thought I, reasoning as calmly as was possible, "there is
another sure means of not losing my way, a thread to guide me
through the labyrinthine subterraneous retreat- one which I had
forgotten- my faithful river."
  This course of reasoning roused my drooping spirits, and I
resolved to resume my journey without further delay. No time was to be
lost.
  It was at this moment that I had reason to bless the
thoughtfulness of my uncle, when he refused to allow the eider
hunter to close the orifices of the hot spring- that small fissure
in the great mass of granite. This beneficent spring after having
saved us from thirst during so many days would now enable me to regain
the right road.
  Having come to this mental decision, I made up my mind, before I
started upwards, that ablution would certainly do me a great deal of
good.
  I stopped to plunge my hands and forehead in the pleasant water of
the Hansbach stream, blessing its presence as a certain consolation.
                                                  {CHAPTER_23 ^paragraph 25}
  Conceive my horror and stupefaction!- I was treading a hard,
dusty, shingly road of granite. The stream on which I reckoned had
wholly disappeared!

CHAPTER_24
                     CHAPTER 24
                        Lost!
-
  NO words in any human language can depict my utter despair. I was
literally buried alive; with no other expectation before me but to die
in all the slow horrible torture of hunger and thirst.
  Mechanically I crawled about, feeling the dry and arid rock. Never
to my fancy had I ever felt anything so dry.
  But, I frantically asked myself, how had I lost the course of the
flowing stream? There could be no doubt it had ceased to flow in the
gallery in which I now was. Now I began to understand the cause of the
strange silence which prevailed when last I tried if any appeal from
my companions might perchance reach my ear.
  It so happened that when I first took an imprudent step in the wrong
direction, I did not perceive the absence of the all-important stream.
                                                   {CHAPTER_24 ^paragraph 5}
  It was now quite evident that when we halted, another tunnel must
have received the waters of the little torrent, and that I had
unconsciously entered a different gallery. To what unknown depths
had my companions gone? Where was I?
  How to get back! Clue or landmark there was absolutely none! My feet
left no signs on the granite and shingle. My brain throbbed with agony
as I tried to discover the solution of this terrible problem. My
situation, after all sophistry and reflection, had finally to be
summed up in three awful words-
  Lost! Lost!! LOST!!!
  Lost at a depth which, to my finite understanding, appeared to be
immeasurable.
  These thirty leagues of the crust of the earth weighed upon my
shoulders like the globe on the shoulders of Atlas. I felt myself
crushed by the awful weight. It was indeed a position to drive the
sanest man to madness!
                                                  {CHAPTER_24 ^paragraph 10}
  I tried to bring my thoughts back to the things of the world so long
forgotten. It was with the greatest difficulty that I succeeded in
doing so. Hamburg, the house on the Konigstrasse, my dear cousin
Gretchen- all that world which had before vanished like a shadow
floated before my now vivid imagination.
  There they were before me, but how unreal. Under the influence of
a terrible hallucination I saw all the incidents of our journey pass
before me like the scenes of a panorama. The ship and its inmates,
Iceland, M. Fridriksson, and the great summit of Mount Sneffels! I
said to myself that, if in my position I retained the most faint and
shadowy outline of a hope, it would be a sure sign of approaching
delirium. It were better to give way wholly to despair!
  In fact, did I but reason with calmness and philosophy, what human
power was there in existence able to take me back to the surface of
the earth, and ready, too, to split asunder, to rend in twain those
huge and mighty vaults which stand above my head? Who could enable
me to find my road- and regain my companions?
  Insensate folly and madness to entertain even a shadow of hope!
  "Oh, Uncle!" was my despairing cry.
                                                  {CHAPTER_24 ^paragraph 15}
  This was the only word of reproach which came to my lips; for I
thoroughly understood how deeply and sorrowfully the worthy
Professor would regret my loss, and how in his turn he would patiently
seek for me.
  When I at last began to resign myself to the fact that no further
aid was to be expected from man, and knowing that I was utterly
powerless to do anything for my own salvation, I kneeled with
earnest fervor and asked assistance from Heaven. The remembrance of my
innocent childhood, the memory of my mother, known only in my infancy,
came welling forth from my heart. I had recourse to prayer. And little
as I had a right to be remembered by Him whom I had forgotten in the
hour of prosperity, and whom I so tardily invoked, I prayed
earnestly and sincerely.
  This renewal of my youthful faith brought about a much greater
amount of calm, and I was enabled to concentrate all my strength and
intelligence on the terrible realities of my unprecedented situation.
  I had about me that which I had at first wholly forgotten- three
days' provisions. Moreover, my water bottle was quite full.
Nevertheless, the one thing which it was impossible to do was to
remain alone. Try to find my companions I must, at any price. But
which course should I take? Should I go upwards, or again descend?
Doubtless it was right to retrace my steps in an upward direction.
  By doing this with care and coolness, I must reach the point where I
had turned away from the rippling stream. I must find the fatal
bifurcation or fork. Once at this spot, once the river at my feet, I
could, at all events, regain the awful crater of Mount Sneffels. Why
had I not thought of this before? This, at last, was a reasonable hope
of safety. The most important thing, then, to be done was to
discover the bed of the Hansbach.
                                                  {CHAPTER_24 ^paragraph 20}
  After a slight meal and a draught of water, I rose like a giant
refreshed. Leaning heavily on my pole, I began the ascent of the
gallery. The slope was very rapid and rather difficult. But I advanced
hopefully and carefully, like a man who at last is making his way
out of a forest, and knows there is only one road to follow.
  During one whole hour nothing happened to check my progress. As I
advanced, I tried to recollect the shape of the tunnel- to recall to
my memory certain projections of rocks- to persuade myself that I
had followed certain winding routes before. But no one particular sign
could I bring to mind, and I was soon forced to allow that this
gallery would never take me back to the point at which I had separated
myself from my companions. It was absolutely without issue- a mere
blind alley in the earth.
  The moment at length came when, facing the solid rock, I knew my
fate, and fell inanimate on the arid floor!
  To describe the horrible state of despair and fear into which I then
fell would now be vain and impossible. My last hope, the courage which
had sustained me, drooped before the sight of this pitiless granite
rock!
  Lost in a vast labyrinth, the sinuosities of which spread in every
direction, without guide, clue or compass, I knew it was a vain and
useless task to attempt flight. All that remained to me was to lie
down and die. To lie down and die the most cruel and horrible of
deaths!
                                                  {CHAPTER_24 ^paragraph 25}
  In my state of mind, the idea came into my head that one day
perhaps, when my fossil bones were found, their discovery so far below
the level of the earth might give rise to solemn and interesting
scientific discussions.
  I tried to cry aloud, but hoarse, hollow, and inarticulate sounds
alone could make themselves heard through my parched lips. I literally
panted for breath.
  In the midst of all these horrible sources of anguish and despair, a
new horror took possession of my soul. My lamp, by falling down, had
got out of order. I had no means of repairing it. Its light was
already becoming paler and paler, and soon would expire.
  With a strange sense of resignation and despair, I watched the
luminous current in the coil getting less and less. A procession of
shadows moved flashing along the granite wall. I scarcely dared to
lower my eyelids, fearing to lose the last spark of this fugitive
light. Every instant it seemed to me that it was about to vanish and
to leave me forever- in utter darkness!
  At last, one final trembling flame remained in the lamp; I
followed it with all my power of vision; I gasped for breath; I
concentrated upon it all the power of my soul, as upon the last
scintillation of light I was ever destined to see: and then I was to
be lost forever in Cimmerian and tenebrous shades.
                                                  {CHAPTER_24 ^paragraph 30}
  A wild and plaintive cry escaped my lips. On earth during the most
profound and comparatively complete darkness, light never allows a
complete destruction and extinction of its power. Light is so diffuse,
so subtle, that it permeates everywhere, and whatever little may
remain, the retina of the eye will succeed in finding it. In this
place nothing- the absolute obscurity made me blind in every sense.
  My head was now wholly lost. I raised my arms, trying the effects of
the feeling in getting against the cold stone wall. It was painful
in the extreme. Madness must have taken possession of me. I knew not
what I did. I began to run, to fly, rushing at haphazard in this
inextricable labyrinth, always going downwards, running wildly
underneath the terrestrial crust, like an inhabitant of the
subterranean furnaces, screaming, roaring, howling, until bruised by
the pointed rocks, falling and picking myself up all covered with
blood, seeking madly to drink the blood which dripped from my torn
features, mad because this blood only trickled over my face, and
watching always for this horrid wall which ever presented to me the
fearful obstacle against which I could not dash my head.
  Where was I going? It was impossible to say. I was perfectly
ignorant of the matter.
  Several hours passed in this way. After a long time, having
utterly exhausted my strength, I fell a heavy inert mass along the
side of the tunnel, and lost consciousness.

CHAPTER_25
                     CHAPTER 25
               The Whispering Gallery
-
  WHEN at last I came back to a sense of life and being, my face was
wet, but wet, as I soon knew, with tears. How long this state of
insensibility lasted, it is quite impossible for me now to say. I
had no means left to me of taking any account of time. Never since the
creation of the world had such a solitude as mine existed. I was
completely abandoned.
  After my fall I lost much blood. I felt myself flooded with the
life-giving liquid. My first sensation was perhaps a natural one.
Why was I not dead? Because I was alive, there was something left to
do. I tried to make up my mind to think no longer. As far as I was
able, I drove away all ideas, and utterly overcome by pain and
grief, I crouched against the granite wall.
  I just commenced to feel the fainting coming on again, and the
sensation that this was the last struggle before complete
annihilation- when, on a sudden, a violent uproar reached my ears.
It had some resemblance to the prolonged rumbling voice of thunder,
and I clearly distinguished sonorous voices, lost one after the other,
in the distant depths of the gulf.
  Whence came this noise? Naturally, it was to be supposed from new
phenomena which were taking place in the bosom of the solid mass of
Mother Earth! The explosion of some gaseous vapors, or the fall of
some solid, of the granitic or other rock.
                                                   {CHAPTER_25 ^paragraph 5}
  Again I listened with deep attention. I was extremely anxious to
hear if this strange and inexplicable sound was likely to be
renewed! A whole quarter of an hour elapsed in painful expectation.
Deep and solemn silence reigned in the tunnel. So still that I could
hear the beatings of my own heart! I waited, waited with a strange
kind of hopefulness.
  Suddenly my ear, which leaned accidentally against the wall,
appeared to catch, as it were, the faintest echo of a sound. I thought
that I heard vague, incoherent and distant voices. I quivered all over
with excitement and hope!
  "It must be hallucination," I cried. "It cannot be! it is not true!"
  But no! By listening more attentively, I really did convince
myself that what I heard was truly the sound of human voices. To
make any meaning out of the sound, however, was beyond my power. I was
too weak even to hear distinctly. Still it was a positive fact that
someone was speaking. Of that I was quite certain.
  There was a moment of fear. A dread fell upon my soul that it
might be my own words brought back to me by a distant echo. Perhaps
without knowing it, I might have been crying aloud. I resolutely
closed my lips, and once more placed my ear to the huge granite wall.
                                                  {CHAPTER_25 ^paragraph 10}
  Yes, for certain. It was in truth the sound of human voices.
  I now by the exercise of great determination dragged myself along
the sides of the cavern, until I reached a point where I could hear
more distinctly. But though I could detect the sound, I could only
make out uncertain, strange, and incomprehensible words. They
reached my ear as if they had been spoken in a low tone- murmured,
as it were, afar off.
  At last, I made out the word forlorad repeated several times in a
tone betokening great mental anguish and sorrow.
  What could this word mean, and who was speaking it? It must be
either my uncle or the guide Hans! If, therefore, I could hear them,
they must surely be able to hear me.
  "Help," I cried at the top of my voice; "help, I am dying!"
                                                  {CHAPTER_25 ^paragraph 15}
  I then listened with scarcely a breath; I panted for the slightest
sound in the darkness- a cry, a sigh, a question! But silence
reigned supreme. No answer came! In this way some minutes passed. A
whole flood of ideas flashed through my mind. I began to fear that
my voice, weakened by sickness and suffering, could not reach my
companions who were in search of me.
  "It must be they," I cried; "who else could by any possibility be
buried a hundred miles below the level of the earth?" The mere
supposition was preposterous.
  I began, therefore, to listen again with the most breathless
attention. As I moved my ears along the side of the place I was in,
I found a mathematical point as it were, where the voices appeared
to attain their maximum of intensity. The word forlorad again
distinctly reached my ear. Then came again that rolling noise like
thunder which had awakened me out of torpor.
  "I begin to understand," I said to myself after some little time
devoted to reflection; "it is not through the solid mass that the
sound reaches my ears. The walls of my cavernous retreat are of
solid granite, and the most fearful explosion would not make uproar
enough to penetrate them. The sound must come along the gallery
itself. The place I was in must possess some peculiar acoustic
properties of its own."
  Again I listened; and this time- yes, this time- I heard my name
distinctly pronounced: cast as it were into space.
                                                  {CHAPTER_25 ^paragraph 20}
  It was my uncle, the Professor, who was speaking. He was in
conversation with the guide, and the word which had so often reached
my ears, forlorad, was a Danish expression.
  Then I understood it all. In order to make myself heard, I too
must speak as it were along the side of the gallery, which would carry
the sound of my voice just as the wire carries the electric fluid from
point to point.
  But there was no time to lose. If my companions were only to
remove a few feet from where they stood, the acoustic effect would
be over, my Whispering Gallery would be destroyed. I again therefore
crawled towards the wall, and said as clearly and distinctly as I
could:
  "Uncle Hardwigg."
  I then awaited a reply.
                                                  {CHAPTER_25 ^paragraph 25}
  Sound does not possess the property of traveling with such extreme
rapidity. Besides the density of the air at that depth from light
and motion was very far from adding to the rapidity of circulation.
Several seconds elapsed, which to my excited imagination, appeared
ages; and these words reached my eager ears, and moved my wildly
beating heart:
  "Harry, my boy, is that you?"
  A short delay between question and answer.
  "Yes- yes."
  . . . . . . . . . .
                                                  {CHAPTER_25 ^paragraph 30}
  "Where are you?"
  . . . . . . . . . .
  "Lost!"
  . . . . . . . . . .
  "And your lamp?"
                                                  {CHAPTER_25 ^paragraph 35}
  . . . . . . . . . .
  "Out."
  . . . . . . . . . .
  "But the guiding stream?"
  . . . . . . . . . .
                                                  {CHAPTER_25 ^paragraph 40}
  "Is lost!"
  . . . . . . . . . .
  "Keep your courage, Harry. We will do our best."
  . . . . . . . . . .
  "One moment, my uncle," I cried; "I have no longer strength to
answer your questions. But- for heaven's sake- do you- continue- to
speak- to me!" Absolute silence, I felt, would be annihilation.
                                                  {CHAPTER_25 ^paragraph 45}
  "Keep up your courage," said my uncle. "As you are so weak, do not
speak. We have been searching for you in all directions, both by going
upwards and downwards in the gallery. My dear boy, I had begun to give
over all hope- and you can never know what bitter tears of sorrow
and regret I have shed. At last, supposing you to be still on the road
beside the Hansbach, we again descended, firing off guns as signals.
Now, however, that we have found you, and that our voices reach each
other, it may be a long time before we actually meet. We are
conversing by means of some extraordinary acoustic arrangement of
the labyrinth. But do not despair, my dear boy. It is something gained
even to hear each other."
  While he was speaking, my brain was at work reflecting. A certain
undefined hope, vague and shapeless as yet, made my heart beat wildly.
In the first place, it was absolutely necessary for me to know one
thing. I once more, therefore, leaned my head against the wall,
which I almost touched with my lips, and again spoke.
  "Uncle."
  . . . . . . . . . .
  "My boy?" was his answer after a few moments.
                                                  {CHAPTER_25 ^paragraph 50}
  . . . . . . . . . .
  "It is of the utmost consequence that we should know how far we
are asunder."
  . . . . . . . . . .
  "That is not difficult."
  . . . . . . . . . .
                                                  {CHAPTER_25 ^paragraph 55}
  "You have your chronometer at hand?" I asked.
  . . . . . . . . . .
  "Certainly."
  . . . . . . . . . .
  "Well, take it into your hand. Pronounce my name, noting exactly the
second at which you speak. I will reply as soon as I hear your
words-and you will then note exactly the moment at which my reply
reaches you."
                                                  {CHAPTER_25 ^paragraph 60}
  . . . . . . . . . .
  "Very good; and the mean time between my question and your answer
will be the time occupied by my voice in reaching you."
  . . . . . . . . . .
  "That is exactly what I mean, Uncle," was my eager reply.
  . . . . . . . . . .
                                                  {CHAPTER_25 ^paragraph 65}
  "Are you ready?"
  . . . . . . . . . .
  "Yes."
  . . . . . . . . . .
  "Well, make ready, I am about to pronounce your name," said the
Professor.
                                                  {CHAPTER_25 ^paragraph 70}
  I applied my ear close to the sides of the cavernous gallery, and as
soon as the word "Harry" reached my ear, I turned round and, placing
my lips to the wall, repeated the sound.
  . . . . . . . . . .
  "Forty seconds," said my uncle. "There has elapsed forty seconds
between the two words. The sound, therefore, takes twenty seconds to
ascend. Now, allowing a thousand and twenty feet for every second-
we have twenty thousand four hundred feet- a league and a half and
one-eighth."
  These words fell on my soul like a kind of death knell.
  "A league and a half," I muttered in a low and despairing voice.
                                                  {CHAPTER_25 ^paragraph 75}
  . . . . . . . . . .
  "It shall be got over, my boy," cried my uncle in a cheery tone;
"depend on us."
  . . . . . . . . . .
  "But do you know whether to ascend or descend?" I asked faintly
enough.
  . . . . . . . . . .
                                                  {CHAPTER_25 ^paragraph 80}
  "We have to descend, and I will tell you why. You have reached a
vast open space, a kind of bare crossroad, from which galleries
diverge in every direction. That in which you are now lying must
necessarily bring you to this point, for it appears that all these
mighty fissures, these fractures of the globe's interior, radiate from
the vast cavern which we at this moment occupy. Rouse yourself,
then, have courage and continue your route. Walk if you can, if not
drag yourself along- slide, if nothing else is possible. The slope
must be rather rapid- and you will find strong arms to receive you
at the end of your journey. Make a start, like a good fellow."
  These words served to rouse some kind of courage in my sinking
frame.
  "Farewell for the present, good uncle, I am about to take my
departure. As soon as I start, our voices will cease to commingle.
Farewell, then, until we meet again."
  . . . . . . . . . .
  "Adieu, Harry- until we say Welcome." Such were the last words which
reached my anxious ears before I commenced my weary and almost
hopeless journey.
                                                  {CHAPTER_25 ^paragraph 85}
  This wonderful and surprising conversation which took place
through the vast mass of the earth's labyrinth, these words exchanged,
the speakers being about five miles apart- ended with hopeful and
pleasant expressions. I breathed one more prayer to Heaven, I sent
up words of thanksgiving- believing in my inmost heart that He had led
me to the only place where the voices of my friends could reach my
ears.
  This apparently astounding acoustic mystery is easily explainable by
simple natural laws; it arose from the conductibility of the rock.
There are many instances of this singular propagation of sound which
are not perceptible in its less mediate positions. In the interior
gallery of St. Paul's, and amid the curious caverns in Sicily, these
phenomena are observable. The most marvelous of them all is known as
the Ear of Dionysius.
  These memories of the past, of my early reading and studies, came
fresh to my thoughts. Moreover, I began to reason that if my uncle and
I could communicate at so great a distance, no serious obstacle
could exist between us. All I had to do was to follow the direction
whence the sound had reached me; and logically putting it, I must
reach him if my strength did not fail.
  I accordingly rose to my feet. I soon found, however, that I could
not walk; that I must drag myself along. The slope as I expected was
very rapid; but I allowed myself to slip down.
  Soon the rapidity of the descent began to assume frightful
proportions; and menaced a fearful fall. I clutched at the sides; I
grasped at projections of rocks; I threw myself backwards. All in
vain. My weakness was so great I could do nothing to save myself.
                                                  {CHAPTER_25 ^paragraph 90}
  Suddenly earth failed me.
  I was first launched into a dark and gloomy void. I then struck
against the projecting asperities of a vertical gallery, a perfect
well. My head bounded against a pointed rock, and I lost all knowledge
of existence. As far as I was concerned, death had claimed me for
his own.

CHAPTER_26
                     CHAPTER 26
                 A Rapid Recovery
-
  WHEN I returned to the consciousness of existence, I found myself
surrounded by a kind of semiobscurity, lying on some thick and soft
coverlets. My uncle was watching- his eyes fixed intently on my
countenance, a grave expression on his face, a tear in his eye. At the
first sigh which struggled from my bosom, he took hold of my hand.
When he saw my eyes open and fix themselves upon his, he uttered a
loud cry of loud cry of joy. "He lives! he lives!"
  "Yes, my good uncle," I whispered.
  "My dear boy," continued the grim Professor, clasping me to his
heart, "you are saved!"
  I was deeply and unaffectedly touched by the tone in which these
words were uttered, and even more by the kindly care which accompanied
them. The Professor, however, was one of those men who must be
severely tried in order to induce any display of affection or gentle
emotion. At this moment our friend Hans, the guide, joined us. He
saw my hand in that of my uncle, and I venture to say that, taciturn
as he was, his eyes beamed with lively satisfaction.
                                                   {CHAPTER_26 ^paragraph 5}
  "God dag," he said.
  "Good day, Hans, good day," I replied, in as hearty a tone as I
could assume, "and now, Uncle, that we are together, tell me where
we are. I have lost all idea of our position, as of everything else."
  "Tomorrow, Harry, tomorrow," he replied. "Today you are far too
weak. Your head is surrounded with bandages and poultices that must
not be touched. Sleep, my boy, sleep, and tomorrow you will know all
that you require."
  "But," I cried, let me know what o'clock it is- what day it is?"
  "It is now eleven o'clock at night, and this is once more Sunday. It
is now the ninth of the month of August. And I distinctly prohibit you
from asking any more questions until the tenth of the same."
                                                  {CHAPTER_26 ^paragraph 10}
  I was, if the truth were told, very weak indeed, and my eyes soon
closed involuntarily. I did require a good night's rest, and I went
off reflecting at the last moment that my perilous adventure in the
interior of the earth, in total darkness, had lasted four days!
  On the morning of the next day, at my awakening, I began to look
around me. My sleeping place, made of all our traveling bedding, was
in a charming grotto, adorned with magnificent stalagmites, glittering
in all the colors of the rainbow, the floor of soft and silvery sand.
  A dim obscurity prevailed. No torch, no lamp was lighted, and yet
certain unexplained beams of light penetrated from without, and made
their way through the opening of the beautiful grotto.
  I, moreover, heard a vague and indefinite murmur, like the ebb and
flow of waves upon a strand, and sometimes I verily believed I could
hear the sighing of the wind.
  I began to believe that, instead of being awake, I must be dreaming.
Surely my brain had not been affected by my fall, and all that
occurred during the last twenty-four hours was not the frenzied
visions of madness? And yet after some reflection, a trial of my
faculties, I came to the conclusion that I could not be mistaken. Eyes
and ears could not surely both deceive me.
                                                  {CHAPTER_26 ^paragraph 15}
  "It is a ray of the blessed daylight," I said to myself, "which
has penetrated through some mighty fissure in the rocks. But what is
the meaning of this murmur of waves, this unmistakable moaning of
the salt-sea billows? I can hear, too, plainly enough, the whistling
of the wind. But can I be altogether mistaken? If my uncle, during
my illness, has but carried me back to the surface of the earth! Has
he, on my account, given up his wondrous expedition, or in some
strange manner has it come to an end?"
  I was puzzling my brain over these and other questions, when the
Professor joined me.
  "Good day, Harry," he cried in a joyous tone. "I fancy you are quite
well."
  "I am very much better," I replied, actually sitting up in my bed.
  "I knew that would be the end of it, as you slept both soundly and
tranquilly. Hans and I have each taken turn to watch, and every hour
we have seen visible signs of amelioration."
                                                  {CHAPTER_26 ^paragraph 20}
  "You must be right, Uncle," was my reply, "for I feel as if I
could do justice to any meal you could put before me."
  "You shall eat, my boy, you shall eat. The fever has left you. Our
excellent friend Hans has rubbed your wounds and bruises with I know
not what ointment, of which the Icelanders alone possess the secret.
And they have healed your bruises in the most marvelous manner. Ah,
he's a wise fellow is Master Hans."
  While he was speaking, my uncle was placing before me several
articles of food, which, despite his earnest injunctions, I readily
devoured. As soon as the first rage of hunger was appeased, I
overwhelmed him with questions, to which he now no longer hesitated to
give answers.
  I then learned, for the first time, that my providential fall had
brought me to the bottom of an almost perpendicular gallery. As I came
down, amidst a perfect shower of stones, the least of which falling on
me would have crushed me to death, they came to the conclusion that
I had carried with me an entire dislocated rock. Riding as it were
on this terrible chariot, I was cast headlong into my uncle's arms.
And into them I fell, insensible and covered with blood.
  "It is indeed a miracle," was the Professor's final remark, "that
you were not killed a thousand times over. But let us take care
never to separate; for surely we should risk never meeting again."
                                                  {CHAPTER_26 ^paragraph 25}
  "Let us take care never again to separate."
  These words fell with a sort of chill upon my heart. The journey,
then, was not over. I looked at my uncle with surprise and
astonishment. My uncle, after an instant's examination of my
countenance, said: "What is the matter, Harry?"
  "I want to ask you a very serious question. You say that I am all
right in health?"
  "Certainly you are."
  "And all my limbs are sound and capable of new exertion?" I asked.
                                                  {CHAPTER_26 ^paragraph 30}
  "Most undoubtedly."
  "But what about my head?" was my next anxious question.
  "Well, your head, except that you have one or two contusions, is
exactly where it ought to be- on your shoulders," said my uncle,
laughing.
  "Well, my own opinion is that my head is not exactly right. In fact,
I believe myself slightly delirious."
  "What makes you think so?"
                                                  {CHAPTER_26 ^paragraph 35}
  "I will explain why I fancy I have lost my senses," I cried. "Have
we not returned to the surface of Mother Earth?"
  "Certainly not."
  "Then truly I must be mad, for do I not see the light of day? do I
not hear the whistling of the wind? and can I not distinguish the wash
of a great sea?"
  "And that is all that makes you uneasy?" said my uncle, with a
smile.
  "Can you explain?"
                                                  {CHAPTER_26 ^paragraph 40}
  "I will not make any attempt to explain; for the whole matter is
utterly inexplicable. But you shall see and judge for yourself. You
will then find that geological science is as yet in its infancy- and
that we are doomed to enlighten the world."
  "Let us advance, then," I cried eagerly, no longer able to
restrain my curiosity.
  "Wait a moment, my dear Harry," he responded; "you must take
precautions after your illness before going into the open air."
  "The open air?"
  "Yes, my boy. I have to warn you that the wind is rather violent-
and I have no wish for you to expose yourself without necessary
precautions."
                                                  {CHAPTER_26 ^paragraph 45}
  "But I beg to assure you that I am perfectly recovered from my
illness."
  "Have just a little patience, my boy. A relapse would be
inconvenient to all parties. We have no time to lose- as our
approaching sea voyage may be of long duration."
  "Sea voyage?" I cried, more bewildered than ever.
  "Yes. You must take another day's rest, and we shall be ready to
go on board by tomorrow," replied my uncle, with a peculiar smile.
  "Go on board!" The words utterly astonished me.
                                                  {CHAPTER_26 ^paragraph 50}
  Go on board- what and how? Had we come upon a river, a lake, had
we discovered some inland sea? Was a vessel lying at anchor in some
part of the interior of the earth?
  My curiosity was worked up to the very highest pitch. My uncle
made vain attempts to restrain me. When at last, however, he
discovered that my feverish impatience would do more harm than good-
and that the satisfaction of my wishes could alone restore me to a
calm state of mind- he gave way.
  I dressed myself rapidly- and then taking the precaution to please
my uncle, of wrapping myself in one of the coverlets, I rushed out
of the grotto.

CHAPTER_27
                     CHAPTER 27
                  The Central Sea
-
  AT first I saw absolutely nothing. My eyes, wholly unused to the
effulgence of light, could not bear the sudden brightness; and I was
compelled to close them. When I was able to reopen them, I stood
still, far more stupefied than astonished. Not all the wildest effects
of imagination could have conjured up such a scene! "The sea- the
sea," I cried.
  "Yes," replied my uncle, in a tone of pardonable pride; "the Central
Sea. No future navigator will deny the fact of my having discovered
it; and hence of acquiring a right of giving it a name."
  It was quite true. A vast, limitless expanse of water, the end of
a lake if not of an ocean, spread before us, until it was lost in
the distance. The shore, which was very much indented, consisted of
a beautiful soft golden sand, mixed with small shells, the
long-deserted home of some of the creatures of a past age. The waves
broke incessantly- and with a peculiarly sonorous murmur, to be
found in underground localities. A slight frothy flake arose as the
wind blew along the pellucid waters; and many a dash of spray was
blown into my face. The mighty superstructure of rock which rose above
to an inconceivable height left only a narrow opening- but where we
stood, there was a large margin of strand. On all sides were capes and
promontories and enormous cliffs, partially worn by the eternal
breaking of the waves, through countless ages! And as I gazed from
side to side, the mighty rocks faded away like a fleecy film of cloud.
  It was in reality an ocean, with an the usual characteristics of
an inland sea, only horribly wild- so rigid, cold and savage.
                                                   {CHAPTER_27 ^paragraph 5}
  One thing startled and puzzled me greatly. How was it that I was
able to look upon that vast sheet of water instead of being plunged in
utter darkness? The vast landscape before me was lit up like day.
But there was wanting the dazzling brilliancy, the splendid
irradiation of the sun; the pale cold illumination of the moon; the
brightness of the stars. The illuminating power in this subterranean
region, from its trembling and Rickering character, its clear dry
whiteness, the very slight elevation of its temperature, its great
superiority to that of the moon, was evidently electric; something
in the nature of the aurora borealis, only that its phenomena were
constant, and able to light up the whole of the ocean cavern.
  The tremendous vault above our heads, the sky, so to speak, appeared
to be composed of a conglomeration of nebulous vapors, in constant
motion. I should originally have supposed that, under such an
atmospheric pressure as must exist in that place, the evaporation of
water could not really take place, and yet from the action of some
physical law, which escaped my memory, there were heavy and dense
clouds rolling along that mighty vault, partially concealing the roof.
Electric currents produced astonishing play of light and shade in
the distance, especially around the heavier clouds. Deep shadows
were cast beneath, and then suddenly, between two clouds, there
would come a ray of unusual beauty, and remarkable intensity. And
yet it was not like the sun, for it gave no heat.
  The effect was sad and excruciatingly melancholy. Instead of a noble
firmament of blue, studded with stars, there was above me a heavy roof
of granite, which seemed to crush me.
  Gazing around, I began to think of the theory of the English captain
who compared the earth to a vast hollow sphere in the interior of
which the air is retained in a luminous state by means of
atmospheric pressure, while two stars, Pluto and Proserpine, circled
there in their mysterious orbits. After all, suppose the old fellow
was right!
  In truth, we were imprisoned- bound as it were, in a vast
excavation. Its width it was impossible to make out; the shore, on
either hand, widening rapidly until lost to sight; while its length
was equally uncertain. A haze on the distant horizon bounded our view.
As to its height, we could see that it must be many miles to the roof.
Looking upward, it was impossible to discover where the stupendous
roof began. The lowest of the clouds must have been floating at an
elevation of two thousand yards, a height greater than that of
terrestrial vapors, which circumstance was doubtless owing to the
extreme density of the air.
                                                  {CHAPTER_27 ^paragraph 10}
  I use the word "cavern" in order to give an idea of the place. I
cannot describe its awful grandeur; human language fails to convey
an idea of its savage sublimity. Whether this singular vacuum had or
had not been caused by the sudden cooling of the earth when in a state
of fusion, I could not say. I had read of most wonderful and
gigantic caverns- but, none in any way like this.
  The great grotto of Guachara, in Colombia, visited by the learned
Humboldt; the vast and partially explored Mammoth Cave in Kentucky-
what were these holes in the earth to that in which I stood in
speechless admiration! with its vapory clouds, its electric light, and
the mighty ocean slumbering in its bosom! Imagination, not
description, can alone give an idea of the splendor and vastness of
the cave.
  I gazed at these marvels in profound silence. Words were utterly
wanting to indicate the sensations of wonder I experienced. I
seemed, as I stood upon that mysterious shore, as if I were some
wandering inhabitant of a distant planet, present for the first time
at the spectacle of some terrestrial phenomena belonging to another
existence. To give body and existence to such new sensations would
have required the coinage of new words- and here my feeble brain found
itself wholly at fault. I looked on, I thought, I reflected, I
admired, in a state of stupefaction not altogether unmingled with
fear!
  The unexpected spectacle restored some color to my pallid cheeks.
I seemed to be actually getting better under the influence of this
novelty. Moreover, the vivacity of the dense atmosphere reanimated
my body by inflating my lungs with unaccustomed oxygen.
  It will be readily conceived that after an imprisonment of
forty-seven days, in a dark and miserable tunnel it was with
infinite delight that I breathed this saline air. It was like the
genial, reviving influence of the salt sea waves.
                                                  {CHAPTER_27 ^paragraph 15}
  My uncle had already got over the first surprise.
  With the Latin poet Horace his idea was that-
-
      Not to admire is all the art I know,
      To make man happy and to keep him so.
                                                  {CHAPTER_27 ^paragraph 20}
-
  "Well," he said, after giving me time thoroughly to appreciate the
marvels of this underground sea, "do you feel strong enough to walk up
and down?"
  "Certainly," was my ready answer, "nothing would give me greater
pleasure."
  "Well then, my boy," he said, lean on my arm, and we will stroll
along the beach."
  I accepted his offer eagerly, and we began to walk along the
shores of this extraordinary lake. To our left were abrupt rocks,
piled one upon the other- a stupendous titanic pile; down their
sides leaped innumerable cascades, which at last, becoming limpid
and murmuring streams, were lost in the waters of the lake. Light
vapors, which rose here and there, and floated in fleecy clouds from
rock to rock, indicated hot springs, which also poured their
superfluity into the vast reservoir at our feet.
                                                  {CHAPTER_27 ^paragraph 25}
  Among them I recognized our old and faithful stream, the Hansbach,
which, lost in that wild basin, seemed as if it had been flowing since
the creation of the world.
  "We shall miss our excellent friend I remarked, with a deep sigh.
  "Bah!" said my uncle testily, "what matters it? That or another,
it is all the same."
  I thought the remark ungrateful, and felt almost inclined to say so;
but I forbore.
  At this moment my attention was attracted by an unexpected
spectacle. After we had gone about five hundred yards, we suddenly
turned a steep promontory, and found ourselves close to a lofty
forest! It consisted of straight trunks with tufted tops, in shape
like parasols. The air seemed to have no effect upon these trees-
which in spite of a tolerable breeze remained as still and
motionless as if they had been petrified.
                                                  {CHAPTER_27 ^paragraph 30}
  I hastened forward. I could find no name for these singular
formations. Did they not belong to the two thousand and more known
trees- or were we to make the discovery of a new growth? By no
means. When we at last reached the forest, and stood beneath the
trees, my surprise gave way to admiration.
  In truth, I was simply in the presence of a very ordinary product of
the earth, of singular and gigantic proportions. My uncle
unhesitatingly called them by their real names.
  "It is only," he said, in his coolest manner, "a forest of
mushrooms."
  On close examination I found that he was not mistaken. Judge of
the development attained by this product of damp hot soils. I had
heard that the Lycoperdon giganteum reaches nine feet in
circumference, but here were white mushrooms, nearly forty feet
high, and with tops of equal dimensions. They grew in countless
thousands- the light could not make its way through their massive
substance, and beneath them reigned a gloomy and mystic darkness.
  Still I wished to go forward. The cold in the shades of this
singular forest was intense. For nearly an hour we wandered about in
this visible darkness. At length I left the spot, and once more
returned to the shores of the lake, to light and comparative warmth.
                                                  {CHAPTER_27 ^paragraph 35}
  But the amazing vegetation of subterraneous land was not confined to
gigantic mushrooms. New wonders awaited us at every step. We had not
gone many hundred yards, when we came upon a mighty group of other
trees with discolored leaves- the common humble trees of Mother Earth,
of an exorbitant and phenomenal size: lycopods a hundred feet high;
flowering ferns as tall as pines; gigantic grasses!
  "Astonishing, magnificent, splendid!" cried my uncle; "here we
have before us the whole flora of the second period of the world, that
of transition. Behold the humble plants of our gardens, which in the
first ages of the world were mighty trees. Look around you, my dear
Harry. No botanist ever before gazed on such a sight!"
  My uncle's enthusiasm, always a little more than was required, was
now excusable.
  "You are right, Uncle," I remarked. "Providence appears to have
designed the preservation in this vast and mysterious hothouse of
antediluvian plants, to prove the sagacity of learned men in
figuring them so marvelously on paper."
  "Well said, my boy- very well said; it is indeed a mighty
hothouse. But you would also be within the bounds of reason and common
sense, if you added that it is also a vast menagerie."
                                                  {CHAPTER_27 ^paragraph 40}
  I looked rather anxiously around. If the animals were as exaggerated
as the plants, the matter would certainly be serious.
  "A menagerie?"
  "Doubtless. Look at the dust we are treading under foot- behold
the bones with which the whole soil of the seashore is covered-"
  "Bones," I replied, "yes, certainly, the bones of antediluvian
animals."
  I stooped down as I spoke, and picked up one or two singular
remains, relics of a bygone age. It was easy to give a name to these
gigantic bones, in some instances as big as trunks of trees.
                                                  {CHAPTER_27 ^paragraph 45}
  "Here is, clearly, the lower jawbone of a mastodon," I cried, almost
as warmly and enthusiastically as my uncle; "here are the molars of
the Dinotherium; here is a leg bone which belonged to the Megatherium.
You are right, Uncle, it is indeed a menagerie; for the mighty animals
to which these bones once belonged, have lived and died on the
shores of this subterranean sea, under the shadow of these plants.
Look, yonder are whole skeletons- and yet-"
  "And yet, nephew?" said my uncle, noticing that I suddenly came to a
full stop.
  "I do not understand the presence of such beasts in granite caverns,
however vast and prodigious," was my reply.
  "Why not?" said my uncle, with very much of his old professional
impatience.
  "Because it is well known that animal life only existed on earth
during the secondary period, when the sedimentary soil was formed by
the alluviums, and thus replaced the hot and burning rocks of the
primitive age."
                                                  {CHAPTER_27 ^paragraph 50}
  "I have listened to you earnestly and with patience, Harry, and I
have a simple and clear answer to your objections: and that is, that
this itself is a sedimentary soil."
  "How can that be at such enormous depth from the surface of the
earth?"
  "The fact can be explained both simply and geologically. At a
certain period, the earth consisted only of an elastic crust, liable
to alternative upward and downward movements in virtue of the law of
attraction. It is very probable that many a landslip took place in
those days, and that large portions of sedimentary soil were cast into
huge and mighty chasms."
  "Quite possible," I dryly remarked. "But, Uncle, if these
antediluvian animals formerly lived in these subterranean regions,
what more likely than that one of these monsters may at this moment be
concealed behind one of yonder mighty rocks."
  As I spoke, I looked keenly around, examining with care every
point of the horizon; but nothing alive appeared to exist on these
deserted shores.
                                                  {CHAPTER_27 ^paragraph 55}
  I now felt rather fatigued, and told my uncle so. The walk and
excitement were too much for me in my weak state. I therefore seated
myself at the end of a promontory, at the foot of which the waves
broke in incessant rolls. I looked round a bay formed by projections
of vast granitic rocks. At the extreme end was a little port protected
by huge pyramids of stones. A brig and three or four schooners might
have lain there with perfect ease. So natural did it seem, that
every minute my imagination induced me to expect a vessel coming out
under all sail and making for the open sea under the influence of a
warm southerly breeze.
  But the fantastic illusion never lasted more than a minute. We
were the only living creatures in this subterranean world!
  During certain periods there was an utter cessation of wind, when
a silence deeper, more terrible than the silence of the desert fell
upon these solitary and arid rocks- and seemed to hang like a leaden
weight upon the waters of this singular ocean. I sought, amid the
awful stillness, to penetrate through the distant fog, to tear down
the veil which concealed the mysterious distance. What unspoken
words were murmured by my trembling lips- what questions did I wish to
ask and did not! Where did this sea end- to what did it lead? Should
we ever be able to examine its distant shores?
  But my uncle had no doubts about the matter. He was convinced that
our enterprise would in the end be successful. For my part, I was in a
state of painful indecision- I desired to embark on the journey and to
succeed, and still I feared the result.
  After we had passed an hour or more in silent contemplation of the
wondrous spectacle, we rose and went down towards the bank on our
way to the grotto, which I was not sorry to gain. After a slight
repast, I sought refuge in slumber, and at length, after many and
tedious struggles, sleep came over my weary eyes.

CHAPTER_28
                     CHAPTER 28
                 Launching the Raft
-
  ON the morning of the next day, to my great surprise, I awoke
completely restored. I thought a bath would be delightful after my
long illness and sufferings. So, soon after rising, I went and plunged
into the waters of this new Mediterranean. The bath was cool, fresh
and invigorating.
  I came back to breakfast with an excellent appetite. Hans, our
worthy guide, thoroughly understood how to cook such eatables as we
were able to provide; he had both fire and water at discretion, so
that he was enabled slightly to vary the weary monotony of our
ordinary repast.
  Our morning meal was like a capital English breakfast, with coffee
by way of a windup. And never had this delicious beverage been so
welcome and refreshing.
  My uncle had sufficient regard for my state of health not to
interrupt me in the enjoyment of the meal, but he was evidently
delighted when I had finished.
                                                   {CHAPTER_28 ^paragraph 5}
  "Now then," said he, "come with me. It is the height of the tide,
and I am anxious to study its curious phenomena."
  "What"' I cried, rising in astonishment, "did you say the tide,
Uncle?"
  "Certainly I did."
  "You do not mean to say," I replied, in a tone of respectful
doubt, "that the influence of the sun and moon is felt here below."
  "And pray why not? Are not all bodies influenced by the law of
universal attraction? Why should this vast underground sea be exempt
from the general law, the rule of the universe? Besides, there is
nothing like that which is proved and demonstrated. Despite the
great atmospheric pressure down here, you will notice that this inland
sea rises and falls with as much regularity as the Atlantic itself."
                                                  {CHAPTER_28 ^paragraph 10}
  As my uncle spoke, we reached the sandy shore, and saw and heard the
waves breaking monotonously on the beach. They were evidently rising.
  "This is truly the flood," I cried, looking at the water at my feet.
  "Yes, my excellent nephew," replied my uncle, rubbing his hands with
the gusto of a philosopher, "and you see by these several streaks of
foam that the tide rises at least ten or twelve feet."
  "It is indeed marvelous."
  "By no means," he responded; "on the contrary, it is quite natural."
                                                  {CHAPTER_28 ^paragraph 15}
  "It may appear so in your eyes, my dear uncle," was my reply, "but
all the phenomena of the place appear to me to partake of the
marvelous. It is almost impossible to believe that which I see. Who in
his wildest dreams could have imagined that, beneath the crust of
our earth, there could exist a real ocean, with ebbing and flowing
tides, with its changes of winds, and even its storms! I for one
should have laughed the suggestion to scorn."
  "But, Harry, my boy, why not?" inquired my uncle, with a pitying
smile; "is there any physical reason in opposition to it?
  "Well, if we give up the great theory of the central heat of the
earth, I certainly can offer no reasons why anything should be
looked upon as impossible."
  "Then you will own," he added, "that the system of Sir Humphry
Davy is wholly justified by what we have seen?"
  "I allow that it is- and that point once granted, I certainly can
see no reason for doubting the existence of seas and other wonders,
even countries, in the interior of the globe."
                                                  {CHAPTER_28 ^paragraph 20}
  "That is so- but of course these varied countries are uninhabited?"
  "Well, I grant that it is more likely than not: still, I do not
see why this sea should not have given shelter to some species of
unknown fish."
  "Hitherto we have not discovered any, and the probabilities are
rather against our ever doing so," observed the Professor.
  I was losing my skepticism in the presence of these wonders.
  "Well, I am determined to solve the question. It is my intention
to try my luck with my fishing line and hook."
                                                  {CHAPTER_28 ^paragraph 25}
  "Certainly; make the experiment," said my uncle, pleased with my
enthusiasm. "While we are about it, it will certainly be only proper
to discover all the secrets of this extraordinary region."
  "But, after all, where are we now?" I asked; "all this time I have
quite forgotten to ask you a question, which, doubtless, your
philosophical instruments have long since answered."
  "Well," replied the Professor, "examining the situation from only
one point of view, we are now distant three hundred and fifty
leagues from Iceland."
  "So much?" was my exclamation.
  "I have gone over the matter several times, and am sure not to
have made a mistake of five hundred yards," replied my uncle
positively.
                                                  {CHAPTER_28 ^paragraph 30}
  "And as to the direction- are we still going to the southeast?"
  "Yes, with a western declination* of nineteen degrees, forty-two
minutes, just as it is above. As for the inclination** I have
discovered a very curious fact."
-
  *The declination is the variation of the needle from the true
meridian of a place.
  **Inclination is the dip of the magnetic needle with a tendency to
incline towards the earth.
                                                  {CHAPTER_28 ^paragraph 35}
-
  "What may that be, Uncle? Your information interests me."
  "Why, that the needle instead of dipping towards the pole as it does
on earth, in the northern hemisphere, has an upward tendency."
  "This proves," I cried, "that the great point of magnetic attraction
lies somewhere between the surface of the earth and the spot we have
succeeded in reaching."
  "Exactly, my observant nephew," exclaimed my uncle, elated and
delighted, "and it is quite probable that if we succeed in getting
toward the polar regions- somewhere near the seventy-third degree of
latitude, where Sir James Ross discovered the magnetic pole, we
shall behold the needle point directly upward. We have therefore
discovered by analogy, that this great center of attraction is not
situated at a very great depth."
                                                  {CHAPTER_28 ^paragraph 40}
  "Well," said I, rather surprised, "this discovery will astonish
experimental philosophers. It was never suspected."
  "Science, great, mighty and in the end unerring," replied my uncle
dogmatically, "science has fallen into many errors- errors which
have been fortunate and useful rather than otherwise, for they have
been the steppingstones to truth."
  After some further discussion, I turned to another matter.
  "Have you any idea of the depth we have reached?"
  "We are now," continued the Professor, "exactly thirty-five leagues-
above a hundred miles- down into the interior of the earth."
                                                  {CHAPTER_28 ^paragraph 45}
  "So," said I, after measuring the distance on the map, "we are now
beneath the Scottish Highlands, and have over our heads the lofty
Grampian Hills."
  "You are quite right," said the Professor, laughing; "it sounds very
alarming, the weight being heavy- but the vault which supports this
vast mass of earth and rock is solid and safe; the mighty Architect of
the Universe has constructed it of solid materials. Man, even in his
highest flights of vivid and poetic imagination, never thought of such
things! What are the finest arches of our bridges, what the vaulted
roofs of our cathedrals, to that mighty dome above us, and beneath
which floats an ocean with its storms and calms and tides!"
  "I admire it all as much as you can, Uncle, and have no fear that
our granite sky will fall upon our heads. But now that we have
discussed matters of science and discovery, what are your future
intentions? Are you not thinking of getting back to the surface of our
beautiful earth?"
  This was said more as a feeler than with any hope of success.
  "Go back, nephew," cried my uncle in a tone of alarm, "you are not
surely thinking of anything so absurd or cowardly. No, my intention is
to advance and continue our journey. We have as yet been singularly
fortunate, and henceforth I hope we shall be more so."
                                                  {CHAPTER_28 ^paragraph 50}
  "But," said I, "how are we to cross yonder liquid plain?"
  "It is not my intention to leap into it head foremost, or even to
swim across it, like Leander over the Hellespont. But as oceans are,
after all, only great lakes, inasmuch as they are surrounded by
land, so does it stand to reason, that this central sea is
circumscribed by granite surroundings."
  "Doubtless," was my natural reply.
  "Well, then, do you not think that when once we reach the other end,
we shall find some means of continuing our journey?"
  "Probably, but what extent do you allow to this internal ocean?"
                                                  {CHAPTER_28 ^paragraph 55}
  "Well, I should fancy it to extend about forty or fifty leagues-
more or less."
  "But even supposing this approximation to be a correct one- what
then?" I asked.
  "My dear boy, we have no time for further discussion. We shall
embark tomorrow."
  I looked around with surprise and incredulity. I could see nothing
in the shape of boat or vessel.
  "What!" I cried, "we are about to launch out upon an unknown sea;
and where, if I may ask, is the vessel to carry us?"
                                                  {CHAPTER_28 ^paragraph 60}
  "Well, my dear boy, it will not be exactly what you would call a
vessel. For the present we must be content with a good and solid
raft."
  "A raft," I cried, incredulously, "but down here a raft is as
impossible of construction as a vessel- and I am at a loss to
imagine-"
  "My good Harry- if you were to listen instead of talking so much,
you would hear," said my uncle, waxing a little impatient.
  "I should hear?"
  "Yes- certain knocks with the hammer, which Hans is now employing to
make the raft. He has been at work for many hours."
                                                  {CHAPTER_28 ^paragraph 65}
  "Making a raft?"
  "Yes."
  "But where has he found trees suitable for such a construction?"
  "He found the trees all ready to his hand. Come, and you shall see
our excellent guide at work."
  More and more amazed at what I heard and saw, I followed my uncle
like one in a dream.
                                                  {CHAPTER_28 ^paragraph 70}
  After a walk of about a quarter of an hour, I saw Hans at work on
the other side of the promontory which formed our natural port. A
few minutes more and I was beside him. To my great surprise, on the
sandy shore lay a half-finished raft. It was made from beams of a very
peculiar wood, and a great number of limbs, joints, boughs, and pieces
lay about, sufficient to have constructed a fleet of ships and boats.
  I turned to my uncle, silent with astonishment and awe.
  "Where did all this wood come from?" I cried; "what wood is it?"
  "Well, there is pinewood, fir, and the palms of the northern
regions, mineralized by the action of the sea," he replied,
sententiously.
  "Can it be possible?"
                                                  {CHAPTER_28 ^paragraph 75}
  "Yes," said the learned Professor, "what you see is called fossil
wood."
  "But then," cried I, after reflecting for a moment, "like the
lignites, it must be as hard and as heavy as iron, and therefore
will certainly not float."
  "Sometimes that is the case. Many of these woods have become true
anthracites, but others again, like those you see before you, have
only undergone one phase of fossil transformation. But there is no
proof like demonstration," added my uncle, picking one or two of these
precious waifs and casting them into the sea.
  The piece of wood, after having disappeared for a moment, came to
the surface, and floated about with the oscillation produced by wind
and tide.
  "Are you convinced?" said my uncle, with a self-satisfied smile.
                                                  {CHAPTER_28 ^paragraph 80}
  "I am convinced," I cried, "that what I see is incredible."
  The fact was that my journey into the interior of the earth was
rapidly changing all preconceived notions, and day by day preparing me
for the marvelous.
  I should not have been surprised to have seen a fleet of native
canoes afloat upon that silent sea.
  The very next evening, thanks to the industry and ability of Hans,
the raft was finished. It was about ten feet long and five feet
wide. The beams bound together with stout ropes, were solid and
firm, and once launched by our united efforts, the improvised vessel
floated tranquilly upon the waters of what the Professor had well
named the Central Sea.

CHAPTER_29
                     CHAPTER 29
            On the Waters - A Raft Voyage
-
  ON the thirteenth of August we were up betimes. There was no time to
be lost. We now had to inaugurate a new kind of locomotion, which
would have the advantage of being rapid and not fatiguing.
  A mast, made of two pieces of wood fastened together, to give
additional strength, a yard made from another one, the sail a linen
sheet from our bed. We were fortunately in no want of cordage, and the
whole on trial appeared solid and seaworthy.
  At six o'clock in the morning, when the eager and enthusiastic
Professor gave the signal to embark, the victuals, the luggage, all
our instruments, our weapons, and a goodly supply of sweet water,
which we had collected from springs in the rocks, were placed on the
raft.
  Hans had, with considerable ingenuity, contrived a rudder, which
enabled him to guide the floating apparatus with ease. He took the
tiller, as a matter of course. The worthy man was as good a sailor
as he was a guide and duck hunter. I then let go the painter which
held us to the shore, the sail was brought to the wind, and we made
a rapid offing.
                                                   {CHAPTER_29 ^paragraph 5}
  Our sea voyage had at length commenced; and once more we were making
for distant and unknown regions.
  Just as we were about to leave the little port where the raft had
been constructed, my uncle, who was very strong as to geographic
nomenclature, wanted to give it a name, and among others, suggested
mine.
  "Well," said I, "before you decide I have another to propose."
  "Well; out with it."
  "I should like to call it Gretchen. Port Gretchen will sound very
well on our future map."
                                                  {CHAPTER_29 ^paragraph 10}
  "Well then, Port Gretchen let it be," said the Professor.
  And thus it was that the memory of my dear girl was attached to
our adventurous and memorable expedition.
  When we left the shore the wind was blowing from the northward and
eastward. We went directly before the wind at a much greater speed
than might have been expected from a raft. The dense layers of
atmosphere at that depth had great propelling power and acted upon the
sail with considerable force.
  At the end of an hour, my uncle, who had been taking careful
observations, was enabled to judge of the rapidity with which we
moved. It was far beyond anything seen in the upper world.
  "If," he said, "we continue to advance at our present rate, we shall
have traveled at least thirty leagues in twenty-four hours. With a
mere raft this is an almost incredible velocity."
                                                  {CHAPTER_29 ^paragraph 15}
  I certainly was surprised, and without making any reply went forward
upon the raft. Already the northern shore was fading away on the
edge of the horizon. The two shores appeared to separate more and
more, leaving a wide and open space for our departure. Before me I
could see nothing but the vast and apparently limitless sea- upon
which we floated- the only living objects in sight.
  Huge and dark clouds cast their grey shadows below- shadows which
seemed to crush that colorless and sullen water by their weight.
Anything more suggestive of gloom and of regions of nether darkness
I never beheld. Silvery rays of electric light, reflected here and
there upon some small spots of water, brought up luminous sparkles
in the long wake of our cumbrous bark. Presently we were wholly out of
sight of land; not a vestige could be seen, nor any indication of
where we were going. So still and motionless did we seem without any
distant point to fix our eyes on that but for the phosphoric light
at the wake of the raft I should have fancied that we were still and
motionless.
  But I knew that we were advancing at a very rapid rate.
  About twelve o'clock in the day, vast collections of seaweed were
discovered surrounding us on all sides. I was aware of the
extraordinary vegetative power of these plants, which have been
known to creep along the bottom of the great ocean, and stop the
advance of large ships. But never were seaweeds ever seen, so gigantic
and wonderful as those of the Central Sea. I could well imagine how,
seen at a distance, tossing and heaving on the summit of the
billows, the long lines of algae have been taken for living things,
and thus have been fertile sources of the belief in sea serpents.
  Our raft swept past great specimens of fucus or seawrack, from three
to four thousand feet in length, immense, incredibly long, looking
like snakes that stretched out far beyond our horizon. It afforded
me great amusement to gaze on their variegated ribbon-like endless
lengths. Hour after hour passed without our coming to the
termination of these floating weeds. If my astonishment increased,
my patience was well-nigh exhausted.
                                                  {CHAPTER_29 ^paragraph 20}
  What natural force could possibly have produced such abnormal and
extraordinary plants? What must have been the aspect of the globe,
during the first centuries of its formation, when under the combined
action of heat and humidity, the vegetable kingdom occupied its vast
surface to the exclusion of everything else?
  These were considerations of never-ending interest for the geologist
and the philosopher.
  All this while we were advancing on our journey; and at length night
came; but as I had remarked the evening before, the luminous state
of the atmosphere was in nothing diminished. Whatever was the cause,
it was a phenomenon upon the duration of which we could calculate with
certainty.
  As soon as our supper had been disposed of, and some little
speculative conversation indulged in, I stretched myself at the foot
of the mast, and presently went to sleep.
  Hans remained motionless at the tiller, allowing the raft to rise
and fall on the waves. The wind being aft, and the sail square, all he
had to do was to keep his oar in the center.
                                                  {CHAPTER_29 ^paragraph 25}
  Ever since we had taken our departure from the newly named Port
Gretchen, my worthy uncle had directed me to keep a regular log of our
day's navigation, with instructions to put down even the most minute
particulars, every interesting and curious phenomenon, the direction
of the wind, our rate of sailing, the distance we went; in a word,
every incident of our extraordinary voyage.
  From our log, therefore, I tell the story of our voyage on the
Central Sea.
-
  Friday, August 14th. A steady breeze from the northwest. Raft
progressing with extreme rapidity, and going perfectly straight. Coast
still dimly visible about thirty leagues to leeward. Nothing to be
seen beyond the horizon in front. The extraordinary intensity of the
light neither increases nor diminishes. It is singularly stationary.
The weather remarkably fine; that is to say, the clouds have
ascended very high, and are light and fleecy, and surrounded by an
atmosphere resembling silver in fusion.
  Thermometer, +32 degrees centigrade.
                                                  {CHAPTER_29 ^paragraph 30}
  About twelve o'clock in the day our guide Hans having prepared and
baited a hook, cast his line into the subterranean waters. The bait he
used was a small piece of meat, by means of which he concealed his
hook. Anxious as I was, I was for a long time doomed to
disappointment. Were these waters supplied with fish or not? That
was the important question. No- was my decided answer. Then there came
a sudden and rather hard tug. Hans coolly drew it in, and with it a
fish, which struggled violently to escape.
  "A fish!" cried my uncle.
  "It is a sturgeon!" I cried, "certainly a small sturgeon."
  The Professor examined the fish carefully, noting every
characteristic; and he did not coincide in my opinion. The fish had
a flat head, round body, and the lower extremities covered with bony
scales; its mouth was wholly without teeth, the pectoral fins, which
were highly developed, sprouted direct from the body, which properly
speaking had no tail. The animal certainly belonged to the order in
which naturalists class the sturgeon, but it differed from that fish
in many essential particulars.
  My uncle, after all, was not mistaken. After a long and patient
examination, he said:
                                                  {CHAPTER_29 ^paragraph 35}
  "This fish, my dear boy, belongs to a family which has been
extinct for ages, and of which no trace has ever been found on
earth, except fossil remains in the Devonian strata."
  "You do not mean to say," I cried, "that we have captured a live
specimen of a fish belonging to the primitive stock that existed
before the deluge?"
  "We have," said the Professor, who all this time was continuing
his observations, "and you may see by careful examination that these
fossil fish have no identity with existing species. To hold in one's
hand, therefore, a living specimen of the order, is enough to make a
naturalist happy for life."
  "But," cried I, "to what family does it belong?"
  "To the order of Ganoides- an order of fish having angular scales,
covered with bright enamel- forming one of the family of the
Cephalaspides, of the genus-"
                                                  {CHAPTER_29 ^paragraph 40}
  "Well, sir," I remarked, as I noticed my uncle hesitated to
conclude.
  "To the genus Pterychtis- yes, I am certain of it. Still, though I
am confident of the correctness of my surmise, this fish offers to our
notice a remarkable peculiarity, never known to exist in any other
fish but those which are the natives of subterranean waters, wells,
lakes, in caverns, and suchlike hidden pools."
  "And what may that be?"
  "It is blind."
  "Blind!" I cried, much surprised.
                                                  {CHAPTER_29 ^paragraph 45}
  "Not only blind," continued the Professor, "but absolutely without
organs of sight."
  I now examined our discovery for myself. It was singular, to be
sure, but it was really a fact. This, however, might be a solitary
instance, I suggested. The hook was baited again and once more
thrown into the water. This subterranean ocean must have been
tolerably well supplied with fish, for in two hours we took a large
number of Pterychtis, as well as other fish belonging to another
supposed extinct family- the Dipterides (a genus of fish, furnished
with two fins only, whence the name), though my uncle could not
class it exactly. All, without exception, however, were blind. This
unexpected capture enabled us to renew our stock of provisions in a
very satisfactory way.
  We were now convinced that this subterranean sea contained only fish
known to us as fossil specimens- and fish and reptiles alike were
all the more perfect the farther back they dated their origin.
  We began to hope that we should find some of those saurians which
science has succeeded in reconstructing from bits of bone or
cartilage.
  I took up the telescope and carefully examined the horizon- looked
over the whole sea; it was utterly and entirely deserted. Doubtless we
were still too near the coast.
                                                  {CHAPTER_29 ^paragraph 50}
  After an examination of the ocean, I looked upward, towards the
strange and mysterious sky. Why should not one of the birds
reconstructed by the immortal Cuvier flap his stupendous wings aloft
in the dull strata of subterranean air? It would, of course, find
quite sufficient food from the fish in the sea. I gazed for some
time upon the void above. It was as silent and as deserted as the
shores we had but lately left.
  Nevertheless, though I could neither see nor discover anything, my
imagination carried me away into wild hypotheses. I was in a kind of
waking dream. I thought I saw on the surface of the water those
enormous antediluvian turtles as big as floating islands. Upon those
dull and somber shores passed a spectral row of the mammifers of early
days, the great Liptotherium found in the cavernous hollow of the
Brazilian hills, the Mesicotherium, a native of the glacial regions of
Siberia.
  Farther on, the pachydermatous Lophrodon, that gigantic tapir, which
concealed itself behind rocks, ready to do battle for its prey with
the Anoplotherium, a singular animal partaking of the nature of the
rhinoceros, the horse, the hippopotamus and the camel.
  There was the giant Mastodon, twisting and turning his horrid trunk,
with which he crushed the rocks of the shore to powder, while the
Megatherium- his back raised like a cat in a passion, his enormous
claws stretched out, dug into the earth for food, at the same time
that he awoke the sonorous echoes of the whole place with his terrible
roar.
  Higher up still, the first monkey ever seen on the face of the globe
clambered, gamboling and playing up the granite hills. Still farther
away, ran the Pterodactyl, with the winged hand, gliding or rather
sailing through the dense and compressed air like a huge bat.
                                                  {CHAPTER_29 ^paragraph 55}
  Above all, near the leaden granitic sky, were immense birds, more
powerful than the cassowary and the ostrich, which spread their mighty
wings and fluttered against the huge stone vault of the inland sea.
  I thought, such was the effect of my imagination, that I saw this
whole tribe of antediluvian creatures. I carried myself back to far
ages, long before man existed- when, in fact, the earth was in too
imperfect a state for him to live upon it.
  My dream was of countless ages before the existence of man. The
mammifers first disappeared, then the mighty birds, then the
reptiles of the secondary period, presently the fish, the crustacea,
the mollusks, and finally the vertebrata. The zoophytes of the
period of transition in their turn sank into annihilation.
  The whole panorama of the world's life before the historic period,
seemed to be born over again, and mine was the only human heart that
beat in this unpeopled world! There were no more seasons; there were
no more climates; the natural heat of the world increased unceasingly,
and neutralized that of the great radiant Sun.
  Vegetation was exaggerated in an extraordinary manner. I passed like
a shadow in the midst of brushwood as lofty as the giant trees of
California, and trod underfoot the moist and humid soil, reeking
with a rank and varied vegetation.
                                                  {CHAPTER_29 ^paragraph 60}
  I leaned against the huge column-like trunks of giant trees, to
which those of Canada were as ferns. Whole ages passed, hundreds
upon hundreds of years were concentrated into a single day.
  Next, unrolled before me like a panorama, came the great and
wondrous series of terrestrial transformations. Plants disappeared;
the granitic rocks lost all trace of solidity; the liquid state was
suddenly substituted for that which had before existed. This was
caused by intense heat acting on the organic matter of the earth.
The waters flowed over the whole surface of the globe; they boiled;
they were volatilized, or turned into vapor; a kind of steam cloud
wrapped the whole earth, the globe itself becoming at last nothing but
one huge sphere of gas, indescribable in color, between white heat and
red, as big and as brilliant as the sun.
  In the very center of this prodigious mass, fourteen hundred
thousand times as large as our globe, I was whirled round in space,
and brought into close conjunction with the planets. My body was
subtilized, or rather became volatile, and commingled in a state of
atomic vapor, with the prodigious clouds, which rushed forward like
a mighty comet into infinite space!
  What an extraordinary dream! Where would it finally take me? My
feverish hand began to write down the marvelous details- details
more like the imaginings of a lunatic than anything sober and real.
I had during this period of hallucination forgotten everything- the
Professor, the guide, and the raft on which we were floating. My
mind was in a state of semioblivion.
  "What is the matter, Harry?" said my uncle suddenly.
                                                  {CHAPTER_29 ^paragraph 65}
  My eyes, which were wide opened like those of a somnambulist, were
fixed upon him, but I did not see him, nor could I clearly make out
anything around me.
  "Take care, my boy," again cried my uncle, "you will fall into the
sea."
  As he uttered these words, I felt myself seized on the other side by
the firm hand of our devoted guide. Had it not been for the presence
of mind of Hans, I must infallibly have fallen into the waves and been
drowned.
  "Have you gone mad?" cried my uncle, shaking me on the other side.
  "What- what is the matter?" I said at last, coming to myself.
                                                  {CHAPTER_29 ^paragraph 70}
  "Are you ill, Henry?" continued the Professor in an anxious tone.
  "No- no; but I have had an extraordinary dream. It, however, has
passed away. All now seems well"' I added, looking around me with
strangely puzzled eyes.
  "All right," said my uncle; "a beautiful breeze, a splendid sea.
We are going along at a rapid rate, and if I am not out in my
calculations we shall soon see land. I shall not be sorry to
exchange the narrow limits of our raft for the mysterious strand of
the subterranean ocean."
  As my uncle uttered these words, I rose and carefully scanned the
horizon. But the line of water was still confounded with the
lowering clouds that hung aloft, and in the distance appeared to touch
the edge of the water.

CHAPTER_30
                     CHAPTER 30
              Terrific Saurian Combat
-
  SATURDAY, August 15th. The sea still retains its uniform monotony.
The same leaden hue, the same eternal glare from above. No
indication of land being in sight. The horizon appears to retreat
before us, more and more as we advance.
  My head, still dull and heavy from the effects of my extraordinary
dream, which I cannot as yet banish from my mind.
  The Professor, who has not dreamed, is, however, in one of his
morose and unaccountable humors. Spends his time in scanning the
horizon, at every point of the compass. His telescope is raised
every moment to his eyes, and when he finds nothing to give any clue
to our whereabouts, he assumes a Napoleonic attitude and walks
anxiously.
  I remarked that my uncle, the Professor, had a strong tendency to
resume his old impatient character, and I could not but make a note of
this disagreeable circumstance in my journal. I saw clearly that it
had required all the influence of my danger and suffering, to
extract from him one scintillation of humane feeling. Now that I was
quite recovered, his original nature had conquered and obtained the
upper hand.
                                                   {CHAPTER_30 ^paragraph 5}
  And, after all, what had he to be angry and annoyed about, now
more than at any other time? Was not the journey being accomplished
under the most favorable circumstances? Was not the raft progressing
with the most marvelous rapidity?
  What, then, could be the matter? After one or two preliminary
hems, I determined to inquire.
  "You seem uneasy, Uncle," said I, when for about the hundredth
time he put down his telescope and walked up and down, muttering to
himself.
  "No, I am not uneasy," he replied in a dry harsh tone, "by no
means."
  "Perhaps I should have said impatient," I replied, softening the
force of my remark.
                                                  {CHAPTER_30 ^paragraph 10}
  "Enough to make me so, I think."
  "And yet we are advancing at a rate seldom attained by a raft," I
remarked.
  "What matters that?" cried my uncle. "I am not vexed at the rate
we go at, but I am annoyed to find the sea so much vaster than I
expected."
  I then recollected that the Professor, before our departure, had
estimated the length of this subterranean ocean as at most about
thirty leagues. Now we had traveled at least over thrice that distance
without discovering any trace of the distant shore. I began to
understand my uncle's anger.
  "We are not going down," suddenly exclaimed the Professor. "We are
not progressing with our great discoveries. All this is utter loss
of time. After all, I did not come from home to undertake a party of
pleasure. This voyage on a raft over a pond annoys and wearies me."
                                                  {CHAPTER_30 ^paragraph 15}
  He called this adventurous journey a party of pleasure, and this
great inland sea a pond!
  "But," argued I, "if we have followed the route indicated by the
great Saknussemm, we cannot be going far wrong."
  "'That is the question,' as the great, the immortal Shakespeare, has
it. Are we following the route indicated by that wondrous sage? Did
Saknussemm ever fall in with this great sheet of water? If he did, did
he cross it? I begin to fear that the rivulet we adopted for a guide
has led us wrong."
  "In any case, we can never regret having come thus far. It is
worth the whole journey to have enjoyed this magnificent spectacle- it
is something to have seen."
  "I care nothing about seeing, nor about magnificent spectacles. I
came down into the interior of the earth with an object, and that
object I mean to attain. Don't talk to me about admiring scenery, or
any other sentimental trash."
                                                  {CHAPTER_30 ^paragraph 20}
  After this I thought it well to hold my tongue, and allow the
Professor to bite his lips until the blood came, without further
remark.
  At six o'clock in the evening, our matter-of-fact guide, Hans, asked
for his week's salary, and receiving his three rix-dollars, put them
carefully in his pocket. He was perfectly contented and satisfied.
-
  Sunday, August 16th. Nothing new to record. The same weather as
before. The wind has a slight tendency to freshen up, with signs of an
approaching gale. When I awoke, My first observation was in regard
to the intensity of the light. I keep on fearing, day after day,
that the extraordinary electric phenomenon should become first
obscured, and then go wholly out, leaving us in total darkness.
Nothing, however, of the kind occurs. The shadow of the raft, its mast
and sails, is clearly distinguished on the surface of the water.
  This wondrous sea is, after all, infinite in its extent. It must
be quite as wide as the Mediterranean- or perhaps even as the great
Atlantic Ocean. Why, after all, should it not be so?
                                                  {CHAPTER_30 ^paragraph 25}
  My uncle has on more than one occasion, tried deep-sea soundings. He
tied the cross of one of our heaviest crowbars to the extremity of a
cord, which he allowed to run out to the extent of two hundred
fathoms. We had the greatest difficulty in hoisting in our novel
kind of lead.
  When the crowbar was finally dragged on board, Hans called my
attention to some singular marks upon its surface. The piece of
iron looked as if it had been crushed between two very hard
substances.
  I looked at our worthy guide with an inquiring glance.
  "Tander," said he.
  Of course I was at a loss to understand. I turned round towards my
uncle, absorbed in gloomy reflections. I had little wish to disturb
him from his reverie. I accordingly turned once more towards our
worthy Icelander.
                                                  {CHAPTER_30 ^paragraph 30}
  Hans very quietly and significantly opened his mouth once or
twice, as if in the act of biting, and in this way made me
understand his meaning.
  "Teeth!" cried I, with stupefaction, as I examined the bar of iron
with more attention.
  Yes. There can be no doubt about the matter. The indentations on the
bar of iron are the marks of teeth! What jaws must the owner of such
molars be possessed of! Have well then, come upon a monster of
unknown species, which still exists within the vast waste of waters- a
monster more voracious than a shark, more terrible and bulky than
the whale? I am unable to withdraw my eyes from the bar of iron,
actually half crushed!
  Is, then, my dream about to come true- a dread and terrible reality?
  All day my thoughts were bent upon these speculations, and my
imagination scarcely regained a degree of calmness and power of
reflection until after a sleep of many hours.
                                                  {CHAPTER_30 ^paragraph 35}
  This day, as on other Sundays, we observed as a day of rest and
pious meditation.
-
  Monday, August 17th. I have been trying to realize from memory the
particular instincts of those antediluvian animals of the secondary
period, which succeeding to the mollusca, to the crustacea, and to the
fish, preceded the appearance of the race of mammifers. The generation
of reptiles then reigned supreme upon the earth. These hideous
monsters ruled everything in the seas of the secondary period, which
formed the strata of which the Jura mountains are composed. Nature had
endowed them with perfect organization. What a gigantic structure
was theirs; what vast and prodigious strength they possessed!
  The existing saurians, which include all such reptiles as lizards,
crocodiles, and alligators, even the largest and most formidable of
their class, are but feeble imitations of their mighty sires, the
animals of ages long ago. If there were giants in the days of old,
there were also gigantic animals.
  I shuddered as I evolved from my mind the idea and recollection of
these awful monsters. No eye of man had seen them in the flesh. They
took their walks abroad upon the face of the earth thousands of ages
before man came into existence, and their fossil bones, discovered
in the limestone, have allowed us to reconstruct them anatomically,
and thus to get some faint idea of their colossal formation.
                                                  {CHAPTER_30 ^paragraph 40}
  I recollect once seeing in the great Museum of Hamburg the
skeleton of one of these wonderful saurians. It measured no less
than thirty feet from the nose to the tail. Am I, then, an
inhabitant of the earth of the present day, destined to find myself
face to face with a representative of this antediluvian family? I
can scarcely believe it possible; I can hardly believe it true. And
yet these marks of powerful teeth upon the bar of iron! Can there be a
doubt from their shape that the bite is the bite of a crocodile?
  My eyes stare wildly and with terror upon the subterranean sea.
Every moment I expect one of these monsters to rise from its vast
cavernous depths.
  I fancy that the worthy Professor in some measure shares my notions,
if not my fears, for, after an attentive examination of the crowbar,
he cast his eyes rapidly over the mighty and mysterious ocean.
  "What could possess him to leave the land," I thought, "as if the
depth of this water was of any importance to us. No doubt he has
disturbed some terrible monster in his watery home, and perhaps we may
pay dearly for our temerity."
  Anxious to be prepared for the worst, I examined our weapons, and
saw that they were in a fit state for use. My uncle looked on at me
and nodded his head approvingly. He, too, has noticed what we have
to fear.
                                                  {CHAPTER_30 ^paragraph 45}
  Already the uplifting of the waters on the surface indicates that
something is in motion below. The danger approaches. It comes nearer
and nearer. It behooves us to be on the watch.
-
  Tuesday, August 18th. Evening came at last, the hour when the desire
for sleep caused our eyelids to be heavy. Night there is not, properly
speaking, in this place, any more than there is in summer in the
arctic regions. Hans, however, is immovable at the rudder. When he
snatches a moment of rest I really cannot say. I take advantage of his
vigilance to take some little repose.
  But two hours after I was awakened from a heavy sleep by an awful
shock. The raft appeared to have struck upon a sunken rock. It was
lifted right out of the water by some wondrous and mysterious power,
and then started off twenty fathoms distant.
  "Eh, what is it?" cried my uncle starting up. "Are we shipwrecked,
or what?"
                                                  {CHAPTER_30 ^paragraph 50}
  Hans raised his hand and pointed to where, about two hundred yards
off, a large black mass was moving up and down.
  I looked with awe. My worst fears were realized.
  "It is a colossal monster!" I cried, clasping my hands.
  "Yes," cried the agitated Professor, "and there yonder is a huge sea
lizard of terrible size and shape."
  "And farther on behold a prodigious crocodile. Look at his hideous
jaws, and that row of monstrous teeth. Ha! he has gone."
                                                  {CHAPTER_30 ^paragraph 55}
  "A whale! a whale!" shouted the Professor, "I can see her enormous
fins. See, see, how she blows air and water!"
  Two liquid columns rose to a vast height above the level of the sea,
into which they fell with a terrific crash, waking up the echoes of
that awful place. We stood still- surprised, stupefied,
terror-stricken at the sight of this group of fearful marine monsters,
more hideous in the reality than in my dream. They were of
supernatural dimensions; the very smallest of the whole party could
with ease have crushed our raft and ourselves with a single bite.
  Hans, seizing the rudder which had flown out of his hand, puts it
hard aweather in order to escape from such dangerous vicinity; but
no sooner does he do so, than he finds he is flying from Scylla to
Charybdis. To leeward is a turtle about forty feet wide, and a serpent
quite as long, with an enormous and hideous head peering from out
the waters.
  Look which way we will, it is impossible for us to fly. The
fearful reptiles advanced upon us; they turned and twisted about the
raft with awful rapidity. They formed around our devoted vessel a
series of concentric circles. I took up my rifle in desperation. But
what effect can a rifle ball produce upon the armor scales with
which the bodies of these horrid monsters are covered?
  We remain still and dumb from utter horror. They advance upon us,
nearer and nearer. Our fate appears certain, fearful and terrible.
On one side the mighty crocodile, on the other the great sea
serpent. The rest of the fearful crowd of marine prodigies have
plunged beneath the briny waves and disappeared!
                                                  {CHAPTER_30 ^paragraph 60}
  I am about to fire at any risk and try the effect of a shot. Hans,
the guide, however, interfered by a sign to check me. The two
hideous and ravenous monsters passed within fifty fathoms of the raft,
and then made a rush at one another- their fury and rage preventing
them from seeing us.
  The combat commenced. We distinctly made out every action of the two
hideous monsters.
  But to my excited imagination the other animals appeared about to
take part in the fierce and deadly struggle- the monster, the whale,
the lizard, and the turtle. I distinctly saw them every moment. I
pointed them out to the Icelander. But he only shook his head.
  "Tva," he said.
  "What- two only does he say. Surely he is mistaken, "I cried in a
tone of wonder.
                                                  {CHAPTER_30 ^paragraph 65}
  "He is quite right," replied my uncle coolly and philosophically,
examining the terrible duel with his telescope and speaking as if he
were in a lecture room.
  "How can that be?"
  "Yes, it is so. The first of these hideous monsters has the snout of
a porpoise, the head of a lizard, the teeth of a crocodile; and it
is this that has deceived us. It is the most fearful of all
antediluvian reptiles, the world-renowned Ichthyosaurus or great
fish lizard."
  "And the other?"
  "The other is a monstrous serpent, concealed under the hard
vaulted shell of the turtle, the terrible enemy of its fearful
rival, the Plesiosaurus, or sea crocodile."
                                                  {CHAPTER_30 ^paragraph 70}
  Hans was quite right. The two monsters only, disturbed the surface
of the sea!
  At last have mortal eyes gazed upon two reptiles of the great
primitive ocean! I see the flaming red eyes of the Ichthyosaurus, each
as big, or bigger than a man's head. Nature in its infinite wisdom had
gifted this wondrous marine animal with an optical apparatus of
extreme power, capable of resisting the pressure of the heavy layers
of water which rolled over him in the depths of the ocean where he
usually fed. It has by some authors truly been called the whale of the
saurian race, for it is as big and quick in its motions as our king of
the seas. This one measures not less than a hundred feet in length,
and I can form some idea of his girth when I see him lift his
prodigious tail out of the waters. His jaw is of awful size and
strength, and according to the best-informed naturalists, it does
not contain less than a hundred and eighty-two teeth.
  The other was the mighty Plesiosaurus, a serpent with a
cylindrical trunk, with a short stumpy tail, with fins like a bank
of oars in a Roman galley.
  Its whole body covered by a carapace or shell, and its neck, as
flexible as that of a swan, rose more than thirty feet above the
waves, a tower of animated flesh!
  These animals attacked one another with inconceivable fury. Such a
combat was never seen before by mortal eyes, and to us who did see it,
it appeared more like the phantasmagoric creation of a dream than
anything else. They raised mountains of water, which dashed in spray
over the raft, already tossed to and fro by the waves. Twenty times we
seemed on the point of being upset and hurled headlong into the waves.
Hideous hisses appeared to shake the gloomy granite roof of that
mighty cavern- hisses which carried terror to our hearts. The awful
combatants held each other in a tight embrace. I could not make out
one from the other. Still the combat could not last forever; and woe
unto us, whichsoever became the victor.
                                                  {CHAPTER_30 ^paragraph 75}
  One hour, two hours, three hours passed away, without any decisive
result. The struggle continued with the same deadly tenacity, but
without apparent result. The deadly opponents now approached, now drew
away from the raft. Once or twice we fancied they were about to
leave us altogether, but instead of that, they came nearer and nearer.
  We crouched on the raft ready to fire at them at a moment's
notice, poor as the prospect of hurting or terrifying them was.
Still we were determined not to perish without a struggle.
  Suddenly the Ichthyosaurus and the Plesiosaurus disappeared
beneath the waves, leaving behind them a maelstrom in the midst of the
sea. We were nearly drawn down by the indraft of the water!
  Several minutes elapsed before anything was again seen. Was this
wonderful combat to end in the depths of the ocean? Was the last act
of this terrible drama to take place without spectators?
  It was impossible for us to say.
                                                  {CHAPTER_30 ^paragraph 80}
  Suddenly, at no great distance from us, an enormous mass rises out
of the waters- the head of the great Plesiosaurus. The terrible
monster is now wounded unto death. I can see nothing now of his
enormous body. All that could be distinguished was his serpent-like
neck, which he twisted and curled in all the agonies of death. Now
he struck the waters with it as if it had been a gigantic whip, and
then again wriggled like a worm cut in two. The water was spurted up
to a great distance in all directions. A great portion of it swept
over our raft and nearly blinded us. But soon the end of the beast
approached nearer and nearer; his movements slackened visibly; his
contortions almost ceased; and at last the body of the mighty snake
lay an inert, dead mass on the surface of the now calm and placid
waters.
  As for the Ichthyosaurus, has he gone down to his mighty cavern
under the sea to rest, or will he reappear to destroy us?
  This question remained unanswered. And we had breathing time.

CHAPTER_31
                     CHAPTER 31
                  The Sea Monster
-
  WEDNESDAY, August 19th. Fortunately the wind, which for the
present blows with some violence, has allowed us to escape from the
scene of the unparalleled and extraordinary struggle. Hans with his
usual imperturbable calm remained at the helm. My uncle, who for a
short time had been withdrawn from his absorbing reveries by the novel
incidents of this sea fight, fell back again apparently into a brown
study. His eyes were fixed impatiently on the widespread ocean.
  Our voyage now became monotonous and uniform. Dull as it has become,
I have no desire to have it broken by any repetition of the perils and
adventures of yesterday.
-
  Thursday, August 20th. The wind is now N. N. E., and blows very
irregularly. It has changed to fitful gusts. The temperature is
exceedingly high. We are now progressing at the average rate of
about ten miles and a half per hour.
                                                   {CHAPTER_31 ^paragraph 5}
  About twelve o'clock a distant sound as of thunder fell upon our
ears. I make a note of the fact without even venturing a suggestion as
to its cause. It was one continued roar as of a sea falling over
mighty rocks.
  "Far off in the distance," said the Professor dogmatically, "there
is some rock or some island against which the seal lashed to fury by
the wind, is breaking violently."
  Hans, without saying a word, clambered to the top of the mast, but
could make out nothing. The ocean was level in every direction as
far as the eye could reach.
  Three hours passed away without any sign to indicate what might be
before us. The sound began to assume that of a mighty cataract.
  I expressed my opinion on this point strongly to my uncle. He merely
shook his head. I, however, am strongly impressed by a conviction that
I am not wrong. Are we advancing towards some mighty waterfall which
shall cast us into the abyss? Probably this mode of descending into
the abyss may be agreeable to the Professor, because it would be
something like the vertical descent he is so eager to make. I
entertain a very different opinion.
                                                  {CHAPTER_31 ^paragraph 10}
  Whatever be the truth, it is certain that not many leagues distant
there must be some very extraordinary phenomenon, for as we advance
the roar becomes something mighty and stupendous. Is it in the
water, or in the air?
  I cast hasty glances aloft at the suspended vapors, and I seek to
penetrate their mighty depths. But the vault above is tranquil. The
clouds, which are now elevated to the very summit, appear utterly
still and motionless, and completely lost in the irradiation of
electric light. It is necessary, therefore, to seek for the cause of
this phenomenon elsewhere.
  I examine the horizon, now perfectly calm, pure, and free from all
haze. Its aspect still remains unchanged. But if this awful noise
proceeds from a cataract- if, so to speak in plain English, this
vast interior ocean is precipitated into a lower basin- if these
tremendous roars are produced by the noise of falling waters, the
current would increase in activity, and its increasing swiftness would
give me some idea of the extent of the peril with which we are
menaced. I consult the current. It simply does not exist: there is
no such thing. An empty bottle cast into the water lies to leeward
without motion.
  About four o'clock Hans rises, clambers up the mast, and reaches the
truck itself. From this elevated position his looks are cast around.
They take in a vast circumference of the ocean. At last, his eyes
remain fixed. His face expresses no astonishment, but his eyes
slightly dilate.
  "He has seen something at last," cried my uncle.
                                                  {CHAPTER_31 ^paragraph 15}
  "I think so", I replied.
  Hans came down, stood beside us, and pointed with his right hand
to the south.
  "Der nere," he said.
  "There," replied my uncle.
  And seizing his telescope, he looked at it with great attention
for about a minute, which to me appeared an age. I knew not what to
think or expect.
                                                  {CHAPTER_31 ^paragraph 20}
  "Yes, yes," he cried in a tone of considerable surprise, "there it
is."
  "What?" I asked.
  "A tremendous spurt of water rising out of the waves."
  "Some other marine monster, I cried, already alarmed.
  "Perhaps."
                                                  {CHAPTER_31 ^paragraph 25}
  "Then let us steer more to the westward, for we know what we have to
expect from antediluvian animals," was my eager reply.
  "Go ahead," said my uncle.
  I turned towards Hans. Hans was at the tiller steering with his
usual imperturbable calm.
  Nevertheless, if from the distance which separated us from this
creature, a distance which must be estimated at not less than a
dozen leagues, one could see the column of water spurting from the
blow-hole of the great animal, his dimensions must be something
preternatural. To fly is, therefore, the course to be suggested by
ordinary prudence. But we have not come into that part of the world to
be prudent. Such is my uncle's determination.
  We, accordingly, continued to advance. The nearer we come, the
loftier is the spouting water. What monster can fill himself with such
huge volumes of water, and then unceasingly spout them out in such
lofty jets?
                                                  {CHAPTER_31 ^paragraph 30}
  At eight o'clock in the evening, reckoning as above ground, where
there is day and night, we are not more than two leagues from the
mighty beast. Its long, black, enormous, mountainous body, lies on the
top of the water like an island. But then sailors have been said to
have gone ashore on sleeping whales, mistaking them for land. Is it
illusion, or is it fear? Its length cannot be less than a thousand
fathoms. What, then, is this cetaceous monster of which no Cuvier ever
thought?
  It is quite motionless and presents the appearance of sleep. The sea
seems unable to lift him upwards; it is rather the waves which break
on his huge and gigantic frame. The waterspout, rising to a height
of five hundred feet, breaks in spray with a dull, sullen roar.
  We advance, like senseless lunatics, towards this mighty mass.
  I honestly confess that I was abjectly afraid. I declared that I
would go no farther. I threatened in my terror to cut the sheet of the
sail. I attacked the Professor with considerable acrimony, calling him
foolhardy, mad, I know not what. He made no answer.
  Suddenly the imperturbable Hans once more pointed his finger to
the menacing object: "Holme!"
                                                  {CHAPTER_31 ^paragraph 35}
  "An island!" cried my uncle.
  "An island?" I replied, shrugging my shoulders at this poor
attempt at deception.
  "Of course it is," cried my uncle, bursting into a loud and joyous
laugh.
  "But the waterspout?"
  "Geyser," said Hans.
                                                  {CHAPTER_31 ^paragraph 40}
  "Yes, of course- a geyser," replied my uncle, still laughing, "a
geyser like those common in Iceland. Jets like this are the great
wonders of the country."
  At first I would not allow that I had been so grossly deceived. What
could be more ridiculous than to have taken an island for a marine
monster? But kick as one may, one must yield to evidence, and I was
finally convinced of my error. It was nothing, after all, but a
natural phenomenon.
  As we approached nearer and nearer, the dimensions of the liquid
sheaf of waters became truly grand and stupendous. The island had,
at a distance, presented the appearance of an enormous whale, whose
head rose high above the waters. The geyser, a word the Icelanders
pronounce geysir, and which signifies fury, rose majestically from its
summit. Dull detonations are heard every now and then, and the
enormous jet, taken as it were with sudden fury, shakes its plume of
vapor, and bounds into the first layer of the clouds. It is alone.
Neither spurts of vapor nor hot springs surround it, and the whole
volcanic power of that region is concentrated in one sublime column.
The rays of electric light mix with this dazzling sheaf, every drop as
it falls assuming the prismatic colors of the rainbow.
  "Let us go on shore," said the Professor, after some minutes of
silence.
  It is necessary, however, to take great precaution, in order to
avoid the weight of falling waters, which would cause the raft to
founder in an instant. Hans, however, steers admirably, and brings
us to the other extremity of the island.
                                                  {CHAPTER_31 ^paragraph 45}
  I was the first to leap on the rock. My uncle followed, while the
eider-duck hunter remained still, like a man above any childish
sources of astonishment. We were now walking on granite mixed with
siliceous sandstone; the soil shivered under our feet like the sides
of boilers in which over-heated steam is forcibly confined. It is
burning. We soon came in sight of the little central basin from
which rose the geyser. I plunged a thermometer into the water which
ran bubbling from the center, and it marked a heat of a hundred and
sixty-three degrees!
  This water, therefore, came from some place where the heat was
intense. This was singularly in contradiction with the theories of
Professor Hardwigg. I could not help telling him my opinion on the
subject.
  "Well," said he sharply, "and what does this prove against my
doctrine?
  "Nothing," replied I dryly, seeing that I was running my head
against a foregone conclusion.
  Nevertheless, I am compelled to confess that until now we have
been most remarkably fortunate, and that this voyage is being
accomplished in most favorable conditions of temperature; but it
appears evident, in fact, certain, that we shall sooner or later
arrive at one of those regions where the central heat will reach its
utmost limits, and will go far beyond all the possible gradations of
thermometers.
                                                  {CHAPTER_31 ^paragraph 50}
  Visions of the Hades of the ancients, believed to be in the center
of the earth, floated through my imagination.
  We shall, however, see what we shall see. That is the Professor's
favorite phrase now. Having christened the volcanic island by the name
of his nephew, the leader of the expedition turned away and gave the
signal for embarkation.
  I stood still, however, for some minutes, gazing upon the
magnificent geyser. I soon was able to perceive that the upward
tendency of the water was irregular; now it diminished in intensity,
and then, suddenly, it regained new vigor, which I attributed to the
variation of the pressure of the accumulated vapors in its reservoir.
  At last we took our departure, going carefully round the projecting,
and rather dangerous, rocks of the southern side. Hans had taken
advantage of this brief halt to repair the raft.
  Before we took our final departure from the island, however, I
made some observations to calculate the distance we had gone over, and
I put them down in my journal. Since we left Port Gretchen, we had
traveled two hundred and seventy leagues- more than eight hundred
miles- on this great inland sea; we were, therefore, six hundred and
twenty leagues from Iceland, and exactly under England.

CHAPTER_32
                     CHAPTER 32
             The Battle of the Elements
-
  FRIDAY, August 21st. This morning the magnificent geyser had
wholly disappeared. The wind had freshened up, and we were fast
leaving the neighborhood of Henry's Island. Even the roaring sound
of the mighty column was lost to the ear.
  The weather, if, under the circumstances, we may use such an
expression, is about to change very suddenly. The atmosphere is
being gradually loaded with vapors, which carry with them the
electricity formed by the constant evaporation of the saline waters;
the clouds are slowly but sensibly falling towards the sea, and are
assuming a dark-olive texture; the electric rays can scarcely pierce
through the opaque curtain which has fallen like a drop scene before
this wondrous theater, on the stage of which another and terrible
drama is soon to be enacted. This time it is no fight of animals; it
is the fearful battle of the elements.
  I feel that I am very peculiarly influenced, as all creatures are on
land when a deluge is about to take place.
  The cumuli, a perfectly oval kind of cloud, piled upon the south,
presented a most awful and sinister appearance, with the pitiless
aspect often seen before a storm. The air is extremely heavy; the
sea is comparatively calm.
                                                   {CHAPTER_32 ^paragraph 5}
  In the distance, the clouds have assumed the appearance of
enormous balls of cotton, or rather pods, piled one above the other in
picturesque confusion. By degrees, they appear to swell out, break,
and gain in number what they lose in grandeur; their heaviness is so
great that they are unable to lift themselves from the horizon; but
under the influence of the upper currents of air, they are gradually
broken up, become much darker, and then present the appearance of
one single layer of a formidable character; now and then a lighter
cloud, still lit up from above, rebounds upon this grey carpet, and is
lost in the opaque mass.
  There can be no doubt that the entire atmosphere is saturated with
electric fluid; I am myself wholly impregnated; my hairs literally
stand on end as if under the influence of a galvanic battery. If one
of my companions ventured to touch me, I think he would receive rather
a violent and unpleasant shock.
  About ten o'clock in the morning, the symptoms of the storm became
more thorough and decisive; the wind appeared to soften down as if
to take breath for a renewed attack; the vast funereal pall above us
looked like a huge bag- like the cave of AEolus, in which the storm
was collecting its forces for the attack.
  I tried all I could not to believe in the menacing signs of the sky,
and yet I could not avoid saying, as it were involuntarily:
  "I believe we are going to have bad weather."
                                                  {CHAPTER_32 ^paragraph 10}
  The Professor made me no answer. He was in a horrible, in a
detestable humor- to see the ocean stretching interminably before
his eyes. On hearing my words he simply shrugged his shoulders.
  "We shall have a tremendous storm," I said again, pointing to the
horizon. "These clouds are falling lower and lower upon the sea, as if
to crush it."
  A great silence prevailed. The wind wholly ceased. Nature assumed
a dead calm, and ceased to breathe. Upon the mast, where I noticed a
sort of slight ignis fatuus, the sail hangs in loose heavy folds.
The raft is motionless in the midst of a dark heavy sea- without
undulation, without motion. It is as still as glass. But as we are
making no progress, what is the use of keeping up the sail, which
may be the cause of our perdition if the tempest should suddenly
strike us without warning.
  "Let us lower the sail," I said, "it is only an act of common
prudence."
  "No- no," cried my uncle, in an exasperated tone, "a hundred
times, no. Let the wind strike us and do its worst, let the storm
sweep us away where it will- only let me see the glimmer of some
coast- of some rocky cliffs, even if they dash our raft into a
thousand pieces. No! keep up the sail- no matter what happens."
                                                  {CHAPTER_32 ^paragraph 15}
  These words were scarcely uttered when the southern horizon
underwent a sudden and violent change. The long accumulated vapors
were resolved into water, and the air required to fill up the void
produced became a wild and raging tempest.
  It came from the most distant corners of the mighty cavern. It raged
from every point of the compass. It roared; it yelled; it shrieked
with glee as of demons let loose. The darkness increased and became
indeed darkness visible.
  The raft rose and fell with the storm, and bounded over the waves.
My uncle was cast headlong upon the deck. I with great difficulty
dragged myself towards him. He was holding on with might and main to
the end of a cable, and appeared to gaze with pleasure and delight
at the spectacle of the unchained elements.
  Hans never moved a muscle. His long hair driven hither and thither
by the tempest and scattered wildly over his motionless face, gave him
a most extraordinary appearance- for every single hair was illuminated
by little sparkling sprigs.
  His countenance presents the extraordinary appearance of an
antediluvian man, a true contemporary of the Megatherium.
                                                  {CHAPTER_32 ^paragraph 20}
  Still the mast holds good against the storm. The sail spreads out
and fills like a soap bubble about to burst. The raft rushes on at a
pace impossible to estimate, but still less swiftly than the body of
water displaced beneath it, the rapidity of which may be seen by the
lines which fly right and left in the wake.
  "The sail, the sail!" I cried, making a trumpet of my hands, and
then endeavoring to lower it.
  "Let it alone!" said my uncle, more exasperated than ever.
  "Nej," said Hans, gently shaking his head.
  Nevertheless, the rain formed a roaring cataract before this horizon
of which we were in search, and to which we were rushing like madmen.
                                                  {CHAPTER_32 ^paragraph 25}
  But before this wilderness of waters reached us, the mighty veil
of cloud was torn in twain; the sea began to foam wildly; and the
electricity, produced by some vast and extraordinary chemical action
in the upper layer of cloud, is brought into play. To the fearful
claps of thunder are added dazzling flashes of lightning, such as I
had never seen. The flashes crossed one another, hurled from every
side; while the thunder came pealing like an echo. The mass of vapor
becomes incandescent; the hailstones which strike the metal of our
boots and our weapons are actually luminous; the waves as they rise
appear to be fire-eating monsters, beneath which seethes an intense
fire, their crests surmounted by combs of flame.
  My eyes are dazzled, blinded by the intensity of light, my ears
are deafened by the awful roar of the elements. I am compelled to hold
onto the mast, which bends like a reed beneath the violence of the
storm, to which none ever before seen by mariners bore any
resemblance.
-
  Here my traveling notes become very incomplete, loose and vague. I
have only been able to make out one or two fugitive observations,
jotted down in a mere mechanical way. But even their brevity, even
their obscurity, show the emotions which overcame me.
-
                                                  {CHAPTER_32 ^paragraph 30}
  Sunday, August 23rd. Where have we got to? In what region are we
wandering? We are still carried forward with inconceivable rapidity.
  The night has been fearful, something not to be described. The storm
shows no signs of cessation. We exist in the midst of an uproar
which has no name. The detonations as of artillery are incessant.
Our ears literally bleed. We are unable to exchange a word, or hear
each other speak.
  The lightning never ceases to flash for a single instant. I can
see the zigzags after a rapid dart strike the arched roof of this
mightiest of mighty vaults. If it were to give way and fall upon us!
Other lightnings plunge their forked streaks in every direction, and
take the form of globes of fire, which explode like bombshells over
a beleaguered city. The general crash and roar do not apparently
increase; it has already gone far beyond what human ear can
appreciate. If all the powder magazines in the world were to explode
together, it would be impossible for us to hear worse noise.
  There is a constant emission of light from the storm clouds; the
electric matter is incessantly released; evidently the gaseous
principles of the air are out of order; innumerable columns of water
rush up like waterspouts, and fall back upon the surface of the
ocean in foam.
  Whither are we going? My uncle still lies at full length upon the
raft, without speaking- without taking any note of time.
                                                  {CHAPTER_32 ^paragraph 35}
  The heat increases. I look at the thermometer, to my surprise it
indicates- The exact figure is here rubbed out in my manuscript.
-
  Monday, August 24th. This terrible storm will never end. Why
should not this state of the atmosphere, so dense and murky, once
modified, again remain definitive?
  We are utterly broken and harassed by fatigue. Hans remains just
as usual. The raft runs to the southeast invariably. We have now
already run two hundred leagues from the newly discovered island.
  About twelve o'clock the storm became worse than ever. We are
obliged now to fasten every bit of cargo tightly on the deck of the
raft, or everything would be swept away. We make ourselves fast,
too, each man lashing the other. The waves drive over us, so that
several times we are actually under water.
                                                  {CHAPTER_32 ^paragraph 40}
  We had been under the painful necessity of abstaining from speech
for three days and three nights. We opened our mouths, we moved our
lips, but no sound came. Even when we placed our mouths to each
other's ears it was the same.
  The wind carried the voice away.
  My uncle once contrived to get his head close to mine after
several almost vain endeavors. He appeared to my nearly exhausted
senses to articulate some word. I had a notion, more from intuition
than anything else, that he said to me, "We are lost."
  I took out my notebook, from which under the most desperate
circumstances I never parted, and wrote a few words as legibly as I
could:
  "Take in sail."
                                                  {CHAPTER_32 ^paragraph 45}
  With a deep sigh he nodded his head and acquiesced.
  His head had scarcely time to fall back in the position from which
he had momentarily raised it than a disk or ball of fire appeared on
the very edge of the raft- our devoted, our doomed craft. The mast and
sail are carried away bodily, and I see them swept away to a
prodigious height like a kite.
  We were frozen, actually shivered with terror. The ball of fire,
half white, half azure-colored, about the size of a ten-inch
bombshell, moved along, turning with prodigious rapidity to leeward of
the storm. It ran about here, there, and everywhere, it clambered up
one of the bulwarks of the raft, it leaped upon the sack of
provisions, and then finally descended lightly, fell like a football
and landed on our powder barrel.
  Horrible situation. An explosion of course was now inevitable.
  By heaven's mercy, it was not so.
                                                  {CHAPTER_32 ^paragraph 50}
  The dazzling disk moved on one side, it approached Hans, who
looked at it with singular fixity; then it approached my uncle, who
cast himself on his knees to avoid it; it came towards me, as I
stood pale and shuddering in the dazzling light and heat; it
pirouetted round my feet, which I endeavored to withdraw.
  An odor of nitrous gas filled the whole air; it penetrated to the
throat, to the lungs. I felt ready to choke.
  Why is it that I cannot withdraw my feet? Are they riveted to the
flooring of the raft?
  No.
  The fall of the electric globe has turned all the iron on board into
loadstones- the instruments, the tools, the arms are clanging together
with awful and horrible noise; the nails of my heavy boots adhere
closely to the plate of iron incrustated in the wood. I cannot
withdraw my foot.
                                                  {CHAPTER_32 ^paragraph 55}
  It is the old story again of the mountain of adamant.
  At last, by a violent and almost superhuman effort, I tear it away
just as the ball which is still executing its gyratory motions is
about to run round it and drag me with it- if-
  Oh, what intense stupendous light! The globe of fire bursts- we
are enveloped in cascades of living fire, which flood the space around
with luminous matter.
  Then all went out and darkness once more fell upon the deep! I had
just time to see my uncle once more cast apparently senseless on the
flooring of the raft, Hans at the helm, "spitting fire" under the
influence of the electricity which seemed to have gone through him.
  Whither are we going, I ask? and echo answers, Whither?
                                                  {CHAPTER_32 ^paragraph 60}
  . . . . . . . . . . . . .
  Tuesday, August 25th. I have just come out of a long fainting fit.
The awful and hideous storm still continues; the lightning has
increased in vividness, and pours out its fiery wrath like a brood
of serpents let loose in the atmosphere.
  Are we still upon the sea? Yes, and being carried along with
incredible velocity.
  We have passed under England, under the Channel, under France,
probably under the whole extent of Europe.
  Another awful clamor in the distance. This time it is certain that
the sea is breaking upon the rocks at no great distance. Then-
                                                  {CHAPTER_32 ^paragraph 65}
  . . . . . . . . . . . . . .
  . . . . . . . . . . . . . .

CHAPTER_33
                     CHAPTER 33
                 Our Route Reversed
-
  HERE ends what I call "My Journal" of our voyage on board the
raft, which journal was happily saved from the wreck. I proceed with
my narrative as I did before I commenced my daily notes.
  What happened when the terrible shock took place, when the raft
was cast upon the rocky shore, it would be impossible for me now to
say. I felt myself precipitated violently into the boiling waves,
and if I escaped from a certain and cruel death, it was wholly owing
to the determination of the faithful Hans, who, clutching me by the
arm, saved me from the yawning abyss.
  The courageous Icelander then carried me in his powerful arms, far
out of the reach of the waves, and laid me down upon a burning expanse
of sand, where I found myself some time afterwards in the company of
my uncle, the Professor.
  Then he quietly returned towards the fatal rocks, against which
the furious waves were beating, in order to save any stray waifs
from the wreck. This man was always practical and thoughtful. I
could not utter a word; I was quite overcome with emotion; my whole
body was broken and bruised with fatigue; it took hours before I was
anything like myself.
                                                   {CHAPTER_33 ^paragraph 5}
  Meanwhile, there fell a fearful deluge of rain, drenching us to
the skin. Its very violence, however, proclaimed the approaching end
of the storm. Some overhanging rocks afforded us a slight protection
from the torrents.
  Under this shelter, Hans prepared some food, which, however, I was
unable to touch; and, exhausted by the three weary days and nights
of watching, we fell into a deep and painful sleep. My dreams were
fearful, but at last exhausted nature asserted her supremacy, and I
slumbered.
  Next day when I awoke the change was magical. The weather was
magnificent. Air and sea, as if by mutual consent, had regained
their serenity. Every trace of the storm, even the faintest, had
disappeared. I was saluted on my awakening by the first joyous tones I
had heard from the Professor for many a day. His gaiety, indeed, was
something terrible.
  "Well, my lad," he cried, rubbing his hands together, "have you
slept soundly?
  Might it not have been supposed that we were in the old house on the
Konigstrasse; that I had just come down quietly to my breakfast; and
that my marriage with Gretchen was to take place that very day? My
uncle's coolness was exasperating.
                                                  {CHAPTER_33 ^paragraph 10}
  Alas, considering how the tempest had driven us in an easterly
direction, we had passed under the whole of Germany, under the city of
Hamburg where I had been so happy, under the very street which
contained all I loved and cared for in the world.
  It was a positive fact that I was only separated from her by a
distance of forty leagues. But these forty leagues were of hard,
impenetrable granite!
  All these dreary and miserable reflections passed through my mind,
before I attempted to answer my uncle's question.
  "Why, what is the matter?" he cried. "Cannot you say whether you
have slept well or not?"
  "I have slept very well," was my reply, "but every bone in my body
aches. I suppose that will lead to nothing."
                                                  {CHAPTER_33 ^paragraph 15}
  "Nothing at all, my boy. It is only the result of the fatigue of the
last few days- that is all.
  "You appear- if I may be allowed to say so- to be very jolly this
morning," I said.
  "Delighted, my dear boy, delighted. Was never happier in my life. We
have at last reached the wished-for port."
  "The end of our expedition?" cried I, in a tone of considerable
surprise.
  "No; but to the confines of that sea which I began to fear would
never end, but go round the whole world. We will now tranquilly resume
our journey by land, and once again endeavor to dive into the center
of the earth."
                                                  {CHAPTER_33 ^paragraph 20}
  "My dear uncle," I began, in a hesitating kind of way, "allow me
to ask you one question."
  "Certainly, Harry; a dozen if you think proper."
  "One will suffice. How about getting back?" I asked.
  "How about getting back? What a question to ask. We have not as
yet reached the end of our journey."
  "I know that. All I want to know is how you propose we shall
manage the return voyage?"
                                                  {CHAPTER_33 ^paragraph 25}
  "In the most simple manner in the world," said the imperturbable
Professor. "Once we reach the exact center of this sphere, either we
shall find a new road by which to ascend to the surface, or we shall
simply turn round and go back by the way we came. I have every
reason to believe that while we are traveling forward, it will not
close behind us."
  "Then one of the first matters to see to will be to repair the
raft," was my rather melancholy response.
  "Of course. We must attend to that above all things," continued
the Professor.
  "Then comes the all-important question of provisions," I urged.
"Have we anything like enough left to enable us to accomplish such
great, such amazing, designs as you contemplate carrying out?"
  "I have seen into the matter, and my answer is in the affirmative.
Hans is a very clever fellow, and I have reason to believe that he has
saved the greater part of the cargo. But the best way to satisfy
your scruples is to come and judge for yourself."
                                                  {CHAPTER_33 ^paragraph 30}
  Saying which, he led the way out of the kind of open grotto in which
we had taken shelter. I had almost begun to hope that which I should
rather have feared, and this was the impossibility of such a shipwreck
leaving even the slightest signs of what it had carried as freight.
I was, however, thoroughly mistaken.
  As soon as I reached the shores of this inland sea, I found Hans
standing gravely in the midst of a large number of things laid out
in complete order. My uncle wrung his hands with deep and silent
gratitude. His heart was too full for speech.
  This man, whose superhuman devotion to his employers I not only
never saw surpassed, nor even equaled, had been hard at work all the
time we slept, and at the risk of his life had succeeded in saving the
most precious articles of our cargo.
  Of course, under the circumstances, we necessarily experienced
several severe losses. Our weapons had wholly vanished. But experience
had taught us to do without them. The provision of powder had,
however, remained intact, after having narrowly escaped blowing us all
to atoms in the storm.
  "Well," said the Professor, who was now ready to make the best of
everything, "as we have no guns, all we have to do is to give up all
idea of hunting."
                                                  {CHAPTER_33 ^paragraph 35}
  "Yes, my dear sir, we can do without them, but what about all our
instruments?"
  "Here is the manometer, the most useful of all, and which I gladly
accept in lieu of the rest. With it alone I can calculate the depth as
we proceed; by its means alone I shall be able to decide when we
have reached the center of the earth. Ha, ha! but for this little
instrument we might make a mistake, and run the risk of coming out
at the antipodes!"
  All this was said amid bursts of unnatural laughter.
  "But the compass," I cried, "without that what can we do?"
  "Here it is, safe and sound!" he cried, with real joy, "ah, ah,
and here we have the chronometer and the thermometers. Hans the hunter
is indeed an invaluable man!"
                                                  {CHAPTER_33 ^paragraph 40}
  It was impossible to deny this fact. As far as the nautical and
other instruments were concerned, nothing was wanting. Then on further
examination, I found ladders, cords, pickaxes, crowbars, and
shovels, all scattered about on the shore.
  There was, however, finally the most important question of all,
and that was, provisions.
  "But what are we to do for food?" I asked.
  "Let us see to the commissariat department", replied my uncle
gravely.
  The boxes which contained our supply of food for the voyage were
placed in a row along the strand, and were in a capital state of
preservation; the sea had in every case respected their contents,
and to sum up in one sentence, taking into consideration, biscuits,
salt meat, Schiedam and dried fish, we could still calculate on having
about four months' supply, if used with prudence and caution.
                                                  {CHAPTER_33 ^paragraph 45}
  "Four months," cried the sanguine Professor in high glee. "Then we
shall have plenty of time both to go and to come, and with what
remains I undertake to give a grand dinner to my colleagues of the
Johanneum."
  I sighed. I should by this time have become used to the
temperament of my uncle, and yet this man astonished me more and
more every day. He was the greatest human enigma I ever had known.
  "Now," he, "before we do anything else, we must lay in a stock of
fresh water. The rain has fallen in abundance, and filled the
hollows of the granite. There is a rich supply of water, and we have
no fear of suffering from thirst, which in our circumstances is of the
last importance. As for the raft, I shall recommend Hans to repair
it to the best of his abilities; though I have every reason to believe
we shall not require it again."
  "How is that?" I cried, more amazed than ever at my uncle's style of
reasoning.
  "I have an idea, my dear boy; it is none other than this simple
fact; we shall not come out by the same opening as that by which we
entered."
                                                  {CHAPTER_33 ^paragraph 50}
  I began to look at my uncle with vague suspicion. An idea had more
than once taken possession of me; and this was, that he was going mad.
And yet, little did I think how true and prophetic his words were
doomed to be.
  "And now," he said, "having seen to all these matters of detail,
to breakfast."
  I followed him to a sort of projecting cape, after he had given
his last instructions to our guide. In this original position, with
dried meat, biscuit, and a delicious cup of tea, we made a
satisfactory meal- I may say one of the most welcome and pleasant I
ever remember. Exhaustion, the keen atmosphere, the state of calm
after so much agitation, all contributed to give me an excellent
appetite. Indeed, it contributed very much to producing a pleasant and
cheerful state of mind.
  While breakfast was in hand, and between the sips of warm tea, I
asked my uncle if he had any idea of how we now stood in relation to
the world above.
  "For my part," I added, "I think it will be rather difficult to
determine."
                                                  {CHAPTER_33 ^paragraph 55}
  "Well, if we were compelled to fix the exact spot," said my uncle,
it might be difficult, since during the three days of that awful
tempest I could keep no account either of the quickness of our pace,
or of the direction in which the raft was going. Still, we will
endeavor to approximate to the truth. We shall not, I believe, be so
very far out."
  "Well, if I recollect rightly," I replied, "our last observation was
made at the geyser island."
  "Harry's Island, my boy! Harry's Island. Do not decline the honor of
having named it; given your name to an island discovered by us, the
first human beings who trod it since the creation of the world!"
  "Let it be so, then. At Harry's Island we had already gone over
two hundred and seventy leagues of sea, and we were, I believe,
about six hundred leagues, more or less, from Iceland."
  "Good. I am glad to see that you remember so well. Let us start from
that point, and let us count four days of storm, during which our rate
of traveling must have been very great. I should say that our velocity
must have been about eighty leagues to the twenty-four hours."
                                                  {CHAPTER_33 ^paragraph 60}
  I agreed that I thought this a fair calculation. There were then
three hundred leagues to be added to the grand total.
  "Yes, and the Central Sea must extend at least six hundred leagues
from side to side. Do you know, my boy, Harry, that we have discovered
an inland lake larger than the Mediterranean?"
  "Certainly, and we only know of its extent in one way. It may be
hundreds of miles in length."
  "Very likely."
  "Then," said I, after calculating for some for some minutes, "if
your previsions are right, we are at this moment exactly under the
Mediterranean itself."
                                                  {CHAPTER_33 ^paragraph 65}
  "Do you think so?"
  "Yes, I am almost certain of it. Are we not nine hundred leagues
distant from Reykjavik?"
  "That is perfectly true, and a famous bit of road we have
traveled, my boy. But why we should be under the Mediterranean more
than under Turkey or the Atlantic Ocean can only be known when we
are sure of not having deviated from our course; and of this we know
nothing."
  "I do not think we were driven very far from our course; the wind
appears to me to have been always about the same. My opinion is that
this shore must be situated to the southeast of Port Gretchen."
  "Good- I hope so. It will, however, be easy to decide the matter
by taking the bearings from our departure by means of the compass.
Come along, and we will consult that invaluable invention."
                                                  {CHAPTER_33 ^paragraph 70}
  The Professor now walked eagerly in the direction of the rock
where the indefatigable Hans had placed the instruments in safety.
My uncle was gay and lighthearted; he rubbed his hands, and assumed
all sorts of attitudes. He was to all appearance once more a young
man. Since I had known him, never had he been so amiable and pleasant.
I followed him, rather curious to know whether I had made any
mistake in my estimation of our position.
  As soon as we had reached the rock, my uncle took the compass,
placed it horizontally before him, and looked keenly at the needle.
  As he had at first shaken it to give it vivacity, it oscillated
considerably, and then slowly assumed its right position under the
influence of the magnetic power.
  The Professor bent his eyes curiously over the wondrous
instrument. A violent start immediately showed the extent of his
emotion.
  He closed his eyes, rubbed them, and took another and a keener
survey.
                                                  {CHAPTER_33 ^paragraph 75}
  Then he turned slowly round to me, stupefaction depicted on his
countenance.
  "What is the matter?" said I, beginning to be alarmed.
  He could not speak. He was too overwhelmed for words. He simply
pointed to the instrument.
  I examined it eagerly according to his mute directions, and a loud
cry of surprise escaped my lips. The needle of the compass pointed due
north- in the direction we expected was the south!
  It pointed to the shore instead of to the high seas.
                                                  {CHAPTER_33 ^paragraph 80}
  I shook the compass; I examined it with a curious and anxious eye.
It was in a state of perfection. No blemish in any way explained the
phenomenon. Whatever position we forced the needle into, it returned
invariably to the same unexpected point.
  It was useless attempting to conceal from ourselves the fatal truth.
  There could be no doubt about it, unwelcome as was the fact, that
during the tempest, there had been a sudden slant of wind, of which we
had been unable to take any account, and thus the raft had carried
us back to the shores we had left, apparently forever, so many days
before!

CHAPTER_34
                     CHAPTER 34
                A Voyage of Discovery
-
  IT would be altogether impossible for me to give any idea of the
utter astonishment which overcame the Professor on making this
extraordinary discovery. Amazement, incredulity, and rage were blended
in such a way as to alarm me.
  During the whole course of my Life I had never seen a man at first
so chapfallen; and then so furiously indignant.
  The terrible fatigues of our sea voyage, the fearful dangers we
had passed through, had all, all, gone for nothing. We had to begin
them all over again.
  Instead of progressing, as we fondly expected, during a voyage of so
many days, we had retreated. Every hour of our expedition on the
raft had been so much lost time!
                                                   {CHAPTER_34 ^paragraph 5}
  Presently, however, the indomitable energy of my uncle overcame
every other consideration.
  "So," he said, between his set teeth, "fatality will play me these
terrible tricks. The elements themselves conspire to overwhelm me with
mortification. Air, fire, and water combine their united efforts to
oppose my passage. Well, they shall see what the earnest will of a
determined man can do. I will not yield, I will not retreat even one
inch; and we shall see who shall triumph in this great contest- man or
nature."
  Standing upright on a rock, irritated and menacing, Professor
Hardwigg, like the ferocious Ajax, seemed to defy the fates. I,
however, took upon myself to interfere, and to impose some sort of
check upon such insensate enthusiasm.
  "Listen to me, Uncle," I said, in a firm but temperate tone of
voice, "there must be some limit to ambition here below. It is utterly
useless to struggle against the impossible. Pray listen to reason.
We are utterly unprepared for a sea voyage; it is simply madness to
think of performing a journey of five hundred leagues upon a
wretched pile of beams, with a counterpane for a sail, a paltry
stick for a mast, and a tempest to contend with. As we are totally
incapable of steering our frail craft, we shall become the mere
plaything of the storm, and it is acting the part of madmen if we, a
second time, run any risk upon this dangerous and treacherous
Central Sea."
  These are only a few of the reasons and arguments I put together-
reasons and arguments which to me appeared unanswerable. I was allowed
to go on without interruption for about ten minutes. The explanation
to this I soon discovered. The Professor was not even listening, and
did not hear a word of all my eloquence.
                                                  {CHAPTER_34 ^paragraph 10}
  "To the raft!" he cried in a hoarse voice, when I paused for a
reply.
  Such was the result of my strenuous effort to resist his iron
will. I tried again; I begged and implored him; I got into a
passion; but I had to deal with a will more determined than my own.
I seemed to feel like the waves which fought and battled against the
huge mass of granite at our feet, which had smiled grimly for so
many ages at their puny efforts.
  Hans, meanwhile, without taking part in our discussion, had been
repairing the raft. One would have supposed that he instinctively
guessed at the further projects of my uncle.
  By means of some fragments of cordage, he had again made the raft
seaworthy.
  While I had been speaking, he had hoisted a new mast and sail, the
latter already fluttering and waving in the breeze.
                                                  {CHAPTER_34 ^paragraph 15}
  The worthy Professor spoke a few words to our imperturbable guide,
who immediately began to put our baggage on board and to prepare for
our departure. The atmosphere was now tolerably clear and pure, and
the northeast wind blew steadily and serenely. It appeared likely to
last for some time.
  What, then, could I do? Could I undertake to resist the iron will of
two men? It was simply impossible if even I could have hoped for the
support of Hans. This, however, was out of the question. It appeared
to me that the Icelander had set aside all personal will and identity.
He was a picture of abnegation.
  I could hope for nothing from one so infatuated with and devoted
to his master. All I could do, therefore, was to swim with the stream.
  In a mood of stolid and sullen resignation, I was about to take my
accustomed place on the raft when my uncle placed his hand upon my
shoulder.
  "There is no hurry, my boy," he said, "we shall not start until
tomorrow."
                                                  {CHAPTER_34 ^paragraph 20}
  I looked the picture of resignation to the dire will of fate.
  "Under the circumstances," he said, "I ought to neglect no
precautions. As fate has cast me upon these shores, I shall not
leave without having completely examined them."
  In order to understand this remark, I must explain that though we
had been driven back to the northern shore, we had landed at a very
different spot from that which had been our starting point.
  Port Gretchen must, we calculated, be very much to the westward.
Nothing, therefore, was more natural and reasonable than that we
should reconnoiter this new shore upon which we had so unexpectedly
landed.
  "Let us go on a journey of discovery," I cried.
                                                  {CHAPTER_34 ^paragraph 25}
  And leaving Hans to his important operation, we started on our
expedition. The distance between the foreshore at high water and the
foot of the rocks was considerable. It would take about half an hour's
walking to get from one to the other.
  As we trudged along, our feet crushed innumerable shells of every
shape and size- once the dwelling place of animals of every period
of creation.
  I particularly noticed some enormous shells- carapaces (turtle and
tortoise species) the diameter of which exceeded fifteen feet.
  They had in past ages belonged to those gigantic Glyptodons of the
Pliocene period, of which the modern turtle is but a minute
specimen. In addition, the whole soil was covered by a vast quantity
of stony relics, having the appearance of flints worn by the action of
the waves, and lying in successive layers one above the other. I
came to the conclusion that in past ages the sea must have covered the
whole district. Upon the scattered rocks, now lying far beyond its
reach, the mighty waves of ages had left evident marks of their
passage.
  On reflection, this appeared to me partially to explain the
existence of this remarkable ocean, forty leagues below the surface of
the earth's crust. According to my new, and perhaps fanciful,
theory, this liquid mass must be gradually lost in the deep bowels
of the earth. I had also no doubt that this mysterious sea was fed
by infiltration of the ocean above, through imperceptible fissures.
                                                  {CHAPTER_34 ^paragraph 30}
  Nevertheless, it was impossible not to admit that these fissures
must now be nearly choked up, for if not, the cavern, or rather the
immense and stupendous reservoir, would have been completely filled in
a short space of time. Perhaps even this water, having to contend
against the accumulated subterraneous fires of the interior of the
earth, had become partially vaporized. Hence the explanation of
those heavy clouds suspended over our heads, and the superabundant
display of that electricity which occasioned such terrible storms in
this deep and cavernous sea.
  This lucid explanation of the phenomena we had witnessed appeared to
me quite satisfactory. However great and mighty the marvels of
nature may seem to us, they are always to be explained by physical
reasons. Everything is subordinate to some great law of nature.
  It now appeared clear that we were walking upon a kind of
sedimentary soil, formed like all the soils of that period, so
frequent on the surface of the globe, by the subsidence of the waters.
The Professor, who was now in his element, carefully examined every
rocky fissure. Let him only find an opening and it directly became
important to him to examine its depth.
  For a whole mile we followed the windings of the Central Sea, when
suddenly an important change took place in the aspect of the soil.
It seemed to have been rudely cast up, convulsionized, as it were,
by a violent upheaving of the lower strata. In many places, hollows
here and hillocks there attested great dislocations at some other
period of the terrestrial mass.
  We advanced with great difficulty over the broken masses of
granite mixed with flint, quartz, and alluvial deposits, when a
large field, more even than a field, a plain of bones, appeared
suddenly before our eyes! It looked like an immense cemetery, where
generation after generation had mingled their mortal dust.
                                                  {CHAPTER_34 ^paragraph 35}
  Lofty barrows of early remains rose at intervals. They undulated
away to the limits of the distant horizon and were lost in a thick and
brown fog.
  On that spot, some three square miles in extent, was accumulated the
whole history of animal life- scarcely one creature upon the
comparatively modern soil of the upper and inhabited world had not
there existed.
  Nevertheless, we were drawn forward by an all-absorbing and
impatient curiosity. Our feet crushed with a dry and crackling sound
the remains of those prehistoric fossils, for which the museums of
great cities quarrel, even when they obtain only rare and curious
morsels. A thousand such naturalists as Cuvier would not have sufficed
to recompose the skeletons of the organic beings which lay in this
magnificent osseous collection.
  I was utterly confounded. My uncle stood for some minutes with his
arms raised on high towards the thick granite vault which served us
for a sky. His mouth was wide open; his eyes sparkled wildly behind
his spectacles (which he had fortunately saved), his head bobbed up
and down and from side to side, while his whole attitude and mien
expressed unbounded astonishment.
  He stood in the presence of an endless, wondrous, and
inexhaustibly rich collection of antediluvian monsters, piled up for
his own private and peculiar satisfaction.
                                                  {CHAPTER_34 ^paragraph 40}
  Fancy an enthusiastic lover of books carried suddenly into the
very midst of the famous library of Alexandria burned by the
sacrilegious Omar, and which some miracle had restored to its pristine
splendor! Such was something of the state of mind in which Uncle
Hardwigg was now placed.
  For some time he stood thus, literally aghast at the magnitude of
his discovery.
  But it was even a greater excitement when, darting wildly over
this mass of organic dust, he caught up a naked skull and addressed me
in a quivering voice:
  "Harry, my boy- Harry- this is a human head!"
  "A human head, Uncle!" I said, no less amazed and stupefied than
himself.
                                                  {CHAPTER_34 ^paragraph 45}
  "Yes, nephew. Ah! Mr. Milne- Edwards- ah! Mr. De Quatrefages- why
are you not here where I am- I, Professor Hardwigg!"

CHAPTER_35
                     CHAPTER 35
              Discovery upon Discovery
-
  IN order fully to understand the exclamation made by my uncle, and
his allusions to these illustrious and learned men, it will be
necessary to enter into certain explanations in regard to a
circumstance of the highest importance to paleontology, or the science
of fossil life, which had taken place a short time before our
departure from the upper regions of the earth.
  On the 28th of March, 1863, some navigators under the direction of
M. Boucher de Perthes, were at work in the great quarries of
Moulin-Quignon, near Abbeville, in the department of the Somme, in
France. While at work, they unexpectedly came upon a human jawbone
buried fourteen feet below the surface of the soil. It was the first
fossil of the kind that had ever been brought to the light of day.
Near this unexpected human relic were found stone hatchets and
carved flints, colored and clothed by time in one uniform brilliant
tint of verdigris.
  The report of this extraordinary and unexpected discovery spread not
only all over France, but over England and Germany. Many learned men
belonging to various scientific bodies, and noteworthy among others,
Messrs. Milne-Edwards and De Quatrefages, took the affair very much to
heart, demonstrated the incontestable authenticity of the bone in
question, and became- to use the phrase then recognized in England-
the most ardent supporters of the "jawbone question."
  To the eminent geologists of the United Kingdom who looked upon
the fact as certain- Messrs. Falconer, Buck, Carpenter, and others-
were soon united the learned men of Germany, and among those in the
first rank, the most eager, the most enthusiastic, was my worthy
uncle, Professor Hardwigg.
                                                   {CHAPTER_35 ^paragraph 5}
  The authenticity of a human fossil of the Quaternary period seemed
then to be incontestably demonstrated, and even to be admitted by
the most skeptical.
  This system or theory, call it what you will, had, it is true, a
bitter adversary in M. Elie de Beaumont. This learned man, who holds
such a high place in the scientific world, holds that the soil of
Moulin-Quignon does not belong to the diluvium but to a much less
ancient stratum, and, in accordance with Cuvier in this respect, he
would by no means admit that the human species was contemporary with
the animals of the Quaternary epoch. My worthy uncle, Professor
Hardwigg, in concert with the great majority of geologists, had held
firm, had disputed, discussed, and finally, after considerable talking
and writing, M. Elie de Beaumont had been pretty well left alone in
his opinions.
  We were familiar with all the details of this discussion, but were
far from being aware then that since our departure the matter had
entered upon a new phase. Other similar jawbones, though belonging
to individuals of varied types and very different natures, had been
found in the movable grey sands of certain grottoes in France,
Switzerland, and Belgium; together with arms, utensils, tools, bones
of children, of men in the prime of life, and of old men. The
existence of men in the Quaternary period became, therefore, more
positive every day.
  But this was far from being all. New remains, dug up from the
Pliocene or Tertiary deposits, had enabled the more far-seeing or
audacious among learned men to assign even a far greater degree of
antiquity to the human race. These remains, it is true, were not those
of men; that is, were not the bones of men, but objects decidedly
having served the human race: shinbones, thighbones of fossil animals,
regularly scooped out, and in fact sculptured- bearing the
unmistakable signs of human handiwork.
  By means of these wondrous and unexpected discoveries, man
ascended endless centuries in the scale of time; he, in fact, preceded
the mastodon; became the contemporary of the Elephas meridionalis- the
southern elephant; acquired an antiquity of over a hundred thousand
years, since that is the date given by the most eminent geologists
to the Pliocene period of the earth. Such was then the state of
paleontologic science, and what we moreover knew sufficed to explain
our attitude before this great cemetery of the plains of the
Hardwigg Ocean.
                                                  {CHAPTER_35 ^paragraph 10}
  It will now be easy to understand the Professor's mingled
astonishment and joy when, on advancing about twenty yards, he found
himself in the presence of, I may say face to face with, a specimen of
the human race actually belonging to the Quaternary period!
  It was indeed a human skull, perfectly recognizable. Had a soil of
very peculiar nature, like that of the cemetery of St. Michel at
Bordeaux, preserved it during countless ages? This was the question
I asked myself, but which I was wholly unable to answer. But this head
with stretched and parchmenty skin, with the teeth whole, the hair
abundant, was before our eyes as in life!
  I stood mute, almost paralyzed with wonder and awe before this dread
apparition of another age. My uncle, who on almost every occasion
was a great talker, remained for a time completely dumfounded. He
was too full of emotion for speech to be possible. After a while,
however, we raised up the body to which the skull belonged. We stood
it on end. It seemed, to our excited imaginations, to look at us
with its terrible hollow eyes.
  After some minutes of silence, the man was vanquished by the
Professor. Human instincts succumbed to scientific pride and
exultation. Professor Hardwigg, carried away by his enthusiasm, forgot
all the circumstances of our journey, the extraordinary position in
which we were placed, the immense cavern which stretched far away over
our heads. There can be no doubt that he thought himself at the
Institution addressing his attentive pupils, for he put on his most
doctorial style, waved his hand, and began:
  "Gentlemen, I have the honor on this auspicious occasion to
present to you a man of the Quaternary period of our globe. Many
learned men have denied his very existence, while other able
persons, perhaps of even higher authority, have affirmed their
belief in the reality of his life. If the St. Thomases of paleontology
were present, they would reverentially touch him with their fingers
and believe in his existence, thus acknowledging their obstinate
heresy. I know that science should be careful in relation to all
discoveries of this nature. I am not without having heard of the
many Barnums and other quacks who have made a trade of suchlike
pretended discoveries. I have, of course, heard of the discovery of
the kneebones of Ajax, of the pretended finding of the body of Orestes
by the Spartiates, and of the body of Asterius, ten spans long,
fifteen feet- of which we read in Pausanias.
                                                  {CHAPTER_35 ^paragraph 15}
  "I have read everything in relation to the skeleton of Trapani,
discovered in the fourteenth century, and which many persons chose
to regard as that of Polyphemus, and the history of the giant dug up
during the sixteenth century in the environs of Palmyra. You are
well aware as I am, gentlemen, of the existence of the celebrated
analysis made near Lucerne, in 1577, of the great bones which the
celebrated Doctor Felix Plater declared belonged to a giant about
nineteen feet high. I have devoured all the treatises of Cassanion,
and all those memoirs, pamphlets, speeches, and replies published in
reference to the skeleton of Teutobochus, king of the Cimbri, the
invader of Gaul, dug out of a gravel pit in Dauphine, in 1613. In
the eighteenth century I should have denied, with Peter Campet, the
existence of the preadamites of Scheuchzer. I have had in my hands the
writing called Gigans-"
  Here my uncle was afflicted by the natural infirmity which prevented
him from pronouncing difficult words in public. It was not exactly
stuttering, but a strange sort of constitutional hesitation.
  "The writing named Gigans-" he repeated.
  He, however, could get no further.
  "Giganteo-"
                                                  {CHAPTER_35 ^paragraph 20}
  Impossible! The unfortunate word would not come out. There would
have been great laughter at the Institution, had the mistake
happened there.
  "Gigantosteology!" at last exclaimed Professor Hardwigg between
two savage growls.
  Having got over our difficulty, and getting more and more excited-
  "Yes, gentlemen, I am well acquainted with all these matters, and
know, also, that Cuvier and Blumenbach fully recognized in these bones
the undeniable remains of mammoths of the Quaternary period. But after
what we now see, to allow a doubt is to insult scientific inquiry.
There is the body; you can see it; you can touch it. It is not a
skeleton, it is a complete and uninjured body, preserved with an
anthropological object."
  I did not attempt to controvert this singular and astounding
assertion.
                                                  {CHAPTER_35 ^paragraph 25}
  "If I could but wash this corpse in a solution of sulphuric acid,"
continued my uncle, "I would undertake to remove all the earthy
particles, and these resplendent shells, which are incrusted all
over this body. But I am without this precious dissolving medium.
Nevertheless, such as it is, this body will tell its own history."
  Here the Professor held up the fossil body, and exhibited it with
rare dexterity. No professional showman could have shown more
activity.
  "As on examination you will see," my uncle continued, "it is only
about six feet in length, which is a long way from the pretended
giants of early days. As to the particular race to which it
belonged, it is incontestably Caucasian. It is of the white race, that
is, of our own. The skull of this fossil being is a perfect ovoid
without any remarkable or prominent development of the cheekbones, and
without any projection of the jaw. It presents no indication of the
prognathism which modifies the facial angle.* Measure the angle for
yourselves, and you will find that it is just ninety degrees. But I
will advance still farther on the road of inquiry and deduction, and I
dare venture to say that this human sample or specimen belongs to
the Japhetic family, which spread over the world from India to the
uttermost limits of western Europe. There is no occasion, gentlemen,
to smile at my remarks."
-
  *The facial angle is formed by two planes- one more or less vertical
which is in a straight line with the forehead and the incisors; the
other, horizontal, which passes through the organs of hearing, and the
lower nasal bone. Prognathism, in anthropological language, means that
particular projection of the jaw which modifies the facial angle.
                                                  {CHAPTER_35 ^paragraph 30}
-
  Of course nobody smiled. But the excellent Professor was so
accustomed to beaming countenances at his lectures, that he believed
he saw all his audience laughing during the delivery of his learned
dissertation.
  "Yes," he continued, with renewed animation, "this is a fossil
man, a contemporary of the mastodons, with the bones of which this
whole amphitheater is covered. But if I am called on to explain how he
came to this place, how these various strata by which he is covered
have fallen into this vast cavity, I can undertake to give you no
explanation. Doubtless, if we carry ourselves back to the Quaternary
epoch, we shall find that great and mighty convulsions took place in
the crust of the earth; the continually cooling operation, through
which the earth had to pass, produced fissures, landslips, and chasms,
through which a large portion of the earth made its way. I come to
no absolute conclusion, but there is the man, surrounded by the
works of his hands, his hatchets and his carved flints, which belong
to the stony period; and the only rational supposition is, that,
like myself, he visited the center of the earth as a traveling
tourist, a pioneer of science. At all events, there can be no doubt of
his great age, and of his being one of the oldest race of human
beings."
  The Professor with these words ceased his oration, and I burst forth
into loud and "unanimous" applause. Besides, after all, my uncle was
right. Much more learned men than his nephew would have found it
rather hard to refute his facts and arguments.
  Another circumstance soon presented itself. This fossilized body was
not the only one in this vast plain of bones- the cemetery of an
extinct world. Other bodies were found, as we trod the dusty plain,
and my uncle was able to choose the most marvelous of these
specimens in order to convince the most incredulous.
                                                  {CHAPTER_35 ^paragraph 35}
  In truth, it was a surprising spectacle, the successive remains of
generations and generations of men and animals confounded together
in one vast cemetery. But a great question now presented itself to our
notice, and one we were actually afraid to contemplate in all its
bearings.
  Had these once animated beings been buried so far beneath the soil
by some tremendous convulsion of nature, after they had been earth
to earth and ashes to ashes, or had they lived here below, in this
subterranean world, under this factitious sky, borne, married, and
given in marriage, and died at last, just like ordinary inhabitants of
the earth?
  Up to the present moment, marine monsters, fish, and suchlike
animals had alone been seen alive!
  The question which rendered us rather uneasy, was a pertinent one.
Were any of these men of the abyss wandering about the deserted shores
of this wondrous sea of the center of the earth?
  This was a question which rendered me very uneasy and uncomfortable.
How, should they really be in existence, would they receive us men
from above?

CHAPTER_36
                     CHAPTER 36
                    What Is It?
-
  FOR a long and weary hour we tramped over this great bed of bones.
We advanced regardless of everything, drawn on by ardent curiosity.
What other marvels did this great cavern contain- what other
wondrous treasures for the scientific man? My eyes were quite prepared
for any number of surprises, my imagination lived in expectation of
something new and wonderful.
  The borders of the great Central Ocean had for some time disappeared
behind the hills that were scattered over the ground occupied by the
plain of bones. The imprudent and enthusiastic Professor, who did
not care whether he lost himself or not, hurried me forward. We
advanced silently, bathed in waves of electric fluid.
  By reason of a phenomenon which I cannot explain, and thanks to
its extreme diffusion, now complete, the light illumined equally the
sides of every hill and rock. Its seat appeared to be nowhere, in no
determined force, and produced no shade whatever.
  The appearance presented was that of a tropical country at midday in
summer- in the midst of the equatorial regions and under the
vertical rays of the sun.
                                                   {CHAPTER_36 ^paragraph 5}
  All signs of vapor had disappeared. The rocks, the distant
mountains, some confused masses of far-off forests, assumed a weird
and mysterious aspect under this equal distribution of the luminous
fluid!
  We resembled, to a certain extent, the mysterious personage in one
of Hoffmann's fantastic tales-the man who lost his shadow.
  After we had walked about a mile farther, we came to the edge of a
vast forest not, however, one of the vast mushroom forests we had
discovered near Port Gretchen.
  It was the glorious and wild vegetation of the Tertiary period, in
all its superb magnificence. Huge palms, of a species now unknown,
superb palmacites- a genus of fossil palms from the coal formation-
pines, yews, cypress, and conifers or cone-bearing trees, the whole
bound together by an inextricable and complicated mass of creeping
plants.
  A beautiful carpet of mosses and ferns grew beneath the trees.
Pleasant brooks murmured beneath umbrageous boughs, little worthy of
this name, for no shade did they give. Upon their borders grew small
treelike shrubs, such as are seen in the hot countries on our own
inhabited globe.
                                                  {CHAPTER_36 ^paragraph 10}
  The one thing wanting in these plants, these shrubs, these trees-
was color! Forever deprived of the vivifying warmth of the sun, they
were vapid and colorless. All shade was lost in one uniform tint, of a
brown and faded character. The leaves were wholly devoid of verdure,
and the flowers, so numerous during the Tertiary period which gave
them birth, were without color and without perfume, something like
paper discolored by long exposure to the atmosphere.
  My uncle ventured beneath the gigantic groves. I followed him,
though not without a certain amount of apprehension. Since nature
had shown herself capable of producing such stupendous vegetable
supplies, why might we not meet with mammals just as large, and
therefore dangerous?
  I particularly remarked, in the clearings left by trees that had
fallen and been partially consumed by time, many leguminous (beanlike)
shrubs, such as the maple and other eatable trees, dear to
ruminating animals. Then there appeared confounded together and
intermixed, the trees of such varied lands, specimens of the
vegetation of every part of the globe; there was the oak near the palm
tree, the Australian eucalyptus, an interesting class of the order
Myrtaceae- leaning against the tall Norwegian pine, the poplar of
the north, mixing its branches with those of the New Zealand kauris.
It was enough to drive the most ingenious classifier of the upper
regions out of his mind, and to upset all his received ideas about
botany.
  Suddenly I stopped short and restrained my uncle.
  The extreme diffuseness of the light enabled me to see the
smallest objects in the distant copses. I thought I saw- no, I
really did see with my own eyes- immense, gigantic animals moving
about under the mighty trees. Yes, they were truly gigantic animals, a
whole herd of mastodons, not fossils, but living, and exactly like
those discovered in 1801, on the marshy banks of the great Ohio, in
North America.
                                                  {CHAPTER_36 ^paragraph 15}
  Yes, I could see these enormous elephants, whose trunks were tearing
down large boughs, and working in and out the trees like a legion of
serpents. I could hear the sounds of the mighty tusks uprooting huge
trees!
  The boughs crackled, and the whole masses of leaves and green
branches went down the capacious throats of these terrible monsters!
  That wondrous dream, when I saw the antehistorical times revivified,
when the Tertiary and Quaternary periods passed before me, was now
realized!
  And there we were alone, far down in the bowels of the earth, at the
mercy of its ferocious inhabitants!
  My uncle paused, full of wonder and astonishment.
                                                  {CHAPTER_36 ^paragraph 20}
  "Come!" he said at last, when his first surprise was over, "Come
along, my boy, and let us see them nearer."
  "No," replied I, restraining his efforts to drag me forward, "we are
wholly without arms. What should we do in the midst of that flock of
gigantic quadrupeds? Come away, Uncle, I implore you. No human
creature can with impunity brave the ferocious anger of these
monsters."
  "No human creature," said my uncle, suddenly lowering his voice to a
mysterious whisper, "you are mistaken, my dear Henry. Look! look
yonder! It seems to me that I behold a human being- a being like
ourselves- a man!"
  I looked, shrugging my shoulders, decided to push incredulity to its
very last limits. But whatever might have been my wish, I was
compelled to yield to the weight of ocular demonstration.
  Yes- not more than a quarter of a mile off, leaning against the
trunk of an enormous tree, was a human being- a Proteus of these
subterranean regions, a new son of Neptune keeping this innumerable
herd of mastodons.
                                                  {CHAPTER_36 ^paragraph 25}
-
      Immanis pecoris custos, immanior ipse!*
-
  *The keeper of gigantic cattle, himself still more gigantic!
-
                                                  {CHAPTER_36 ^paragraph 30}
  Yes- it was no longer a fossil whose corpse we had raised from the
ground in the great cemetery, but a giant capable of guiding and
driving these prodigious monsters. His height was above twelve feet.
His head, as big as the head of a buffalo, was lost in a mane of
matted hair. It was indeed a huge mane, like those which belonged to
the elephants of the earlier ages of the world.
  In his hand was a branch of a tree, which served as a crook for this
antediluvian shepherd.
  We remained profoundly still, speechless with surprise.
  But we might at any moment be seen by him. Nothing remained for us
but instant flight.
  "Come, come!" I cried, dragging my uncle along; and, for the first
time, he made no resistance to my wishes.
                                                  {CHAPTER_36 ^paragraph 35}
  A quarter of an hour later we were far away from that terrible
monster!
  Now that I think of the matter calmly, and that I reflect upon it
dispassionately; now that months, years, have passed since this
strange and unnatural adventure befell us- what am I to think, what am
I to believe?
  No, it is utterly impossible! Our ears must have deceived us, and
our eyes have cheated us! we have not seen what we believed we had
seen. No human being could by any possibility have existed in that
subterranean world! No generation of men could inhabit the lower
caverns of the globe without taking note of those who peopled the
surface, without communication with them. It was folly, folly,
folly! nothing else!
  I am rather inclined to admit the existence of some animal
resembling in structure the human race- of some monkey of the first
geological epochs, like that discovered by M. Lartet in the ossiferous
deposit of Sansan.
  But this animal, or being, whichsoever it was, surpassed in height
all things known to modern science. Never mind. However unlikely it
may be, it might have been a monkey- but a man, a living man, and with
him a whole generation of gigantic animals, buried in the entrails
of the earth- it was too monstrous to be believed!

CHAPTER_37
                     CHAPTER 37
               The Mysterious Dagger
-
  DURING this time, we had left the bright and transparent forest
far behind us. We were mute with astonishment, overcome by a kind of
feeling which was next door to apathy. We kept running in spite of
ourselves. It was a perfect Right, which resembled one of those
horrible sensations we sometimes meet with in our dreams.
  Instinctively we made our way towards the Central Sea, and I
cannot now tell what wild thoughts passed through my mind, nor of what
follies I might have been guilty, but for a very serious preoccupation
which brought me back to practical life.
  Though I was aware that we were treading on a soil quite new to
us, I, however, every now and then noticed certain aggregations of
rock, the shape of which forcibly reminded me of those near Port
Gretchen.
  This confirmed, moreover, the indications of the compass and our
extraordinary and unlooked-for, as well as involuntary, return to
the north of this great Central Sea. It was so like our starting
point, that I could scarcely doubt the reality of our position.
Streams and cascades fell in hundreds over the numerous projections of
the rocks.
                                                   {CHAPTER_37 ^paragraph 5}
  I actually thought I could see our faithful and monotonous Hans
and the wonderful grotto in which I had come back to life after my
tremendous fall.
  Then, as we advanced still farther, the position of the cliffs,
the appearance of a stream, the unexpected profile of a rock, threw me
again into a state of bewildering doubt.
  After some time, I explained my state of mental indecision to my
uncle. He confessed to a similar feeling of hesitation. He was totally
unable to make up his mind in the midst of this extraordinary but
uniform panorama.
  "There can be no doubt," I insisted, "that we have not landed
exactly at the place whence we first took our departure; but the
tempest has brought us above our starting point. I think, therefore,
that if we follow the coast we shall once more find Port Gretchen."
  "In that case," cried my uncle, "it is useless to continue our
exploration. The very best thing we can do is to make our way back
to the raft. Are you quite sure, Harry, that you are not mistaken?"
                                                  {CHAPTER_37 ^paragraph 10}
  "It is difficult," was my reply, "to come to any decision, for all
these rocks are exactly alike. There is no marked difference between
them. At the same time, the impression on my mind is that I
recognize the promontory at the foot of which our worthy Hans
constructed the raft. We are, I am nearly convinced, near the little
port: if this be not it," I added, carefully examining a creek which
appeared singularly familiar to my mind.
  "My dear Harry- if this were the case, we should find traces of
our own footsteps, some signs of our passage; and I can really see
nothing to indicate our having passed this way."
  "But I see something," I cried, in an impetuous tone of voice, as
I rushed forward and eagerly picked up something which shone in the
sand under my feet.
  "What is it?" cried the astonished and bewildered Professor.
  "This," was my reply.
                                                  {CHAPTER_37 ^paragraph 15}
  And I handed to my startled relative a rusty dagger, of singular
shape.
  "What made you bring with you so useless a weapon?" he exclaimed.
"It was needlessly hampering yourself."
  "I bring it? It is quite new to me. I never saw it before- are you
sure it is not out of your collection?"
  "Not that I know of," said the Professor, puzzled. "I have no
recollection of the circumstance. It was never my property."
  "This is very extraordinary," I said, musing over the novel and
singular incident.
                                                  {CHAPTER_37 ^paragraph 20}
  "Not at all. There is a very simple explanation, Harry. The
Icelanders are known to keep up the use of these antiquated weapons,
and this must have belonged to Hans, who has let it fall without
knowing it."
  I shook my head. That dagger had never been in the possession of the
pacific and taciturn Hans. I knew him and his habits too well.
  "Then what can it be- unless it be the weapon of some antediluvian
warrior," I continued, "of some living man, a contemporary of that
mighty shepherd from whom we have just escaped? But no- mystery upon
mystery- this is no weapon of the stony epoch, nor even of the
bronze period. It is made of excellent steel-"
  Ere I could finish my sentence, my uncle stopped me short from
entering upon a whole train of theories, and spoke in his most cold
and decided tone of voice.
  "Calm yourself, my dear boy, and endeavor to use your reason. This
weapon, upon which we have fallen so unexpectedly, is a true dague,
one of those worn by gentlemen in their belts during the sixteenth
century. Its use was to give the coup de grace, the final blow, to the
foe who would not surrender. It is clearly of Spanish workmanship.
It belongs neither to you, nor to me, nor the eider-down hunter, nor
to any of the living beings who may still exist so marvelously in
the interior of the earth."
                                                  {CHAPTER_37 ^paragraph 25}
  "What can you mean, Uncle?" I said, now lost in a host of surmises.
  "Look closely at it," he continued; "these jagged edges were never
made by the resistance of human blood and bone. The blade is covered
with a regular coating of iron mold and rust, which is not a day
old, not a year old, not a century old, but much more-"
  The Professor began to get quite excited, according to custom, and
was allowing himself to be carried away by his fertile imagination.
I could have said something. He stopped me.
  "Harry," he cried, "we are now on the verge of a great discovery.
This blade of a dagger you have so marvelously discovered, after being
abandoned upon the sand for more than a hundred, two hundred, even
three hundred years, has been indented by someone endeavoring to carve
an inscription on these rocks."
  "But this poniard never got here of itself," I exclaimed, "it
could not have twisted itself. Someone, therefore, must have
preceded us upon the shores of this extraordinary sea."
                                                  {CHAPTER_37 ^paragraph 30}
  "Yes, a man."
  "But what man has been sufficiently desperate to do such a thing?"
  "A man who has somewhere written his name with this very dagger- a
man who has endeavored once more to indicate the right road to the
interior of the earth. Let us look around, my boy. You know not the
importance of your singular and happy discovery."
  Prodigiously interested, we walked along the wall of rock, examining
the smallest fissures, which might finally expand into the much
wished-for gully or shaft.
  We at last reached a spot where the shore became extremely narrow.
The sea almost bathed the foot of the rocks, which were here very
lofty and steep. There was scarcely a path wider than two yards at any
point. At last, under a huge over-hanging rock, we discovered the
entrance of a dark and gloomy tunnel.
                                                  {CHAPTER_37 ^paragraph 35}
  There, on a square tablet of granite, which had been smoothed by
rubbing it with another stone, we could see two mysterious, and much
worn letters, the two initials of the bold and extraordinary
traveler who had preceded us on our adventurous journey.
  "A. S.!" cried my uncle. "You see, I was right. Arne Saknussemm,
always Arne Saknussemm!"

CHAPTER_38
                     CHAPTER 38
            No Outlet - Blasting the Rock
-
  EVER since the commencement of our marvelous journey, I had
experienced many surprises, had suffered from many illusions. I
thought that I was case-hardened against all surprises and could
neither see nor hear anything to amaze me again.
  I was like a many who, having been round the world, finds himself
wholly blase and proof against the marvelous.
  When, however, I saw these two letters, which had been engraven
three hundred years before, I stood fixed in an attitude of mute
surprise.
  Not only was there the signature of the learned and enterprising
alchemist written in the rock, but I held in my hand the very
identical instrument with which he had laboriously engraved it.
                                                   {CHAPTER_38 ^paragraph 5}
  It was impossible, without showing an amount of incredulity scarcely
becoming a sane man, to deny the existence of the traveler, and the
reality of that voyage which I believed all along to have been a myth-
the mystification of some fertile brain.
  While these reflections were passing through my mind, my uncle,
the Professor, gave way to an access of feverish and poetical
excitement.
  "Wonderful and glorious genius, great Saknussemm", he cried, "you
have left no stone unturned, no resource omitted, to show to other
mortals the way into the interior of our mighty globe, and your fellow
creatures can find the trail left by your illustrious footsteps, three
hundred years ago, at the bottom of these obscure subterranean abodes.
You have been careful to secure for others the contemplation of
these wonders and marvels of creation. Your name engraved at every
important stage of your glorious journey leads the hopeful traveler
direct to the great and mighty discovery to which you devoted such
energy and courage. The audacious traveler, who shall follow your
footsteps to the last, will doubtless find your initials engraved with
your own hand upon the center of the earth. I will be that audacious
traveler- I, too, will sign my name upon the very same spot, upon
the central granite stone of this wondrous work of the Creator. But in
justice to your devotion, to your courage, and to your being the first
to indicate the road, let this cape, seen by you upon the shores of
this sea discovered by you, be called, of all time, Cape Saknussemm."
  This is what I heard, and I began to be roused to the pitch of
enthusiasm indicated by those words. A fierce excitement roused me.
I forgot everything. The dangers of the voyage and the perils of the
return journey were now as nothing!
  What another man had done in ages past could, I felt, be done again;
I was determined to do it myself, and now nothing that man had
accomplished appeared to me impossible.
                                                  {CHAPTER_38 ^paragraph 10}
  "Forward- forward," I cried in a burst of genuine and hearty
enthusiasm.
  I had already started in the direction of the somber and gloomy
gallery when the Professor stopped me; he, the man so rash and
hasty, he, the man so easily roused to the highest pitch of
enthusiasm, checked me, and asked me to be patient and show more calm.
  "Let us return to our good friend, Hans," he said; "we will then
bring the raft down to this place."
  I must say that though I at once yielded to my uncle's request, it
was not without dissatisfaction, and I hastened along the rocks of
that wonderful coast.
  "Do you know, my dear uncle," I said, as we walked along, "that we
have been singularly helped by a concurrence of circumstances, right
up to this very moment."
                                                  {CHAPTER_38 ^paragraph 15}
  "So you begin to see it, do you, Harry?" said the Professor with a
smile.
  "Doubtless," I responded, "and strangely enough, even the tempest
has been the means of putting us on the right road. Blessings on the
tempest! It brought us safely back to the very spot from which fine
weather would have driven us forever. Supposing we had succeeded in
reaching the southern and distant shores of this extraordinary sea,
what would have become of us? The name of Saknussemm would never
have appeared to us, and at this moment we should have been cast
away upon an inhospitable coast, probably without an outlet."
  "Yes, Harry, my boy, there is certainly something providential in
that wandering at the mercy of wind and waves towards the south: we
have come back exactly north; and what is better still, we fall upon
this great discovery of Cape Saknussemm. I mean to say, that it is
more than surprising; there is something in it which is far beyond
my comprehension. The coincidence is unheard of, marvelous!"
  "What matter! It is not our duty to explain facts, but to make the
best possible use of them."
  "Doubtless, my boy; but if you will allow me-" said the really
delighted Professor.
                                                  {CHAPTER_38 ^paragraph 20}
  "Excuse me, sir, but I see exactly how it will be; we shall take the
northern route; we shall pass under the northern regions of Europe,
under Sweden, under Russia, under Siberia, and who knows where-
instead of burying ourselves under the burning plains and deserts of
Africa, or beneath the mighty waves of the ocean; and that is all,
at this stage of our journey, that I care to know. Let us advance, and
Heaven will be our guide!"
  "Yes, Harry, you are right, quite right; all is for the best. Let us
abandon this horizontal sea, which could never have led to anything
satisfactory. We shall descend, descend, and everlastingly descend. Do
you know, my dear boy, that to reach the interior of the earth we have
only five thousand miles to travel!"
  "Bah!" I cried, carried away by a burst of enthusiasm, "the distance
is scarcely worth speaking about. The thing is to make a start."
  My wild, mad, and incoherent speeches continued until we rejoined
our patient and phlegmatic guide. All was, we found, prepared for an
immediate departure. There was not a single parcel but what was in its
proper place. We all took up our posts on the raft, and the sail being
hoisted, Hans received his directions, and guided the frail bark
towards Cape Saknussemm, as we had definitely named it.
  The wind was very unfavorable to a craft that was unable to sail
close to the wind. It was constructed to go before the blast. We
were continually reduced to pushing ourselves forward by means of
poles. On several occasions the rocks ran far out into deep water
and we were compelled to make a long round. At last, after three
long and weary hours of navigation, that is to say, about six
o'clock in the evening, we found a place at which we could land.
                                                  {CHAPTER_38 ^paragraph 25}
  I jumped on shore first. In my present state of excitement and
enthusiasm, I was always first. My uncle and the Icelander followed.
The voyage from the port to this point of the sea had by no means
calmed me. It had rather produced the opposite effect. I even proposed
to burn our vessel, that is, to destroy our raft, in order to
completely cut off our retreat. But my uncle sternly opposed this wild
project. I began to think him particularly lukewarm and
unenthusiastic.
  "At any rate, my dear uncle," I said, "let us start without delay."
  "Yes, my boy, I am quite as eager to do so as you can be. But, in
the first place, let us examine this mysterious gallery, in order to
find if we shall need to prepare and mend our ladders."
  My uncle now began to see to the efficiency of our Ruhmkorff coil,
which would doubtless soon be needed; the raft, securely fastened to a
rock, was left alone. Moreover, the opening into the new gallery was
not twenty paces distant from the spot. Our little troop, with
myself at the head, advanced.
  The orifice, which was almost circular, presented a diameter of
about five feet; the somber tunnel was cut in the living rock, and
coated on the inside by the different material which had once passed
through it in a state of fusion. The lower part was about level with
the water, so that we were able to penetrate to the interior without
difficulty.
                                                  {CHAPTER_38 ^paragraph 30}
  We followed an almost horizontal direction; when, at the end of
about a dozen paces, our further advance was checked by the
interposition of an enormous block of granite rock.
  "Accursed stone!" I cried furiously, on perceiving that we were
stopped by what seemed an insurmountable obstacle.
  In vain we looked to the right, in vain we looked to the left; in
vain examined it above and below. There existed no passage, no sign of
any other tunnel. I experienced the most bitter and painful
disappointment. So enraged was I that I would not admit the reality of
any obstacle. I stooped to my knees; I looked under the mass of stone.
No hole, no interstice. I then looked above. The same barrier of
granite! Hans, with the lamp, examined the sides of the tunnel in
every direction.
  But all in vain! It was necessary to renounce all hope of passing
through.
  I had seated myself upon the ground. My uncle walked angrily and
hopelessly up and down. He was evidently desperate.
                                                  {CHAPTER_38 ^paragraph 35}
  "But," I cried, after some moments' thought, "what about Arne
Saknussemm?"
  "You are right," replied my uncle, "he can never have been checked
by a lump of rock."
  "No- ten thousand times no," I cried, with extreme vivacity. "This
huge lump of rock, in consequence of some singular concussion, or
process, one of those magnetic phenomena which have so often shaken
the terrestrial crust, has in some unexpected way closed up the
passage. Many and many years have passed away since the return of
Saknussemm, and the fall of this huge block of granite. Is it not
quite evident that this gallery was formerly the outlet for the
pent-up lava in the interior of the earth, and that these eruptive
matters then circulated freely? Look at these recent fissures in the
granite roof; it is evidently formed of pieces of enormous stone,
placed here as if by the hand of a giant, who had worked to make a
strong and substantial arch. One day, after an unusually strong shock,
the vast rock which stands in our way, and which was doubtless the key
of a kind of arch, fell through to a level with the soil and has
barred our further progress. We are right, then, in thinking that this
is an unexpected obstacle, with which Saknussemm did not meet; and
if we do not upset it in some way, we are unworthy of following in the
footsteps of the great discoverer; and incapable of finding our way to
the center of the earth!"
  In this wild way I addressed my uncle. The zeal of the Professor,
his earnest longing for success, had become part and parcel of my
being. I wholly forgot the past; I utterly despised the future.
Nothing existed for me upon the surface of this spheroid in the
bosom of which I was engulfed, no towns, no country, no Hamburg, no
Koenigstrasse, not even my poor Gretchen, who by this time would
believe me utterly lost in the interior of the earth!
  "Well," cried my uncle, roused to enthusiasm by my words, "Let us go
to work with pickaxes, with crowbars, with anything that comes to
hand- but down with these terrible walls."
                                                  {CHAPTER_38 ^paragraph 40}
  "It is far too tough and too big to be destroyed by a pickax or
crowbar," I replied.
  "What then?"
  "As I said, it is useless to think of overcoming such a difficulty
by means of ordinary tools."
  "What then?"
  "What else but gunpowder, a subterranean mine? Let us blow up the
obstacle that stands in our way."
                                                  {CHAPTER_38 ^paragraph 45}
  "Gunpowder!"
  "Yes; all we have to do is to get rid of this paltry obstacle."
  "To work, Hans, to work!" cried the Professor.
  The Icelander went back to the raft, and soon returned with a huge
crowbar, with which he began to dig a hole in the rock, which was to
serve as a mine. It was by no means a slight task. It was necessary
for our purpose to make a cavity large enough to hold fifty pounds
of fulminating gun cotton, the expansive power of which is four
times as great as that of ordinary gunpowder.
  I had now roused myself to an almost miraculous state of excitement.
While Hans was at work, I actively assisted my uncle to prepare a long
wick, made from damp gunpowder, the mass of which we finally
enclosed in a bag of linen.
                                                  {CHAPTER_38 ^paragraph 50}
  "We are bound to go through," I cried, enthusiastically.
  "We are bound to go through," responded the Professor, tapping me on
the back.
  At midnight, our work as miners was completely finished; the
charge of fulminating cotton was thrust into the hollow, and the
match, which we had made of considerable length, was ready.
  A spark was now sufficient to ignite this formidable engine, and
to blow the rock to atoms!
  "We will now rest until tomorrow."
                                                  {CHAPTER_38 ^paragraph 55}
  It was absolutely necessary to resign myself to my fate, and to
consent to wait for the explosion for six weary hours!

CHAPTER 39
                     CHAPTER 39
            The Explosion and Its Results
-
  THE next day, which was the twenty-seventh of August, was a date
celebrated in our wondrous subterranean journey. I never think of it
even now, but I shudder with horror. My heart beats wildly at the very
memory of that awful day.
  From this time forward, our reason, our judgment, our human
ingenuity, have nothing to do with the course of events. We are
about to become the plaything of the great phenomena of the earth!
  At six o'clock we were all up and ready. The dreaded moment was
arriving when we were about to seek an opening into the interior of
the earth by means of gunpowder. What would be the consequences of
breaking through the crust of the earth?
  I begged that it might be my duty to set fire to the mine. I
looked upon it as an honor. This task once performed, I could rejoin
my friends upon the raft, which had not been unloaded. As soon as we
were all ready, we were to sail away to some distance to avoid the
consequences of the explosion, the effects of which would certainly
not be concentrated in the interior of the earth.
                                                   {CHAPTER 39 ^paragraph 5}
  The slow match we calculated to burn for about ten minutes, more
or less, before it reached the chamber in which the great body of
powder was confined. I should therefore have plenty of time to reach
the raft and put off to a safe distance.
  I prepared to execute my self-allotted task- not, it must be
confessed, without considerable emotion.
  After a hearty repast, my uncle and the hunter-guide embarked on
board the raft, while I remained alone upon the desolate shore.
  I was provided with a lantern which was to enable me to set fire
to the wick of the infernal machine.
  "Go, my boy," said my uncle, "and Heaven be with you. But come
back as soon as you can. I shall be all impatience."
                                                  {CHAPTER 39 ^paragraph 10}
  "Be easy on that matter," I replied, "there is no fear of my
delaying on the road."
  Having said this, I advanced toward the opening of the somber
gallery. My heart beat wildly. I opened my lantern and seized the
extremity of the wick.
  The Professor, who was looking on, held his chronometer in his hand.
  "Are you ready?" cried he.
  "Quite ready."
                                                  {CHAPTER 39 ^paragraph 15}
  "Well, then, fire away!"
  I hastened to put the light to the wick, which crackled and
sparkled, hissing and spitting like a serpent; then, running as fast
as I could, I returned to the shore.
  "Get on board, my lad, and you, Hans, shove off," cried my uncle.
  By a vigorous application of his pole Hans sent us flying over the
water. The raft was quite twenty fathoms distant.
  It was a moment of palpitating interest, of deep anxiety. My
uncle, the Professor, never took his eyes off the chronometer.
                                                  {CHAPTER 39 ^paragraph 20}
  "Only five minutes more," he said in a low tone, "only four, only
three."
  My pulse went a hundred to the minute. I could hear my heart
beating.
  "Only two, one! Now, then, mountains of granite, crumble beneath the
power of man!"
  What happened after that? As to the terrific roar of the
explosion, I do not think I heard it. But the form of the rocks
completely changed in my eyes- they seemed to be drawn aside like a
curtain. I saw a fathomless, a bottomless abyss, which yawned
beneath the turgid waves. The sea, which seemed suddenly to have
gone mad, then became one great mountainous mass, upon the top of
which the raft rose perpendicularly.
  We were all thrown down. In less than a second the light gave
place to the most profound obscurity. Then I felt all solid support
give way not to my feet, but to the raft itself. I thought it was
going bodily down a tremendous well. I tried to speak, to question
my uncle. Nothing could be heard but the roaring of the mighty
waves. We clung together in utter silence.
                                                  {CHAPTER 39 ^paragraph 25}
  Despite the awful darkness, despite the noise, the surprise, the
emotion, I thoroughly understood what had happened.
  Beyond the rock which had been blown up, there existed a mighty
abyss. The explosion had caused a kind of earthquake in this soil,
broken by fissures and rents. The gulf, thus suddenly thrown open, was
about to swallow the inland seal which, transformed into a mighty
torrent, was dragging us with it.
  Only one idea filled my mind. We were utterly and completely lost!
  One hour, two hours- what more I cannot say, passed in this
manner. We sat close together, elbow touching elbow, knee touching
knee! We held one another's hands not to be thrown off the raft. We
were subjected to the most violent shocks, whenever our sole
dependence, a frail wooden raft, struck against the rocky sides of the
channel. Fortunately for us, these concussions became less and less
frequent, which made me fancy that the gallery was getting wider and
wider. There could be now no doubt that we had chanced upon the road
once followed by Saknussemm, but instead of going down in a proper
manner, we had, through our own imprudence, drawn a whole sea with us!
  These ideas presented themselves to my mind in a very vague and
obscure manner. I felt rather than reasoned. I put my ideas together
only confusedly, while spinning along like a man going down a
waterfall. To judge by the air which, as it were, whipped my face,
we must have been rushing at a perfectly lightning rate.
                                                  {CHAPTER 39 ^paragraph 30}
  To attempt under these circumstances to light a torch was simply
impossible, and the last remains of our electric machine, of our
Ruhmkorff coil, had been destroyed during the fearful explosion.
  I was therefore very much confused to see at last a bright light
shining close to me. The calm countenance of the guide seemed to gleam
upon me. The clever and patient hunter had succeeded in lighting the
lantern; and though, in the keen and thorough draft, the flame
Flickered and vacillated and was nearly put out, it served partially
to dissipate the awful obscurity.
  The gallery into which we had entered was very wide. I was,
therefore, quite right in that part of my conjecture. The insufficient
light did not allow us to see both of the walls at the same time.
The slope of waters, which was carrying us away, was far greater
than that of the most rapid river of America. The whole surface of the
stream seemed to be composed of liquid arrows, darted forward with
extreme violence and power. I can give no idea of the impression it
made upon me.
  The raft, at times, caught in certain whirlpools, and rushed
forward, yet turned on itself all the time. How it did not upset I
shall never be able to understand. When it approached the sides of the
gallery, I took care to throw upon them the light of the lantern,
and I was able to judge of the rapidity of motion by looking at the
projecting masses of rock, which as soon as seen were again invisible.
So rapid was our progress that points of rock at a considerable
distance one from the other appeared like portions of transverse
lines, which enclosed us in a kind of net, like that of a line of
telegraphic wires.
  I believe we were now going at a rate of not less than a hundred
miles an hour.
                                                  {CHAPTER 39 ^paragraph 35}
  My uncle and I looked at one another with wild and haggard eyes;
we clung convulsively to the stump of the mast, which, at the moment
when the catastrophe took place, had snapped short off. We turned
our backs as much as possible to the wind, in order not to be
stifled by a rapidity of motion which nothing human could face and
live.
  And still the long monotonous hours went on. The situation did not
change in the least, though a discovery I suddenly made seemed to
complicate it very much.
  When we had slightly recovered our equilibrium, I proceeded to
examine our cargo. I then made the unsatisfactory discovery that the
greater part of it had utterly disappeared.
  I became alarmed, and determined to discover what were our
resources. My heart beat at the idea, but it was absolutely
necessary to know on what we had to depend. With this view, I took the
lantern and looked around.
  Of all our former collection of nautical and philosophical
instruments, there remained only the chronometer and the compass.
The ladders and ropes were reduced to a small piece of rope fastened
to the stump of the mast. Not a pickax, not a crowbar, not a hammer,
and, far worse than all, no food- not enough for one day!
                                                  {CHAPTER 39 ^paragraph 40}
  This discovery was a prelude to a certain and horrible death.
  Seated gloomily on the raft, clasping the stump of the mast
mechanically, I thought of all I had read as to sufferings from
starvation.
  I remembered everything that history had taught me on the subject,
and I shuddered at the remembrance of the agonies to be endured.
  Maddened at the prospects of enduring the miseries of starvation,
I persuaded myself that I must be mistaken. I examined the cracks in
the raft; I poked between the joints and beams; I examined every
possible hole and corner. The result was- simply nothing!
  Our stock of provisions consisted of nothing but a piece of dry meat
and some soaked and half-moldy biscuits.
                                                  {CHAPTER 39 ^paragraph 45}
  I gazed around me scared and frightened. I could not understand
the awful truth. And yet of what consequence was it in regard to any
new danger? Supposing that we had had provisions for months, and
even for years, how could we ever get out of the awful abyss into
which we were being hurled by the irresistible torrent we had let
loose?
  Why should we trouble ourselves about the sufferings and tortures to
be endured from hunger when death stared us in the face under so
many other swifter and perhaps even more horrid forms?
  It was very doubtful, under the circumstances in which we were
placed, if we should have time to die of inanition.
  But the human frame is singularly constituted.
  I know not how it was; but, from some singular hallucination of
the mind, I forgot the real, serious, and immediate danger to which we
were exposed, to think of the menaces of the future, which appeared
before us in all their naked terror. Besides, after all, suggested
Hope, perhaps we might finally escape the fury of the raging
torrent, and once more revisit the glimpses of the moon, on the
surface of our beautiful Mother Earth.
                                                  {CHAPTER 39 ^paragraph 50}
  How was it to be done? I had not the remotest idea. Where were we to
come out? No matter, so that we did.
  One chance in a thousand is always a chance, while death from hunger
gave us not even the faintest glimpse of hope. It left to the
imagination nothing but blank horror, without the faintest chance of
escape!
  I had the greatest mind to reveal all to my uncle, to explain to him
the extraordinary and wretched position to which we were reduced, in
order that, between the two, we might make a calculation as to the
exact space of time which remained for us to live.
  It was, it appeared to me, the only thing to be done. But I had
the courage to hold my tongue, to gnaw at my entrails like the Spartan
boy. I wished to leave him all his coolness.
  At this moment, the light of the lantern slowly fell, and at last
went out!
                                                  {CHAPTER 39 ^paragraph 55}
  The wick had wholly burnt to an end. The obscurity became
absolute. It was no longer possible to see through the impenetrable
darkness! There was one torch left, but it was impossible to keep it
alight. Then, like a child, I shut my eyes, that I might not see the
darkness.
  After a great lapse of time, the rapidity of our journey
increased. I could feel it by the rush of air upon my face. The
slope of the waters was excessive. I began to feel that we were no
longer going down a slope; we were falling. I felt as one does in a
dream, going down bodily- falling; falling; falling!
  I felt that the hands of my uncle and Hans were vigorously
clasping my arms.
  Suddenly, after a lapse of time scarcely appreciable, I felt
something like a shock. The raft had not struck a hard body, but had
suddenly been checked in its course. A waterspout, a liquid column
of water, fell upon us. I felt suffocating. I was being drowned.
  Still the sudden inundation did not last. In a few seconds I felt
myself once more able to breathe. My uncle and Hans pressed my arms,
and the raft carried us all three away.

CHAPTER_40
                     CHAPTER 40
                   The Ape Gigans
-
  IT is difficult for me to determine what was the real time, but I
should suppose, by after calculation, that it must have been ten at
night.
  I lay in a stupor, a half dream, during which I saw visions of
astounding character. Monsters of the deep were side by side with
the mighty elephantine shepherd. Gigantic fish and animals seemed to
form strange conjunctions.
  The raft took a sudden turn, whirled round, entered another
tunnel- this time illumined in a most singular manner. The roof was
formed of porous stalactite, through which a moonlit vapor appeared to
pass, casting its brilliant light upon our gaunt and haggard
figures. The light increased as we advanced, while the roof
ascended; until at last, we were once more in a kind of water
cavern, the lofty dome of which disappeared in a luminous cloud!
  A rugged cavern of small extent appeared to offer a halting place to
our weary bodies.
                                                   {CHAPTER_40 ^paragraph 5}
  My uncle and the guide moved as men in a dream. I was afraid to
waken them, knowing the danger of such a sudden start. I seated myself
beside them to watch.
  As I did so, I became aware of something moving in the distance,
which at once fascinated my eyes. It was floating, apparently, upon
the surface of the water, advancing by means of what at first appeared
paddles. I looked with glaring eyes. One glance told me that it was
something monstrous.
  But what?
  It was the great "shark-crocodile" of the early writers on
geology. About the size of an ordinary whale, with hideous jaws and
two gigantic eyes, it advanced. Its eyes fixed on me with terrible
sternness. Some indefinite warning told me that it had marked me for
its own.
  I attempted to rise- to escape, no matter where, but my knees
shook under me; my limbs trembled violently; I almost lost my
senses. And still the mighty monster advanced. My uncle and the
guide made no effort to save themselves.
                                                  {CHAPTER_40 ^paragraph 10}
  With a strange noise, like none other I had ever heard, the beast
came on. His jaws were at least seven feet apart, and his distended
mouth looked large enough to have swallowed a boatful of men.
  We were about ten feet distant when I discovered that much as his
body resembled that of a crocodile, his mouth was wholly that of a
shark.
  His twofold nature now became apparent. To snatch us up at a
mouthful it was necessary for him to turn on his back, which motion
necessarily caused his legs to kick up helplessly in the air.
  I actually laughed even in the very jaws of death!
  But next minute, with a wild cry, I darted away into the interior of
the cave, leaving my unhappy comrades to their fate! This cavern was
deep and dreary. After about a hundred yards, I paused and looked
around.
                                                  {CHAPTER_40 ^paragraph 15}
  The whole floor, composed of sand and malachite, was strewn with
bones, freshly gnawed bones of reptiles and fish, with a mixture of
mammalia. My very soul grew sick as my body shuddered with horror. I
had truly, according to the old proverb, fallen out of the frying
pan into the fire. Some beast larger and more ferocious even than
the shark-crocodile inhabited this den.
  What could I do? The mouth of the cave was guarded by one
ferocious monster, the interior was inhabited by something too hideous
to contemplate. Flight was impossible!
  Only one resource remained, and that was to find some small hiding
place to which the fearful denizens of the cavern could not penetrate.
I gazed wildly around, and at last discovered a fissure in the rock,
to which I rushed in the hope of recovering my scattered senses.
  Crouching down, I waited shivering as in an ague fit. No man is
brave in presence of an earthquake, or a bursting boiler, or an
exploding torpedo. I could not be expected to feel much courage in
presence of the fearful fate that appeared to await me.
  An hour passed. I heard all the time a strange rumbling outside
the cave.
                                                  {CHAPTER_40 ^paragraph 20}
  What was the fate of my unhappy companions? It was impossible for me
to pause to inquire. My own wretched existence was all I could think
of.
  Suddenly a groaning, as of fifty bears in a fight, fell upon my
ears- hisses, spitting, moaning, hideous to hear- and then I saw-
  Never, were ages to pass over my head, shall I forget the horrible
apparition.
  It was the Ape Gigans!
  Fourteen feet high, covered with coarse hair, of a blackish brown,
the hair on the arms, from the shoulder to the elbow joints,
pointing downwards, while that from the wrist to the elbow pointed
upwards, it advanced. Its arms were as long as its body, while its
legs were prodigious. It had thick, long, and sharply pointed teeth-
like a mammoth saw.
                                                  {CHAPTER_40 ^paragraph 25}
  It struck its breast as it came on smelling and sniffing,
reminding me of the stories we read in our early childhood of giants
who ate the Flesh of men and little boys!
  Suddenly it stopped. My heart beat wildly, for I was conscious that,
somehow or other, the fearful monster had smelled me out and was
peering about with his hideous eyes to try and discover my
whereabouts.
  My reading, which as a rule is a blessing, but which on this
occasion, seemed momentarily to prove a curse, told me the real truth.
It was the Ape Gigans, the antediluvian gorilla.
  Yes! This awful monster, confined by good fortune to the interior of
the earth, was the progenitor of the hideous monster of Africa.
  He glared wildly about, seeking something- doubtless myself. I
gave myself up for lost. No hope of safety or escape seemed to remain.
                                                  {CHAPTER_40 ^paragraph 30}
  At this moment, just as my eyes appeared to close in death, there
came a strange noise from the entrance of the cave; and turning, the
gorilla evidently recognized some enemy more worthy his prodigious
size and strength. It was the huge shark-crocodile, which perhaps
having disposed of my friends, was coming in search of further prey.
  The gorilla placed himself on the defensive, and clutching a bone
some seven or eight feet in length, a perfect club, aimed a deadly
blow at the hideous beast, which reared upwards and fell with all
its weight upon its adversary.
  A terrible combat, the details of which it is impossible to give,
now ensued. The struggle was awful and ferocious, I, however, did
not wait to witness the result. Regarding myself as the object of
contention, I determined to remove from the presence of the victor.
I slid down from my hiding place, reached the ground, and gliding
against the wall, strove to gain the open mouth of the cavern.
  But I had not taken many steps when the fearful clamor ceased, to be
followed by a mumbling and groaning which appeared to be indicative of
victory.
  I looked back and saw the huge ape, gory with blood, coming after me
with glaring eyes, with dilated nostrils that gave forth two columns
of heated vapor. I could feel his hot and fetid breath on my neck; and
with a horrid jump- awoke from my nightmare sleep.
                                                  {CHAPTER_40 ^paragraph 35}
  Yes- it was all a dream. I was still on the raft with my uncle and
the guide.
  The relief was not instantaneous, for under the influence of the
hideous nightmare my senses had become numbed. After a while, however,
my feelings were tranquilized. The first of my perceptions which
returned in full force was that of hearing. I listened with acute
and attentive ears. All was still as death. All I comprehended was
silence. To the roaring of the waters, which had filled the gallery
with awful reverberations, succeeded perfect peace.
  After some little time my uncle spoke, in a low and scarcely audible
tone: "Harry, boy, where are you?"
  "I am here," was my faint rejoinder.
  "Well, don't you see what has happened? We are going upwards."
                                                  {CHAPTER_40 ^paragraph 40}
  "My dear uncle, what can you mean?" was my half-delirious reply.
  "Yes, I tell you we are ascending rapidly. Our downward journey is
quite checked."
  I held out my hand, and, after some little difficulty, succeeded
in touching the wall. My hand was in an instant covered with blood.
The skin was torn from the flesh. We were ascending with extraordinary
rapidity.
  "The torch- the torch!" cried the Professor, wildly; "it must be
lighted."
  Hans, the guide, after many vain efforts, at last succeeded in
lighting it, and the flame, having now nothing to prevent its burning,
shed a tolerably clear light. We were enabled to form an approximate
idea of the truth.
                                                  {CHAPTER_40 ^paragraph 45}
  "It is just as I thought," said my uncle, after a moment or two of
silent attention. "We are in a narrow well about four fathoms
square. The waters of the great inland sea, having reached the
bottom of the gulf are now forcing themselves up the mighty shaft.
As a natural consequence, we are being cast upon the summit of the
waters."
  "That I can see," was my lugubrious reply; "but where will this
shaft end, and to what fall are we likely to be exposed?"
  "Of that I am as ignorant as yourself. All I know is, that we should
be prepared for the worst. We are going up at a fearfully rapid
rate. As far as I can judge, we are ascending at the rate of two
fathoms a second, of a hundred and twenty fathoms a minute, or
rather more than three and a half leagues an hour. At this rate, our
fate will soon be a matter of certainty."
  "No doubt of it," was my reply. "The great concern I have now,
however, is to know whether this shaft has any issue. It may end in
a granite roof- in which case we shall be suffocated by compressed
air, or dashed to atoms against the top. I fancy, already, that the
air is beginning to be close and condensed. I have a difficulty in
breathing."
  This might be fancy, or it might be the effect of our rapid
motion, but I certainly felt a great oppression of the chest.
                                                  {CHAPTER_40 ^paragraph 50}
  "Henry," said the Professor, "I do believe that the situation is
to a certain extent desperate. There remain, however, many chances
of ultimate safety, and I have, in my own mind, been revolving them
over, during your heavy but agitated sleep. I have come to this
logical conclusion- whereas we may at any moment perish, so at any
moment we may be saved! We need, therefore, prepare ourselves for
whatever may turn up in the great chapter of accidents."
  "But what would you have us do?" I cried. "Are we not utterly
helpless?"
  "No! While there is life there is hope. At all events, there is
one thing we can do- eat, and thus obtain strength to face victory
or death."
  As he spoke, I looked at my uncle with a haggard glance. I had put
off the fatal communication as long as possible. It was now forced
upon me, and I must tell him the truth.
  Still I hesitated.
                                                  {CHAPTER_40 ^paragraph 55}
  "Eat," I said, in a deprecating tone as if there were no hurry.
  "Yes, and at once. I feel like a starving prisoner," he said,
rubbing his yellow and shivering hands together.
  And, turning round to the guide, he spoke some hearty, cheering
words, as I judged from his tone, in Danish. Hans shook his head in
a terribly significant manner. I tried to look unconcerned.
  "What!" cried the Professor, "you do not mean to say that all our
provisions are lost?"
  "Yes," was my lowly spoken reply, as I held out something in my
hand, "this morsel of dried meat is all that remains for us three."
                                                  {CHAPTER_40 ^paragraph 60}
  My uncle gazed at me as if he could not fully appreciate the meaning
of my words. The blow seemed to stun him by its severity. I allowed
him to reflect for some moments.
  "Well, said I, after a short pause, "what do you think now? Is there
any chance of our escaping from our horrible subterranean dangers? Are
we not doomed to perish in the great hollows of the center of the
earth?"
  But my pertinent questions brought no answer. My uncle either
heard me not, or appeared not to do so.
  And in this way a whole hour passed. Neither of us cared to speak.
For myself, I began to feel the most fearful and devouring hunger.
My companions, doubtless, felt the same horrible tortures, but neither
of them would touch the wretched morsel of meat that remained. It
lay there, a last remnant of all our great preparations for the mad
and senseless journey!
  I looked back, with wonderment, to my own folly. Fully was I aware
that, despite his enthusiasm, and the ever-to-be-hated scroll of
Saknussemm, my uncle should never have started on his perilous voyage.
What memories of the happy past, what previsions of the horrible
future, now filled my brain!

CHAPTER_41
                     CHAPTER 41
                       Hunger
-
  HUNGER, prolonged, is temporary madness! The brain is at work
without its required food, and the most fantastic notions fill the
mind. Hitherto I had never known what hunger really meant. I was
likely to understand it now.
  And yet, three months before I could tell my terrible story of
starvation, as I thought it. As a boy I used to make frequent
excursions in the neighborhood of the Professor's house.
  My uncle always acted on system, and he believed that, in addition
to the day of rest and worship, there should be a day of recreation.
In consequence, I was always free to do as I liked on a Wednesday.
  Now, as I had a notion to combine the useful and the agreeable, my
favorite pastime was birds' nesting. I had one of the best collections
of eggs in all the town. They were classified, and under glass cases.
                                                   {CHAPTER_41 ^paragraph 5}
  There was a certain wood, which, by rising at early morn, and taking
the cheap train, I could reach at eleven in the morning. Here I
would botanize or geologize at my will. My uncle was always glad of
specimens for his herbarium, and stones to examine. When I had
filled my wallet, I proceeded to search for nests.
  After about two hours of hard work, I, one day, sat down by a stream
to eat my humble but copious lunch. How the remembrance of the
spiced sausage, the wheaten loaf, and the beer, made my mouth water
now! I would have given every prospect of worldly wealth for such a
meal. But to my story.
  While seated thus at my leisure, I looked up at the ruins of an
old castle, at no great distance. It was the remains of an
historical dwelling, ivy-clad, and now falling to pieces.
  While looking, I saw two eagles circling about the summit of a lofty
tower. I soon became satisfied that there was a nest. Now, in all my
collection, I lacked eggs of the native eagle and the large owl.
  My mind was made up. I would reach the summit of that tower, or
perish in the attempt. I went nearer, and surveyed the ruins. The
old staircase, years before, had fallen in. The outer walls were,
however, intact. There was no chance that way, unless I looked to
the ivy solely for support. This was, as I soon found out, futile.
                                                  {CHAPTER_41 ^paragraph 10}
  There remained the chimney, which still went up to the top, and
had once served to carry off the smoke from every story of the tower.
  Up this I determined to venture. It was narrow, rough, and therefore
the more easily climbed. I took off my coat and crept into the
chimney. Looking up, I saw a small, light opening, proclaiming the
summit of the chimney.
  Up- up I went, for some time using my hands and knees, after the
fashion of a chimney sweep. It was slow work, but, there being
continual projections, the task was comparatively easy. In this way, I
reached halfway. The chimney now became narrower. The atmosphere was
close, and, at last, to end the matter, I stuck fast. I could ascend
no higher.
  There could be no doubt of this, and there remained no resource
but to descend, and give up my glorious prey in despair. I yielded
to fate and endeavored to descend. But I could not move. Some unseen
and mysterious obstacle intervened and stopped me. In an instant the
full horror of my situation seized me.
  I was unable to move either way, and was doomed to a terrible and
horrible death, that of starvation. In a boy's mind, however, there is
an extraordinary amount of elasticity and hope, and I began to think
of all sorts of plans to escape my gloomy fate.
                                                  {CHAPTER_41 ^paragraph 15}
  In the first place, I required no food just at present, having had
an excellent meal, and was therefore allowed time for reflection. My
first thought was to try and move the mortar with my hand. Had I
possessed a knife, something might have been done, but that useful
instrument I had left in my coat pocket.
  I soon found that all efforts of this kind were vain and useless,
and that all I could hope to do was to wriggle downwards.
  But though I jerked and struggled, and strove to turn, it was all in
vain. I could not move an inch, one way or the other. And time flew
rapidly. My early rising probably contributed to the fact that I
felt sleepy, and gradually gave way to the sensation of drowsiness.
  I slept, and awoke in darkness, ravenously hungry.
  Night had come, and still I could not move. I was tight bound, and
did not succeed in changing my position an inch. I groaned aloud.
Never since the days of my happy childhood, when it was a hardship
to go from meal to meal without eating, had I really experienced
hunger. The sensation was as novel as it was painful. I began now to
lose my head and to scream and cry out in my agony. Something
appeared, startled by my noise. It was a harmless lizard, but it
appeared to me a loathsome reptile. Again I made the old ruins resound
with my cries, and finally so exhausted myself that I fainted.
                                                  {CHAPTER_41 ^paragraph 20}
  How long I lay in a kind of trance or sleep I cannot say, but when
again I recovered consciousness it was day. How ill I felt, how hunger
still gnawed at me, it would be hard to say. I was too weak to
scream now, far too weak to struggle.
  Suddenly I was startled by a roar.
  "Are you there, Henry?" said the voice of my uncle; "are you
there, my boy?"
  I could only faintly respond, but I also made a desperate effort
to turn. Some mortar fell. To this I owed my being discovered. When
the search took place, it was easily seen that mortar and small pieces
of stone had recently fallen from above. Hence my uncle's cry.
  "Be calm, "he cried, "if we pull down the whole ruin, you shall be
saved."
                                                  {CHAPTER_41 ^paragraph 25}
  They were delicious words, but I had little hope.
  Soon however, about a quarter of an hour later I heard a voice above
me, at one of the upper fireplaces.
  "Are you below or above?"
  "Below," was my reply.
  In an instant a basket was lowered with milk, a biscuit, and an egg.
My uncle was fearful to be too ready with his supply of food. I
drank the milk first, for thirst had nearly deadened hunger. I then,
much refreshed, ate my bread and hard egg.
                                                  {CHAPTER_41 ^paragraph 30}
  They were now at work at the wall. I could hear a pickax. Wishing to
escape all danger from this terrible weapon I made a desperate
struggle, and the belt, which surrounded my waist and which had been
hitched on a stone, gave way. I was free, and only escaped falling
down by a rapid motion of my hands and knees.
  In ten minutes more I was in my uncle's arms, after being two days
and nights in that horrible prison. My occasional delirium prevented
me from counting time.
  I was weeks recovering from that awful starvation adventure; and yet
what was that to the hideous sufferings I now endured?
  After dreaming for some time, and thinking of this and other
matters, I once more looked around me. We were still ascending with
fearful rapidity. Every now and then the air appeared to check our
respiration as it does that of aeronauts when the ascension of the
balloon is too rapid. But if they feel a degree of cold in
proportion to the elevation they attain in the atmosphere, we
experienced quite a contrary effect. The heat began to increase in a
most threatening and exceptional manner. I cannot tell exactly the
mean, but I think it must have reached one hundred twenty-two
degrees Fahrenheit.
  What was the meaning of this extraordinary change in the
temperature? As far as we had hitherto gone, facts had proved the
theories of Davy and of Lidenbrock to be correct. Until now, all the
peculiar conditions of refractory rocks, of electricity, of magnetism,
had modified the general laws of nature, and had created for us a
moderate temperature; for the theory of the central fire, remained, in
my eyes, the only explainable one.
                                                  {CHAPTER_41 ^paragraph 35}
  Were we, then, going to reach a position in which these phenomena
were to be carried out in all their rigor, and in which the heat would
reduce the rocks to a state of fusion?
  Such was my not unnatural fear, and I did not conceal the fact
from my uncle. My way of doing so might be cold and heartless, but I
could not help it.
  "If we are not drowned, or smashed into pancakes, and if we do not
die of starvation, we have the satisfaction of knowing that we must be
burned alive."
  My uncle, in presence of this brusque attack, simply shrugged his
shoulders, and resumed his reflections- whatever they might be.
  An hour passed away, and except that there was a slight increase
in the temperature no incident modified the situation.
                                                  {CHAPTER_41 ^paragraph 40}
  My uncle at last, of his own accord, broke silence.
  "Well, Henry, my boy," he said, in a cheerful way, "we must make
up our minds."
  "Make up our minds to what?" I asked, in considerable surprise.
  "Well- to something. We must at whatever risk recruit our physical
strength. If we make the fatal mistake of husbanding our little
remnant of food, we may probably prolong our wretched existence a
few hours- but we shall remain weak to the end."
  "Yes," I growled, "to the end. That, however, will not keep us
long waiting."
                                                  {CHAPTER_41 ^paragraph 45}
  "Well, only let a chance of safety present itself- only allow that a
moment of action be necessary- where shall we find the means of action
if we allow ourselves to be reduced to physical weakness by
inanition?"
  "When this piece of meat is devoured, Uncle, what hope will there
remain unto us?"
  "None, my dear Henry, none. But will it do you any good to devour it
with your eyes? You appear to me to reason like one without will or
decision, like a being without energy."
  "Then," cried I, exasperated to a degree which is scarcely to be
explained, "you do not mean to tell me- that you- that you- have not
lost all hope.
  "Certainly not," replied the Professor with consummate coolness.
                                                  {CHAPTER_41 ^paragraph 50}
  "You mean to tell me, Uncle, that we shall get out of this monstrous
subterranean shaft?"
  "While there is life there is hope. I beg to assert, Henry, that
as long as a man's heart beats, as long as a man's flesh quivers, I do
not allow that a being gifted with thought and will can allow
himself to despair."
  What a nerve! The man placed in a position like that we occupied
must have been very brave to speak like this.
  "Well," I cried, "what do you mean to do?"
  "Eat what remains of the food we have in our hands; let us swallow
the last crumb. It will bel Heaven willing, our last repast. Well,
never mind- instead of being exhausted skeletons, we shall be men."
                                                  {CHAPTER_41 ^paragraph 55}
  "True," muttered I in a despairing tone, "let us take our fill."
  "We must, replied my uncle, with a deep sigh, "call it what you
will."
  My uncle took a piece of the meat that remained, and some crusts
of biscuit which had escaped the wreck. He divided the whole into
three parts.
  Each had one pound of food to last him as long as he remained in the
interior of the earth.
  Each now acted in accordance with his own private character.
                                                  {CHAPTER_41 ^paragraph 60}
  My uncle, the Professor, ate greedily, but evidently without
appetite, eating simply from some mechanical motion. I put the food
inside my lips, and hungry as I was, chewed my morsel without
pleasure, and without satisfaction.
  Hans, the guide, just as if he had been eider-down hunting,
swallowed every mouthful, as though it were a usual affair. He
looked like a man equally prepared to enjoy superfluity or total want.
  Hans, in all probability, was no more used to starvation than
ourselves, but his hardy Icelandic nature had prepared him for many
sufferings. As long as he received his three rix-dollars every
Saturday night, he was prepared for anything.
  The fact was, Hans never troubled himself about much except his
money. He had undertaken to serve a certain man at so much per week,
and no matter what evils befell his employer or himself, he never
found fault or grumbled, so long as his wages were duly paid.
  Suddenly my uncle roused himself. He had seen a smile on the face of
our guide. I could not make it out.
                                                  {CHAPTER_41 ^paragraph 65}
  "What is the matter?" said my uncle.
  "Schiedam," said the guide, producing a bottle of this precious
fluid.
  We drank. My uncle and myself will own to our dying day that hence
we derived strength to exist until the last bitter moment. That
precious bottle of Hollands was in reality only half full; but,
under the circumstances, it was nectar.
  It took some minutes for myself and my uncle to form a decided
opinion on the subject. The worthy Professor swallowed about half a
pint and did not seem able to drink any more.
  "Fortrafflig," said Hans, swallowing nearly all that was left.
                                                  {CHAPTER_41 ^paragraph 70}
  "Excellent- very good," said my uncle, with as much gusto as if he
had just left the steps of the club at Hamburg.
  I had begun to feel as if there had been one gleam of hope. Now
all thought of the future vanished!
  We had consumed our last ounce of food, and it was five o'clock in
the morning!

CHAPTER_42
                     CHAPTER 42
                The Volcanic Shaft
-
  MAN'S constitution is so peculiar that his health is purely a
negative matter. No sooner is the rage of hunger appeased than it
becomes difficult to comprehend the meaning of starvation. It is
only when you suffer that you really understand.
  As to anyone who has not endured privation having any notion of
the matter, it is simply absurd.
  With us, after a long fast, some mouthfuls of bread and meat, a
little moldy biscuit and salt beef triumphed over all our previous
gloomy and saturnine thoughts.
  Nevertheless, after this repast each gave way to his own
reflections. I wondered what were those of Hans- the man of the
extreme north, who was yet gifted with the fatalistic resignation of
Oriental character. But the utmost stretch of the imagination would
not allow me to realize the truth. As for my individual self, my
thoughts had ceased to be anything but memories of the past, and
were all connected with that upper world which I never should have
left. I saw it all now, the beautiful house in the Konigstrasse, my
poor Gretchen, the good Martha; they all passed before my mind like
visions of the past. Every time any of the lugubrious groanings
which were to be distinguished in the hollows around fell upon my
ears, I fancied I heard the distant murmur of the great cities above
my head.
                                                   {CHAPTER_42 ^paragraph 5}
  As for my uncle, always thinking of his science, he examined the
nature of the shaft by means of a torch. He closely examined the
different strata one above the other, in order to recognize his
situation by geological theory. This calculation, or rather this
estimation, could by no means be anything but approximate. But a
learned man, a philosopher, is nothing if not a philosopher, when he
keeps his ideas calm and collected; and certainly the Professor
possessed this quality to perfection.
  I heard him, as I sat in silence, murmuring words of geological
science. As I understood his object and his meaning, I could not but
interest myself despite my preoccupation in that terrible hour.
  "Eruptive granite," he said to himself, "we are still in the
primitive epoch. But we are going up- going up, still going up. But
who knows? Who knows?"
  Then he still hoped. He felt along the vertical sides of the shaft
with his hand, and some few minutes later, he would go on again in the
following style:
  "This is gneiss. This is mica schist- siliceous mineral. Good again;
this is the epoch of transition, at all events, we are close to
them- and then, and then-"
                                                  {CHAPTER_42 ^paragraph 10}
  What could the Professor mean? Could he, by any conceivable means,
measure the thickness of the crust of the earth suspended above our
heads? Did he possess any possible means of making any approximation
to this calculation? No.
  The manometer was wanting, and no summary estimation could take
the place of it.
  And yet, as we progressed, the temperature increased in the most
extraordinary degree, and I began to feel as if I were bathed in a hot
and burning atmosphere. Never before had I felt anything like it. I
could only compare it to the hot vapor from an iron foundry, when
the liquid iron is in a state of ebullition and runs over. By degrees,
and one after the other, Hans, my uncle, and myself had taken off
our coats and waistcoats. They were unbearable. Even the slightest
garment was not only uncomfortable, but the cause of extreme
suffering.
  "Are we ascending to a living fire?" I cried; when, to my horror and
astonishment, the heat became greater than before.
  "No, no," said my uncle, "it is simply impossible, quite
impossible."
                                                  {CHAPTER_42 ^paragraph 15}
  "And yet," said I, touching the side of the shaft with my naked
hand, "this wall is literally burning."
  At this moment, feeling as I did that the sides of this
extraordinary wall were red hot, I plunged my hands into the water
to cool them. I drew them back with a cry of despair.
  "The water is boiling!" I cried.
  My uncle, the Professor, made no reply other than a gesture of
rage and despair.
  Something very like the truth had probably struck his imagination.
                                                  {CHAPTER_42 ^paragraph 20}
  But I could take no share in either what was going on, or in his
speculations. An invincible dread had taken possession of my brain and
soul. I could only look forward to an immediate catastrophe, such a
catastrophe as not even the most vivid imagination could have
thought of. An idea, at first vague and uncertain, was gradually being
changed into certainty.
  I tremulously rejected it at first, but it forced itself upon me
by degrees with extreme obstinacy. It was so terrible an idea that I
scarcely dared to whisper it to myself.
  And yet all the while certain, and as it were, involuntary
observations determined my convictions. By the doubtful glare of the
torch, I could make out some singular changes in the granitic
strata; a strange and terrible phenomenon was about to be produced, in
which electricity played a part.
  Then this boiling water, this terrible and excessive heat? I
determined as a last resource to examine the compass.
  The compass had gone mad!
                                                  {CHAPTER_42 ^paragraph 25}
  Yes, wholly stark staring mad. The needle jumped from pole to pole
with sudden and surprising jerks, ran round, or as it is said, boxed
the compass, and then ran suddenly back again as if it had the
vertigo.
  I was aware that, according to the best acknowledged theories, it
was a received notion that the mineral crust of the globe is never,
and never has been, in a state of complete repose.
  It is perpetually undergoing the modifications caused by the
decomposition of internal matter, the agitation consequent on the
flowing of extensive liquid currents, the excessive action of
magnetism which tends to shake it incessantly, at a time when even the
multitudinous beings on its surface do not suspect the seething
process to be going on.
  Still this phenomenon would not have alarmed me alone; it would
not have aroused in my mind a terrible, an awful idea.
  But other facts could not allow my self-delusion to last.
                                                  {CHAPTER_42 ^paragraph 30}
  Terrible detonations, like Heaven's artillery, began to multiply
themselves with fearful intensity. I could only compare them with
the noise made by hundreds of heavily laden chariots being madly
driven over a stone pavement. It was a continuous roll of heavy
thunder.
  And then the mad compass, shaken by the wild electric phenomena,
confirmed me in my rapidly formed opinion. The mineral crust was about
to burst, the heavy granite masses were about to rejoin, the fissure
was about to close, the void was about to be filled up, and we poor
atoms to be crushed in its awful embrace!
  "Uncle, Uncle!" I cried, "we are wholly, irretrievably lost!"
  "What, then, my young friend, is your new cause of terror and
alarm?" he said in his calmest manner. "What fear you now?"
  "What do I fear now!" I cried in fierce and angry tones. "Do you not
see that the walls of the shaft are in motion? Do you not see that the
solid granite masses are cracking? Do you not feel the terrible,
torrid heat? Do you not observe the awful boiling water on which we
float? Do you not remark this mad needle? Every sign and portent of an
awful earthquake!"
                                                  {CHAPTER_42 ^paragraph 35}
  My uncle coolly shook his head.
  "An earthquake," he replied in the most calm and provoking tone.
  "Yes."
  "My nephew, I tell you that you are utterly mistaken," he continued.
  "Do you not, can you not, recognize all the well-known symtons-"
                                                  {CHAPTER_42 ^paragraph 40}
  "Of an earthquake? By no means. I am expecting something far more
important."
  "My brain is strained beyond endurance- what, what do you mean?" I
cried.
  "An eruption, Harry."
  "An eruption," I gasped. "We are, then, in the volcanic shaft of a
crater in full action and vigor."
  "I have every reason to think so," said the Professor in a smiling
tone, "and I beg to tell you that it is the most fortunate thing
that could happen to us."
                                                  {CHAPTER_42 ^paragraph 45}
  The most fortunate thing! Had my uncle really and truly gone mad?
What did he mean by these awful words- what did he mean by this
terrible calm, this solemn smile?
  "What!" cried I, in the height of my exasperation, "we are on the
way to an eruption, are we? Fatality has cast us into a well of
burning and boiling lava, of rocks on fire, of boiling water, in a
word, filled with every kind of eruptive matter? We are about to be
expelled, thrown up, vomited, spit out of the interior of the earth,
in common with huge blocks of granite, with showers of cinders and
scoriae, in a wild whirlwind of flame, and you say- the most fortunate
thing which could happen to us."
  "Yes, replied the Professor, looking at me calmly from under his
spectacles, "it is the only chance which remains to us of ever
escaping from the interior of the earth to the light of day."
  It is quite impossible that I can put on paper the thousand strange,
wild thoughts which followed this extraordinary announcement.
  But my uncle was right, quite right, and never had he appeared to me
so audacious and so convinced as when he looked me calmly in the
face and spoke of the chances of an eruption- of our being cast upon
Mother Earth once more through the gaping crater of a volcano!
                                                  {CHAPTER_42 ^paragraph 50}
  Nevertheless, while we were speaking we were still ascending; we
passed the whole night going up, or to speak more scientifically, in
an ascensional motion. The fearful noise redoubled; I was ready to
suffocate. I seriously believed that my last hour was approaching, and
yet, so strange is imagination, all I thought of was some childish
hypothesis or other. In such circumstances you do not choose your
own thoughts. They overcome you.
  It was quite evident that we were being cast upwards by eruptive
matter; under the raft there was a mass of boiling water, and under
this was a heavier mass of lava, and an aggregate of rocks which, on
reaching the summit of the water, would be dispersed in every
direction.
  That we were inside the chimney of a volcano there could no longer
be the shadow of a doubt. Nothing more terrible could be conceived!
  But on this occasion, instead of Sneffels, an old and extinct
volcano, we were inside a mountain of fire in full activity. Several
times I found myself asking, what mountain was it, and on what part of
the world we should be shot out. As if it were of any consequence!
  In the northern regions, there could be no reasonable doubt about
that. Before it went decidedly mad, the compass had never made the
slightest mistake. From the cape of Saknussemm, we had been swept away
to the northward many hundreds of leagues. Now the question was,
were we once more under Iceland- should we be belched forth on to
the earth through the crater of Mount Hecla, or should we reappear
through one of the other seven fire funnels of the island? Taking in
my mental vision a radius of five hundred leagues to the westward, I
could see under this parallel only the little-known volcanoes of the
northwest coast of America.
                                                  {CHAPTER_42 ^paragraph 55}
  To the east one only existed somewhere about the eightieth degree of
latitude, the Esk, upon the island of Jan Mayen, not far from the
frozen regions of Spitsbergen.
  It was not craters that were wanting, and many of them were big
enough to vomit a whole army; all I wished to know was the
particular one towards which we were making with such fearful
velocity.
  I often think now of my folly: as if I should ever have expected
to escape!
  Towards morning, the ascending motion became greater and greater. If
the degree of heat increased instead of decreasing, as we approached
the surface of the earth, it was simply because the causes were
local and wholly due to volcanic influence. Our very style of
locomotion left in my mind no doubt upon the subject. An enormous
force, a force of several hundreds of atmospheres produced by the
vapors accumulated and long compressed in the interior of the earth,
was hoisting us upwards with irresistible power.
  But though we were approaching the light of day, to what fearful
dangers were we about to be exposed?
                                                  {CHAPTER_42 ^paragraph 60}
  Instant death appeared the only fate which we could expect or
contemplate.
  Soon a dim, sepulchral light penetrated the vertical gallery,
which became wider and wider. I could make out to the right and left
long dark corridors like immense tunnels, from which awful and
horrid vapors poured out. Tongues of fire, sparkling and crackling,
appeared about to lick us up.
  The hour had come!
  "Look, Uncle, look!" I cried.
  "Well, what you see are the great sulphurous flames. Nothing more
common in connection with an eruption."
                                                  {CHAPTER_42 ^paragraph 65}
  "But if they lap us round!" I angrily replied.
  "They will not lap us round," was his quiet and serene answer.
  "But it will be all the same in the end if they stifle us," I cried.
  "We shall not be stifled. The gallery is rapidly becoming wider
and wider, and if it be necessary, we will presently leave the raft
and take refuge in some fissure in the rock."
  "But the water, the water, which is continually ascending?" I
despairingly replied.
                                                  {CHAPTER_42 ^paragraph 70}
  "There is no longer any water, Harry," he answered, "but a kind of
lava paste, which is heaving us up, in company with itself, to the
mouth of the crater."
  In truth, the liquid column of water had wholly disappeared to
give place to dense masses of boiling eruptive matter. The temperature
was becoming utterly insupportable, and a thermometer exposed to
this atmosphere would have marked between one hundred and
eighty-nine and one hundred ninety degrees Fahrenheit.
  Perspiration rushed from every pore. But for the extraordinary
rapidity of our ascent we should have been stifled.
  Nevertheless, the Professor did not carry out his proposition of
abandoning the raft; and he did quite wisely. Those few ill-joined
beams offered, anyway, a solid surface- a support which elsewhere must
have utterly failed us.
  Towards eight o'clock in the morning a new incident startled us. The
ascensional movement suddenly ceased. The raft became still and
motionless.
                                                  {CHAPTER_42 ^paragraph 75}
  "What is the matter now?" I said, querulously, very much startled by
this change.
  "A simple halt," replied my uncle.
  "Is the eruption about to fail?" I asked.
  "I hope not."
  Without making any reply, I rose. I tried to look around me. Perhaps
the raft, checked by some projecting rock, opposed a momentary
resistance to the eruptive mass. In this case, it was absolutely
necessary to release it as quickly as possible.
                                                  {CHAPTER_42 ^paragraph 80}
  Nothing of the kind had occurred. The column of cinders, of scoriae,
of broken rocks and earth, had wholly ceased to ascend.
  "I tell you, Uncle, that the eruption has stopped," was my
oracular decision.
  "Ah," said my uncle, "you think so, my boy. You are wrong. Do not be
in the least alarmed; this sudden moment of calm will not last long,
be assured. It has already endured five minutes, and before we are
many minutes older we shall be continuing our journey to the mouth
of the crater."
  All the time he was speaking the Professor continued to consult
his chronometer, and he was probably right in his prognostics. Soon
the raft resumed its motion, in a very rapid and disorderly way, which
lasted two minutes or thereabout; and then again it stopped as
suddenly as before.
  "Good," said my uncle, observing the hour, "in ten we shall start
again."
                                                  {CHAPTER_42 ^paragraph 85}
  "In ten minutes?"
  "Yes- precisely. We have to do with a volcano, the eruption of which
is intermittent. We are compelled to breathe just as it does."
  Nothing could be more true. At the exact minute he had indicated, we
were again launched on high with extreme rapidity. Not to be cast
off the raft, it was necessary to hold on to the beams. Then the hoist
again ceased.
  Many times since have I thought of this singular phenomenon
without being able to find for it any satisfactory explanation.
Nevertheless, it appeared quite clear to me, that we were not in the
principal chimney of the volcano, but in an accessory conduit, where
we felt the counter shock of the great and principal tunnel filled
by burning lava.
  It is impossible for me to say how many times this maneuver was
repeated. All that I can remember is, that on every ascensional
motion, we were hoisted up with ever increasing velocity, as if we had
been launched from a huge projectile. During the sudden halts we
were nearly stifled; during the moments of projection the hot air took
away our breath.
                                                  {CHAPTER_42 ^paragraph 90}
  I thought for a moment of the voluptuous joy of suddenly finding
myself in the hyperborean regions with the cold thirty degrees below
zero!
  My exalted imagination pictured to itself the vast snowy plains of
the arctic regions, and I was impatient to roll myself on the icy
carpet of the North Pole.
  By degrees my head, utterly overcome by a series of violent
emotions, began to give way to hallucination. I was delirious. Had
it not been for the powerful arms of Hans, the guide, I should have
broken my head against the granite masses of the shaft.
  I have, in consequence, kept no account of what followed for many
hours. I have a vague and confused remembrance of continual
detonations, of the shaking of the huge granitic mass, and of the raft
going round like a spinning top. It floated on the stream of hot lava,
amidst a falling cloud of cinders. The huge flames roaring, wrapped us
around.
  A storm of wind which appeared to be cast forth from an immense
ventilator roused up the interior fires of the earth. It was a hot,
incandescent blast!
                                                  {CHAPTER_42 ^paragraph 95}
  At last I saw the figure of Hans as if enveloped in the huge halo of
burning blaze, and no other sense remained to me but that sinister
dread which the condemned victim may be supposed to feel when led to
the mouth of a cannon, at the supreme moment when the shot is fired
and his limbs are dispersed into empty space.

CHAPTER_43
                     CHAPTER 43
                  Daylight at Last
-
  WHEN I opened my eyes I felt the hand of the guide clutching me
firmly by the belt. With his other hand he supported my uncle. I was
not grievously wounded, but bruised all over in the most remarkable
manner.
  After a moment I looked around, and found that I was lying down on
the slope of a mountain not two yards from a yawning gulf into which I
should have fallen had I made the slightest false step. Hans had saved
me from death, while I rolled insensible on the flanks of the crater.
  "Where are we?" dreamily asked my uncle, who literally appeared to
be disgusted at having returned to earth.
  The eider-down hunter simply shrugged his shoulders as a mark of
total ignorance.
                                                   {CHAPTER_43 ^paragraph 5}
  "In Iceland?" said I, not positively but interrogatively.
  "Nej," said Hans.
  "How do you mean?" cried the Professor; "no- what are your reasons?"
  "Hans is wrong," said I, rising.
  After all the innumerable surprises of this journey, a yet more
singular one was reserved to us. I expected to see a cone covered by
snow, by extensive and widespread glaciers, in the midst of the arid
deserts of the extreme northern regions, beneath the full rays of a
polar sky, beyond the highest latitudes.
                                                  {CHAPTER_43 ^paragraph 10}
  But contrary to all our expectations, I, my uncle, and the
Icelander, were cast upon the slope of a mountain calcined by the
burning rays of a sun which was literally baking us with its fires.
  I could not believe my eyes, but the actual heat which affected my
body allowed me no chance of doubting. We came out of the crater
half naked, and the radiant star from which we had asked nothing for
two months, was good enough to be prodigal to us of light and
warmth- a light and warmth we could easily have dispensed with.
  When our eyes were accustomed to the light we had lost sight of so
long, I used them to rectify the errors of my imagination. Whatever
happened, we should have been at Spitsbergen, and I was in no humor to
yield to anything but the most absolute proof.
  After some delay, the Professor spoke.
  "Hem!" he said, in a hesitating kind of way, "it really does not
look like Iceland."
                                                  {CHAPTER_43 ^paragraph 15}
  "But supposing it were the island of Jan Mayen?" I ventured to
observe.
  "Not in the least, my boy. This is not one of the volcanoes of the
north, with its hills of granite and its crown of snow."
  "Nevertheless-
  "Look, look, my boy," said the Professor, as dogmatically as usual.
  Right above our heads, at a great height, opened the crater of a
volcano from which escaped, from one quarter of an hour to the
other, with a very loud explosion, a lofty jet of flame mingled with
pumice stone, cinders, and lava. I could feel the convulsions of
nature in the mountain, which breathed like a huge whale, throwing
up from time to time fire and air through its enormous vents.
                                                  {CHAPTER_43 ^paragraph 20}
  Below, and floating along a slope of considerable angularity, the
stream of eruptive matter spread away to a depth which did not give
the volcano a height of three hundred fathoms.
  Its base disappeared in a perfect forest of green trees, among which
I perceived olives, fig trees, and vines loaded with rich grapes.
  Certainly this was not the ordinary aspect of the arctic regions.
About that there could not be the slightest doubt.
  When the eye was satisfied at its glimpse of this verdant expanse,
it fell upon the waters of a lovely sea or beautiful lake, which
made of this enchanted land an island of not many leagues in extent.
  On the side of the rising sun was to be seen a little port,
crowded with houses, and near which the boats and vessels of
peculiar build were floating upon azure waves.
                                                  {CHAPTER_43 ^paragraph 25}
  Beyond, groups of islands rose above the liquid plain, so numerous
and close together as to resemble a vast beehive.
  Towards the setting sun, some distant shores were to be made out
on the edge of the horizon. Some presented the appearance of blue
mountains of harmonious conformation; upon others, much more
distant, there appeared a prodigiously lofty cone, above the summit of
which hung dark and heavy clouds.
  Towards the north, an immense expanse of water sparkled beneath
the solar rays, occasionally allowing the extremity of a mast or the
convexity of a sail bellying to the wind, to be seen.
  The unexpected character of such a scene added a hundredfold to
its marvelous beauties.
  "Where can we be?" I asked, speaking in a low and solemn voice.
                                                  {CHAPTER_43 ^paragraph 30}
  Hans shut his eyes with an air of indifference, and my uncle
looked on without clearly understanding.
  "Whatever this mountain may be," he said, at last, "I must confess
it is rather warm. The explosions do not leave off, and I do not think
it is worthwhile to have left the interior of a volcano and remain
here to receive a huge piece of rock upon one's head. Let us carefully
descend the mountain and discover the real state of the case. To
confess the truth, I am dying of hunger and thirst."
  Decidedly the Professor was no longer a truly reflective
character. For myself, forgetting all my necessities, ignoring my
fatigues and sufferings, I should have remained still for several
hours longer- but it was necessary to follow my companions.
  The slope of the volcano was very steep and slippery; we slid over
piles of ashes, avoiding the streams of hot lava which glided about
like fiery serpents. Still, while we were advancing, I spoke with
extreme volubility, for my imagination was too full not to explode
in words.
  "We are in Asia!" I exclaimed; "we are on the coast of India, in the
great Malay islands, in the center of Oceania. We have crossed the one
half of the globe to come out right at the antipodes of Europe!"
                                                  {CHAPTER_43 ^paragraph 35}
  "But the compass!" exclaimed my uncle; "explain that to me!"
  "Yes- the compass," I said with considerable hesitation. "I grant
that is a difficulty. According to it, we have always been going
northward."
  "Then it lied."
  "Hem- to say it lied is rather a harsh word," was my answer.
  "Then we are at the North Pole-"
                                                  {CHAPTER_43 ^paragraph 40}
  "The Pole- no- well- well I give it up," was my reply.
  The plain truth was, that there was no explanation possible. I could
make nothing of it.
  And all the while we were approaching this beautiful verdure, hunger
and thirst tormented me fearfully. Happily, after two long hours'
march, a beautiful country spread out before us, covered by olives,
pomegranates, and vines, which appeared to belong to anybody and
everybody. In any event, in the state of destitution into which we had
fallen, we were not in a mood to ponder too scrupulously.
  What delight it was to press these delicious fruits to our lips, and
to bite at grapes and pomegranates fresh from the vine.
  Not far off, near some fresh and mossy grass, under the delicious
shade of some trees, I discovered a spring of fresh water, in which we
voluptuously laved our faces, hands, and feet.
                                                  {CHAPTER_43 ^paragraph 45}
  While we were all giving way to the delights of new-found pleasures,
a little child appeared between two tufted olive trees.
  "Ah," cried I, "an inhabitant of this happy country."
  The little fellow was poorly dressed, weak, and suffering, and
appeared terribly alarmed at our appearance. Half-naked, with tangled,
matted and ragged beards, we did look supremely ill-favored; and
unless the country was a bandit land, we were not likely to alarm
the inhabitants!
  Just as the boy was about to take to his heels, Hans ran after
him, and brought him back, despite his cries and kicks.
  My uncle tried to look as gentle as possible, and then spoke in
German.
                                                  {CHAPTER_43 ^paragraph 50}
  "What is the name of this mountain, my friend?"
  The child made no reply.
  "Good," said my uncle, with a very positive air of conviction, "we
are not in Germany."
  He then made the same demand in English, of which language he was an
excellent scholar.
  The child shook its head and made no reply. I began to be
considerably puzzled.
                                                  {CHAPTER_43 ^paragraph 55}
  "Is he dumb?" cried the Professor, who was rather proud of his
polyglot knowledge of languages, and made the same demand in French.
  The boy only stared in his face.
  "I must perforce try him in Italian," said my uncle, with a shrug.
  "Dove noi siamo?"
  "Yes, tell me where we are?" I added impatiently and eagerly.
                                                  {CHAPTER_43 ^paragraph 60}
  Again the boy remained silent.
  "My fine fellow, do you or do you not mean to speak?" cried my
uncle, who began to get angry. He shook him, and spoke another dialect
of the Italian language.
  "Come si noma questa isola?"- "What is the name of this island?"
  "Stromboli," replied the rickety little shepherd, dashing away
from Hans and disappearing in the olive groves.
  We thought little enough about him.
                                                  {CHAPTER_43 ^paragraph 65}
  Stromboli! What effect on the imagination did these few words
produce! We were in the center of the Mediterranean, amidst the
eastern archipelago of mythological memory, in the ancient Strongylos,
where AEolus kept the wind and the tempest chained up. And those
blue mountains, which rose towards the rising sun, were the
mountains of Calabria.
  And that mighty volcano which rose on the southern horizon was Etna,
the fierce and celebrated Etna!
  "Stromboli! Stromboli!" I repeated to myself.
  My uncle played a regular accompaniment to my gestures and words. We
were singing together like an ancient chorus.
  Ah- what a journey- what a marvelous and extraordinary journey! Here
we had entered the earth by one volcano, and we had come out by
another. And this other was situated more than twelve hundred
leagues from Sneffels from that drear country of Iceland cast away
on the confines of the earth. The wondrous changes of this
expedition had transported us to the most harmonious and beautiful
of earthly lands. We had abandoned the region of eternal snows for
that of infinite verdure, and had left over our heads the gray fog
of the icy regions to come back to the azure sky of Sicily!
                                                  {CHAPTER_43 ^paragraph 70}
  After a delicious repast of fruits and fresh water, we again
continued our journey in order to reach the port of Stromboli. To
say how we had reached the island would scarcely have been prudent.
The superstitious character of the Italians would have been at work,
and we should have been called demons vomited from the infernal
regions. It was therefore necessary to pass for humble and unfortunate
shipwrecked travelers. It was certainly less striking and romantic,
but it was decidedly safer.
  As we advanced, I could hear my worthy uncle muttering to himself:
  "But the compass. The compass most certainly marked north. This is a
fact I cannot explain in any way."
  "Well, the fact is," said I, with an air of disdain, "we must not
explain anything. It will be much more easy."
  "I should like to see a professor of the Johanneum Institution who
is unable to explain a cosmic phenomenon- it would indeed be strange."
                                                  {CHAPTER_43 ^paragraph 75}
  And speaking thus, my uncle, half-naked, his leathern purse round
his loins, and his spectacles upon his nose, became once more the
terrible Professor of Mineralogy.
  An hour after leaving the wood of olives, we reached the fort of San
Vicenza, where Hans demanded the price of his thirteenth week of
service. My uncle paid him, with very many warm shakes of the hand.
  At that moment, if he did not indeed quite share our natural
emotion, he allowed his feelings so far to give way as to indulge in
an extraordinary expression for him.
  With the tips of two fingers he gently pressed our hands and smiled.

CHAPTER_44
                     CHAPTER 44
                 The Journey Ended
-
  THIS is the final conclusion of a narrative which will be probably
disbelieved even by people who are astonished at nothing. I am,
however, armed at all points against human incredulity.
  We were kindly received by the Strombolite fishermen, who treated us
as shipwrecked travelers. They gave us clothes and food. After a delay
of forty-eight hours, on the 30th of September a little vessel took us
to Messina, where a few days of delightful and complete repose
restored us to ourselves.
  On Friday, the 4th of October, we embarked in the Volturne, one of
the postal packets of the Imperial Messageries of France; and three
days later we landed at Marseilles, having no other care on our
minds but that of our precious but erratic compass. This
inexplicable circumstance tormented me terribly. On the 9th of
October, in the evening, we reached Hamburg.
  What was the astonishment of Martha, what the joy of Gretchen! I
will not attempt to define it.
                                                   {CHAPTER_44 ^paragraph 5}
  "Now then, Harry, that you really are a hero," she said, "there is
no reason why you should ever leave me again."
  I looked at her. She was weeping tears of joy.
  I leave it to be imagined if the return of Professor Hardwigg made
or did not make a sensation in Hamburg. Thanks to the indiscretion
of Martha, the news of his departure for the interior of the earth had
been spread over the whole world.
  No one would believe it- and when they saw him come back in safety
they believed it all the less.
  But the presence of Hans and many stray scraps of information by
degrees modified public opinion.
                                                  {CHAPTER_44 ^paragraph 10}
  Then my uncle became a great man and I the nephew of a great man,
which, at all events, is something. Hamburg gave a festival in our
honor. A public meeting of the Johanneum Institution was held, at
which the Professor related the whole story of his adventures,
omitting only the facts in connection with the compass.
  That same day he deposited in the archives of the town the
document he had found written by Saknussemm, and he expressed his
great regret that circumstances, stronger than his will, did not allow
him to follow the Icelandic traveler's track into the very center of
the earth. He was modest in his glory, but his reputation only
increased.
  So much honor necessarily created for him many envious enemies. Of
course they existed, and as his theories, supported by certain
facts, contradicted the system of science upon the question of central
heat, he maintained his own views both with pen and speech against the
learned of every country. Although I still believe in the theory of
central heat, I confess that certain circumstances, hitherto very
ill defined, may modify the laws of such natural phenomena.
  At the moment when these questions were being discussed with
interest, my uncle received a rude shock-one that he felt very much.
Hans, despite everything he could say to the contrary, quitted
Hamburg; the man to whom we owed so much would not allow us to pay our
deep debt of gratitude. He was taken with nostalgia; a love for his
Icelandic home.
  "Farval," said he, one day, and with this one short word of adieu,
he started for Reykjavik, which he soon reached in safety.
                                                  {CHAPTER_44 ^paragraph 15}
  We were deeply attached to our brave eider-duck hunter. His
absence will never cause him to be forgotten by those whose lives he
saved, and I hope, at some not distant day, to see him again.
  To conclude, I may say that our journey into the interior of the
earth created an enormous sensation throughout the civilized world. It
was translated and printed in many languages. All the leading journals
published extracts from it, which were commentated, discussed,
attacked, and supported with equal animation by those who believed
in its episodes, and by those who were utterly incredulous.
  Wonderful! My uncle enjoyed during his lifetime all the glory he
deserved; and he was even offered a large sum of money, by Mr. Barnum,
to exhibit himself in the United States; while I am credibly
informed by a traveler that he is to be seen in waxwork at Madame
Tussaud's!
  But one care preyed upon his mind, a care which rendered him very
unhappy. One fact remained inexplicable- that of the compass. For a
learned man to be baffled by such an inexplicable phenomenon was
very aggravating. But Heaven was merciful, and in the end my uncle was
happy.
  One day, while he put some minerals belonging to his collection in
order, I fell upon the famous compass and examined it keenly.
                                                  {CHAPTER_44 ^paragraph 20}
  For six months it had lain unnoticed and untouched.
  I looked at it with curiosity, which soon became surprise. I gave
a loud cry. The Professor, who was at hand, soon joined me.
  "What is the matter?" he cried.
  "The compass!
  "What then?"
                                                  {CHAPTER_44 ^paragraph 25}
  "Why its needle points to the south and not to the north."
  "My dear boy, you must be dreaming."
  "I am not dreaming. See- the poles are changed."
  "Changed!"
  My uncle put on his spectacles, examined the instrument, and
leaped with joy, shaking the whole house.
                                                  {CHAPTER_44 ^paragraph 30}
  A clear light fell upon our minds.
  "Here it is!" he cried, as soon as he had recovered the use of his
speech, "after we had once passed Cape Saknussemm, the needle of
this compass pointed to the southward instead of the northward."
  "Evidently."
  "Our error is now easily explained. But to what phenomenon do we owe
this alteration in the needle?"
  "Nothing more simple."

  "Explain yourself, my boy. I am on thorns."
  "During the storm, upon the Central Sea, the ball of fire which made
a magnet of the iron in our raft, turned our compass topsy-turvy."
  "Ah!" cried the Professor, with a loud and ringing laugh, "it was
a trick of that inexplicable electricity."
  From that hour my uncle was the happiest of learned men, and I the
happiest of ordinary mortals. For my pretty Virland girl, abdicating
her position as ward, took her place in the house in the
Konigstrasse in the double quality of niece and wife.
  We need scarcely mention that her uncle was the illustrious
Professor Hardwigg, corresponding member of all the scientific,
geographical, mineralogical, and geological societies of the five
parts of the globe.



                                -THE END-

###################################################################################

FROM THE EARTH TO THE MOON




CHAPTER I


THE GUN CLUB


During the War of the Rebellion, a new and influential club was
established in the city of Baltimore in the State of Maryland.
It is well known with what energy the taste for military matters
became developed among that nation of ship-owners, shopkeepers,
and mechanics.  Simple tradesmen jumped their counters to become
extemporized captains, colonels, and generals, without having
ever passed the School of Instruction at West Point;
nevertheless; they quickly rivaled their compeers of the old
continent, and, like them, carried off victories by dint of
lavish expenditure in ammunition, money, and men.

But the point in which the Americans singularly distanced the
Europeans was in the science of gunnery.  Not, indeed, that
their weapons retained a higher degree of perfection than
theirs, but that they exhibited unheard-of dimensions, and
consequently attained hitherto unheard-of ranges.  In point of
grazing, plunging, oblique, or enfilading, or point-blank
firing, the English, French, and Prussians have nothing to
learn; but their cannon, howitzers, and mortars are mere
pocket-pistols compared with the formidable engines of the
American artillery.

This fact need surprise no one.  The Yankees, the first
mechanicians in the world, are engineers-- just as the Italians
are musicians and the Germans metaphysicians-- by right of birth.
Nothing is more natural, therefore, than to perceive them
applying their audacious ingenuity to the science of gunnery.
Witness the marvels of Parrott, Dahlgren, and Rodman.
The Armstrong, Palliser, and Beaulieu guns were compelled to bow
before their transatlantic rivals.

Now when an American has an idea, he directly seeks a second
American to share it.  If there be three, they elect a president
and two secretaries.  Given four, they name a keeper of records,
and the office is ready for work; five, they convene a general
meeting, and the club is fully constituted.  So things were
managed in Baltimore.  The inventor of a new cannon associated
himself with the caster and the borer.  Thus was formed the
nucleus of the "Gun Club."  In a single month after its formation
it numbered 1,833 effective members and 30,565 corresponding members.

One condition was imposed as a _sine qua non_ upon every
candidate for admission into the association, and that was the
condition of having designed, or (more or less) perfected a
cannon; or, in default of a cannon, at least a firearm of
some description.  It may, however, be mentioned that mere
inventors of revolvers, fire-shooting carbines, and similar
small arms, met with little consideration.  Artillerists always
commanded the chief place of favor.

The estimation in which these gentlemen were held, according to
one of the most scientific exponents of the Gun Club, was
"proportional to the masses of their guns, and in the direct
ratio of the square of the distances attained by their projectiles."

The Gun Club once founded, it is easy to conceive the result of
the inventive genius of the Americans.  Their military weapons
attained colossal proportions, and their projectiles, exceeding
the prescribed limits, unfortunately occasionally cut in two
some unoffending pedestrians.  These inventions, in fact, left
far in the rear the timid instruments of European artillery.

It is but fair to add that these Yankees, brave as they have
ever proved themselves to be, did not confine themselves to
theories and formulae, but that they paid heavily, _in propria
persona_, for their inventions.  Among them were to be counted
officers of all ranks, from lieutenants to generals; military
men of every age, from those who were just making their _debut_
in the profession of arms up to those who had grown old in the
gun-carriage.  Many had found their rest on the field of battle
whose names figured in the "Book of Honor" of the Gun Club; and
of those who made good their return the greater proportion bore
the marks of their indisputable valor.  Crutches, wooden legs,
artificial arms, steel hooks, caoutchouc jaws, silver craniums,
platinum noses, were all to be found in the collection; and it
was calculated by the great statistician Pitcairn that throughout
the Gun Club there was not quite one arm between four persons
and two legs between six.

Nevertheless, these valiant artillerists took no particular
account of these little facts, and felt justly proud when the
despatches of a battle returned the number of victims at
ten-fold the quantity of projectiles expended.

One day, however-- sad and melancholy day!-- peace was signed
between the survivors of the war; the thunder of the guns
gradually ceased, the mortars were silent, the howitzers were
muzzled for an indefinite period, the cannon, with muzzles
depressed, were returned into the arsenal, the shot were
repiled, all bloody reminiscences were effaced; the
cotton-plants grew luxuriantly in the well-manured fields, all
mourning garments were laid aside, together with grief; and the
Gun Club was relegated to profound inactivity.

Some few of the more advanced and inveterate theorists set
themselves again to work upon calculations regarding the laws
of projectiles.  They reverted invariably to gigantic shells
and howitzers of unparalleled caliber.  Still in default of
practical experience what was the value of mere theories?
Consequently, the clubrooms became deserted, the servants dozed
in the antechambers, the newspapers grew mouldy on the tables,
sounds of snoring came from dark corners, and the members of the
Gun Club, erstwhile so noisy in their seances, were reduced to
silence by this disastrous peace and gave themselves up wholly
to dreams of a Platonic kind of artillery.

"This is horrible!" said Tom Hunter one evening, while rapidly
carbonizing his wooden legs in the fireplace of the
smoking-room; "nothing to do! nothing to look forward to! what
a loathsome existence!  When again shall the guns arouse us in
the morning with their delightful reports?"

"Those days are gone by," said jolly Bilsby, trying to extend
his missing arms.  "It was delightful once upon a time!
One invented a gun, and hardly was it cast, when one hastened
to try it in the face of the enemy!  Then one returned to camp
with a word of encouragement from Sherman or a friendly shake
of the hand from McClellan.  But now the generals are gone
back to their counters; and in place of projectiles, they
despatch bales of cotton.  By Jove, the future of gunnery in
America is lost!"

"Ay! and no war in prospect!" continued the famous James T.
Maston, scratching with his steel hook his gutta-percha cranium.
"Not a cloud on the horizon! and that too at such a critical
period in the progress of the science of artillery!  Yes, gentlemen!
I who address you have myself this very morning perfected a
model (plan, section, elevation, etc.) of a mortar destined to
change all the conditions of warfare!"

"No! is it possible?" replied Tom Hunter, his thoughts reverting
involuntarily to a former invention of the Hon. J. T. Maston, by
which, at its first trial, he had succeeded in killing three
hundred and thirty-seven people.

"Fact!" replied he.  "Still, what is the use of so many studies
worked out, so many difficulties vanquished?  It's mere waste
of time!  The New World seems to have made up its mind to live in
peace; and our bellicose _Tribune_ predicts some approaching
catastrophes arising out of this scandalous increase of population."

"Nevertheless," replied Colonel Blomsberry, "they are always
struggling in Europe to maintain the principle of nationalities."

"Well?"

"Well, there might be some field for enterprise down there; and
if they would accept our services----"

"What are you dreaming of?" screamed Bilsby; "work at gunnery
for the benefit of foreigners?"

"That would be better than doing nothing here," returned the colonel.

"Quite so," said J. T. Matson; "but still we need not dream of
that expedient."

"And why not?" demanded the colonel.

"Because their ideas of progress in the Old World are contrary
to our American habits of thought.  Those fellows believe that
one can't become a general without having served first as an
ensign; which is as much as to say that one can't point a gun
without having first cast it oneself!"

"Ridiculous!" replied Tom Hunter, whittling with his bowie-knife
the arms of his easy chair; "but if that be the case there, all
that is left for us is to plant tobacco and distill whale-oil."

"What!" roared J. T. Maston, "shall we not employ these
remaining years of our life in perfecting firearms?  Shall there
never be a fresh opportunity of trying the ranges of projectiles?
Shall the air never again be lighted with the glare of our guns?
No international difficulty ever arise to enable us to declare
war against some transatlantic power?  Shall not the French sink
one of our steamers, or the English, in defiance of the rights
of nations, hang a few of our countrymen?"

"No such luck," replied Colonel Blomsberry; "nothing of the kind
is likely to happen; and even if it did, we should not profit by it.
American susceptibility is fast declining, and we are all going
to the dogs."

"It is too true," replied J. T. Maston, with fresh violence;
"there are a thousand grounds for fighting, and yet we don't fight.
We save up our arms and legs for the benefit of nations who don't
know what to do with them!  But stop-- without going out of one's
way to find a cause for war-- did not North America once belong
to the English?"

"Undoubtedly," replied Tom Hunter, stamping his crutch with fury.

"Well, then," replied J. T. Maston, "why should not England in
her turn belong to the Americans?"

"It would be but just and fair," returned Colonel Blomsberry.

"Go and propose it to the President of the United States," cried
J. T. Maston, "and see how he will receive you."

"Bah!" growled Bilsby between the four teeth which the war had
left him; "that will never do!"

"By Jove!" cried J. T. Maston, "he mustn't count on my vote at
the next election!"

"Nor on ours," replied unanimously all the bellicose invalids.

"Meanwhile," replied J. T. Maston, "allow me to say that, if I
cannot get an opportunity to try my new mortars on a real field
of battle, I shall say good-by to the members of the Gun Club,
and go and bury myself in the prairies of Arkansas!"

"In that case we will accompany you," cried the others.

Matters were in this unfortunate condition, and the club was
threatened with approaching dissolution, when an unexpected
circumstance occurred to prevent so deplorable a catastrophe.

On the morrow after this conversation every member of the
association received a sealed circular couched in the
following terms:


                                     BALTIMORE, October 3.
The president of the Gun Club has the honor to inform his colleagues
that, at the meeting of the 5th instant, he will bring before
them a communication of an extremely interesting nature.  He requests,
therefore, that they will make it convenient to attend in
accordance with the present invitation.        Very cordially,
                                     IMPEY BARBICANE, P.G.C.





CHAPTER II


PRESIDENT BARBICANE'S COMMUNICATION


On the 5th of October, at eight p.m., a dense crowd pressed
toward the saloons of the Gun Club at No. 21 Union Square.
All the members of the association resident in Baltimore attended
the invitation of their president.  As regards the corresponding
members, notices were delivered by hundreds throughout the streets
of the city, and, large as was the great hall, it was quite
inadequate to accommodate the crowd of _savants_.  They overflowed
into the adjoining rooms, down the narrow passages, into the
outer courtyards.  There they ran against the vulgar herd who
pressed up to the doors, each struggling to reach the front ranks,
all eager to learn the nature of the important communication of
President Barbicane; all pushing, squeezing, crushing with that
perfect freedom of action which is so peculiar to the masses when
educated in ideas of "self-government."

On that evening a stranger who might have chanced to be in
Baltimore could not have gained admission for love or money into
the great hall.  That was reserved exclusively for resident or
corresponding members; no one else could possibly have obtained
a place; and the city magnates, municipal councilors, and
"select men" were compelled to mingle with the mere townspeople
in order to catch stray bits of news from the interior.

Nevertheless the vast hall presented a curious spectacle.
Its immense area was singularly adapted to the purpose.
Lofty pillars formed of cannon, superposed upon huge mortars as a
base, supported the fine ironwork of the arches, a perfect piece
of cast-iron lacework.  Trophies of blunderbuses, matchlocks,
arquebuses, carbines, all kinds of firearms, ancient and modern,
were picturesquely interlaced against the walls.  The gas lit
up in full glare myriads of revolvers grouped in the form of
lustres, while groups of pistols, and candelabra formed of
muskets bound together, completed this magnificent display
of brilliance.  Models of cannon, bronze castings, sights covered
with dents, plates battered by the shots of the Gun Club,
assortments of rammers and sponges, chaplets of shells, wreaths
of projectiles, garlands of howitzers-- in short, all the
apparatus of the artillerist, enchanted the eye by this
wonderful arrangement and induced a kind of belief that their
real purpose was ornamental rather than deadly.

At the further end of the saloon the president, assisted by four
secretaries, occupied a large platform.  His chair, supported by
a carved gun-carriage, was modeled upon the ponderous proportions
of a 32-inch mortar.  It was pointed at an angle of ninety degrees,
and suspended upon truncheons, so that the president could balance
himself upon it as upon a rocking-chair, a very agreeable fact in
the very hot weather.  Upon the table (a huge iron plate supported
upon six carronades) stood an inkstand of exquisite elegance, made
of a beautifully chased Spanish piece, and a sonnette, which, when
required, could give forth a report equal to that of a revolver.
During violent debates this novel kind of bell scarcely sufficed
to drown the clamor of these excitable artillerists.

In front of the table benches arranged in zigzag form, like the
circumvallations of a retrenchment, formed a succession of
bastions and curtains set apart for the use of the members of
the club; and on this especial evening one might say, "All the
world was on the ramparts."  The president was sufficiently well
known, however, for all to be assured that he would not put his
colleagues to discomfort without some very strong motive.

Impey Barbicane was a man of forty years of age, calm, cold,
austere; of a singularly serious and self-contained demeanor,
punctual as a chronometer, of imperturbable temper and immovable
character; by no means chivalrous, yet adventurous withal, and
always bringing practical ideas to bear upon the very rashest
enterprises; an essentially New Englander, a Northern colonist,
a descendant of the old anti-Stuart Roundheads, and the
implacable enemy of the gentlemen of the South, those ancient
cavaliers of the mother country.  In a word, he was a Yankee to
the backbone.

Barbicane had made a large fortune as a timber merchant.
Being nominated director of artillery during the war, he proved
himself fertile in invention.  Bold in his conceptions, he
contributed powerfully to the progress of that arm and gave an
immense impetus to experimental researches.

He was personage of the middle height, having, by a rare
exception in the Gun Club, all his limbs complete.  His strongly
marked features seemed drawn by square and rule; and if it be
true that, in order to judge a man's character one must look at
his profile, Barbicane, so examined, exhibited the most certain
indications of energy, audacity, and _sang-froid_.

At this moment he was sitting in his armchair, silent, absorbed,
lost in reflection, sheltered under his high-crowned hat-- a
kind of black cylinder which always seems firmly screwed upon
the head of an American.

Just when the deep-toned clock in the great hall struck eight,
Barbicane, as if he had been set in motion by a spring, raised
himself up.  A profound silence ensued, and the speaker, in a
somewhat emphatic tone of voice, commenced as follows:

"My brave, colleagues, too long already a paralyzing peace has
plunged the members of the Gun Club in deplorable inactivity.
After a period of years full of incidents we have been compelled
to abandon our labors, and to stop short on the road of progress.
I do not hesitate to state, baldly, that any war which would
recall us to arms would be welcome!"  (Tremendous applause!)
"But war, gentlemen, is impossible under existing circumstances;
and, however we may desire it, many years may elapse before our
cannon shall again thunder in the field of battle.  We must make
up our minds, then, to seek in another train of ideas some field
for the activity which we all pine for."

The meeting felt that the president was now approaching the
critical point, and redoubled their attention accordingly.

"For some months past, my brave colleagues," continued
Barbicane, "I have been asking myself whether, while confining
ourselves to our own particular objects, we could not enter upon
some grand experiment worthy of the nineteenth century; and
whether the progress of artillery science would not enable us to
carry it out to a successful issue.  I have been considering,
working, calculating; and the result of my studies is the conviction
that we are safe to succeed in an enterprise which to any other
country would appear wholly impracticable.  This project, the result
of long elaboration, is the object of my present communication.
It is worthy of yourselves, worthy of the antecedents of the Gun
Club; and it cannot fail to make some noise in the world."

A thrill of excitement ran through the meeting.

Barbicane, having by a rapid movement firmly fixed his hat upon
his head, calmly continued his harangue:

"There is no one among you, my brave colleagues, who has not
seen the Moon, or, at least, heard speak of it.  Don't be
surprised if I am about to discourse to you regarding the Queen
of the Night.  It is perhaps reserved for us to become the
Columbuses of this unknown world.  Only enter into my plans, and
second me with all your power, and I will lead you to its
conquest, and its name shall be added to those of the thirty-six
states which compose this Great Union."

"Three cheers for the Moon!" roared the Gun Club, with one voice.

"The moon, gentlemen, has been carefully studied," continued
Barbicane; "her mass, density, and weight; her constitution,
motions, distance, as well as her place in the solar system,
have all been exactly determined.  Selenographic charts have
been constructed with a perfection which equals, if it does not
even surpass, that of our terrestrial maps.  Photography has
given us proofs of the incomparable beauty of our satellite; all
is known regarding the moon which mathematical science,
astronomy, geology, and optics can learn about her.  But up to
the present moment no direct communication has been established
with her."

A violent movement of interest and surprise here greeted this
remark of the speaker.

"Permit me," he continued, "to recount to you briefly how
certain ardent spirits, starting on imaginary journeys, have
penetrated the secrets of our satellite.  In the seventeenth
century a certain David Fabricius boasted of having seen with
his own eyes the inhabitants of the moon.  In 1649 a Frenchman,
one Jean Baudoin, published a `Journey performed from the Earth
to the Moon by Domingo Gonzalez,' a Spanish adventurer.  At the
same period Cyrano de Bergerac published that celebrated
`Journeys in the Moon' which met with such success in France.
Somewhat later another Frenchman, named Fontenelle, wrote `The
Plurality of Worlds,' a _chef-d'oeuvre_ of its time.  About 1835
a small treatise, translated from the New York _American_, related
how Sir John Herschel, having been despatched to the Cape of
Good Hope for the purpose of making there some astronomical
calculations, had, by means of a telescope brought to perfection
by means of internal lighting, reduced the apparent distance of
the moon to eighty yards!  He then distinctly perceived caverns
frequented by hippopotami, green mountains bordered by golden
lace-work, sheep with horns of ivory, a white species of deer
and inhabitants with membranous wings, like bats.  This _brochure_,
the work of an American named Locke, had a great sale.  But, to
bring this rapid sketch to a close, I will only add that a
certain Hans Pfaal, of Rotterdam, launching himself in a balloon
filled with a gas extracted from nitrogen, thirty-seven times
lighter than hydrogen, reached the moon after a passage of
nineteen hours.  This journey, like all previous ones, was purely
imaginary; still, it was the work of a popular American author--
I mean Edgar Poe!"

"Cheers for Edgar Poe!" roared the assemblage, electrified by
their president's words.

"I have now enumerated," said Barbicane, "the experiments which
I call purely paper ones, and wholly insufficient to establish
serious relations with the Queen of the Night.  Nevertheless, I
am bound to add that some practical geniuses have attempted to
establish actual communication with her.  Thus, a few days ago,
a German geometrician proposed to send a scientific expedition
to the steppes of Siberia.  There, on those vast plains, they
were to describe enormous geometric figures, drawn in characters
of reflecting luminosity, among which was the proposition
regarding the `square of the hypothenuse,' commonly called the
`Ass's Bridge' by the French.  `Every intelligent being,' said
the geometrician, `must understand the scientific meaning of
that figure.  The Selenites, do they exist, will respond by a
similar figure; and, a communication being thus once
established, it will be easy to form an alphabet which shall
enable us to converse with the inhabitants of the moon.'  So
spoke the German geometrician; but his project was never put
into practice, and up to the present day there is no bond
in existence between the Earth and her satellite.  It is
reserved for the practical genius of Americans to establish a
communication with the sidereal world.  The means of arriving
thither are simple, easy, certain, infallible-- and that is the
purpose of my present proposal."

A storm of acclamations greeted these words.  There was not a
single person in the whole audience who was not overcome,
carried away, lifted out of himself by the speaker's words!

Long-continued applause resounded from all sides.

As soon as the excitement had partially subsided, Barbicane
resumed his speech in a somewhat graver voice.

"You know," said he, "what progress artillery science has made
during the last few years, and what a degree of perfection
firearms of every kind have reached.  Moreover, you are well
aware that, in general terms, the resisting power of cannon and
the expansive force of gunpowder are practically unlimited.
Well! starting from this principle, I ask myself whether,
supposing sufficient apparatus could be obtained constructed
upon the conditions of ascertained resistance, it might not be
possible to project a shot up to the moon?"

At these words a murmur of amazement escaped from a thousand
panting chests; then succeeded a moment of perfect silence,
resembling that profound stillness which precedes the bursting
of a thunderstorm.  In point of fact, a thunderstorm did peal
forth, but it was the thunder of applause, or cries, and of
uproar which made the very hall tremble.  The president
attempted to speak, but could not.  It was fully ten minutes
before he could make himself heard.

"Suffer me to finish," he calmly continued.  "I have looked at
the question in all its bearings, I have resolutely attacked it,
and by incontrovertible calculations I find that a projectile
endowed with an initial velocity of 12,000 yards per second, and
aimed at the moon, must necessarily reach it.  I have the honor,
my brave colleagues, to propose a trial of this little experiment."





CHAPTER III


EFFECT OF THE PRESIDENT'S COMMUNICATION


It is impossible to describe the effect produced by the last
words of the honorable president-- the cries, the shouts, the
succession of roars, hurrahs, and all the varied vociferations
which the American language is capable of supplying.  It was a
scene of indescribable confusion and uproar.  They shouted, they
clapped, they stamped on the floor of the hall.  All the weapons
in the museum discharged at once could not have more violently set
in motion the waves of sound.  One need not be surprised at this.
There are some cannoneers nearly as noisy as their own guns.

Barbicane remained calm in the midst of this enthusiastic
clamor; perhaps he was desirous of addressing a few more words
to his colleagues, for by his gestures he demanded silence,
and his powerful alarum was worn out by its violent reports.
No attention, however, was paid to his request.  He was presently
torn from his seat and passed from the hands of his faithful
colleagues into the arms of a no less excited crowd.

Nothing can astound an American.  It has often been asserted
that the word "impossible" in not a French one.  People have
evidently been deceived by the dictionary.  In America, all is
easy, all is simple; and as for mechanical difficulties, they
are overcome before they arise.  Between Barbicane's proposition
and its realization no true Yankee would have allowed even the
semblance of a difficulty to be possible.  A thing with them is
no sooner said than done.

The triumphal progress of the president continued throughout
the evening.  It was a regular torchlight procession.  Irish, Germans,
French, Scotch, all the heterogeneous units which make up the
population of Maryland shouted in their respective vernaculars;
and the "vivas," "hurrahs," and "bravos" were intermingled in
inexpressible enthusiasm.

Just at this crisis, as though she comprehended all this
agitation regarding herself, the moon shone forth with
serene splendor, eclipsing by her intense illumination all the
surrounding lights.  The Yankees all turned their gaze toward
her resplendent orb, kissed their hands, called her by all kinds
of endearing names.  Between eight o'clock and midnight one
optician in Jones'-Fall Street made his fortune by the sale of
opera-glasses.

Midnight arrived, and the enthusiasm showed no signs of diminution.
It spread equally among all classes of citizens-- men of science,
shopkeepers, merchants, porters, chair-men, as well as "greenhorns,"
were stirred in their innermost fibres.  A national enterprise was
at stake.  The whole city, high and low, the quays bordering the
Patapsco, the ships lying in the basins, disgorged a crowd drunk
with joy, gin, and whisky.  Every one chattered, argued, discussed,
disputed, applauded, from the gentleman lounging upon the barroom
settee with his tumbler of sherry-cobbler before him down to the
waterman who got drunk upon his "knock-me-down" in the dingy taverns
of Fell Point.

About two A.M., however, the excitement began to subside.
President Barbicane reached his house, bruised, crushed, and
squeezed almost to a mummy.  Hercules could not have resisted a
similar outbreak of enthusiasm.  The crowd gradually deserted
the squares and streets.  The four railways from Philadelphia
and Washington, Harrisburg and Wheeling, which converge at
Baltimore, whirled away the heterogeneous population to the four
corners of the United States, and the city subsided into
comparative tranquility.

On the following day, thanks to the telegraphic wires, five
hundred newspapers and journals, daily, weekly, monthly, or
bi-monthly, all took up the question.  They examined it under
all its different aspects, physical, meteorological, economical,
or moral, up to its bearings on politics or civilization.
They debated whether the moon was a finished world, or whether
it was destined to undergo any further transformation.  Did it
resemble the earth at the period when the latter was destitute
as yet of an atmosphere?  What kind of spectacle would its hidden
hemisphere present to our terrestrial spheroid?  Granting that
the question at present was simply that of sending a projectile
up to the moon, every one must see that that involved the
commencement of a series of experiments.  All must hope that
some day America would penetrate the deepest secrets of that
mysterious orb; and some even seemed to fear lest its conquest
should not sensibly derange the equilibrium of Europe.

The project once under discussion, not a single paragraph
suggested a doubt of its realization.  All the papers,
pamphlets, reports-- all the journals published by the
scientific, literary, and religious societies enlarged upon its
advantages; and the Society of Natural History of Boston, the
Society of Science and Art of Albany, the Geographical and
Statistical Society of New York, the Philosophical Society of
Philadelphia, and the Smithsonian of Washington sent innumerable
letters of congratulation to the Gun Club, together with offers
of immediate assistance and money.

From that day forward Impey Barbicane became one of the greatest
citizens of the United States, a kind of Washington of science.
A single trait of feeling, taken from many others, will serve to
show the point which this homage of a whole people to a single
individual attained.

Some few days after this memorable meeting of the Gun Club, the
manager of an English company announced, at the Baltimore
theatre, the production of "Much ado about Nothing."  But the
populace, seeing in that title an allusion damaging to
Barbicane's project, broke into the auditorium, smashed the
benches, and compelled the unlucky director to alter his playbill.
Being a sensible man, he bowed to the public will and replaced
the offending comedy by "As you like it"; and for many weeks he
realized fabulous profits.





CHAPTER IV


REPLY FROM THE OBSERVATORY OF CAMBRIDGE


Barbicane, however, lost not one moment amid all the enthusiasm
of which he had become the object.  His first care was to
reassemble his colleagues in the board-room of the Gun Club.
There, after some discussion, it was agreed to consult the
astronomers regarding the astronomical part of the enterprise.
Their reply once ascertained, they could then discuss the
mechanical means, and nothing should be wanting to ensure the
success of this great experiment.

A note couched in precise terms, containing special
interrogatories, was then drawn up and addressed to the
Observatory of Cambridge in Massachusetts.  This city, where the
first university of the United States was founded, is justly
celebrated for its astronomical staff.  There are to be found
assembled all the most eminent men of science.  Here is to be
seen at work that powerful telescope which enabled Bond to
resolve the nebula of Andromeda, and Clarke to discover the
satellite of Sirius.  This celebrated institution fully justified
on all points the confidence reposed in it by the Gun Club.
So, after two days, the reply so impatiently awaited was placed
in the hands of President Barbicane.

It was couched in the following terms:

_The Director of the Cambridge Observatory to the President   
           of the Gun Club at Baltimore._


                                    CAMBRIDGE, October 7.
On the receipt of your favor of the 6th instant, addressed to
the Observatory of Cambridge in the name of the members of the
Baltimore Gun Club, our staff was immediately called together,
and it was judged expedient to reply as follows:

The questions which have been proposed to it are these--

"1. Is it possible to transmit a projectile up to the moon?

"2. What is the exact distance which separates the earth from
its satellite?

"3. What will be the period of transit of the projectile when
endowed with sufficient initial velocity? and, consequently, at
what moment ought it to be discharged in order that it may touch
the moon at a particular point?

"4. At what precise moment will the moon present herself in the
most favorable position to be reached by the projectile?

"5. What point in the heavens ought the cannon to be aimed at
which is intended to discharge the projectile?

"6. What place will the moon occupy in the heavens at the moment
of the projectile's departure?"

Regarding the _first_ question, "Is it possible to transmit a
projectile up to the moon?"

_Answer._-- Yes; provided it possess an initial velocity of
1,200 yards per second; calculations prove that to be sufficient.
In proportion as we recede from the earth the action of gravitation
diminishes in the inverse ratio of the square of the distance;
that is to say, _at three times a given distance the action is
nine times less._  Consequently, the weight of a shot will decrease,
and will become reduced to _zero_ at the instant that the attraction
of the moon exactly counterpoises that of the earth; that is to say
at 47/52 of its passage.  At that instant the projectile will
have no weight whatever; and, if it passes that point, it will
fall into the moon by the sole effect of the lunar attraction.
The _theoretical possibility_ of the experiment is therefore
absolutely demonstrated; its _success_ must depend upon the power
of the engine employed.

As to the _second_ question, "What is the exact distance which
separates the earth from its satellite?"

_Answer._-- The moon does not describe a _circle_ round the
earth, but rather an _ellipse_, of which our earth occupies one
of the _foci_; the consequence, therefore, is, that at certain
times it approaches nearer to, and at others it recedes farther
from, the earth; in astronomical language, it is at one time in
_apogee_, at another in _perigee_.  Now the difference between
its greatest and its least distance is too considerable to be
left out of consideration.  In point of fact, in its apogee the
moon is 247,552 miles, and in its perigee, 218,657 miles only
distant; a fact which makes a difference of 28,895 miles, or
more than one-ninth of the entire distance.  The perigee
distance, therefore, is that which ought to serve as the basis
of all calculations.

To the _third_ question.

_Answer._-- If the shot should preserve continuously its initial
velocity of 12,000 yards per second, it would require little
more than nine hours to reach its destination; but, inasmuch as
that initial velocity will be continually decreasing, it will
occupy 300,000 seconds, that is 83hrs. 20m. in reaching the
point where the attraction of the earth and moon will be _in
equilibrio_.  From this point it will fall into the moon in
50,000 seconds, or 13hrs. 53m. 20sec.  It will be desirable,
therefore, to discharge it 97hrs. 13m. 20sec. before the arrival
of the moon at the point aimed at.

Regarding question _four_, "At what precise moment will the moon
present herself in the most favorable position, etc.?"

_Answer._-- After what has been said above, it will be
necessary, first of all, to choose the period when the moon will
be in perigee, and _also_ the moment when she will be crossing
the zenith, which latter event will further diminish the entire
distance by a length equal to the radius of the earth, _i. e._
3,919 miles; the result of which will be that the final passage
remaining to be accomplished will be 214,976 miles.  But although
the moon passes her perigee every month, she does not reach the
zenith always _at exactly the same moment_.  She does not appear
under these two conditions simultaneously, except at long
intervals of time.  It will be necessary, therefore, to wait for
the moment when her passage in perigee shall coincide with that
in the zenith.  Now, by a fortunate circumstance, on the 4th of
December in the ensuing year the moon _will_ present these
two conditions.  At midnight she will be in perigee, that is,
at her shortest distance from the earth, and at the same moment
she will be crossing the zenith.

On the _fifth_ question, "At what point in the heavens ought the
cannon to be aimed?"

_Answer._-- The preceding remarks being admitted, the cannon
ought to be pointed to the zenith of the place.  Its fire,
therefore, will be perpendicular to the plane of the horizon;
and the projectile will soonest pass beyond the range of the
terrestrial attraction.  But, in order that the moon should
reach the zenith of a given place, it is necessary that the
place should not exceed in latitude the declination of the
luminary; in other words, it must be comprised within the
degrees 0@ and 28@ of lat. N. or S. In every other spot the fire
must necessarily be oblique, which would seriously militate
against the success of the experiment.

As to the _sixth_ question, "What place will the moon occupy in
the heavens at the moment of the projectile's departure?"

_Answer._-- At the moment when the projectile shall be discharged
into space, the moon, which travels daily forward 13@ 10' 35'',
will be distant from the zenith point by four times that quantity,
_i. e._ by 52@ 41' 20'', a space which corresponds to the path
which she will describe during the entire journey of the projectile.
But, inasmuch as it is equally necessary to take into account the
deviation which the rotary motion of the earth will impart to the
shot, and as the shot cannot reach the moon until after a deviation
equal to 16 radii of the earth, which, calculated upon the moon's
orbit, are equal to about eleven degrees, it becomes necessary to
add these eleven degrees to those which express the retardation of
the moon just mentioned:  that is to say, in round numbers, about
sixty-four degrees.  Consequently, at the moment of firing the
visual radius applied to the moon will describe, with the vertical
line of the place, an angle of sixty-four degrees.

These are our answers to the questions proposed to the
Observatory of Cambridge by the members of the Gun Club:

To sum up--

1st. The cannon ought to be planted in a country situated
between 0@ and 28@ of N. or S. lat.

2nd. It ought to be pointed directly toward the zenith of the place.

3rd. The projectile ought to be propelled with an initial
velocity of 12,000 yards per second.

4th. It ought to be discharged at 10hrs. 46m. 40sec. of the 1st
of December of the ensuing year.

5th. It will meet the moon four days after its discharge,
precisely at midnight on the 4th of December, at the moment of
its transit across the zenith.

The members of the Gun Club ought, therefore, without delay, to
commence the works necessary for such an experiment, and to be
prepared to set to work at the moment determined upon; for, if
they should suffer this 4th of December to go by, they will not
find the moon again under the same conditions of perigee and of
zenith until eighteen years and eleven days afterward.

The staff of the Cambridge Observatory place themselves entirely
at their disposal in respect of all questions of theoretical
astronomy; and herewith add their congratulations to those of
all the rest of America.
               For the Astronomical Staff,
                               J. M. BELFAST,         
_Director of the Observatory of Cambridge._





CHAPTER V


THE ROMANCE OF THE MOON


An observer endued with an infinite range of vision, and placed
in that unknown center around which the entire world revolves,
might have beheld myriads of atoms filling all space during the
chaotic epoch of the universe.  Little by little, as ages went
on, a change took place; a general law of attraction manifested
itself, to which the hitherto errant atoms became obedient:
these atoms combined together chemically according to their
affinities, formed themselves into molecules, and composed those
nebulous masses with which the depths of the heavens are strewed.
These masses became immediately endued with a rotary motion
around their own central point.  This center, formed of
indefinite molecules, began to revolve around its own axis
during its gradual condensation; then, following the immutable
laws of mechanics, in proportion as its bulk diminished by
condensation, its rotary motion became accelerated, and these
two effects continuing, the result was the formation of one
principal star, the center of the nebulous mass.

By attentively watching, the observer would then have perceived
the other molecules of the mass, following the example of this
central star, become likewise condensed by gradually accelerated
rotation, and gravitating round it in the shape of innumerable stars.
Thus was formed the _Nebulae_, of which astronomers have reckoned
up nearly 5,000.

Among these 5,000 nebulae there is one which has received the
name of the Milky Way, and which contains eighteen millions of
stars, each of which has become the center of a solar world.

If the observer had then specially directed his attention to one
of the more humble and less brilliant of these stellar bodies,
a star of the fourth class, that which is arrogantly called the
Sun, all the phenomena to which the formation of the Universe is to
be ascribed would have been successively fulfilled before his eyes.
In fact, he would have perceived this sun, as yet in the gaseous
state, and composed of moving molecules, revolving round its axis
in order to accomplish its work of concentration.  This motion,
faithful to the laws of mechanics, would have been accelerated
with the diminution of its volume; and a moment would have arrived
when the centrifugal force would have overpowered the centripetal,
which causes the molecules all to tend toward the center.

Another phenomenon would now have passed before the observer's
eye, and the molecules situated on the plane of the equator,
escaping like a stone from a sling of which the cord had
suddenly snapped, would have formed around the sun sundry
concentric rings resembling that of Saturn.  In their turn,
again, these rings of cosmical matter, excited by a rotary
motion about the central mass, would have been broken up and
decomposed into secondary nebulosities, that is to say,
into planets.  Similarly he would have observed these planets
throw off one or more rings each, which became the origin of the
secondary bodies which we call satellites.

Thus, then, advancing from atom to molecule, from molecule to
nebulous mass, from that to principal star, from star to sun,
from sun to planet, and hence to satellite, we have the whole
series of transformations undergone by the heavenly bodies
during the first days of the world.

Now, of those attendant bodies which the sun maintains in their
elliptical orbits by the great law of gravitation, some few in
turn possess satellites.  Uranus has eight, Saturn eight, Jupiter
four, Neptune possibly three, and the Earth one.  This last, one
of the least important of the entire solar system, we call the
Moon; and it is she whom the daring genius of the Americans
professed their intention of conquering.

The moon, by her comparative proximity, and the constantly
varying appearances produced by her several phases, has always
occupied a considerable share of the attention of the
inhabitants of the earth.

From the time of Thales of Miletus, in the fifth century B.C.,
down to that of Copernicus in the fifteenth and Tycho Brahe in
the sixteenth century A.D., observations have been from time to
time carried on with more or less correctness, until in the
present day the altitudes of the lunar mountains have been
determined with exactitude.  Galileo explained the phenomena of
the lunar light produced during certain of her phases by the
existence of mountains, to which he assigned a mean altitude of
27,000 feet.  After him Hevelius, an astronomer of Dantzic,
reduced the highest elevations to 15,000 feet; but the
calculations of Riccioli brought them up again to 21,000 feet.

At the close of the eighteenth century Herschel, armed with a powerful
telescope, considerably reduced the preceding measurements.
He assigned a height of 11,400 feet to the maximum elevations,
and reduced the mean of the different altitudes to little more
than 2,400 feet.  But Herschel's calculations were in their turn
corrected by the observations of Halley, Nasmyth, Bianchini,
Gruithuysen, and others; but it was reserved for the labors of
Boeer and Maedler finally to solve the question.  They succeeded
in measuring 1,905 different elevations, of which six exceed
15,000 feet, and twenty-two exceed 14,400 feet.  The highest
summit of all towers to a height of 22,606 feet above the surface
of the lunar disc.  At the same period the examination of the moon
was completed.  She appeared completely riddled with craters, and
her essentially volcanic character was apparent at each observation.
By the absence of refraction in the rays of the planets occulted
by her we conclude that she is absolutely devoid of an atmosphere.
The absence of air entails the absence of water.  It became,
therefore, manifest that the Selenites, to support life under
such conditions, must possess a special organization of their
own, must differ remarkably from the inhabitants of the earth.

At length, thanks to modern art, instruments of still higher
perfection searched the moon without intermission, not leaving
a single point of her surface unexplored; and notwithstanding
that her diameter measures 2,150 miles, her surface equals the
one-fifteenth part of that of our globe, and her bulk the
one-forty-ninth part of that of the terrestrial spheroid-- not
one of her secrets was able to escape the eyes of the
astronomers; and these skillful men of science carried to an
even greater degree their prodigious observations.

Thus they remarked that, during full moon, the disc appeared
scored in certain parts with white lines; and, during the
phases, with black.  On prosecuting the study of these with
still greater precision, they succeeded in obtaining an exact
account of the nature of these lines.  They were long and narrow
furrows sunk between parallel ridges, bordering generally upon
the edges of the craters.  Their length varied between ten and 100
miles, and their width was about 1,600 yards.  Astronomers called
them chasms, but they could not get any further.  Whether these
chasms were the dried-up beds of ancient rivers or not they were
unable thoroughly to ascertain.

The Americans, among others, hoped one day or other to
determine this geological question.  They also undertook to
examine the true nature of that system of parallel ramparts
discovered on the moon's surface by Gruithuysen, a learned
professor of Munich, who considered them to be "a system of
fortifications thrown up by the Selenitic engineers."  These two
points, yet obscure, as well as others, no doubt, could not be
definitely settled except by direct communication with the moon.

Regarding the degree of intensity of its light, there was
nothing more to learn on this point.  It was known that it is
300,000 times weaker than that of the sun, and that its heat has
no appreciable effect upon the thermometer.  As to the
phenomenon known as the "ashy light," it is explained naturally
by the effect of the transmission of the solar rays from the
earth to the moon, which give the appearance of completeness to
the lunar disc, while it presents itself under the crescent form
during its first and last phases.

Such was the state of knowledge acquired regarding the earth's
satellite, which the Gun Club undertook to perfect in all its
aspects, cosmographic, geological, political, and moral.





CHAPTER VI


PERMISSIVE LIMITS OF IGNORANCE AND BELIEF IN THE UNITED STATES


The immediate result of Barbicane's proposition was to place upon
the orders of the day all the astronomical facts relative to the
Queen of the Night.  Everybody set to work to study assiduously.
One would have thought that the moon had just appeared for the
first time, and that no one had ever before caught a glimpse of
her in the heavens.  The papers revived all the old anecdotes in
which the "sun of the wolves" played a part; they recalled the
influences which the ignorance of past ages ascribed to her; in
short, all America was seized with selenomania, or had become moon-mad.

The scientific journals, for their part, dealt more especially with
the questions which touched upon the enterprise of the Gun Club.
The letter of the Observatory of Cambridge was published by them,
and commented upon with unreserved approval.

Until that time most people had been ignorant of the mode in which
the distance which separates the moon from the earth is calculated.
They took advantage of this fact to explain to them that this
distance was obtained by measuring the parallax of the moon.
The term parallax proving "caviare to the general," they further
explained that it meant the angle formed by the inclination of two
straight lines drawn from either extremity of the earth's radius
to the moon.  On doubts being expressed as to the correctness of
this method, they immediately proved that not only was the mean
distance 234,347 miles, but that astronomers could not possibly
be in error in their estimate by more than seventy miles either way.

To those who were not familiar with the motions of the moon,
they demonstrated that she possesses two distinct motions, the
first being that of rotation upon her axis, the second being
that of revolution round the earth, accomplishing both together
in an equal period of time, that is to say, in twenty-seven and
one-third days.

The motion of rotation is that which produces day and night on
the surface of the moon; save that there is only one day and one
night in the lunar month, each lasting three hundred and
fifty-four and one-third hours.  But, happily for her, the face
turned toward the terrestrial globe is illuminated by it with an
intensity equal to that of fourteen moons.  As to the other
face, always invisible to us, it has of necessity three hundred
and fifty-four hours of absolute night, tempered only by that
"pale glimmer which falls upon it from the stars."

Some well-intentioned, but rather obstinate persons, could not
at first comprehend how, if the moon displays invariably the
same face to the earth during her revolution, she can describe
one turn round herself.  To such they answered, "Go into your
dining-room, and walk round the table in such a way as to always
keep your face turned toward the center; by the time you will
have achieved one complete round you will have completed one
turn around yourself, since your eye will have traversed
successively every point of the room.  Well, then, the room is
the heavens, the table is the earth, and the moon is yourself."
And they would go away delighted.

So, then the moon displays invariably the same face to the
earth; nevertheless, to be quite exact, it is necessary to add
that, in consequence of certain fluctuations of north and south,
and of west and east, termed her libration, she permits rather
more than half, that is to say, five-sevenths, to be seen.

As soon as the ignoramuses came to understand as much as the
director of the observatory himself knew, they began to worry
themselves regarding her revolution round the earth, whereupon
twenty scientific reviews immediately came to the rescue.
They pointed out to them that the firmament, with its infinitude
of stars, may be considered as one vast dial-plate, upon which the
moon travels, indicating the true time to all the inhabitants of
the earth; that it is during this movement that the Queen of
Night exhibits her different phases; that the moon is _full_
when she is in _opposition_ with the sun, that is when the three
bodies are on the same straight line, the earth occupying the
center; that she is _new_ when she is in _conjunction_ with the
sun, that is, when she is between it and the earth; and, lastly
that she is in her _first_ or _last_ quarter, when she makes
with the sun and the earth an angle of which she herself occupies
the apex.

Regarding the altitude which the moon attains above the horizon,
the letter of the Cambridge Observatory had said all that was to
be said in this respect.  Every one knew that this altitude
varies according to the latitude of the observer.  But the only
zones of the globe in which the moon passes the zenith, that is,
the point directly over the head of the spectator, are of
necessity comprised between the twenty-eighth parallels and
the equator.  Hence the importance of the advice to try the
experiment upon some point of that part of the globe, in order
that the projectile might be discharged perpendicularly, and so
the soonest escape the action of gravitation.  This was an
essential condition to the success of the enterprise, and
continued actively to engage the public attention.

Regarding the path described by the moon in her revolution round
the earth, the Cambridge Observatory had demonstrated that this
path is a re-entering curve, not a perfect circle, but an
ellipse, of which the earth occupies one of the _foci_.  It was
also well understood that it is farthest removed from the earth
during its _apogee_, and approaches most nearly to it at its _perigee_.

Such was then the extent of knowledge possessed by every
American on the subject, and of which no one could decently
profess ignorance.  Still, while these principles were being
rapidly disseminated many errors and illusory fears proved less
easy to eradicate.

For instance, some worthy persons maintained that the moon was
an ancient comet which, in describing its elongated orbit round
the sun, happened to pass near the earth, and became confined
within her circle of attraction.  These drawing-room astronomers
professed to explain the charred aspect of the moon-- a disaster
which they attributed to the intensity of the solar heat; only,
on being reminded that comets have an atmosphere, and that the
moon has little or none, they were fairly at a loss for a reply.

Others again, belonging to the doubting class, expressed certain
fears as to the position of the moon.  They had heard it said
that, according to observations made in the time of the Caliphs,
her revolution had become accelerated in a certain degree.
Hence they concluded, logically enough, that an acceleration of
motion ought to be accompanied by a corresponding diminution in
the distance separating the two bodies; and that, supposing the
double effect to be continued to infinity, the moon would end by
one day falling into the earth.  However, they became reassured
as to the fate of future generations on being apprised that,
according to the calculations of Laplace, this acceleration of
motion is confined within very restricted limits, and that a
proportional diminution of speed will be certain to succeed it.
So, then, the stability of the solar system would not be deranged
in ages to come.

There remains but the third class, the superstitious.
These worthies were not content merely to rest in ignorance;
they must know all about things which had no existence whatever,
and as to the moon, they had long known all about her.  One set
regarded her disc as a polished mirror, by means of which people
could see each other from different points of the earth and
interchange their thoughts.  Another set pretended that out of
one thousand new moons that had been observed, nine hundred and
fifty had been attended with remarkable disturbances, such as
cataclysms, revolutions, earthquakes, the deluge, etc.  Then they
believed in some mysterious influence exercised by her over human
destinies-- that every Selenite was attached to some inhabitant
of the earth by a tie of sympathy; they maintained that the
entire vital system is subject to her control, etc.  But in time
the majority renounced these vulgar errors, and espoused the true
side of the question.  As for the Yankees, they had no other
ambition than to take possession of this new continent of the sky,
and to plant upon the summit of its highest elevation the star-
spangled banner of the United States of America.





CHAPTER VII


THE HYMN OF THE CANNON-BALL


The Observatory of Cambridge in its memorable letter had treated the
question from a purely astronomical point of view.  The mechanical
part still remained.

President Barbicane had, without loss of time, nominated a
working committee of the Gun Club.  The duty of this committee
was to resolve the three grand questions of the cannon, the
projectile, and the powder.  It was composed of four members of
great technical knowledge, Barbicane (with a casting vote in
case of equality), General Morgan, Major Elphinstone, and J. T.
Maston, to whom were confided the functions of secretary.  On the
8th of October the committee met at the house of President
Barbicane, 3 Republican Street.  The meeting was opened by the
president himself.

"Gentlemen," said he, "we have to resolve one of the most
important problems in the whole of the noble science of gunnery.
It might appear, perhaps, the most logical course to devote our
first meeting to the discussion of the engine to be employed.
Nevertheless, after mature consideration, it has appeared to me
that the question of the projectile must take precedence of that
of the cannon, and that the dimensions of the latter must
necessarily depend on those of the former."

"Suffer me to say a word," here broke in J. T. Maston.
Permission having been granted, "Gentlemen," said he with an
inspired accent, "our president is right in placing the question
of the projectile above all others.  The ball we are about to
discharge at the moon is our ambassador to her, and I wish to
consider it from a moral point of view.  The cannon-ball,
gentlemen, to my mind, is the most magnificent manifestation of
human power.  If Providence has created the stars and the planets,
man has called the cannon-ball into existence.  Let Providence
claim the swiftness of electricity and of light, of the stars,
the comets, and the planets, of wind and sound-- we claim to
have invented the swiftness of the cannon-ball, a hundred times
superior to that of the swiftest horses or railway train.
How glorious will be the moment when, infinitely exceeding all
hitherto attained velocities, we shall launch our new projectile
with the rapidity of seven miles a second!  Shall it not,
gentlemen-- shall it not be received up there with the honors
due to a terrestrial ambassador?"

Overcome with emotion the orator sat down and applied himself to
a huge plate of sandwiches before him.

"And now," said Barbicane, "let us quit the domain of poetry and
come direct to the question."

"By all means," replied the members, each with his mouth full
of sandwich.

"The problem before us," continued the president, "is how to
communicate to a projectile a velocity of 12,000 yards per second.
Let us at present examine the velocities hitherto attained.
General Morgan will be able to enlighten us on this point."

"And the more easily," replied the general, "that during the war
I was a member of the committee of experiments.  I may say,
then, that the 100-pounder Dahlgrens, which carried a distance
of 5,000 yards, impressed upon their projectile an initial
velocity of 500 yards a second.  The Rodman Columbiad threw a
shot weighing half a ton a distance of six miles, with a
velocity of 800 yards per second-- a result which Armstrong and
Palisser have never obtained in England."

"This," replied Barbicane, "is, I believe, the maximum velocity
ever attained?"

"It is so," replied the general.

"Ah!" groaned J. T. Maston, "if my mortar had not burst----"

"Yes," quietly replied Barbicane, "but it did burst.  We must
take, then, for our starting point, this velocity of 800 yards.
We must increase it twenty-fold.  Now, reserving for another
discussion the means of producing this velocity, I will call
your attention to the dimensions which it will be proper to
assign to the shot.  You understand that we have nothing to do
here with projectiles weighing at most but half a ton."

"Why not?" demanded the major.

"Because the shot," quickly replied J. T. Maston, "must be big
enough to attract the attention of the inhabitants of the moon,
if there are any?"

"Yes," replied Barbicane, "and for another reason more important still."

"What mean you?" asked the major.

"I mean that it is not enough to discharge a projectile, and
then take no further notice of it; we must follow it throughout
its course, up to the moment when it shall reach its goal."

"What?" shouted the general and the major in great surprise.

"Undoubtedly," replied Barbicane composedly, "or our experiment
would produce no result."

"But then," replied the major, "you will have to give this
projectile enormous dimensions."

"No!  Be so good as to listen.  You know that optical
instruments have acquired great perfection; with certain
instruments we have succeeded in obtaining enlargements of 6,000
times and reducing the moon to within forty miles' distance.
Now, at this distance, any objects sixty feet square would be
perfectly visible.

"If, then, the penetrative power of telescopes has not been
further increased, it is because that power detracts from their
light; and the moon, which is but a reflecting mirror, does not
give back sufficient light to enable us to perceive objects of
lesser magnitude."

"Well, then, what do you propose to do?" asked the general.
"Would you give your projectile a diameter of sixty feet?"

"Not so."

"Do you intend, then, to increase the luminous power of the moon?"

"Exactly so.  If I can succeed in diminishing the density of the
atmosphere through which the moon's light has to travel I shall
have rendered her light more intense.  To effect that object it
will be enough to establish a telescope on some elevated mountain.
That is what we will do."

"I give it up," answered the major.  "You have such a way of
simplifying things.  And what enlargement do you expect to
obtain in this way?"

"One of 48,000 times, which should bring the moon within an
apparent distance of five miles; and, in order to be visible,
objects need not have a diameter of more than nine feet."

"So, then," cried J. T. Maston, "our projectile need not be more
than nine feet in diameter."

"Let me observe, however," interrupted Major Elphinstone, "this
will involve a weight such as----"

"My dear major," replied Barbicane, "before discussing its
weight permit me to enumerate some of the marvels which our
ancestors have achieved in this respect.  I don't mean to
pretend that the science of gunnery has not advanced, but it
is as well to bear in mind that during the middle ages they
obtained results more surprising, I will venture to say, than ours.
For instance, during the siege of Constantinople by Mahomet II.,
in 1453, stone shot of 1,900 pounds weight were employed.  At Malta,
in the time of the knights, there was a gun of the fortress of St.
Elmo which threw a projectile weighing 2,500 pounds.  And, now,
what is the extent of what we have seen ourselves?  Armstrong guns
discharging shot of 500 pounds, and the Rodman guns projectiles
of half a ton!  It seems, then, that if projectiles have gained
in range, they have lost far more in weight.  Now, if we turn our
efforts in that direction, we ought to arrive, with the progress
on science, at ten times the weight of the shot of Mahomet II.
and the Knights of Malta."

"Clearly," replied the major; "but what metal do you calculate
upon employing?"

"Simply cast iron," said General Morgan.

"But," interrupted the major, "since the weight of a shot is
proportionate to its volume, an iron ball of nine feet in
diameter would be of tremendous weight."

"Yes, if it were solid, not if it were hollow."

"Hollow? then it would be a shell?"

"Yes, a shell," replied Barbicane; "decidely it must be.  A solid
shot of 108 inches would weigh more than 200,000 pounds, a weight
evidently far too great.  Still, as we must reserve a certain
stability for our projectile, I propose to give it a weight of
20,000 pounds."

"What, then, will be the thickness of the sides?" asked the major.

"If we follow the usual proportion," replied Morgan, "a diameter
of 108 inches would require sides of two feet thickness, or less."

"That would be too much," replied Barbicane; "for you will
observe that the question is not that of a shot intended to
pierce an iron plate; it will suffice to give it sides strong
enough to resist the pressure of the gas.  The problem,
therefore, is this-- What thickness ought a cast-iron shell to
have in order not to weight more than 20,000 pounds?  Our clever
secretary will soon enlighten us upon this point."

"Nothing easier." replied the worthy secretary of the committee;
and, rapidly tracing a few algebraical formulae upon paper,
among which _n_^2 and _x_^2 frequently appeared, he presently said:

"The sides will require a thickness of less than two inches."

"Will that be enough?" asked the major doubtfully.

"Clearly not!" replied the president.

"What is to be done, then?" said Elphinstone, with a puzzled air.

"Employ another metal instead of iron."

"Copper?" said Morgan.

"No! that would be too heavy.  I have better than that to offer."

"What then?" asked the major.

"Aluminum!" replied Barbicane.

"Aluminum?" cried his three colleagues in chorus.

"Unquestionably, my friends.  This valuable metal possesses the
whiteness of silver, the indestructibility of gold, the tenacity
of iron, the fusibility of copper, the lightness of glass.  It is
easily wrought, is very widely distributed, forming the base of
most of the rocks, is three times lighter than iron, and seems to
have been created for the express purpose of furnishing us with
the material for our projectile."

"But, my dear president," said the major, "is not the cost price
of aluminum extremely high?"

"It was so at its first discovery, but it has fallen now to nine
dollars a pound."

"But still, nine dollars a pound!" replied the major, who was
not willing readily to give in; "even that is an enormous price."

"Undoubtedly, my dear major; but not beyond our reach."

"What will the projectile weigh then?" asked Morgan.

"Here is the result of my calculations," replied Barbicane.
"A shot of 108 inches in diameter, and twelve inches in
thickness, would weigh, in cast-iron, 67,440 pounds; cast in
aluminum, its weight will be reduced to 19,250 pounds."

"Capital!" cried the major; "but do you know that, at nine
dollars a pound, this projectile will cost----"

"One hundred and seventy-three thousand and fifty dollars ($173,050).
I know it quite well.  But fear not, my friends; the money will not
be wanting for our enterprise.  I will answer for it.  Now what say
you to aluminum, gentlemen?"

"Adopted!" replied the three members of the committee.  So ended
the first meeting.  The question of the projectile was
definitely settled.





CHAPTER VII


HISTORY OF THE CANNON


The resolutions passed at the last meeting produced a great
effect out of doors.  Timid people took fright at the idea of
a shot weighing 20,000 pounds being launched into space; they
asked what cannon could ever transmit a sufficient velocity to
such a mighty mass.  The minutes of the second meeting were
destined triumphantly to answer such questions.  The following
evening the discussion was renewed.

"My dear colleagues," said Barbicane, without further preamble,
"the subject now before us is the construction of the engine,
its length, its composition, and its weight.  It is probable
that we shall end by giving it gigantic dimensions; but however
great may be the difficulties in the way, our mechanical genius
will readily surmount them.  Be good enough, then, to give me
your attention, and do not hesitate to make objections at the close.
I have no fear of them.  The problem before us is how to communicate
an initial force of 12,000 yards per second to a shell of 108
inches in diameter, weighing 20,000 pounds.  Now when a projectile
is launched into space, what happens to it?  It is acted upon by
three independent forces:  the resistance of the air, the attraction
of the earth, and the force of impulsion with which it is endowed.
Let us examine these three forces.  The resistance of the air is of
little importance.  The atmosphere of the earth does not exceed
forty miles.  Now, with the given rapidity, the projectile will
have traversed this in five seconds, and the period is too brief
for the resistance of the medium to be regarded otherwise than
as insignificant.  Proceding, then, to the attraction of the earth,
that is, the weight of the shell, we know that this weight will
diminish in the inverse ratio of the square of the distance.
When a body left to itself falls to the surface of the earth, it
falls five feet in the first second; and if the same body were
removed 257,542 miles further off, in other words, to the distance
of the moon, its fall would be reduced to about half a line in the
first second.  That is almost equivalent to a state of perfect rest.
Our business, then, is to overcome progressively this action
of gravitation.  The mode of accomplishing that is by the force
of impulsion."

"There's the difficulty," broke in the major.

"True," replied the president; "but we will overcome that, for
the force of impulsion will depend on the length of the engine
and the powder employed, the latter being limited only by the
resisting power of the former.  Our business, then, to-day is
with the dimensions of the cannon."

"Now, up to the present time," said Barbicane, "our longest guns
have not exceeded twenty-five feet in length.  We shall
therefore astonish the world by the dimensions we shall be
obliged to adopt.  It must evidently be, then, a gun of great
range, since the length of the piece will increase the detention
of the gas accumulated behind the projectile; but there is no
advantage in passing certain limits."

"Quite so," said the major.  "What is the rule in such a case?"

"Ordinarily the length of a gun is twenty to twenty-five times
the diameter of the shot, and its weight two hundred and
thirty-five to two hundred and forty times that of the shot."

"That is not enough," cried J. T. Maston impetuously.

"I agree with you, my good friend; and, in fact, following this
proportion for a projectile nine feet in diameter, weighing 30,000
pounds, the gun would only have a length of two hundred and twenty-
five feet, and a weight of 7,200,000 pounds."

"Ridiculous!" rejoined Maston.  "As well take a pistol."

"I think so too," replied Barbicane; "that is why I propose to
quadruple that length, and to construct a gun of nine hundred feet."

The general and the major offered some objections; nevertheless,
the proposition, actively supported by the secretary, was
definitely adopted.

"But," said Elphinstone, "what thickness must we give it?"

"A thickness of six feet," replied Barbicane.

"You surely don't think of mounting a mass like that upon a
carriage?" asked the major.

"It would be a superb idea, though," said Maston.

"But impracticable," replied Barbicane.  "No, I think of sinking
this engine in the earth alone, binding it with hoops of wrought
iron, and finally surrounding it with a thick mass of masonry of
stone and cement.  The piece once cast, it must be bored with
great precision, so as to preclude any possible windage.  So there
will be no loss whatever of gas, and all the expansive force of
the powder will be employed in the propulsion."

"One simple question," said Elphinstone:  "is our gun to be rifled?"

"No, certainly not," replied Barbicane; "we require an enormous
initial velocity; and you are well aware that a shot quits a
rifled gun less rapidly than it does a smooth-bore."

"True," rejoined the major.

The committee here adjourned for a few minutes to tea and sandwiches.

On the discussion being renewed, "Gentlemen," said Barbicane,
"we must now take into consideration the metal to be employed.
Our cannon must be possessed of great tenacity, great hardness,
be infusible by heat, indissoluble, and inoxidable by the
corrosive action of acids."

"There is no doubt about that," replied the major; "and as we
shall have to employ an immense quantity of metal, we shall not
be at a loss for choice."

"Well, then," said Morgan, "I propose the best alloy hitherto
known, which consists of one hundred parts of copper, twelve of
tin, and six of brass."

"I admit," replied the president, "that this composition has
yielded excellent results, but in the present case it would be
too expensive, and very difficult to work.  I think, then, that
we ought to adopt a material excellent in its way and of low
price, such as cast iron.  What is your advice, major?"

"I quite agree with you," replied Elphinstone.

"In fact," continued Barbicane, "cast iron costs ten times less
than bronze; it is easy to cast, it runs readily from the moulds
of sand, it is easy of manipulation, it is at once economical of
money and of time.  In addition, it is excellent as a material,
and I well remember that during the war, at the siege of
Atlanta, some iron guns fired one thousand rounds at intervals
of twenty minutes without injury."

"Cast iron is very brittle, though," replied Morgan.

"Yes, but it possesses great resistance.  I will now ask our
worthy secretary to calculate the weight of a cast-iron gun with
a bore of nine feet and a thickness of six feet of metal."

"In a moment," replied Maston.  Then, dashing off some
algebraical formulae with marvelous facility, in a minute or two
he declared the following result:

"The cannon will weigh 68,040 tons.  And, at two cents a pound,
it will cost----"

"Two million five hundred and ten thousand seven hundred and
one dollars."

Maston, the major, and the general regarded Barbicane with
uneasy looks.

"Well, gentlemen," replied the president, "I repeat what I
said yesterday.  Make yourselves easy; the millions will not
be wanting."

With this assurance of their president the committee separated,
after having fixed their third meeting for the following evening.





CHAPTER IX


THE QUESTION OF THE POWDERS


There remained for consideration merely the question of powders.
The public awaited with interest its final decision.  The size
of the projectile, the length of the cannon being settled, what
would be the quantity of powder necessary to produce impulsion?

It is generally asserted that gunpowder was invented in the
fourteenth century by the monk Schwartz, who paid for his grand
discovery with his life.  It is, however, pretty well proved
that this story ought to be ranked among the legends of the
middle ages.  Gunpowder was not invented by any one; it was the
lineal successor of the Greek fire, which, like itself, was
composed of sulfur and saltpeter.  Few persons are acquainted
with the mechanical power of gunpowder.  Now this is precisely
what is necessary to be understood in order to comprehend the
importance of the question submitted to the committee.

A litre of gunpowder weighs about two pounds; during combustion
it produces 400 litres of gas.  This gas, on being liberated and
acted upon by temperature raised to 2,400 degrees, occupies a
space of 4,000 litres:  consequently the volume of powder is to
the volume of gas produced by its combustion as 1 to 4,000.
One may judge, therefore, of the tremendous pressure on this
gas when compressed within a space 4,000 times too confined.
All this was, of course, well known to the members of the committee
when they met on the following evening.

The first speaker on this occasion was Major Elphinstone, who
had been the director of the gunpowder factories during the war.

"Gentlemen," said this distinguished chemist, "I begin with
some figures which will serve as the basis of our calculation.
The old 24-pounder shot required for its discharge sixteen pounds
of powder."

"You are certain of this amount?" broke in Barbicane.

"Quite certain," replied the major.  "The Armstrong cannon
employs only seventy-five pounds of powder for a projectile
of eight hundred pounds, and the Rodman Columbiad uses only one
hundred and sixty pounds of powder to send its half ton shot a
distance of six miles.  These facts cannot be called in question,
for I myself raised the point during the depositions taken before
the committee of artillery."

"Quite true," said the general.

"Well," replied the major, "these figures go to prove that the
quantity of powder is not increased with the weight of the shot;
that is to say, if a 24-pounder shot requires sixteen pounds of
powder;-- in other words, if in ordinary guns we employ a
quantity of powder equal to two-thirds of the weight of the
projectile, this proportion is not constant.  Calculate, and you
will see that in place of three hundred and thirty-three pounds
of powder, the quantity is reduced to no more than one hundred
and sixty pounds."

"What are you aiming at?" asked the president.

"If you push your theory to extremes, my dear major," said J. T.
Maston, "you will get to this, that as soon as your shot becomes
sufficiently heavy you will not require any powder at all."

"Our friend Maston is always at his jokes, even in serious
matters," cried the major; "but let him make his mind easy, I am
going presently to propose gunpowder enough to satisfy his
artillerist's propensities.  I only keep to statistical facts
when I say that, during the war, and for the very largest guns,
the weight of the powder was reduced, as the result of
experience, to a tenth part of the weight of the shot."

"Perfectly correct," said Morgan; "but before deciding the
quantity of powder necessary to give the impulse, I think it
would be as well----"

"We shall have to employ a large-grained powder," continued the
major; "its combustion is more rapid than that of the small."

"No doubt about that," replied Morgan; "but it is very
destructive, and ends by enlarging the bore of the pieces."

"Granted; but that which is injurious to a gun destined to
perform long service is not so to our Columbiad.  We shall
run no danger of an explosion; and it is necessary that our
powder should take fire instantaneously in order that its
mechanical effect may be complete."

"We must have," said Maston, "several touch-holes, so as to fire
it at different points at the same time."

"Certainly," replied Elphinstone; "but that will render the
working of the piece more difficult.  I return then to my
large-grained powder, which removes those difficulties.
In his Columbiad charges Rodman employed a powder as large
as chestnuts, made of willow charcoal, simply dried in cast-
iron pans.  This powder was hard and glittering, left no trace
upon the hand, contained hydrogen and oxygen in large proportion,
took fire instantaneously, and, though very destructive, did not
sensibly injure the mouth-piece."

Up to this point Barbicane had kept aloof from the discussion;
he left the others to speak while he himself listened; he had
evidently got an idea.  He now simply said, "Well, my friends,
what quantity of powder do you propose?"

The three members looked at one another.

"Two hundred thousand pounds." at last said Morgan.

"Five hundred thousand," added the major.

"Eight hundred thousand," screamed Maston.

A moment of silence followed this triple proposal; it was at
last broken by the president.

"Gentlemen," he quietly said, "I start from this principle, that
the resistance of a gun, constructed under the given conditions,
is unlimited.  I shall surprise our friend Maston, then, by
stigmatizing his calculations as timid; and I propose to double
his 800,000 pounds of powder."

"Sixteen hundred thousand pounds?" shouted Maston, leaping from
his seat.

"Just so."

"We shall have to come then to my ideal of a cannon half a mile
long; for you see 1,600,000 pounds will occupy a space of about
20,000 cubic feet; and since the contents of your cannon do not
exceed 54,000 cubic feet, it would be half full; and the bore
will not be more than long enough for the gas to communicate to
the projectile sufficient impulse."

"Nevertheless," said the president, "I hold to that quantity
of powder.  Now, 1,600,000 pounds of powder will create
6,000,000,000 litres of gas.  Six thousand millions!
You quite understand?"

"What is to be done then?" said the general.

"The thing is very simple; we must reduce this enormous quantity
of powder, while preserving to it its mechanical power."

"Good; but by what means?"

"I am going to tell you," replied Barbicane quietly.

"Nothing is more easy than to reduce this mass to one quarter of
its bulk.  You know that curious cellular matter which
constitutes the elementary tissues of vegetable?  This substance
is found quite pure in many bodies, especially in cotton, which
is nothing more than the down of the seeds of the cotton plant.
Now cotton, combined with cold nitric acid, become transformed
into a substance eminently insoluble, combustible, and explosive.
It was first discovered in 1832, by Braconnot, a French chemist,
who called it xyloidine.  In 1838 another Frenchman, Pelouze,
investigated its different properties, and finally, in 1846,
Schonbein, professor of chemistry at Bale, proposed its employment
for purposes of war.  This powder, now called pyroxyle, or
fulminating cotton, is prepared with great facility by simply
plunging cotton for fifteen minutes in nitric acid, then washing
it in water, then drying it, and it is ready for use."

"Nothing could be more simple," said Morgan.

"Moreover, pyroxyle is unaltered by moisture-- a valuable
property to us, inasmuch as it would take several days to charge
the cannon.  It ignites at 170 degrees in place of 240, and its
combustion is so rapid that one may set light to it on the top
of the ordinary powder, without the latter having time to ignite."

"Perfect!" exclaimed the major.

"Only it is more expensive."

"What matter?" cried J. T. Maston.

"Finally, it imparts to projectiles a velocity four times
superior to that of gunpowder.  I will even add, that if we mix
it with one-eighth of its own weight of nitrate of potassium,
its expansive force is again considerably augmented."

"Will that be necessary?" asked the major.

"I think not," replied Barbicane.  "So, then, in place of
1,600,000 pounds of powder, we shall have but 400,000 pounds of
fulminating cotton; and since we can, without danger, compress
500 pounds of cotton into twenty-seven cubic feet, the whole
quantity will not occupy a height of more than 180 feet within
the bore of the Columbiad.  In this way the shot will have more
than 700 feet of bore to traverse under a force of 6,000,000,000
litres of gas before taking its flight toward the moon."

At this juncture J. T. Maston could not repress his emotion; he
flung himself into the arms of his friend with the violence of
a projectile, and Barbicane would have been stove in if he had
not been boom-proof.

This incident terminated the third meeting of the committee.

Barbicane and his bold colleagues, to whom nothing seemed
impossible, had succeeding in solving the complex problems of
projectile, cannon, and powder.  Their plan was drawn up, and it
only remained to put it into execution.

"A mere matter of detail, a bagatelle," said J. T. Maston.





CHAPTER X


ONE ENEMY _v._ TWENTY-FIVE MILLIONS OF FRIENDS


The American public took a lively interest in the smallest
details of the enterprise of the Gun Club.  It followed day by
day the discussion of the committee.  The most simple
preparations for the great experiment, the questions of figures
which it involved, the mechanical difficulties to be resolved--
in one word, the entire plan of work-- roused the popular
excitement to the highest pitch.

The purely scientific attraction was suddenly intensified by the
following incident:

We have seen what legions of admirers and friends Barbicane's
project had rallied round its author.  There was, however,
one single individual alone in all the States of the Union who
protested against the attempt of the Gun Club.  He attacked it
furiously on every opportunity, and human nature is such that
Barbicane felt more keenly the opposition of that one man than
he did the applause of all the others.  He was well aware of the
motive of this antipathy, the origin of this solitary enmity,
the cause of its personality and old standing, and in what
rivalry of self-love it had its rise.

This persevering enemy the president of the Gun Club had never seen.
Fortunate that it was so, for a meeting between the two men would
certainly have been attended with serious consequences.  This rival
was a man of science, like Barbicane himself, of a fiery, daring,
and violent disposition; a pure Yankee.  His name was Captain
Nicholl; he lived at Philadelphia.

Most people are aware of the curious struggle which arose during
the Federal war between the guns and armor of iron-plated ships.
The result was the entire reconstruction of the navy of both the
continents; as the one grew heavier, the other became thicker
in proportion.  The Merrimac, the Monitor, the Tennessee, the
Weehawken discharged enormous projectiles themselves, after
having been armor-clad against the projectiles of others.  In fact
they did to others that which they would not they should do to them--
that grand principle of immortality upon which rests the whole art
of war.

Now if Barbicane was a great founder of shot, Nicholl was a
great forger of plates; the one cast night and day at Baltimore,
the other forged day and night at Philadelphia.  As soon as ever
Barbicane invented a new shot, Nicholl invented a new plate;
each followed a current of ideas essentially opposed to the other.
Happily for these citizens, so useful to their country, a distance
of from fifty to sixty miles separated them from one another, and
they had never yet met.  Which of these two inventors had the
advantage over the other it was difficult to decide from the
results obtained.  By last accounts, however, it would seem that
the armor-plate would in the end have to give way to the shot;
nevertheless, there were competent judges who had their doubts
on the point.

At the last experiment the cylindro-conical projectiles of
Barbicane stuck like so many pins in the Nicholl plates.
On that day the Philadelphia iron-forger then believed himself
victorious, and could not evince contempt enough for his rival;
but when the other afterward substituted for conical shot simple
600-pound shells, at very moderate velocity, the captain was
obliged to give in.  In fact, these projectiles knocked his best
metal plate to shivers.

Matters were at this stage, and victory seemed to rest with the
shot, when the war came to an end on the very day when Nicholl
had completed a new armor-plate of wrought steel.  It was a
masterpiece of its kind, and bid defiance to all the projectiles
of the world.  The captain had it conveyed to the Polygon at
Washington, challenging the president of the Gun Club to break it.
Barbicane, peace having been declared, declined to try the experiment.

Nicholl, now furious, offered to expose his plate to the shock
of any shot, solid, hollow, round, or conical.  Refused by the
president, who did not choose to compromise his last success.

Nicholl, disgusted by this obstinacy, tried to tempt Barbicane
by offering him every chance.  He proposed to fix the plate
within two hundred yards of the gun.  Barbicane still obstinate
in refusal.  A hundred yards?  Not even seventy-five!

"At fifty then!" roared the captain through the newspapers.
"At twenty-five yards! and I'll stand behind!"

Barbicane returned for answer that, even if Captain Nicholl
would be so good as to stand in front, he would not fire any more.

Nicholl could not contain himself at this reply; threw out hints
of cowardice; that a man who refused to fire a cannon-shot was
pretty near being afraid of it; that artillerists who fight at
six miles distance are substituting mathematical formulae for
individual courage.

To these insinuations Barbicane returned no answer; perhaps he
never heard of them, so absorbed was he in the calculations for
his great enterprise.

When his famous communication was made to the Gun Club, the
captain's wrath passed all bounds; with his intense jealousy was
mingled a feeling of absolute impotence.  How was he to invent
anything to beat this 900-feet Columbiad?  What armor-plate
could ever resist a projectile of 30,000 pounds weight?
Overwhelmed at first under this violent shock, he by and by
recovered himself, and resolved to crush the proposal by weight
of his arguments.

He then violently attacked the labors of the Gun Club, published
a number of letters in the newspapers, endeavored to prove Barbicane
ignorant of the first principles of gunnery.  He maintained that
it was absolutely impossible to impress upon any body whatever
a velocity of 12,000 yards per second; that even with such a
velocity a projectile of such a weight could not transcend the
limits of the earth's atmosphere.  Further still, even regarding
the velocity to be acquired, and granting it to be sufficient,
the shell could not resist the pressure of the gas developed by
the ignition of 1,600,000 pounds of powder; and supposing it to
resist that pressure, it would be less able to support that
temperature; it would melt on quitting the Columbiad, and fall
back in a red-hot shower upon the heads of the imprudent spectators.

Barbicane continued his work without regarding these attacks.

Nicholl then took up the question in its other aspects.  Without
touching upon its uselessness in all points of view, he regarded
the experiment as fraught with extreme danger, both to the
citizens, who might sanction by their presence so reprehensible
a spectacle, and also to the towns in the neighborhood of this
deplorable cannon.  He also observed that if the projectile did
not succeed in reaching its destination (a result absolutely
impossible), it must inevitably fall back upon the earth, and
that the shock of such a mass, multiplied by the square of its
velocity, would seriously endanger every point of the globe.
Under the circumstances, therefore, and without interfering with
the rights of free citizens, it was a case for the intervention
of Government, which ought not to endanger the safety of all for
the pleasure of one individual.

In spite of all his arguments, however, Captain Nicholl
remained alone in his opinion.  Nobody listened to him, and he
did not succeed in alienating a single admirer from the
president of the Gun Club.  The latter did not even take the
pains to refute the arguments of his rival.

Nicholl, driven into his last entrenchments, and not able to
fight personally in the cause, resolved to fight with money.
He published, therefore, in the Richmond _Inquirer_ a series of
wagers, conceived in these terms, and on an increasing scale:

No. 1 ($1,000).-- That the necessary funds for the experiment
of the Gun Club will not be forthcoming.

No. 2 ($2,000).-- That the operation of casting a cannon of 900
feet is impracticable, and cannot possibly succeed.

No. 3 ($3,000).-- That is it impossible to load the Columbiad,
and that the pyroxyle will take fire spontaneously under the
pressure of the projectile.

No. 4 ($4,000).-- That the Columbiad will burst at the first fire.

No. 5 ($5,000).-- That the shot will not travel farther than six miles,
and that it will fall back again a few seconds after its discharge.

It was an important sum, therefore, which the captain risked in
his invincible obstinacy.  He had no less than $15,000 at stake.

Notwithstanding the importance of the challenge, on the 19th of
May he received a sealed packet containing the following
superbly laconic reply:
                              "BALTIMORE, October 19.
                          "Done.
                              "BARBICANE."





CHAPTER XI


FLORIDA AND TEXAS


One question remained yet to be decided; it was necessary to
choose a favorable spot for the experiment.  According to the
advice of the Observatory of Cambridge, the gun must be fired
perpendicularly to the plane of the horizon, that is to say,
toward the zenith.  Now the moon does not traverse the zenith,
except in places situated between 0@ and 28@ of latitude.  It
became, then, necessary to determine exactly that spot on the
globe where the immense Columbiad should be cast.

On the 20th of October, at a general meeting of the Gun Club,
Barbicane produced a magnificent map of the United States.
"Gentlemen," said he, in opening the discussion, "I presume that
we are all agreed that this experiment cannot and ought not to
be tried anywhere but within the limits of the soil of the Union.
Now, by good fortune, certain frontiers of the United States
extend downward as far as the 28th parallel of the north latitude.
If you will cast your eye over this map, you will see that we have at
our disposal the whole of the southern portion of Texas and Florida."

It was finally agreed, then, that the Columbiad must be cast on
the soil of either Texas or Florida.  The result, however, of
this decision was to create a rivalry entirely without precedent
between the different towns of these two States.

The 28th parallel, on reaching the American coast, traverses the
peninsula of Florida, dividing it into two nearly equal portions.
Then, plunging into the Gulf of Mexico, it subtends the arc
formed by the coast of Alabama, Mississippi, and Louisiana;
then skirting Texas, off which it cuts an angle, it continues
its course over Mexico, crosses the Sonora, Old California,
and loses itself in the Pacific Ocean.  It was, therefore,
only those portions of Texas and Florida which were situated
below this parallel which came within the prescribed conditions
of latitude.

Florida, in its southern part, reckons no cities of importance;
it is simply studded with forts raised against the roving Indians.
One solitary town, Tampa Town, was able to put in a claim in favor
of its situation.

In Texas, on the contrary, the towns are much more numerous
and important.  Corpus Christi, in the county of Nueces, and all
the cities situated on the Rio Bravo, Laredo, Comalites, San
Ignacio on the Web, Rio Grande City on the Starr, Edinburgh in
the Hidalgo, Santa Rita, Elpanda, Brownsville in the Cameron,
formed an imposing league against the pretensions of Florida.
So, scarcely was the decision known, when the Texan and Floridan
deputies arrived at Baltimore in an incredibly short space of time.
From that very moment President Barbicane and the influential
members of the Gun Club were besieged day and night by
formidable claims.  If seven cities of Greece contended for
the honor of having given birth to a Homer, here were two entire
States threatening to come to blows about the question of a cannon.

The rival parties promenaded the streets with arms in their hands;
and at every occasion of their meeting a collision was to be
apprehended which might have been attended with disastrous results.
Happily the prudence and address of President Barbicane averted
the danger.  These personal demonstrations found a division in
the newspapers of the different States.  The New York _Herald_ and
the _Tribune_ supported Texas, while the _Times_ and the _American
Review_ espoused the cause of the Floridan deputies.  The members
of the Gun Club could not decide to which to give the preference.

Texas produced its array of twenty-six counties; Florida replied
that twelve counties were better than twenty-six in a country
only one-sixth part of the size.

Texas plumed itself upon its 330,000 natives; Florida, with a
far smaller territory, boasted of being much more densely
populated with 56,000.

The Texans, through the columns of the _Herald_ claimed that
some regard should be had to a State which grew the best cotton
in all America, produced the best green oak for the service of
the navy, and contained the finest oil, besides iron mines, in
which the yield was fifty per cent. of pure metal.

To this the _American Review_ replied that the soil of Florida,
although not equally rich, afforded the best conditions for the
moulding and casting of the Columbiad, consisting as it did of
sand and argillaceous earth.

"That may be all very well," replied the Texans; "but you must
first get to this country.  Now the communications with Florida
are difficult, while the coast of Texas offers the bay of
Galveston, which possesses a circumference of fourteen leagues,
and is capable of containing the navies of the entire world!"

"A pretty notion truly," replied the papers in the interest of
Florida, "that of Galveston bay _below the 29th parallel!_
Have we not got the bay of Espiritu Santo, opening precisely upon
_the 28th degree_, and by which ships can reach Tampa Town by
direct route?"

"A fine bay; half choked with sand!"

"Choked yourselves!" returned the others.

Thus the war went on for several days, when Florida endeavored
to draw her adversary away on to fresh ground; and one morning
the _Times_ hinted that, the enterprise being essentially
American, it ought not to be attempted upon other than purely
American territory.

To these words Texas retorted, "American! are we not as much so
as you?  Were not Texas and Florida both incorporated into the
Union in 1845?"

"Undoubtedly," replied the _Times_; "but we have belonged to the
Americans ever since 1820."

"Yes!" returned the _Tribune_; "after having been Spaniards or
English for two hundred years, you were sold to the United
States for five million dollars!"

"Well! and why need we blush for that?  Was not Louisiana bought
from Napoleon in 1803 at the price of sixteen million dollars?"

"Scandalous!" roared the Texas deputies.  "A wretched little
strip of country like Florida to dare to compare itself to
Texas, who, in place of selling herself, asserted her own
independence, drove out the Mexicans in March 2, 1846, and
declared herself a federal republic after the victory gained by
Samuel Houston, on the banks of the San Jacinto, over the troops
of Santa Anna!-- a country, in fine, which voluntarily annexed
itself to the United States of America!"

"Yes; because it was afraid of the Mexicans!" replied Florida.

"Afraid!"  From this moment the state of things became intolerable.
A sanguinary encounter seemed daily imminent between the two
parties in the streets of Baltimore.  It became necessary to keep
an eye upon the deputies.

President Barbicane knew not which way to look.  Notes, documents,
letters full of menaces showered down upon his house.  Which side
ought he to take?  As regarded the appropriation of the soil, the
facility of communication, the rapidity of transport, the claims
of both States were evenly balanced.  As for political prepossessions,
they had nothing to do with the question.

This dead block had existed for some little time, when Barbicane
resolved to get rid of it all at once.  He called a meeting of
his colleagues, and laid before them a proposition which, it will
be seen, was profoundly sagacious.

"On carefully considering," he said, "what is going on now
between Florida and Texas, it is clear that the same
difficulties will recur with all the towns of the favored State.
The rivalry will descend from State to city, and so on downward.
Now Texas possesses eleven towns within the prescribed
conditions, which will further dispute the honor and create us
new enemies, while Florida has only one.  I go in, therefore,
for Florida and Tampa Town."

This decision, on being made known, utterly crushed the
Texan deputies.  Seized with an indescribable fury, they
addressed threatening letters to the different members of the
Gun Club by name.  The magistrates had but one course to take,
and they took it.  They chartered a special train, forced the
Texans into it whether they would or no; and they quitted the
city with a speed of thirty miles an hour.

Quickly, however, as they were despatched, they found time to
hurl one last and bitter sarcasm at their adversaries.

Alluding to the extent of Florida, a mere peninsula confined
between two seas, they pretended that it could never sustain
the shock of the discharge, and that it would "bust up" at the
very first shot.

"Very well, let it bust up!" replied the Floridans, with a
brevity of the days of ancient Sparta.





CHAPTER XII


URBI ET ORBI


The astronomical, mechanical, and topographical difficulties
resolved, finally came the question of finance.  The sum
required was far too great for any individual, or even any
single State, to provide the requisite millions.

President Barbicane undertook, despite of the matter being a
purely American affair, to render it one of universal interest,
and to request the financial co-operation of all peoples.
It was, he maintained, the right and duty of the whole earth
to interfere in the affairs of its satellite.  The subscription
opened at Baltimore extended properly to the whole world-- _Urbi
et orbi_.

This subscription was successful beyond all expectation;
notwithstanding that it was a question not of lending but of
giving the money.  It was a purely disinterested operation in
the strictest sense of the term, and offered not the slightest
chance of profit.

The effect, however, of Barbicane's communication was not
confined to the frontiers of the United States; it crossed
the Atlantic and Pacific, invading simultaneously Asia and
Europe, Africa and Oceanica.  The observatories of the Union
placed themselves in immediate communication with those of
foreign countries.  Some, such as those of Paris, Petersburg,
Berlin, Stockholm, Hamburg, Malta, Lisbon, Benares, Madras,
and others, transmitted their good wishes; the rest maintained
a prudent silence, quietly awaiting the result.  As for the
observatory at Greenwich, seconded as it was by the twenty-
two astronomical establishments of Great Britain, it spoke
plainly enough.  It boldly denied the possibility of success,
and pronounced in favor of the theories of Captain Nicholl.
But this was nothing more than mere English jealousy.

On the 8th of October President Barbicane published a manifesto
full of enthusiasm, in which he made an appeal to "all persons
of good will upon the face of the earth."  This document,
translated into all languages, met with immense success.

Subscription lists were opened in all the principal cities of
the Union, with a central office at the Baltimore Bank, 9
Baltimore Street.

In addition, subscriptions were received at the following banks
in the different states of the two continents:

     At Vienna, with S. M. de Rothschild.
     At Petersburg, Stieglitz and Co.
     At Paris, The Credit Mobilier.
     At Stockholm, Tottie and Arfuredson.
     At London, N. M. Rothschild and Son.
     At Turin, Ardouin and Co.
     At Berlin, Mendelssohn.
     At Geneva, Lombard, Odier and Co.
     At Constantinople, The Ottoman Bank.
     At Brussels, J. Lambert.
     At Madrid, Daniel Weisweller.
     At Amsterdam, Netherlands Credit Co.
     At Rome, Torlonia and Co.
     At Lisbon, Lecesne.
     At Copenhagen, Private Bank.
     At Rio de Janeiro, Private Bank.
     At Montevideo, Private Bank.
     At Valparaiso and Lima, Thomas la Chambre and Co.
     At Mexico, Martin Daran and Co.

Three days after the manifesto of President Barbicane $4,000,000
were paid into the different towns of the Union.  With such a
balance the Gun Club might begin operations at once.  But some
days later advices were received to the effect that foreign
subscriptions were being eagerly taken up.  Certain countries
distinguished themselves by their liberality; others untied
their purse-strings with less facility--a matter of temperament.
Figures are, however, more eloquent than words, and here is the
official statement of the sums which were paid in to the credit
of the Gun Club at the close of the subscription.

Russia paid in as her contingent the enormous sum of 368,733 roubles.
No one need be surprised at this, who bears in mind the scientific
taste of the Russians, and the impetus which they have given to
astronomical studies--thanks to their numerous observatories.

France began by deriding the pretensions of the Americans.
The moon served as a pretext for a thousand stale puns and
a score of ballads, in which bad taste contested the palm
with ignorance.  But as formerly the French paid before singing,
so now they paid after having had their laugh, and they subscribed
for a sum of 1,253,930 francs.  At that price they had a right
to enjoy themselves a little.

Austria showed herself generous in the midst of her financial crisis.
Her public contributions amounted to the sum of 216,000 florins--
a perfect godsend.

Fifty-two thousand rix-dollars were the remittance of Sweden
and Norway; the amount is large for the country, but it would
undoubtedly have been considerably increased had the
subscription been opened in Christiana simultaneously with that
at Stockholm.  For some reason or other the Norwegians do not
like to send their money to Sweden.

Prussia, by a remittance of 250,000 thalers, testified her high
approval of the enterprise.

Turkey behaved generously; but she had a personal interest in
the matter.  The moon, in fact, regulates the cycle of her years
and her fast of Ramadan.  She could not do less than give
1,372,640 piastres; and she gave them with an eagerness which
denoted, however, some pressure on the part of the government.

Belgium distinguished herself among the second-rate states by
a grant of 513,000 francs-- about two centimes per head of
her population.

Holland and her colonies interested themselves to the extent of
110,000 florins, only demanding an allowance of five per cent.
discount for paying ready money.

Denmark, a little contracted in territory, gave nevertheless
9,000 ducats, proving her love for scientific experiments.

The Germanic Confederation pledged itself to 34,285 florins.
It was impossible to ask for more; besides, they would not have
given it.

Though very much crippled, Italy found 200,000 lire in the
pockets of her people.  If she had had Venetia she would have
done better; but she had not.

The States of the Church thought that they could not send less
than 7,040 Roman crowns; and Portugal carried her devotion to
science as far as 30,000 cruzados.  It was the widow's mite--
eighty-six piastres; but self-constituted empires are always
rather short of money.

Two hundred and fifty-seven francs, this was the modest
contribution of Switzerland to the American work.  One must
freely admit that she did not see the practical side of
the matter.  It did not seem to her that the mere despatch of
a shot to the moon could possibly establish any relation of
affairs with her; and it did not seem prudent to her to embark
her capital in so hazardous an enterprise.  After all, perhaps
she was right.

As to Spain, she could not scrape together more than 110 reals.
She gave as an excuse that she had her railways to finish.
The truth is, that science is not favorably regarded in that
country, it is still in a backward state; and moreover, certain
Spaniards, not by any means the least educated, did not form a
correct estimate of the bulk of the projectile compared with
that of the moon.  They feared that it would disturb the
established order of things.  In that case it were better to
keep aloof; which they did to the tune of some reals.

There remained but England; and we know the contemptuous
antipathy with which she received Barbicane's proposition.
The English have but one soul for the whole twenty-six millions
of inhabitants which Great Britain contains.  They hinted that
the enterprise of the Gun Club was contrary to the "principle of
non-intervention."  And they did not subscribe a single farthing.

At this intimation the Gun Club merely shrugged its shoulders
and returned to its great work.  When South America, that is to
say, Peru, Chili, Brazil, the provinces of La Plata and Columbia,
had poured forth their quota into their hands, the sum of $300,000,
it found itself in possession of a considerable capital, of which
the following is a statement:

     United States subscriptions, .     .  $4,000,000
     Foreign subscriptions  .     .     .  $1,446,675
                                          -----------
            Total,    .     .     .     .  $5,446,675


Such was the sum which the public poured into the treasury of
the Gun Club.

Let no one be surprised at the vastness of the amount.  The work
of casting, boring, masonry, the transport of workmen, their
establishment in an almost uninhabited country, the construction
of furnaces and workshops, the plant, the powder, the projectile,
and incipient expenses, would, according to the estimates, absorb
nearly the whole.  Certain cannon-shots in the Federal war cost
one thousand dollars apiece.  This one of President Barbicane,
unique in the annals of gunnery, might well cost five thousand
times more.

On the 20th of October a contract was entered into with the
manufactory at Coldspring, near New York, which during the war
had furnished the largest Parrott, cast-iron guns.  It was
stipulated between the contracting parties that the manufactory
of Coldspring should engage to transport to Tampa Town,
in southern Florida, the necessary materials for casting
the Columbiad.  The work was bound to be completed at latest
by the 15th of October following, and the cannon delivered
in good condition under penalty of a forfeit of one hundred
dollars a day to the moment when the moon should again present
herself under the same conditions-- that is to say, in eighteen
years and eleven days.

The engagement of the workmen, their pay, and all the necessary
details of the work, devolved upon the Coldspring Company.

This contract, executed in duplicate, was signed by Barbicane,
president of the Gun Club, of the one part, and T. Murchison
director of the Coldspring manufactory, of the other, who thus
executed the deed on behalf of their respective principals.





CHAPTER XIII


STONES HILL


When the decision was arrived at by the Gun Club, to the
disparagement of Texas, every one in America, where reading is
a universal acquirement, set to work to study the geography
of Florida.  Never before had there been such a sale for works
like "Bertram's Travels in Florida," "Roman's Natural History of
East and West Florida," "William's Territory of Florida," and
"Cleland on the Cultivation of the Sugar-Cane in Florida."
It became necessary to issue fresh editions of these works.

Barbicane had something better to do than to read.  He desired
to see things with his own eyes, and to mark the exact position
of the proposed gun.  So, without a moment's loss of time, he
placed at the disposal of the Cambridge Observatory the funds
necessary for the construction of a telescope, and entered into
negotiations with the house of Breadwill and Co., of Albany, for
the construction of an aluminum projectile of the required size.
He then quitted Baltimore, accompanied by J. T. Maston, Major
Elphinstone, and the manager of the Coldspring factory.

On the following day, the four fellow-travelers arrived at
New Orleans.  There they immediately embarked on board the
_Tampico_, a despatch-boat belonging to the Federal navy, which
the government had placed at their disposal; and, getting up
steam, the banks of Louisiana speedily disappeared from sight.

The passage was not long.  Two days after starting, the _Tampico_,
having made four hundred and eighty miles, came in sight of the
coast of Florida.  On a nearer approach Barbicane found himself
in view of a low, flat country of somewhat barren aspect.
After coasting along a series of creeks abounding in lobsters
and oysters, the _Tampico_ entered the bay of Espiritu Santo,
where she finally anchored in a small natural harbor, formed by
the _embouchure_ of the River Hillisborough, at seven P.M., on
the 22d of October.

Our four passengers disembarked at once.  "Gentlemen," said
Barbicane, "we have no time to lose; tomorrow we must obtain
horses, and proceed to reconnoiter the country."

Barbicane had scarcely set his foot on shore when three thousand
of the inhabitants of Tampa Town came forth to meet him, an
honor due to the president who had signalized their country by
his choice.

Declining, however, every kind of ovation, Barbicane ensconced
himself in a room of the Franklin Hotel.

On the morrow some of the small horses of the Spanish breed,
full of vigor and of fire, stood snorting under his windows;
but instead of four steeds, here were fifty, together with
their riders.  Barbicane descended with his three fellow-
travelers; and much astonished were they all to find themselves
in the midst of such a cavalcade.  He remarked that every
horseman carried a carbine slung across his shoulders and
pistols in his holsters.

On expressing his surprise at these preparations, he was
speedily enlightened by a young Floridan, who quietly said:

"Sir, there are Seminoles there."

"What do you mean by Seminoles?"

"Savages who scour the prairies.  We thought it best, therefore,
to escort you on your road."

"Pooh!" cried J. T. Maston, mounting his steed.

"All right," said the Floridan; "but it is true enough, nevertheless."

"Gentlemen," answered Barbicane, "I thank you for your kind
attention; but it is time to be off."

It was five A.M. when Barbicane and his party, quitting Tampa Town,
made their way along the coast in the direction of Alifia Creek.
This little river falls into Hillisborough Bay twelve miles above
Tampa Town.  Barbicane and his escort coasted along its right bank
to the eastward.  Soon the waves of the bay disappeared behind a
bend of rising ground, and the Floridan "champagne" alone offered
itself to view.

Florida, discovered on Palm Sunday, in 1512, by Juan Ponce de
Leon, was originally named _Pascha Florida_.  It little deserved
that designation, with its dry and parched coasts.  But after
some few miles of tract the nature of the soil gradually changes
and the country shows itself worthy of the name.  Cultivated plains
soon appear, where are united all the productions of the northern
and tropical floras, terminating in prairies abounding with
pineapples and yams, tobacco, rice, cotton-plants, and sugar-canes,
which extend beyond reach of sight, flinging their riches broadcast
with careless prodigality.

Barbicane appeared highly pleased on observing the progressive
elevation of the land; and in answer to a question of J. T.
Maston, replied:

"My worthy friend, we cannot do better than sink our Columbiad
in these high grounds."

"To get nearer the moon, perhaps?" said the secretary of the Gun Club.

"Not exactly," replied Barbicane, smiling; "do you not see that
among these elevated plateaus we shall have a much easier work
of it?  No struggles with the water-springs, which will save us
long expensive tubings; and we shall be working in daylight
instead of down a deep and narrow well.  Our business, then, is
to open our trenches upon ground some hundreds of yards above
the level of the sea."

"You are right, sir," struck in Murchison, the engineer; "and, if I
mistake not, we shall ere long find a suitable spot for our purpose."

"I wish we were at the first stroke of the pickaxe," said the president.

"And I wish we were at the _last_," cried J. T. Maston.

About ten A.M. the little band had crossed a dozen miles.
To fertile plains succeeded a region of forests.  There perfumes
of the most varied kinds mingled together in tropical profusion.
These almost impenetrable forests were composed of pomegranates,
orange-trees, citrons, figs, olives, apricots, bananas, huge vines,
whose blossoms and fruits rivaled each other in color and perfume.
Beneath the odorous shade of these magnificent trees fluttered and
warbled a little world of brilliantly plumaged birds.

J. T. Maston and the major could not repress their admiration on
finding themselves in the presence of the glorious beauties of
this wealth of nature.  President Barbicane, however, less
sensitive to these wonders, was in haste to press forward;
the very luxuriance of the country was displeasing to him.
They hastened onward, therefore, and were compelled to ford
several rivers, not without danger, for they were infested
with huge alligators from fifteen to eighteen feet long.
Maston courageously menaced them with his steel hook, but he
only succeeded in frightening some pelicans and teal, while
tall flamingos stared stupidly at the party.

At length these denizens of the swamps disappeared in their
turn; smaller trees became thinly scattered among less dense
thickets-- a few isolated groups detached in the midst of
endless plains over which ranged herds of startled deer.

"At last," cried Barbicane, rising in his stirrups, "here we are
at the region of pines!"

"Yes! and of savages too," replied the major.

In fact, some Seminoles had just came in sight upon the horizon;
they rode violently backward and forward on their fleet horses,
brandishing their spears or discharging their guns with a dull report.
These hostile demonstrations, however, had no effect upon Barbicane
and his companions.

They were then occupying the center of a rocky plain, which the
sun scorched with its parching rays.  This was formed by a
considerable elevation of the soil, which seemed to offer to the
members of the Gun Club all the conditions requisite for the
construction of their Columbiad.

"Halt!" said Barbicane, reining up.  "Has this place any
local appellation?"

"It is called Stones Hill," replied one of the Floridans.

Barbicane, without saying a word, dismounted, seized his instruments,
and began to note his position with extreme exactness.  The little
band, drawn up in the rear, watched his proceedings in profound silence.

At this moment the sun passed the meridian.  Barbicane, after a
few moments, rapidly wrote down the result of his observations,
and said:

"This spot is situated eighteen hundred feet above the level of
the sea, in 27@ 7' N. lat. and 5@ 7' W. long. of the meridian
of Washington.  It appears to me by its rocky and barren character
to offer all the conditions requisite for our experiment.  On that
plain will be raised our magazines, workshops, furnaces, and
workmen's huts; and here, from this very spot," said he, stamping
his foot on the summit of Stones Hill, "hence shall our projectile
take its flight into the regions of the Solar World."





CHAPTER XIV


PICKAXE AND TROWEL


The same evening Barbicane and his companions returned to Tampa
Town; and Murchison, the engineer, re-embarked on board the
Tampico for New Orleans.  His object was to enlist an army of
workmen, and to collect together the greater part of the materials.
The members of the Gun Club remained at Tampa Town, for the
purpose of setting on foot the preliminary works by the aid of
the people of the country.

Eight days after its departure, the Tampico returned into the
bay of Espiritu Santo, with a whole flotilla of steamboats.
Murchison had succeeded in assembling together fifteen
hundred artisans.  Attracted by the high pay and considerable
bounties offered by the Gun Club, he had enlisted a choice
legion of stokers, iron-founders, lime-burners, miners,
brickmakers, and artisans of every trade, without distinction
of color.  As many of these people brought their families with
them, their departure resembled a perfect emigration.

On the 31st of October, at ten o'clock in the morning, the troop
disembarked on the quays of Tampa Town; and one may imagine the
activity which pervaded that little town, whose population was
thus doubled in a single day.

During the first few days they were busy discharging the cargo
brought by the flotilla, the machines, and the rations, as well
as a large number of huts constructed of iron plates, separately
pieced and numbered.  At the same period Barbicane laid the
first sleepers of a railway fifteen miles in length, intended to
unite Stones Hill with Tampa Town.  On the first of November
Barbicane quitted Tampa Town with a detachment of workmen; and
on the following day the whole town of huts was erected round
Stones Hill.  This they enclosed with palisades; and in respect
of energy and activity, it might have been mistaken for one of
the great cities of the Union.  Everything was placed under a
complete system of discipline, and the works were commenced in
most perfect order.

The nature of the soil having been carefully examined, by means
of repeated borings, the work of excavation was fixed for the
4th of November.

On that day Barbicane called together his foremen and addressed
them as follows:  "You are well aware, my friends, of the
object with which I have assembled you together in this wild
part of Florida.  Our business is to construct a cannon measuring
nine feet in its interior diameter, six feet thick, and with a
stone revetment of nineteen and a half feet in thickness.  We have,
therefore, a well of sixty feet in diameter to dig down to a
depth of nine hundred feet.  This great work must be completed
within eight months, so that you have 2,543,400 cubic feet of
earth to excavate in 255 days; that is to say, in round numbers,
2,000 cubic feet per day.  That which would present no difficulty
to a thousand navvies working in open country will be of course
more troublesome in a comparatively confined space.  However, the
thing must be done, and I reckon for its accomplishment upon your
courage as much as upon your skill."

At eight o'clock the next morning the first stroke of the
pickaxe was struck upon the soil of Florida; and from that
moment that prince of tools was never inactive for one moment
in the hands of the excavators.  The gangs relieved each other
every three hours.

On the 4th of November fifty workmen commenced digging, in the
very center of the enclosed space on the summit of Stones Hill,
a circular hole sixty feet in diameter.  The pickaxe first
struck upon a kind of black earth, six inches in thickness,
which was speedily disposed of.  To this earth succeeded two
feet of fine sand, which was carefully laid aside as being
valuable for serving the casting of the inner mould.  After the
sand appeared some compact white clay, resembling the chalk of
Great Britain, which extended down to a depth of four feet.
Then the iron of the picks struck upon the hard bed of the soil;
a kind of rock formed of petrified shells, very dry, very solid,
and which the picks could with difficulty penetrate.  At this
point the excavation exhibited a depth of six and a half feet
and the work of the masonry was begun.

At the bottom of the excavation they constructed a wheel of oak,
a kind of circle strongly bolted together, and of immense strength.
The center of this wooden disc was hollowed out to a diameter
equal to the exterior diameter of the Columbiad.  Upon this wheel
rested the first layers of the masonry, the stones of which were
bound together by hydraulic cement, with irresistible tenacity.
The workmen, after laying the stones from the circumference to
the center, were thus enclosed within a kind of well twenty-one
feet in diameter.  When this work was accomplished, the miners
resumed their picks and cut away the rock from underneath the wheel
itself, taking care to support it as they advanced upon blocks of
great thickness.  At every two feet which the hole gained in depth
they successively withdrew the blocks.  The wheel then sank little
by little, and with it the massive ring of masonry, on the upper
bed of which the masons labored incessantly, always reserving some
vent holes to permit the escape of gas during the operation of
the casting.

This kind of work required on the part of the workmen extreme
nicety and minute attention.  More than one, in digging
underneath the wheel, was dangerously injured by the splinters
of stone.  But their ardor never relaxed, night or day.  By day
they worked under the rays of the scorching sun; by night, under
the gleam of the electric light.  The sounds of the picks against
the rock, the bursting of mines, the grinding of the machines,
the wreaths of smoke scattered through the air, traced around
Stones Hill a circle of terror which the herds of buffaloes and
the war parties of the Seminoles never ventured to pass.
Nevertheless, the works advanced regularly, as the steam-cranes
actively removed the rubbish.  Of unexpected obstacles there was
little account; and with regard to foreseen difficulties, they
were speedily disposed of.

At the expiration of the first month the well had attained the
depth assigned for that lapse of time, namely, 112 feet.  This depth
was doubled in December, and trebled in January.

During the month of February the workmen had to contend with a
sheet of water which made its way right across the outer soil.
It became necessary to employ very powerful pumps and
compressed-air engines to drain it off, so as to close up the
orifice from whence it issued; just as one stops a leak on
board ship.  They at last succeeded in getting the upper hand of
these untoward streams; only, in consequence of the loosening of
the soil, the wheel partly gave way, and a slight partial
settlement ensued.  This accident cost the life of several workmen.

No fresh occurrence thenceforward arrested the progress of the
operation; and on the tenth of June, twenty days before the
expiration of the period fixed by Barbicane, the well, lined
throughout with its facing of stone, had attained the depth of
900 feet.  At the bottom the masonry rested upon a massive block
measuring thirty feet in thickness, while on the upper portion
it was level with the surrounding soil.

President Barbicane and the members of the Gun Club warmly
congratulated their engineer Murchison; the cyclopean work had
been accomplished with extraordinary rapidity.

During these eight months Barbicane never quitted Stones Hill
for a single instant.  Keeping ever close by the work of
excavation, he busied himself incessantly with the welfare
and health of his workpeople, and was singularly fortunate
in warding off the epidemics common to large communities of
men, and so disastrous in those regions of the globe which
are exposed to the influences of tropical climates.

Many workmen, it is true, paid with their lives for the rashness
inherent in these dangerous labors; but these mishaps are impossible
to be avoided, and they are classed among the details with which
the Americans trouble themselves but little.  They have in fact
more regard for human nature in general than for the individual
in particular.

Nevertheless, Barbicane professed opposite principles to these,
and put them in force at every opportunity.  So, thanks to his
care, his intelligence, his useful intervention in all
difficulties, his prodigious and humane sagacity, the average of
accidents did not exceed that of transatlantic countries, noted
for their excessive precautions-- France, for instance, among
others, where they reckon about one accident for every two
hundred thousand francs of work.




CHAPTER XV


THE FETE OF THE CASTING


During the eight months which were employed in the work of
excavation the preparatory works of the casting had been carried
on simultaneously with extreme rapidity.  A stranger arriving at
Stones Hill would have been surprised at the spectacle offered
to his view.

At 600 yards from the well, and circularly arranged around it as
a central point, rose 1,200 reverberating ovens, each six feet
in diameter, and separated from each other by an interval of
three feet.  The circumference occupied by these 1,200 ovens
presented a length of two miles.  Being all constructed on the
same plan, each with its high quadrangular chimney, they
produced a most singular effect.

It will be remembered that on their third meeting the committee
had decided to use cast iron for the Columbiad, and in particular
the white description.  This metal, in fact, is the most
tenacious, the most ductile, and the most malleable, and
consequently suitable for all moulding operations; and when
smelted with pit coal, is of superior quality for all
engineering works requiring great resisting power, such as
cannon, steam boilers, hydraulic presses, and the like.

Cast iron, however, if subjected to only one single fusion,
is rarely sufficiently homogeneous; and it requires a second
fusion completely to refine it by dispossessing it of its last
earthly deposits.  So long before being forwarded to Tampa Town,
the iron ore, molten in the great furnaces of Coldspring, and
brought into contact with coal and silicium heated to a high
temperature, was carburized and transformed into cast iron.
After this first operation, the metal was sent on to Stones Hill.
They had, however, to deal with 136,000,000 pounds of iron, a
quantity far too costly to send by railway.  The cost of
transport would have been double that of material.  It appeared
preferable to freight vessels at New York, and to load them with
the iron in bars.  This, however, required not less than sixty-
eight vessels of 1,000 tons, a veritable fleet, which, quitting
New York on the 3rd of May, on the 10th of the same month ascended
the Bay of Espiritu Santo, and discharged their cargoes, without
dues, in the port at Tampa Town.  Thence the iron was transported
by rail to Stones Hill, and about the middle of January this
enormous mass of metal was delivered at its destination.

It will easily be understood that 1,200 furnaces were not too
many to melt simultaneously these 60,000 tons of iron.  Each of
these furnaces contained nearly 140,000 pounds weight of metal.
They were all built after the model of those which served for
the casting of the Rodman gun; they were trapezoidal in shape,
with a high elliptical arch.  These furnaces, constructed of
fireproof brick, were especially adapted for burning pit coal,
with a flat bottom upon which the iron bars were laid.  This bottom,
inclined at an angle of 25 degrees, allowed the metal to flow into
the receiving troughs; and the 1,200 converging trenches carried
the molten metal down to the central well.

The day following that on which the works of the masonry and
boring had been completed, Barbicane set to work upon the
central mould.  His object now was to raise within the center of
the well, and with a coincident axis, a cylinder 900 feet high,
and nine feet in diameter, which should exactly fill up the
space reserved for the bore of the Columbiad.  This cylinder was
composed of a mixture of clay and sand, with the addition of a
little hay and straw.  The space left between the mould and the
masonry was intended to be filled up by the molten metal, which
would thus form the walls six feet in thickness.  This cylinder,
in order to maintain its equilibrium, had to be bound by iron
bands, and firmly fixed at certain intervals by cross-clamps
fastened into the stone lining; after the castings these would
be buried in the block of metal, leaving no external projection.

This operation was completed on the 8th of July, and the run of
the metal was fixed for the following day.

"This _fete_ of the casting will be a grand ceremony," said J.
T. Maston to his friend Barbicane.

"Undoubtedly," said Barbicane; "but it will not be a public _fete_"

"What! will you not open the gates of the enclosure to all comers?"

"I must be very careful, Maston.  The casting of the Columbiad
is an extremely delicate, not to say a dangerous operation, and
I should prefer its being done privately.  At the discharge of
the projectile, a _fete_ if you like-- till then, no!"

The president was right.  The operation involved unforeseen
dangers, which a great influx of spectators would have hindered
him from averting.  It was necessary to preserve complete
freedom of movement.  No one was admitted within the enclosure
except a delegation of members of the Gun Club, who had made the
voyage to Tampa Town.  Among these was the brisk Bilsby, Tom
Hunter, Colonel Blomsberry, Major Elphinstone, General Morgan,
and the rest of the lot to whom the casting of the Columbiad was
a matter of personal interest.  J. T. Maston became their cicerone.
He omitted no point of detail; he conducted them throughout the
magazines, workshops, through the midst of the engines, and
compelled them to visit the whole 1,200 furnaces one after
the other.  At the end of the twelve-hundredth visit they were
pretty well knocked up.

The casting was to take place at twelve o'clock precisely.
The previous evening each furnace had been charged with 114,000
pounds weight of metal in bars disposed cross-ways to each other,
so as to allow the hot air to circulate freely between them.
At daybreak the 1,200 chimneys vomited their torrents of flame
into the air, and the ground was agitated with dull tremblings.
As many pounds of metal as there were to cast, so many pounds of
coal were there to burn.  Thus there were 68,000 tons of coal
which projected in the face of the sun a thick curtain of smoke.
The heat soon became insupportable within the circle of furnaces,
the rumbling of which resembled the rolling of thunder.  The powerful
ventilators added their continuous blasts and saturated with
oxygen the glowing plates.  The operation, to be successful,
required to be conducted with great rapidity.  On a signal given
by a cannon-shot each furnace was to give vent to the molten
iron and completely to empty itself.  These arrangements made,
foremen and workmen waited the preconcerted moment with an
impatience mingled with a certain amount of emotion.  Not a soul
remained within the enclosure.  Each superintendent took his
post by the aperture of the run.

Barbicane and his colleagues, perched on a neighboring eminence,
assisted at the operation.  In front of them was a piece of
artillery ready to give fire on the signal from the engineer.
Some minutes before midday the first driblets of metal began to
flow; the reservoirs filled little by little; and, by the time
that the whole melting was completely accomplished, it was kept
in abeyance for a few minutes in order to facilitate the
separation of foreign substances.

Twelve o'clock struck!  A gunshot suddenly pealed forth and shot
its flame into the air.  Twelve hundred melting-troughs were
simultaneously opened and twelve hundred fiery serpents crept
toward the central well, unrolling their incandescent curves.
There, down they plunged with a terrific noise into a depth of
900 feet.  It was an exciting and a magnificent spectacle.
The ground trembled, while these molten waves, launching into the
sky their wreaths of smoke, evaporated the moisture of the mould
and hurled it upward through the vent-holes of the stone lining
in the form of dense vapor-clouds.  These artificial clouds
unrolled their thick spirals to a height of 1,000 yards into
the air.  A savage, wandering somewhere beyond the limits of the
horizon, might have believed that some new crater was forming in
the bosom of Florida, although there was neither any eruption,
nor typhoon, nor storm, nor struggle of the elements, nor any of
those terrible phenomena which nature is capable of producing.
No, it was man alone who had produced these reddish vapors,
these gigantic flames worthy of a volcano itself, these
tremendous vibrations resembling the shock of an earthquake,
these reverberations rivaling those of hurricanes and storms;
and it was his hand which precipitated into an abyss, dug by
himself, a whole Niagara of molten metal!




CHAPTER XVI


THE COLUMBIAD


Had the casting succeeded?  They were reduced to mere conjecture.
There was indeed every reason to expect success, since the mould
has absorbed the entire mass of the molten metal; still some
considerable time must elapse before they could arrive at any
certainty upon the matter.

The patience of the members of the Gun Club was sorely tried during
this period of time.  But they could do nothing.  J. T. Maston
escaped roasting by a miracle.  Fifteen days after the casting
an immense column of smoke was still rising in the open sky and
the ground burned the soles of the feet within a radius of two
hundred feet round the summit of Stones Hill.  It was impossible
to approach nearer.  All they could do was to wait with what
patience they might.

"Here we are at the 10th of August," exclaimed J. T. Maston one
morning, "only four months to the 1st of December!  We shall
never be ready in time!"  Barbicane said nothing, but his
silence covered serious irritation.

However, daily observations revealed a certain change going on
in the state of the ground.  About the 15th of August the vapors
ejected had sensibly diminished in intensity and thickness.
Some days afterward the earth exhaled only a slight puff of
smoke, the last breath of the monster enclosed within its circle
of stone.  Little by little the belt of heat contracted, until
on the 22nd of August, Barbicane, his colleagues, and the
engineer were enabled to set foot on the iron sheet which lay
level upon the summit of Stones Hill.

"At last!" exclaimed the president of the Gun Club, with an
immense sigh of relief.

The work was resumed the same day.  They proceeded at once to
extract the interior mould, for the purpose of clearing out the
boring of the piece.  Pickaxes and boring irons were set to work
without intermission.  The clayey and sandy soils had acquired
extreme hardness under the action of the heat; but, by the aid
of the machines, the rubbish on being dug out was rapidly carted
away on railway wagons; and such was the ardor of the work, so
persuasive the arguments of Barbicane's dollars, that by the 3rd
of September all traces of the mould had entirely disappeared.

Immediately the operation of boring was commenced; and by the
aid of powerful machines, a few weeks later, the inner surface
of the immense tube had been rendered perfectly cylindrical, and
the bore of the piece had acquired a thorough polish.

At length, on the 22d of September, less than a twelvemonth
after Barbicane's original proposition, the enormous weapon,
accurately bored, and exactly vertically pointed, was ready
for work.  There was only the moon now to wait for; and they
were pretty sure that she would not fail in the rendezvous.

The ecstasy of J. T. Maston knew no bounds, and he narrowly
escaped a frightful fall while staring down the tube.  But for
the strong hand of Colonel Blomsberry, the worthy secretary,
like a modern Erostratus, would have found his death in the
depths of the Columbiad.

The cannon was then finished; there was no possible doubt as to
its perfect completion.  So, on the 6th of October, Captain
Nicholl opened an account between himself and President Barbicane,
in which he debited himself to the latter in the sum of two
thousand dollars.  One may believe that the captain's wrath was
increased to its highest point, and must have made him seriously ill.
However, he had still three bets of three, four, and five
thousand dollars, respectively; and if he gained two out of these,
his position would not be very bad.  But the money question did
not enter into his calculations; it was the success of his rival
in casting a cannon against which iron plates sixty feet thick
would have been ineffectual, that dealt him a terrible blow.

After the 23rd of September the enclosure of Stones hill was
thrown open to the public; and it will be easily imagined what
was the concourse of visitors to this spot!  There was an
incessant flow of people to and from Tampa Town and the place,
which resembled a procession, or rather, in fact, a pilgrimage.

It was already clear to be seen that, on the day of the
experiment itself, the aggregate of spectators would be counted
by millions; for they were already arriving from all parts of
the earth upon this narrow strip of promontory.  Europe was
emigrating to America.

Up to that time, however, it must be confessed, the curiosity
of the numerous comers was but scantily gratified.  Most had
counted upon witnessing the spectacle of the casting, and they
were treated to nothing but smoke.  This was sorry food for
hungry eyes; but Barbicane would admit no one to that operation.
Then ensued grumbling, discontent, murmurs; they blamed the
president, taxed him with dictatorial conduct.  His proceedings
were declared "un-American."  There was very nearly a riot round
Stones Hill; but Barbicane remained inflexible.  When, however,
the Columbiad was entirely finished, this state of closed doors
could no longer be maintained; besides it would have been bad
taste, and even imprudence, to affront the public feeling.
Barbicane, therefore, opened the enclosure to all comers; but,
true to his practical disposition, he determined to coin money
out of the public curiosity.

It was something, indeed, to be enabled to contemplate this
immense Columbiad; but to descend into its depths, this seemed
to the Americans the _ne plus ultra_ of earthly felicity.
Consequently, there was not one curious spectator who was not
willing to give himself the treat of visiting the interior of
this great metallic abyss.  Baskets suspended from steam-cranes
permitted them to satisfy their curiosity.  There was a
perfect mania.  Women, children, old men, all made it a point
of duty to penetrate the mysteries of the colossal gun.
The fare for the descent was fixed at five dollars per head;
and despite this high charge, during the two months which
preceded the experiment, the influx of visitors enabled the
Gun Club to pocket nearly five hundred thousand dollars!

It is needless to say that the first visitors of the Columbiad
were the members of the Gun Club.  This privilege was justly
reserved for that illustrious body.  The ceremony took place on
the 25th of September.  A basket of honor took down the
president, J. T. Maston, Major Elphinstone, General Morgan,
Colonel Blomsberry, and other members of the club, to the number
of ten in all.  How hot it was at the bottom of that long tube
of metal!  They were half suffocated.  But what delight!
What ecstasy!  A table had been laid with six covers on the
massive stone which formed the bottom of the Columbiad, and
lighted by a jet of electric light resembling that of day itself.
Numerous exquisite dishes, which seemed to descend from heaven,
were placed successively before the guests, and the richest wines
of France flowed in profusion during this splendid repast, served
nine hundred feet beneath the surface of the earth!

The festival was animated, not to say somewhat noisy.  Toasts flew
backward and forward.  They drank to the earth and to her satellite,
to the Gun Club, the Union, the Moon, Diana, Phoebe, Selene, the
"peaceful courier of the night!"  All the hurrahs, carried upward
upon the sonorous waves of the immense acoustic tube, arrived with
the sound of thunder at its mouth; and the multitude ranged round
Stones Hill heartily united their shouts with those of the ten
revelers hidden from view at the bottom of the gigantic Columbiad.

J. T. Maston was no longer master of himself.  Whether he
shouted or gesticulated, ate or drank most, would be a difficult
matter to determine.  At all events, he would not have given his
place up for an empire, "not even if the cannon-- loaded,
primed, and fired at that very moment--were to blow him in
pieces into the planetary world."





CHAPTER XVII


A TELEGRAPHIC DISPATCH


The great works undertaken by the Gun Club had now virtually
come to an end; and two months still remained before the day for
the discharge of the shot to the moon.  To the general impatience
these two months appeared as long as years!  Hitherto the smallest
details of the operation had been daily chronicled by the journals,
which the public devoured with eager eyes.

Just at this moment a circumstance, the most unexpected, the
most extraordinary and incredible, occurred to rouse afresh
their panting spirits, and to throw every mind into a state of
the most violent excitement.

One day, the 30th of September, at 3:47 P.M., a telegram,
transmitted by cable from Valentia (Ireland) to Newfoundland and
the American Mainland, arrived at the address of President Barbicane.

The president tore open the envelope, read the dispatch, and,
despite his remarkable powers of self-control, his lips turned
pale and his eyes grew dim, on reading the twenty words of
this telegram.

Here is the text of the dispatch, which figures now in the
archives of the Gun Club:

                                FRANCE, PARIS,
                                    30 September, 4 A.M.
            Barbicane, Tampa Town, Florida, United States.

Substitute for your spherical shell a cylindro-conical projectile.
I shall go inside.  Shall arrive by steamer Atlanta.
                                                   MICHEL ARDAN.




CHAPTER XVIII


THE PASSENGER OF THE ATLANTA



If this astounding news, instead of flying through the electric
wires, had simply arrived by post in the ordinary sealed envelope,
Barbicane would not have hesitated a moment.  He would have held
his tongue about it, both as a measure of prudence, and in order
not to have to reconsider his plans.  This telegram might be a
cover for some jest, especially as it came from a Frenchman.
What human being would ever have conceived the idea of such
a journey? and, if such a person really existed, he must be an
idiot, whom one would shut up in a lunatic ward, rather than
within the walls of the projectile.

The contents of the dispatch, however, speedily became known;
for the telegraphic officials possessed but little discretion,
and Michel Ardan's proposition ran at once throughout the
several States of the Union.  Barbicane, had, therefore, no
further motives for keeping silence.  Consequently, he called
together such of his colleagues as were at the moment in Tampa
Town, and without any expression of his own opinions simply read
to them the laconic text itself.  It was received with every
possible variety of expressions of doubt, incredulity, and
derision from every one, with the exception of J. T. Maston, who
exclaimed, "It is a grand idea, however!"

When Barbicane originally proposed to send a shot to the moon
every one looked upon the enterprise as simple and practicable
enough-- a mere question of gunnery; but when a person,
professing to be a reasonable being, offered to take passage
within the projectile, the whole thing became a farce, or, in
plainer language a humbug.

One question, however, remained.  Did such a being exist?
This telegram flashed across the depths of the Atlantic, the
designation of the vessel on board which he was to take his
passage, the date assigned for his speedy arrival, all combined
to impart a certain character of reality to the proposal.
They must get some clearer notion of the matter.  Scattered groups
of inquirers at length condensed themselves into a compact crowd,
which made straight for the residence of President Barbicane.
That worthy individual was keeping quiet with the intention of
watching events as they arose.  But he had forgotten to take
into account the public impatience; and it was with no pleasant
countenance that he watched the population of Tampa Town
gathering under his windows.  The murmurs and vociferations
below presently obliged him to appear.  He came forward,
therefore, and on silence being procured, a citizen put
point-blank to him the following question:  "Is the person
mentioned in the telegram, under the name of Michel Ardan, on
his way here?  Yes or no."

"Gentlemen," replied Barbicane, "I know no more than you do."

"We must know," roared the impatient voices.

"Time will show," calmly replied the president.

"Time has no business to keep a whole country in suspense,"
replied the orator.  "Have you altered the plans of the
projectile according to the request of the telegram?"

"Not yet, gentlemen; but you are right! we must have better
information to go by.  The telegraph must complete its information."

"To the telegraph!" roared the crowd.

Barbicane descended; and heading the immense assemblage, led the
way to the telegraph office.  A few minutes later a telegram was
dispatched to the secretary of the underwriters at Liverpool,
requesting answers to the following queries:

"About the ship Atlanta-- when did she leave Europe?  Had she on
board a Frenchman named Michel Ardan?"

Two hours afterward Barbicane received information too exact to
leave room for the smallest remaining doubt.

"The steamer Atlanta from Liverpool put to sea on the 2nd of
October, bound for Tampa Town, having on board a Frenchman borne
on the list of passengers by the name of Michel Ardan."

That very evening he wrote to the house of Breadwill and Co.,
requesting them to suspend the casting of the projectile until
the receipt of further orders.  On the 10th of October, at nine
A.M., the semaphores of the Bahama Canal signaled a thick smoke
on the horizon.  Two hours later a large steamer exchanged
signals with them.  the name of the Atlanta flew at once over
Tampa Town.  At four o'clock the English vessel entered the Bay
of Espiritu Santo.  At five it crossed the passage of
Hillisborough Bay at full steam.  At six she cast anchor at
Port Tampa.  The anchor had scarcely caught the sandy bottom when
five hundred boats surrounded the Atlanta, and the steamer was
taken by assault.  Barbicane was the first to set foot on deck,
and in a voice of which he vainly tried to conceal the emotion,
called "Michel Ardan."

"Here!" replied an individual perched on the poop.

Barbicane, with arms crossed, looked fixedly at the passenger of
the Atlanta.

He was a man of about forty-two years of age, of large build,
but slightly round-shouldered.  His massive head momentarily
shook a shock of reddish hair, which resembled a lion's mane.
His face was short with a broad forehead, and furnished with a
moustache as bristly as a cat's, and little patches of yellowish
whiskers upon full cheeks.  Round, wildish eyes, slightly
near-sighted, completed a physiognomy essentially feline.
His nose was firmly shaped, his mouth particularly sweet in
expression, high forehead, intelligent and furrowed with
wrinkles like a newly-plowed field.  The body was powerfully
developed and firmly fixed upon long legs.  Muscular arms,
and a general air of decision gave him the appearance of a hardy,
jolly, companion.  He was dressed in a suit of ample dimensions,
loose neckerchief, open shirtcollar, disclosing a robust neck;
his cuffs were invariably unbuttoned, through which appeared
a pair of red hands.

On the bridge of the steamer, in the midst of the crowd, he
bustled to and fro, never still for a moment, "dragging his
anchors," as the sailors say, gesticulating, making free with
everybody, biting his nails with nervous avidity.  He was one of
those originals which nature sometimes invents in the freak of
a moment, and of which she then breaks the mould.

Among other peculiarities, this curiosity gave himself out for
a sublime ignoramus, "like Shakespeare," and professed supreme
contempt for all scientific men.  Those "fellows," as he called
them, "are only fit to mark the points, while we play the game."
He was, in fact, a thorough Bohemian, adventurous, but not an
adventurer; a hare-brained fellow, a kind of Icarus, only
possessing relays of wings.  For the rest, he was ever in
scrapes, ending invariably by falling on his feet, like those
little figures which they sell for children's toys.  In a few
words, his motto was "I have my opinions," and the love of the
impossible constituted his ruling passion.

Such was the passenger of the Atlanta, always excitable, as if
boiling under the action of some internal fire by the character
of his physical organization.  If ever two individuals offered
a striking contrast to each other, these were certainly Michel
Ardan and the Yankee Barbicane; both, moreover, being equally
enterprising and daring, each in his own way.

The scrutiny which the president of the Gun Club had instituted
regarding this new rival was quickly interrupted by the shouts
and hurrahs of the crowd.  The cries became at last so
uproarious, and the popular enthusiasm assumed so personal a
form, that Michel Ardan, after having shaken hands some
thousands of times, at the imminent risk of leaving his fingers
behind him, was fain at last to make a bolt for his cabin.

Barbicane followed him without uttering a word.

"You are Barbicane, I suppose?" said Michel Ardan, in a tone
of voice in which he would have addressed a friend of twenty
years' standing.

"Yes," replied the president of the Gun Club.

"All right! how d'ye do, Barbicane? how are you getting on--
pretty well? that's right."

"So," said Barbicane without further preliminary, "you are quite
determined to go."

"Quite decided."

"Nothing will stop you?"

"Nothing.  Have you modified your projectile according to my telegram."

"I waited for your arrival.  But," asked Barbicane again, "have
you carefully reflected?"

"Reflected? have I any time to spare?  I find an opportunity of
making a tour in the moon, and I mean to profit by it.  There is
the whole gist of the matter."

Barbicane looked hard at this man who spoke so lightly of his
project with such complete absence of anxiety.  "But, at least,"
said he, "you have some plans, some means of carrying your
project into execution?"

"Excellent, my dear Barbicane; only permit me to offer one remark:
My wish is to tell my story once for all, to everybody, and then
have done with it; then there will be no need for recapitulation.
So, if you have no objection, assemble your friends, colleagues,
the whole town, all Florida, all America if you like, and
to-morrow I shall be ready to explain my plans and answer any
objections whatever that may be advanced.  You may rest assured
I shall wait without stirring.  Will that suit you?"

"All right," replied Barbicane.

So saying, the president left the cabin and informed the crowd of
the proposal of Michel Ardan.  His words were received with clappings
of hands and shouts of joy.  They had removed all difficulties.
To-morrow every one would contemplate at his ease this European hero.
However, some of the spectators, more infatuated than the rest,
would not leave the deck of the Atlanta.  They passed the night
on board.  Among others J. T. Maston got his hook fixed in the
combing of the poop, and it pretty nearly required the capstan to
get it out again.

"He is a hero! a hero!" he cried, a theme of which he was never
tired of ringing the changes; "and we are only like weak, silly
women, compared with this European!"

As to the president, after having suggested to the visitors it
was time to retire, he re-entered the passenger's cabin, and
remained there till the bell of the steamer made it midnight.

But then the two rivals in popularity shook hands heartily and
parted on terms of intimate friendship.





CHAPTER XIX


A MONSTER MEETING


On the following day Barbicane, fearing that indiscreet
questions might be put to Michel Ardan, was desirous of reducing
the number of the audience to a few of the initiated, his own
colleagues for instance.  He might as well have tried to
check the Falls of Niagara! he was compelled, therefore, to
give up the idea, and let his new friend run the chances of a
public conference.  The place chosen for this monster meeting
was a vast plain situated in the rear of the town.  In a few
hours, thanks to the help of the shipping in port, an immense
roofing of canvas was stretched over the parched prairie, and
protected it from the burning rays of the sun.  There three
hundred thousand people braved for many hours the stifling heat
while awaiting the arrival of the Frenchman.  Of this crowd of
spectators a first set could both see and hear; a second set saw
badly and heard nothing at all; and as for the third, it could
neither see nor hear anything at all.  At three o'clock Michel
Ardan made his appearance, accompanied by the principal members
of the Gun Club.  He was supported on his right by President
Barbicane, and on his left by J. T. Maston, more radiant than
the midday sun, and nearly as ruddy.  Ardan mounted a platform,
from the top of which his view extended over a sea of black hats.

He exhibited not the slightest embarrassment; he was just as
gay, familiar, and pleasant as if he were at home.  To the
hurrahs which greeted him he replied by a graceful bow; then,
waving his hands to request silence, he spoke in perfectly
correct English as follows:

"Gentlemen, despite the very hot weather I request your patience
for a short time while I offer some explanations regarding the
projects which seem to have so interested you.  I am neither an
orator nor a man of science, and I had no idea of addressing you
in public; but my friend Barbicane has told me that you would
like to hear me, and I am quite at your service.  Listen to me,
therefore, with your six hundred thousand ears, and please
excuse the faults of the speaker.  Now pray do not forget that
you see before you a perfect ignoramus whose ignorance goes so
far that he cannot even understand the difficulties!  It seemed
to him that it was a matter quite simple, natural, and easy
to take one's place in a projectile and start for the moon!
That journey must be undertaken sooner or later; and, as for the
mode of locomotion adopted, it follows simply the law of progress.
Man began by walking on all-fours; then, one fine day, on two
feet; then in a carriage; then in a stage-coach; and lastly
by railway.  Well, the projectile is the vehicle of the future,
and the planets themselves are nothing else!  Now some of you,
gentlemen, may imagine that the velocity we propose to impart to
it is extravagant.  It is nothing of the kind.  All the stars
exceed it in rapidity, and the earth herself is at this moment
carrying us round the sun at three times as rapid a rate, and
yet she is a mere lounger on the way compared with many others
of the planets!  And her velocity is constantly decreasing.
Is it not evident, then, I ask you, that there will some day appear
velocities far greater than these, of which light or electricity
will probably be the mechanical agent?

"Yes, gentlemen," continued the orator, "in spite of the
opinions of certain narrow-minded people, who would shut up the
human race upon this globe, as within some magic circle which it
must never outstep, we shall one day travel to the moon, the
planets, and the stars, with the same facility, rapidity, and
certainty as we now make the voyage from Liverpool to New York!
Distance is but a relative expression, and must end by being
reduced to zero."

The assembly, strongly predisposed as they were in favor of the
French hero, were slightly staggered at this bold theory.
Michel Ardan perceived the fact.

"Gentlemen," he continued with a pleasant smile, "you do not
seem quite convinced.  Very good!  Let us reason the matter out.
Do you know how long it would take for an express train to reach
the moon?  Three hundred days; no more!  And what is that?
The distance is no more than nine times the circumference of
the earth; and there are no sailors or travelers, of even
moderate activity, who have not made longer journeys than that
in their lifetime.  And now consider that I shall be only ninety-
seven hours on my journey.  Ah!  I see you are reckoning that the
moon is a long way off from the earth, and that one must think
twice before making the experiment.  What would you say, then,
if we were talking of going to Neptune, which revolves at a
distance of more than two thousand seven hundred and twenty
millions of miles from the sun!  And yet what is that compared
with the distance of the fixed stars, some of which, such as Arcturus,
are billions of miles distant from us?  And then you talk of the
distance which separates the planets from the sun!  And there
are people who affirm that such a thing as distance exists.
Absurdity, folly, idiotic nonsense!  Would you know what I think
of our own solar universe?  Shall I tell you my theory?  It is
very simple!  In my opinion the solar system is a solid
homogeneous body; the planets which compose it are in actual
contact with each other; and whatever space exists between them
is nothing more than the space which separates the molecules of
the densest metal, such as silver, iron, or platinum!  I have
the right, therefore, to affirm, and I repeat, with the
conviction which must penetrate all your minds, `Distance is
but an empty name; distance does not really exist!'"

"Hurrah!" cried one voice (need it be said it was that of
J. T. Maston).  "Distance does not exist!"  And overcome by the
energy of his movements, he nearly fell from the platform to
the ground.  He just escaped a severe fall, which would have
proved to him that distance was by no means an empty name.

"Gentlemen," resumed the orator, "I repeat that the distance
between the earth and her satellite is a mere trifle, and
undeserving of serious consideration.  I am convinced that
before twenty years are over one-half of our earth will have
paid a visit to the moon.  Now, my worthy friends, if you have
any question to put to me, you will, I fear, sadly embarrass a
poor man like myself; still I will do my best to answer you."

Up to this point the president of the Gun Club had been
satisfied with the turn which the discussion had assumed.
It became now, however, desirable to divert Ardan from
questions of a practical nature, with which he was doubtless
far less conversant.  Barbicane, therefore, hastened to get in
a word, and began by asking his new friend whether he thought
that the moon and the planets were inhabited.

"You put before me a great problem, my worthy president,"
replied the orator, smiling.  "Still, men of great intelligence,
such as Plutarch, Swedenborg, Bernardin de St. Pierre, and
others have, if I mistake not, pronounced in the affirmative.
Looking at the question from the natural philosopher's point of
view, I should say that nothing useless existed in the world;
and, replying to your question by another, I should venture to
assert, that if these worlds are habitable, they either are,
have been, or will be inhabited."

"No one could answer more logically or fairly," replied the
president.  "The question then reverts to this:  Are these
worlds habitable?  For my own part I believe they are."

"For myself, I feel certain of it," said Michel Ardan.

"Nevertheless," retorted one of the audience, "there are many
arguments against the habitability of the worlds.  The conditions
of life must evidently be greatly modified upon the majority
of them.  To mention only the planets, we should be either
broiled alive in some, or frozen to death in others, according
as they are more or less removed from the sun."

"I regret," replied Michel Ardan, "that I have not the honor of
personally knowing my contradictor, for I would have attempted
to answer him.  His objection has its merits, I admit; but I
think we may successfully combat it, as well as all others which
affect the habitability of other worlds.  If I were a natural
philosopher, I would tell him that if less of caloric were set
in motion upon the planets which are nearest to the sun, and
more, on the contrary, upon those which are farthest removed
from it, this simple fact would alone suffice to equalize the
heat, and to render the temperature of those worlds supportable
by beings organized like ourselves.  If I were a naturalist,
I would tell him that, according to some illustrious men of
science, nature has furnished us with instances upon the earth
of animals existing under very varying conditions of life;
that fish respire in a medium fatal to other animals; that
amphibious creatures possess a double existence very difficult
of explanation; that certain denizens of the seas maintain life
at enormous depths, and there support a pressure equal to that
of fifty or sixty atmospheres without being crushed; that
several aquatic insects, insensible to temperature, are met with
equally among boiling springs and in the frozen plains of the
Polar Sea; in fine, that we cannot help recognizing in nature a
diversity of means of operation oftentimes incomprehensible, but
not the less real.  If I were a chemist, I would tell him that
the aerolites, bodies evidently formed exteriorly of our
terrestrial globe, have, upon analysis, revealed indisputable
traces of carbon, a substance which owes its origin solely to
organized beings, and which, according to the experiments of
Reichenbach, must necessarily itself have been endued with
animation.  And lastly, were I a theologian, I would tell him
that the scheme of the Divine Redemption, according to St. Paul,
seems to be applicable, not merely to the earth, but to all the
celestial worlds.  But, unfortunately, I am neither theologian,
nor chemist, nor naturalist, nor philosopher; therefore, in my
absolute ignorance of the great laws which govern the universe,
I confine myself to saying in reply, `I do not know whether the
worlds are inhabited or not:  and since I do not know, I am going
to see!'"

Whether Michel Ardan's antagonist hazarded any further arguments
or not it is impossible to say, for the uproarious shouts of the
crowd would not allow any expression of opinion to gain a hearing.
On silence being restored, the triumphant orator contented himself
with adding the following remarks:

"Gentlemen, you will observe that I have but slightly touched
upon this great question.  There is another altogether different
line of argument in favor of the habitability of the stars,
which I omit for the present.  I only desire to call attention
to one point.  To those who maintain that the planets are _not_
inhabited one may reply:  You might be perfectly in the right,
if you could only show that the earth is the best possible
world, in spite of what Voltaire has said.  She has but _one_
satellite, while Jupiter, Uranus, Saturn, Neptune have each
several, an advantage by no means to be despised.  But that
which renders our own globe so uncomfortable is the inclination
of its axis to the plane of its orbit.  Hence the inequality of
days and nights; hence the disagreeable diversity of the seasons.
On the surface of our unhappy spheroid we are always either too
hot or too cold; we are frozen in winter, broiled in summer;
it is the planet of rheumatism, coughs, bronchitis; while on the
surface of Jupiter, for example, where the axis is but slightly
inclined, the inhabitants may enjoy uniform temperatures.
It possesses zones of perpetual springs, summers, autumns, and
winters; every Jovian may choose for himself what climate he
likes, and there spend the whole of his life in security from
all variations of temperature.  You will, I am sure, readily
admit this superiority of Jupiter over our own planet, to say
nothing of his years, which each equal twelve of ours!
Under such auspices and such marvelous conditions of existence,
it appears to me that the inhabitants of so fortunate a world
must be in every respect superior to ourselves.  All we require,
in order to attain such perfection, is the mere trifle of having
an axis of rotation less inclined to the plane of its orbit!"

"Hurrah!" roared an energetic voice, "let us unite our efforts,
invent the necessary machines, and rectify the earth's axis!"

A thunder of applause followed this proposal, the author of
which was, of course, no other than J. T. Maston.  And, in all
probability, if the truth must be told, if the Yankees could
only have found a point of application for it, they would have
constructed a lever capable of raising the earth and rectifying
its axis.  It was just this deficiency which baffled these
daring mechanicians.





CHAPTER XX


ATTACK AND RIPOSTE


As soon as the excitement had subsided, the following words were
heard uttered in a strong and determined voice:

"Now that the speaker has favored us with so much imagination,
would he be so good as to return to his subject, and give us a
little practical view of the question?"

All eyes were directed toward the person who spoke.  He was a
little dried-up man, of an active figure, with an American
"goatee" beard.  Profiting by the different movements in the crowd,
he had managed by degrees to gain the front row of spectators.
There, with arms crossed and stern gaze, he watched the hero of
the meeting.  After having put his question he remained silent,
and appeared to take no notice of the thousands of looks directed
toward himself, nor of the murmur of disapprobation excited by
his words.  Meeting at first with no reply, he repeated his
question with marked emphasis, adding, "We are here to talk about
the _moon_ and not about the _earth_."

"You are right, sir," replied Michel Ardan; "the discussion has
become irregular.  We will return to the moon."

"Sir," said the unknown, "you pretend that our satellite is inhabited.
Very good, but if Selenites do exist, that race of beings assuredly
must live without breathing, for-- I warn you for your own sake--
there is not the smallest particle of air on the surface of the moon."

At this remark Ardan pushed up his shock of red hair; he saw
that he was on the point of being involved in a struggle with
this person upon the very gist of the whole question.  He looked
sternly at him in his turn and said:

"Oh! so there is no air in the moon?  And pray, if you are so
good, who ventures to affirm that?

"The men of science."

"Really?"

"Really."

"Sir," replied Michel, "pleasantry apart, I have a profound
respect for men of science who do possess science, but a
profound contempt for men of science who do not."

"Do you know any who belong to the latter category?"

"Decidedly.  In France there are some who maintain that,
mathematically, a bird cannot possibly fly; and others who
demonstrate theoretically that fishes were never made to
live in water."

"I have nothing to do with persons of that description, and I
can quote, in support of my statement, names which you cannot
refuse deference to."

"Then, sir, you will sadly embarrass a poor ignorant, who,
besides, asks nothing better than to learn."

"Why, then, do you introduce scientific questions if you have
never studied them?" asked the unknown somewhat coarsely.

"For the reason that `he is always brave who never suspects danger.'
I know nothing, it is true; but it is precisely my very weakness
which constitutes my strength."

"Your weakness amounts to folly," retorted the unknown in a passion.

"All the better," replied our Frenchman, "if it carries me up to
the moon."

Barbicane and his colleagues devoured with their eyes the intruder
who had so boldly placed himself in antagonism to their enterprise.
Nobody knew him, and the president, uneasy as to the result of so
free a discussion, watched his new friend with some anxiety.
The meeting began to be somewhat fidgety also, for the contest
directed their attention to the dangers, if not the actual
impossibilities, of the proposed expedition.

"Sir," replied Ardan's antagonist, "there are many and
incontrovertible reasons which prove the absence of an
atmosphere in the moon.  I might say that, _a priori_, if one
ever did exist, it must have been absorbed by the earth; but I
prefer to bring forward indisputable facts."

"Bring them forward then, sir, as many as you please."

"You know," said the stranger, "that when any luminous rays
cross a medium such as the air, they are deflected out of the
straight line; in other words, they undergo refraction.  Well!
When stars are occulted by the moon, their rays, on grazing the
edge of her disc, exhibit not the least deviation, nor offer the
slightest indication of refraction.  It follows, therefore, that
the moon cannot be surrounded by an atmosphere.

"In point of fact," replied Ardan, "this is your chief, if not
your _only_ argument; and a really scientific man might be
puzzled to answer it.  For myself, I will simply say that it is
defective, because it assumes that the angular diameter of the
moon has been completely determined, which is not the case.
But let us proceed.  Tell me, my dear sir, do you admit the
existence of volcanoes on the moon's surface?"

"Extinct, yes!  In activity, no!"

"These volcanoes, however, were at one time in a state of activity?"

"True, but, as they furnish themselves the oxygen necessary for
combustion, the mere fact of their eruption does not prove the
presence of an atmosphere."

"Proceed again, then; and let us set aside this class of
arguments in order to come to direct observations.  In 1715 the
astronomers Louville and Halley, watching the eclipse of the
3rd of May, remarked some very extraordinary scintillations.
These jets of light, rapid in nature, and of frequent recurrence,
they attributed to thunderstorms generated in the lunar atmosphere."

"In 1715," replied the unknown, "the astronomers Louville and
Halley mistook for lunar phenomena some which were purely
terrestrial, such as meteoric or other bodies which are
generated in our own atmosphere.  This was the scientific
explanation at the time of the facts; and that is my answer now."

"On again, then," replied Ardan; "Herschel, in 1787, observed a
great number of luminous points on the moon's surface, did he not?"

"Yes! but without offering any solution of them.  Herschel himself
never inferred from them the necessity of a lunar atmosphere.
And I may add that Baeer and Maedler, the two great authorities
upon the moon, are quite agreed as to the entire absence of air
on its surface."

A movement was here manifest among the assemblage, who appeared
to be growing excited by the arguments of this singular personage.

"Let us proceed," replied Ardan, with perfect coolness, "and
come to one important fact.  A skillful French astronomer, M.
Laussedat, in watching the eclipse of July 18, 1860, probed that
the horns of the lunar crescent were rounded and truncated.
Now, this appearance could only have been produced by a
deviation of the solar rays in traversing the atmosphere of
the moon.  There is no other possible explanation of the facts."

"But is this established as a fact?"

"Absolutely certain!"

A counter-movement here took place in favor of the hero of the
meeting, whose opponent was now reduced to silence.  Ardan resumed
the conversation; and without exhibiting any exultation at the
advantage he had gained, simply said:

"You see, then, my dear sir, we must not pronounce with absolute
positiveness against the existence of an atmosphere in the moon.
That atmosphere is, probably, of extreme rarity; nevertheless at
the present day science generally admits that it exists."

"Not in the mountains, at all events," returned the unknown,
unwilling to give in.

"No! but at the bottom of the valleys, and not exceeding a few
hundred feet in height."

"In any case you will do well to take every precaution, for the
air will be terribly rarified."

"My good sir, there will always be enough for a solitary
individual; besides, once arrived up there, I shall do my best
to economize, and not to breathe except on grand occasions!"

A tremendous roar of laughter rang in the ears of the mysterious
interlocutor, who glared fiercely round upon the assembly.

"Then," continued Ardan, with a careless air, "since we are in
accord regarding the presence of a certain atmosphere, we are
forced to admit the presence of a certain quantity of water.
This is a happy consequence for me.  Moreover, my amiable
contradictor, permit me to submit to you one further observation.
We only know _one_ side of the moon's disc; and if there is but
little air on the face presented to us, it is possible that there
is plenty on the one turned away from us."

"And for what reason?"

"Because the moon, under the action of the earth's attraction,
has assumed the form of an egg, which we look at from the
smaller end.  Hence it follows, by Hausen's calculations, that
its center of gravity is situated in the other hemisphere.
Hence it results that the great mass of air and water must have
been drawn away to the other face of our satellite during the
first days of its creation."

"Pure fancies!" cried the unknown.

"No!  Pure theories! which are based upon the laws of mechanics,
and it seems difficult to me to refute them.  I appeal then to
this meeting, and I put it to them whether life, such as exists
upon the earth, is possible on the surface of the moon?"

Three hundred thousand auditors at once applauded the proposition.
Ardan's opponent tried to get in another word, but he could not
obtain a hearing.  Cries and menaces fell upon him like hail.

"Enough! enough!" cried some.

"Drive the intruder off!" shouted others.

"Turn him out!" roared the exasperated crowd.

But he, holding firmly on to the platform, did not budge an
inch, and let the storm pass on, which would soon have assumed
formidable proportions, if Michel Ardan had not quieted it by
a gesture.  He was too chivalrous to abandon his opponent in an
apparent extremity.

"You wished to say a few more words?" he asked, in a pleasant voice.

"Yes, a thousand; or rather, no, only one!  If you persevere in
your enterprise, you must be a----"

"Very rash person!  How can you treat me as such? me, who have
demanded a cylindro-conical projectile, in order to prevent
turning round and round on my way like a squirrel?"

"But, unhappy man, the dreadful recoil will smash you to pieces
at your starting."

"My dear contradictor, you have just put your finger upon the
true and only difficulty; nevertheless, I have too good an
opinion of the industrial genius of the Americans not to believe
that they will succeed in overcoming it."

"But the heat developed by the rapidity of the projectile in
crossing the strata of air?"

"Oh! the walls are thick, and I shall soon have crossed
the atmosphere."

"But victuals and water?"

"I have calculated for a twelvemonth's supply, and I shall be
only four days on the journey."

"But for air to breathe on the road?"

"I shall make it by a chemical process."

"But your fall on the moon, supposing you ever reach it?"

"It will be six times less dangerous than a sudden fall upon the
earth, because the weight will be only one-sixth as great on the
surface of the moon."

"Still it will be enough to smash you like glass!"

"What is to prevent my retarding the shock by means of rockets
conveniently placed, and lighted at the right moment?"

"But after all, supposing all difficulties surmounted, all
obstacles removed, supposing everything combined to favor you,
and granting that you may arrive safe and sound in the moon, how
will you come back?"

"I am not coming back!"

At this reply, almost sublime in its very simplicity, the
assembly became silent.  But its silence was more eloquent than
could have been its cries of enthusiasm.  The unknown profited
by the opportunity and once more protested:

"You will inevitably kill yourself!" he cried; "and your death
will be that of a madman, useless even to science!"

"Go on, my dear unknown, for truly your prophecies are most agreeable!"

"It really is too much!" cried Michel Ardan's adversary.  "I do
not know why I should continue so frivolous a discussion!
Please yourself about this insane expedition!  We need not
trouble ourselves about you!"

"Pray don't stand upon ceremony!"

"No! another person is responsible for your act."

"Who, may I ask?" demanded Michel Ardan in an imperious tone.

"The ignoramus who organized this equally absurd and
impossible experiment!"

The attack was direct.  Barbicane, ever since the interference
of the unknown, had been making fearful efforts of self-control;
now, however, seeing himself directly attacked, he could
restrain himself no longer.  He rose suddenly, and was rushing
upon the enemy who thus braved him to the face, when all at once
he found himself separated from him.

The platform was lifted by a hundred strong arms, and the president
of the Gun Club shared with Michel Ardan triumphal honors.
The shield was heavy, but the bearers came in continuous relays,
disputing, struggling, even fighting among themselves in their
eagerness to lend their shoulders to this demonstration.

However, the unknown had not profited by the tumult to quit
his post.  Besides he could not have done it in the midst of that
compact crowd.  There he held on in the front row with crossed
arms, glaring at President Barbicane.

The shouts of the immense crowd continued at their highest pitch
throughout this triumphant march.  Michel Ardan took it all with
evident pleasure.  His face gleamed with delight.  Several times
the platform seemed seized with pitching and rolling like a
weatherbeaten ship.  But the two heros of the meeting had good
sea-legs.  They never stumbled; and their vessel arrived without
dues at the port of Tampa Town.

Michel Ardan managed fortunately to escape from the last
embraces of his vigorous admirers.  He made for the Hotel
Franklin, quickly gained his chamber, and slid under the
bedclothes, while an army of a hundred thousand men kept watch
under his windows.

During this time a scene, short, grave, and decisive, took place
between the mysterious personage and the president of the Gun Club.

Barbicane, free at last, had gone straight at his adversary.

"Come!" he said shortly.

The other followed him on the quay; and the two presently found
themselves alone at the entrance of an open wharf on Jones' Fall.

The two enemies, still mutually unknown, gazed at each other.

"Who are you?" asked Barbicane.

"Captain Nicholl!"

"So I suspected.  Hitherto chance has never thrown you in my way."

"I am come for that purpose."

"You have insulted me."

"Publicly!"

"And you will answer to me for this insult?"

"At this very moment."

"No!  I desire that all that passes between us shall be secret.
Their is a wood situated three miles from Tampa, the wood
of Skersnaw.  Do you know it?"

"I know it."

"Will you be so good as to enter it to-morrow morning at five
o'clock, on one side?"

"Yes! if you will enter at the other side at the same hour."

"And you will not forget your rifle?" said Barbicane.

"No more than you will forget yours?" replied Nicholl.

These words having been coldly spoken, the president of the Gun
Club and the captain parted.  Barbicane returned to his lodging;
but instead of snatching a few hours of repose, he passed the
night in endeavoring to discover a means of evading the recoil
of the projectile, and resolving the difficult problem proposed
by Michel Ardan during the discussion at the meeting.





CHAPTER XXI


HOW A FRENCHMAN MANAGES AN AFFAIR


While the contract of this duel was being discussed by the
president and the captain-- this dreadful, savage duel, in which
each adversary became a man-hunter-- Michel Ardan was resting
from the fatigues of his triumph.  Resting is hardly an
appropriate expression, for American beds rival marble or
granite tables for hardness.

Ardan was sleeping, then, badly enough, tossing about between
the cloths which served him for sheets, and he was dreaming of
making a more comfortable couch in his projectile when a
frightful noise disturbed his dreams.  Thundering blows shook
his door.  They seemed to be caused by some iron instrument.
A great deal of loud talking was distinguishable in this racket,
which was rather too early in the morning.  "Open the door,"
some one shrieked, "for heaven's sake!"  Ardan saw no reason
for complying with a demand so roughly expressed.  However, he
got up and opened the door just as it was giving way before the
blows of this determined visitor.  The secretary of the Gun Club
burst into the room.  A bomb could not have made more noise or
have entered the room with less ceremony.

"Last night," cried J. T. Maston, _ex abrupto_, "our president
was publicly insulted during the meeting.  He provoked his
adversary, who is none other than Captain Nicholl!  They are
fighting this morning in the wood of Skersnaw.  I heard all the
particulars from the mouth of Barbicane himself.  If he is
killed, then our scheme is at an end.  We must prevent his duel;
and one man alone has enough influence over Barbicane to stop
him, and that man is Michel Ardan."

While J. T. Maston was speaking, Michel Ardan, without
interrupting him, had hastily put on his clothes; and, in less
than two minutes, the two friends were making for the suburbs of
Tampa Town with rapid strides.

It was during this walk that Maston told Ardan the state of the
case.  He told him the real causes of the hostility between
Barbicane and Nicholl; how it was of old date, and why, thanks
to unknown friends, the president and the captain had, as yet,
never met face to face.  He added that it arose simply from
a rivalry between iron plates and shot, and, finally, that the
scene at the meeting was only the long-wished-for opportunity
for Nicholl to pay off an old grudge.

Nothing is more dreadful than private duels in America.  The two
adversaries attack each other like wild beasts.  Then it is that
they might well covet those wonderful properties of the Indians
of the prairies-- their quick intelligence, their ingenious
cunning, their scent of the enemy.  A single mistake, a moment's
hesitation, a single false step may cause death.  On these
occasions Yankees are often accompanied by their dogs, and keep
up the struggle for hours.

"What demons you are!" cried Michel Ardan, when his companion
had depicted this scene to him with much energy.

"Yes, we are," replied J. T. modestly; "but we had better make haste."

Though Michel Ardan and he had crossed the plains still wet with
dew, and had taken the shortest route over creeks and ricefields,
they could not reach Skersnaw in under five hours and a half.

Barbicane must have passed the border half an hour ago.

There was an old bushman working there, occupied in selling
fagots from trees that had been leveled by his axe.

Maston ran toward him, saying, "Have you seen a man go into the
wood, armed with a rifle?  Barbicane, the president, my best friend?"

The worthy secretary of the Gun Club thought that his president
must be known by all the world.  But the bushman did not seem to
understand him.

"A hunter?" said Ardan.

"A hunter?  Yes," replied the bushman.

"Long ago?"

"About an hour."

"Too late!" cried Maston.

"Have you heard any gunshots?" asked Ardan.

"No!"

"Not one?"

"Not one! that hunter did not look as if he knew how to hunt!"

"What is to be done?" said Maston.

"We must go into the wood, at the risk of getting a ball which
is not intended for us."

"Ah!" cried Maston, in a tone which could not be mistaken, "I would
rather have twenty balls in my own head than one in Barbicane's."

"Forward, then," said Ardan, pressing his companion's hand.

A few moments later the two friends had disappeared in the copse.
It was a dense thicket, in which rose huge cypresses, sycamores,
tulip-trees, olives, tamarinds, oaks, and magnolias.
These different trees had interwoven their branches into an
inextricable maze, through which the eye could not penetrate.
Michel Ardan and Maston walked side by side in silence through
the tall grass, cutting themselves a path through the strong
creepers, casting curious glances on the bushes, and momentarily
expecting to hear the sound of rifles.  As for the traces which
Barbicane ought to have left of his passage through the wood,
there was not a vestige of them visible: so they followed the
barely perceptible paths along which Indians had tracked some
enemy, and which the dense foliage darkly overshadowed.

After an hour spent in vain pursuit the two stopped in
intensified anxiety.

"It must be all over," said Maston, discouraged.  "A man like
Barbicane would not dodge with his enemy, or ensnare him, would
not even maneuver!  He is too open, too brave.  He has gone
straight ahead, right into the danger, and doubtless far enough
from the bushman for the wind to prevent his hearing the report
of the rifles."

"But surely," replied Michel Ardan, "since we entered the wood
we should have heard!"

"And what if we came too late?" cried Maston in tones of despair.

For once Ardan had no reply to make, he and Maston resuming
their walk in silence.  From time to time, indeed, they raised
great shouts, calling alternately Barbicane and Nicholl, neither
of whom, however, answered their cries.  Only the birds,
awakened by the sound, flew past them and disappeared among the
branches, while some frightened deer fled precipitately before them.

For another hour their search was continued.  The greater part
of the wood had been explored.  There was nothing to reveal the
presence of the combatants.  The information of the bushman was
after all doubtful, and Ardan was about to propose their
abandoning this useless pursuit, when all at once Maston stopped.

"Hush!" said he, "there is some one down there!"

"Some one?" repeated Michel Ardan.

"Yes; a man!  He seems motionless.  His rifle is not in his hands.
What can he be doing?"

"But can you recognize him?" asked Ardan, whose short sight was
of little use to him in such circumstances.

"Yes! yes!  He is turning toward us," answered Maston.

"And it is?"

"Captain Nicholl!"

"Nicholl?" cried Michel Ardan, feeling a terrible pang of grief.

"Nicholl unarmed!  He has, then, no longer any fear of his adversary!"

"Let us go to him," said Michel Ardan, "and find out the truth."

But he and his companion had barely taken fifty steps, when they
paused to examine the captain more attentively.  They expected
to find a bloodthirsty man, happy in his revenge.

On seeing him, they remained stupefied.

A net, composed of very fine meshes, hung between two enormous
tulip-trees, and in the midst of this snare, with its wings
entangled, was a poor little bird, uttering pitiful cries, while
it vainly struggled to escape.  The bird-catcher who had laid
this snare was no human being, but a venomous spider, peculiar
to that country, as large as a pigeon's egg, and armed with
enormous claws.  The hideous creature, instead of rushing on its
prey, had beaten a sudden retreat and taken refuge in the upper
branches of the tulip-tree, for a formidable enemy menaced
its stronghold.

Here, then, was Nicholl, his gun on the ground, forgetful
of danger, trying if possible to save the victim from its
cobweb prison.  At last it was accomplished, and the little
bird flew joyfully away and disappeared.

Nicholl lovingly watched its flight, when he heard these words
pronounced by a voice full of emotion:

"You are indeed a brave man."

He turned.  Michel Ardan was before him, repeating in a
different tone:

"And a kindhearted one!"

"Michel Ardan!" cried the captain.  "Why are you here?"

"To press your hand, Nicholl, and to prevent you from either
killing Barbicane or being killed by him."

"Barbicane!" returned the captain.  "I have been looking for him
for the last two hours in vain.  Where is he hiding?"

"Nicholl!" said Michel Ardan, "this is not courteous! we ought
always to treat an adversary with respect; rest assureed if
Barbicane is still alive we shall find him all the more easily;
because if he has not, like you, been amusing himself with
freeing oppressed birds, he must be looking for _you_.  When we
have found him, Michel Ardan tells you this, there will be no
duel between you."

"Between President Barbicane and myself," gravely replied
Nicholl, "there is a rivalry which the death of one of us----"

"Pooh, pooh!" said Ardan.  "Brave fellows like you indeed! you
shall not fight!"

"I will fight, sir!"

"No!"

"Captain," said J. T. Maston, with much feeling, "I am a friend
of the president's, his _alter ego_, his second self; if you
really must kill some one, _shoot me!_ it will do just as well!"

"Sir," Nicholl replied, seizing his rifle convulsively, "these
jokes----"

"Our friend Maston is not joking," replied Ardan.  "I fully
understand his idea of being killed himself in order to save
his friend.  But neither he nor Barbicane will fall before the balls
of Captain Nicholl.  Indeed I have so attractive a proposal to
make to the two rivals, that both will be eager to accept it."

"What is it?" asked Nicholl with manifest incredulity.

"Patience!" exclaimed Ardan.  "I can only reveal it in the
presence of Barbicane."

"Let us go in search of him then!" cried the captain.

The three men started off at once; the captain having discharged
his rifle threw it over his shoulder, and advanced in silence.
Another half hour passed, and the pursuit was still fruitless.
Maston was oppressed by sinister forebodings.  He looked fiercely
at Nicholl, asking himself whether the captain's vengeance had
already been satisfied, and the unfortunate Barbicane, shot, was
perhaps lying dead on some bloody track.  The same thought seemed
to occur to Ardan; and both were casting inquiring glances on
Nicholl, when suddenly Maston paused.

The motionless figure of a man leaning against a gigantic
catalpa twenty feet off appeared, half-veiled by the foliage.

"It is he!" said Maston.

Barbicane never moved.  Ardan looked at the captain, but he did
not wince.  Ardan went forward crying:

"Barbicane!  Barbicane!"

No answer!  Ardan rushed toward his friend; but in the act of
seizing his arms, he stopped short and uttered a cry of surprise.

Barbicane, pencil in hand, was tracing geometrical figures in a
memorandum book, while his unloaded rifle lay beside him on the ground.

Absorbed in his studies, Barbicane, in his turn forgetful of the
duel, had seen and heard nothing.

When Ardan took his hand, he looked up and stared at his visitor
in astonishment.

"Ah, it is you!" he cried at last.  "I have found it, my friend,
I have found it!"

"What?"

"My plan!"

"What plan?"

"The plan for countering the effect of the shock at the
departure of the projectile!"

"Indeed?" said Michel Ardan, looking at the captain out of the
corner of his eye.

"Yes! water! simply water, which will act as a spring-- ah!
Maston," cried Barbicane, "you here also?"

"Himself," replied Ardan; "and permit me to introduce to you at
the same time the worthy Captain Nicholl!"

"Nicholl!" cried Barbicane, who jumped up at once.  "Pardon me,
captain, I had quite forgotten-- I am ready!"

Michel Ardan interfered, without giving the two enemies time to
say anything more.

"Thank heaven!" said he.  "It is a happy thing that brave men
like you two did not meet sooner! we should now have been
mourning for one or other of you.  But, thanks to Providence,
which has interfered, there is now no further cause for alarm.
When one forgets one's anger in mechanics or in cobwebs, it is
a sign that the anger is not dangerous."

Michel Ardan then told the president how the captain had been
found occupied.

"I put it to you now," said he in conclusion, "are two such good
fellows as you are made on purpose to smash each other's skulls
with shot?"

There was in "the situation" somewhat of the ridiculous,
something quite unexpected; Michel Ardan saw this, and
determined to effect a reconciliation.

"My good friends," said he, with his most bewitching smile,
"this is nothing but a misunderstanding.  Nothing more! well! to
prove that it is all over between you, accept frankly the
proposal I am going to make to you."

"Make it," said Nicholl.

"Our friend Barbicane believes that his projectile will go
straight to the moon?"

"Yes, certainly," replied the president.

"And our friend Nicholl is persuaded it will fall back upon the earth?"

"I am certain of it," cried the captain.

"Good!" said Ardan.  "I cannot pretend to make you agree; but I
suggest this:  Go with me, and so see whether we are stopped on
our journey."

"What?" exclaimed J. T. Maston, stupefied.

The two rivals, on this sudden proposal, looked steadily at
each other.  Barbicane waited for the captain's answer.
Nicholl watched for the decision of the president.

"Well?" said Michel.  "There is now no fear of the shock!"

"Done!" cried Barbicane.

But quickly as he pronounced the word, he was not before Nicholl.

"Hurrah! bravo! hip! hip! hurrah!" cried Michel, giving a hand
to each of the late adversaries.  "Now that it is all settled,
my friends, allow me to treat you after French fashion.  Let us
be off to breakfast!"





CHAPTER XXII


THE NEW CITIZEN OF THE UNITED STATES


That same day all America heard of the affair of Captain Nicholl
and President Barbicane, as well as its singular _denouement_.
From that day forth, Michel Ardan had not one moment's rest.
Deputations from all corners of the Union harassed him without
cessation or intermission.  He was compelled to receive them
all, whether he would or no.  How many hands he shook, how many
people he was "hail-fellow-well-met" with, it is impossible
to guess!  Such a triumphal result would have intoxicated any
other man; but he managed to keep himself in a state of delightful
_semi_-tipsiness.

Among the deputations of all kinds which assailed him, that of
"The Lunatics" were careful not to forget what they owed to the
future conqueror of the moon.  One day, certain of these poor
people, so numerous in America, came to call upon him, and
requested permission to return with him to their native country.

"Singular hallucination!" said he to Barbicane, after having
dismissed the deputation with promises to convey numbers of
messages to friends in the moon.  "Do you believe in the
influence of the moon upon distempers?"

"Scarcely!"

"No more do I, despite some remarkable recorded facts of history.
For instance, during an epidemic in 1693, a large number of
persons died at the very moment of an eclipse.  The celebrated
Bacon always fainted during an eclipse.  Charles VI relapsed
six times into madness during the year 1399, sometimes during
the new, sometimes during the full moon.  Gall observed that
insane persons underwent an accession of their disorder twice
in every month, at the epochs of new and full moon.  In fact,
numerous observations made upon fevers, somnambulisms, and other
human maladies, seem to prove that the moon does exercise some
mysterious influence upon man."

"But the how and the wherefore?" asked Barbicane.

"Well, I can only give you the answer which Arago borrowed from
Plutarch, which is nineteen centuries old.  `Perhaps the stories
are not true!'"

In the height of his triumph, Michel Ardan had to encounter all
the annoyances incidental to a man of celebrity.  Managers of
entertainments wanted to exhibit him.  Barnum offered him a
million dollars to make a tour of the United States in his show.
As for his photographs, they were sold of all size, and his
portrait taken in every imaginable posture.  More than half a
million copies were disposed of in an incredibly short space of time.

But it was not only the men who paid him homage, but the women
as well.  He might have married well a hundred times over, if he
had been willing to settle in life.  The old maids, in
particular, of forty years and upward, and dry in proportion,
devoured his photographs day and night.  They would have married
him by hundreds, even if he had imposed upon them the condition
of accompanying him into space.  He had, however, no intention
of transplanting a race of Franco-Americans upon the surface of
the moon.

He therefore declined all offers.

As soon as he could withdraw from these somewhat embarrassing
demonstrations, he went, accompanied by his friends, to pay a
visit to the Columbiad.  He was highly gratified by his
inspection, and made the descent to the bottom of the tube of
this gigantic machine which was presently to launch him to the
regions of the moon.  It is necessary here to mention a proposal
of J. T. Maston's.  When the secretary of the Gun Club found
that Barbicane and Nicholl accepted the proposal of Michel
Ardan, he determined to join them, and make one of a smug party
of four.  So one day he determined to be admitted as one of the
travelers.  Barbicane, pained at having to refuse him, gave him
clearly to understand that the projectile could not possibly
contain so many passengers.  Maston, in despair, went in search
of Michel Ardan, who counseled him to resign himself to the
situation, adding one or two arguments _ad hominem_.

"You see, old fellow," he said, "you must not take what I say in
bad part; but really, between ourselves, you are in too
incomplete a condition to appear in the moon!"

"Incomplete?" shrieked the valiant invalid.

"Yes, my dear fellow! imagine our meeting some of the
inhabitants up there!  Would you like to give them such a
melancholy notion of what goes on down here? to teach them what
war is, to inform them that we employ our time chiefly in
devouring each other, in smashing arms and legs, and that too
on a globe which is capable of supporting a hundred billions
of inhabitants, and which actually does contain nearly two
hundred millions?  Why, my worthy friend, we should have to
turn you out of doors!"

"But still, if you arrive there in pieces, you will be as
incomplete as I am."

"Unquestionably," replied Michel Ardan; "but we shall not."

In fact, a preparatory experiment, tried on the 18th of October,
had yielded the best results and caused the most well-grounded
hopes of success.  Barbicane, desirous of obtaining some notion
of the effect of the shock at the moment of the projectile's
departure, had procured a 38-inch mortar from the arsenal
of Pensacola.  He had this placed on the bank of Hillisborough
Roads, in order that the shell might fall back into the sea, and
the shock be thereby destroyed.  His object was to ascertain the
extent of the shock of departure, and not that of the return.

A hollow projectile had been prepared for this curious experiment.
A thick padding fastened upon a kind of elastic network, made of
the best steel, lined the inside of the walls.  It was a veritable
_nest_ most carefully wadded.

"What a pity I can't find room in there," said J. T. Maston,
regretting that his height did not allow of his trying the adventure.

Within this shell were shut up a large cat, and a squirrel
belonging to J. T. Maston, and of which he was particularly fond.
They were desirous, however, of ascertaining how this little
animal, least of all others subject to giddiness, would endure
this experimental voyage.

The mortar was charged with 160 pounds of powder, and the shell
placed in the chamber.  On being fired, the projectile rose with
great velocity, described a majestic parabola, attained a height
of about a thousand feet, and with a graceful curve descended in
the midst of the vessels that lay there at anchor.

Without a moment's loss of time a small boat put off in the
direction of its fall; some divers plunged into the water
and attached ropes to the handles of the shell, which was
quickly dragged on board.  Five minutes did not elapse between
the moment of enclosing the animals and that of unscrewing the
coverlid of their prison.

Ardan, Barbicane, Maston, and Nicholl were present on board the
boat, and assisted at the operation with an interest which may
readily be comprehended.  Hardly had the shell been opened when
the cat leaped out, slightly bruised, but full of life, and
exhibiting no signs whatever of having made an aerial expedition.
No trace, however, of the squirrel could be discovered.  The truth
at last became apparent-- the cat had eaten its fellow-traveler!

J. T. Maston grieved much for the loss of his poor squirrel, and
proposed to add its case to that of other martyrs to science.

After this experiment all hesitation, all fear disappeared.
Besides, Barbicane's plans would ensure greater perfection for
his projectile, and go far to annihilate altogether the effects
of the shock.  Nothing now remained but to go!

Two days later Michel Ardan received a message from the
President of the United States, an honor of which he showed
himself especially sensible.

After the example of his illustrious fellow-countryman, the
Marquis de la Fayette, the government had decreed to him the
title of "Citizen of the United States of America."





CHAPTER XXIII


THE PROJECTILE-VEHICLE


On the completion of the Columbiad the public interest centered
in the projectile itself, the vehicle which was destined to
carry the three hardy adventurers into space.

The new plans had been sent to Breadwill and Co., of Albany,
with the request for their speedy execution.  The projectile was
consequently cast on the 2nd of November, and immediately
forwarded by the Eastern Railway to Stones Hill, which it
reached without accident on the 10th of that month, where Michel
Ardan, Barbicane, and Nicholl were waiting impatiently for it.

The projectile had now to be filled to the depth of three feet
with a bed of water, intended to support a water-tight wooden
disc, which worked easily within the walls of the projectile.
It was upon this kind of raft that the travelers were to take
their place.  This body of water was divided by horizontal
partitions, which the shock of the departure would have to break
in succession.  Then each sheet of the water, from the lowest
to the highest, running off into escape tubes toward the top of
the projectile, constituted a kind of spring; and the wooden
disc, supplied with extremely powerful plugs, could not strike
the lowest plate except after breaking successively the
different partitions.  Undoubtedly the travelers would still
have to encounter a violent recoil after the complete escapement
of the water; but the first shock would be almost entirely
destroyed by this powerful spring.  The upper parts of the walls
were lined with a thick padding of leather, fastened upon springs
of the best steel, behind which the escape tubes were completely
concealed; thus all imaginable precautions had been taken for
averting the first shock; and if they did get crushed, they
must, as Michel Ardan said, be made of very bad materials.

The entrance into this metallic tower was by a narrow aperture
contrived in the wall of the cone.  This was hermetically closed
by a plate of aluminum, fastened internally by powerful
screw-pressure.  The travelers could therefore quit their prison
at pleasure, as soon as they should reach the moon.

Light and view were given by means of four thick lenticular
glass scuttles, two pierced in the circular wall itself, the
third in the bottom, the fourth in the top.  These scuttles then
were protected against the shock of departure by plates let into
solid grooves, which could easily be opened outward by
unscrewing them from the inside.  Reservoirs firmly fixed
contained water and the necessary provisions; and fire
and light were procurable by means of gas, contained in a
special reservoir under a pressure of several atmospheres.
They had only to turn a tap, and for six hours the gas would
light and warm this comfortable vehicle.

There now remained only the question of air; for allowing for
the consumption of air by Barbicane, his two companions, and two
dogs which he proposed taking with him, it was necessary to
renew the air of the projectile.  Now air consists principally
of twenty-one parts of oxygen and seventy-nine of nitrogen.
The lungs absorb the oxygen, which is indispensable for the support
of life, and reject the nitrogen.  The air expired loses nearly
five per cent. of the former and contains nearly an equal volume
of carbonic acid, produced by the combustion of the elements of
the blood.  In an air-tight enclosure, then, after a certain
time, all the oxygen of the air will be replaced by the carbonic
acid-- a gas fatal to life.  There were two things to be done
then-- first, to replace the absorbed oxygen; secondly, to
destroy the expired carbonic acid; both easy enough to do, by
means of chlorate of potassium and caustic potash.  The former
is a salt which appears under the form of white crystals; when
raised to a temperature of 400 degrees it is transformed into
chlorure of potassium, and the oxygen which it contains is
entirely liberated.  Now twenty-eight pounds of chlorate of
potassium produces seven pounds of oxygen, or 2,400 litres-- the
quantity necessary for the travelers during twenty-four hours.

Caustic potash has a great affinity for carbonic acid; and it is
sufficient to shake it in order for it to seize upon the acid
and form bicarbonate of potassium.  By these two means they
would be enabled to restore to the vitiated air its life-
supporting properties.

It is necessary, however, to add that the experiments had
hitherto been made _in anima vili_.  Whatever its scientific
accuracy was, they were at present ignorant how it would answer
with human beings.  The honor of putting it to the proof was
energetically claimed by J. T. Maston.

"Since I am not to go," said the brave artillerist, "I may at
least live for a week in the projectile."

It would have been hard to refuse him; so they consented to
his wish.  A sufficient quantity of chlorate of potassium and
of caustic potash was placed at his disposal, together with
provisions for eight days.  And having shaken hands with his
friends, on the 12th of November, at six o'clock A.M., after
strictly informing them not to open his prison before the 20th,
at six o'clock P.M., he slid down the projectile, the plate of
which was at once hermetically sealed.  What did he do with
himself during that week?  They could get no information.
The thickness of the walls of the projectile prevented any
sound reaching from the inside to the outside.  On the 20th
of November, at six P.M. exactly, the plate was opened.
The friends of J. T. Maston had been all along in a state of
much anxiety; but they were promptly reassured on hearing a
jolly voice shouting a boisterous hurrah.

Presently afterward the secretary of the Gun Club appeared at
the top of the cone in a triumphant attitude.  He had grown fat!





CHAPTER XXIV


THE TELESCOPE OF THE ROCKY MOUNTAINS


On the 20th of October in the preceding year, after the close of
the subscription, the president of the Gun Club had credited the
Observatory of Cambridge with the necessary sums for the
construction of a gigantic optical instrument.  This instrument
was designed for the purpose of rendering visible on the surface
of the moon any object exceeding nine feet in diameter.

At the period when the Gun Club essayed their great experiment,
such instruments had reached a high degree of perfection,
and produced some magnificent results.  Two telescopes in
particular, at this time, were possessed of remarkable power
and of gigantic dimensions.  The first, constructed by Herschel,
was thirty-six feet in length, and had an object-glass of four
feet six inches; it possessed a magnifying power of 6,000.
The second was raised in Ireland, in Parsonstown Park, and belongs
to Lord Rosse.  The length of this tube is forty-eight feet, and
the diameter of its object-glass six feet; it magnifies 6,400
times, and required an immense erection of brick work and
masonry for the purpose of working it, its weight being twelve
and a half tons.

Still, despite these colossal dimensions, the actual
enlargements scarcely exceeded 6,000 times in round numbers;
consequently, the moon was brought within no nearer an apparent
distance than thirty-nine miles; and objects of less than sixty
feet in diameter, unless they were of very considerable length,
were still imperceptible.

In the present case, dealing with a projectile nine feet in
diameter and fifteen feet long, it became necessary to bring the
moon within an apparent distance of five miles at most; and for
that purpose to establish a magnifying power of 48,000 times.

Such was the question proposed to the Observatory of Cambridge,
There was no lack of funds; the difficulty was purely one
of construction.

After considerable discussion as to the best form and principle
of the proposed instrument the work was finally commenced.
According to the calculations of the Observatory of Cambridge,
the tube of the new reflector would require to be 280 feet in
length, and the object-glass sixteen feet in diameter.
Colossal as these dimensions may appear, they were diminutive
in comparison with the 10,000 foot telescope proposed by the
astronomer Hooke only a few years ago!

Regarding the choice of locality, that matter was
promptly determined.  The object was to select some lofty
mountain, and there are not many of these in the United States.
In fact there are but two chains of moderate elevation, between
which runs the magnificent Mississippi, the "king of rivers"
as these Republican Yankees delight to call it.

Eastwards rise the Appalachians, the very highest point of
which, in New Hampshire, does not exceed the very moderate
altitude of 5,600 feet.

On the west, however, rise the Rocky Mountains, that immense
range which, commencing at the Straights of Magellan, follows
the western coast of Southern America under the name of the
Andes or the Cordilleras, until it crosses the Isthmus of
Panama, and runs up the whole of North America to the very
borders of the Polar Sea.  The highest elevation of this range
still does not exceed 10,700 feet.  With this elevation,
nevertheless, the Gun Club were compelled to be content,
inasmuch as they had determined that both telescope and
Columbiad should be erected within the limits of the Union.
All the necessary apparatus was consequently sent on to the
summit of Long's Peak, in the territory of Missouri.

Neither pen nor language can describe the difficulties of all
kinds which the American engineers had to surmount, of the
prodigies of daring and skill which they accomplished.  They had
to raise enormous stones, massive pieces of wrought iron, heavy
corner-clamps and huge portions of cylinder, with an
object-glass weighing nearly 30,000 pounds, above the line of
perpetual snow for more than 10,000 feet in height, after
crossing desert prairies, impenetrable forests, fearful rapids,
far from all centers of population, and in the midst of savage
regions, in which every detail of life becomes an almost
insoluble problem.  And yet, notwithstanding these innumerable
obstacles, American genius triumphed.  In less than a year after
the commencement of the works, toward the close of September,
the gigantic reflector rose into the air to a height of 280 feet.
It was raised by means of an enormous iron crane; an ingenious
mechanism allowed it to be easily worked toward all the points
of the heavens, and to follow the stars from the one horizon to
the other during their journey through the heavens.

It had cost $400,000.  The first time it was directed toward the
moon the observers evinced both curiosity and anxiety.  What were
they about to discover in the field of this telescope which
magnified objects 48,000 times?  Would they perceive peoples,
herds of lunar animals, towns, lakes, seas?  No! there was
nothing which science had not already discovered! and on all the
points of its disc the volcanic nature of the moon became
determinable with the utmost precision.

But the telescope of the Rocky Mountains, before doing its duty
to the Gun Club, rendered immense services to astronomy.  Thanks to
its penetrative power, the depths of the heavens were sounded to
the utmost extent; the apparent diameter of a great number of stars
was accurately measured; and Mr. Clark, of the Cambridge staff,
resolved the Crab nebula in Taurus, which the reflector of Lord
Rosse had never been able to decompose.





CHAPTER XXV


FINAL DETAILS


It was the 22nd of November; the departure was to take place in
ten days.  One operation alone remained to be accomplished to
bring all to a happy termination; an operation delicate and
perilous, requiring infinite precautions, and against the
success of which Captain Nicholl had laid his third bet.  It was,
in fact, nothing less than the loading of the Columbiad, and the
introduction into it of 400,000 pounds of gun-cotton.  Nicholl had
thought, not perhaps without reason, that the handling of such
formidable quantities of pyroxyle would, in all probability,
involve a grave catastrophe; and at any rate, that this immense
mass of eminently inflammable matter would inevitably ignite when
submitted to the pressure of the projectile.

There were indeed dangers accruing as before from the
carelessness of the Americans, but Barbicane had set his heart
on success, and took all possible precautions.  In the first
place, he was very careful as to the transportation of the
gun-cotton to Stones Hill.  He had it conveyed in small
quantities, carefully packed in sealed cases.  These were
brought by rail from Tampa Town to the camp, and from thence
were taken to the Columbiad by barefooted workmen, who deposited
them in their places by means of cranes placed at the orifice of
the cannon.  No steam-engine was permitted to work, and every
fire was extinguished within two miles of the works.

Even in November they feared to work by day, lest the sun's rays
acting on the gun-cotton might lead to unhappy results.  This led
to their working at night, by light produced in a vacuum by means
of Ruhmkorff's apparatus, which threw an artificial brightness
into the depths of the Columbiad.  There the cartridges were
arranged with the utmost regularity, connected by a metallic thread,
destined to communicate to them all simultaneously the electric
spark, by which means this mass of gun-cotton was eventually
to be ignited.

By the 28th of November eight hundred cartridges had been
placed in the bottom of the Columbiad.  So far the operation had
been successful!  But what confusion, what anxieties, what struggles
were undergone by President Barbicane!  In vain had he refused
admission to Stones Hill; every day the inquisitive neighbors
scaled the palisades, some even carrying their imprudence to the
point of smoking while surrounded by bales of gun-cotton.
Barbicane was in a perpetual state of alarm.  J. T. Maston
seconded him to the best of his ability, by giving vigorous
chase to the intruders, and carefully picking up the still
lighted cigar ends which the Yankees threw about.  A somewhat
difficult task! seeing that more than 300,000 persons were
gathered round the enclosure.  Michel Ardan had volunteered to
superintend the transport of the cartridges to the mouth of the
Columbiad; but the president, having surprised him with an
enormous cigar in his mouth, while he was hunting out the rash
spectators to whom he himself offered so dangerous an example,
saw that he could not trust this fearless smoker, and was
therefore obliged to mount a special guard over him.

At last, Providence being propitious, this wonderful loading
came to a happy termination, Captain Nicholl's third bet being
thus lost.  It remained now to introduce the projectile into the
Columbiad, and to place it on its soft bed of gun-cotton.

But before doing this, all those things necessary for the
journey had to be carefully arranged in the projectile vehicle.
These necessaries were numerous; and had Ardan been allowed to
follow his own wishes, there would have been no space remaining
for the travelers.  It is impossible to conceive of half the
things this charming Frenchman wished to convey to the moon.
A veritable stock of useless trifles!  But Barbicane interfered
and refused admission to anything not absolutely needed.
Several thermometers, barometers, and telescopes were packed in
the instrument case.

The travelers being desirous of examing the moon carefully
during their voyage, in order to facilitate their studies,
they took with them Boeer and Moeller's excellent _Mappa
Selenographica_, a masterpiece of patience and observation,
which they hoped would enable them to identify those physical
features in the moon, with which they were acquainted.
This map reproduced with scrupulous fidelity the smallest
details of the lunar surface which faces the earth; the
mountains, valleys, craters, peaks, and ridges were all
represented, with their exact dimensions, relative positions,
and names; from the mountains Doerfel and Leibnitz on the
eastern side of the disc, to the _Mare frigoris_ of the North Pole.

They took also three rifles and three fowling-pieces, and a
large quantity of balls, shot, and powder.

"We cannot tell whom we shall have to deal with," said Michel Ardan.
"Men or beasts may possibly object to our visit.  It is only wise
to take all precautions."

These defensive weapons were accompanied by pickaxes, crowbars,
saws, and other useful implements, not to mention clothing
adapted to every temperature, from that of polar regions to that
of the torrid zone.

Ardan wished to convey a number of animals of different sorts,
not indeed a pair of every known species, as he could not see
the necessity of acclimatizing serpents, tigers, alligators, or
any other noxious beasts in the moon.  "Nevertheless," he said
to Barbicane, "some valuable and useful beasts, bullocks, cows,
horses, and donkeys, would bear the journey very well, and would
also be very useful to us."

"I dare say, my dear Ardan," replied the president, "but our
projectile-vehicle is no Noah's ark, from which it differs both in
dimensions and object.  Let us confine ourselves to possibilities."

After a prolonged discussion, it was agreed that the travelers
should restrict themselves to a sporting-dog belonging to
Nicholl, and to a large Newfoundland.  Several packets of seeds
were also included among the necessaries.  Michel Ardan, indeed,
was anxious to add some sacks full of earth to sow them in; as
it was, he took a dozen shrubs carefully wrapped up in straw to
plant in the moon.

The important question of provisions still remained; it being
necessary to provide against the possibility of their finding
the moon absolutely barren.  Barbicane managed so successfully,
that he supplied them with sufficient rations for a year.
These consisted of preserved meats and vegetables, reduced by
strong hydraulic pressure to the smallest possible dimensions.
They were also supplied with brandy, and took water enough for
two months, being confident, from astronomical observations,
that there was no lack of water on the moon's surface.  As to
provisions, doubtless the inhabitants of the _earth_ would find
nourishment somewhere in the _moon_.  Ardan never questioned
this; indeed, had he done so, he would never have undertaken
the journey.

"Besides," he said one day to his friends, "we shall not be
completely abandoned by our terrestrial friends; they will take
care not to forget us."

"No, indeed!" replied J. T. Maston.

"Nothing would be simpler," replied Ardan; "the Columbiad will
be always there.  Well! whenever the moon is in a favorable
condition as to the zenith, if not to the perigee, that is to
say about once a year, could you not send us a shell packed
with provisions, which we might expect on some appointed day?"

"Hurrah! hurrah!" cried J. T. Matson; "what an ingenious fellow!
what a splendid idea!  Indeed, my good friends, we shall not
forget you!"

"I shall reckon upon you!  Then, you see, we shall receive news
regularly from the earth, and we shall indeed be stupid if we
hit upon no plan for communicating with our good friends here!"

These words inspired such confidence, that Michel Ardan carried
all the Gun Club with him in his enthusiasm.  What he said
seemed so simple and so easy, so sure of success, that none
could be so sordidly attached to this earth as to hesitate to
follow the three travelers on their lunar expedition.

All being ready at last, it remained to place the projectile in
the Columbiad, an operation abundantly accompanied by dangers
and difficulties.

The enormous shell was conveyed to the summit of Stones Hill.
There, powerful cranes raised it, and held it suspended over the
mouth of the cylinder.

It was a fearful moment!  What if the chains should break under
its enormous weight?  The sudden fall of such a body would
inevitably cause the gun-cotton to explode!

Fortunately this did not happen; and some hours later the
projectile-vehicle descended gently into the heart of the cannon
and rested on its couch of pyroxyle, a veritable bed of
explosive eider-down.  Its pressure had no result, other than
the more effectual ramming down of the charge in the Columbiad.

"I have lost," said the captain, who forthwith paid President
Barbicane the sum of three thousand dollars.

Barbicane did not wish to accept the money from one of his
fellow-travelers, but gave way at last before the determination
of Nicholl, who wished before leaving the earth to fulfill all
his engagements.

"Now," said Michel Ardan, "I have only one thing more to wish
for you, my brave captain."

"What is that?" asked Nicholl.

"It is that you may lose your two other bets!  Then we shall be
sure not to be stopped on our journey!"





CHAPTER XXVI


FIRE!


The first of December had arrived! the fatal day! for, if the
projectile were not discharged that very night at 10h. 48m. 40s.
P.M., more than eighteen years must roll by before the moon
would again present herself under the same conditions of zenith
and perigee.

The weather was magnificent.  Despite the approach of winter,
the sun shone brightly, and bathed in its radiant light that
earth which three of its denizens were about to abandon for a
new world.

How many persons lost their rest on the night which preceded
this long-expected day!  All hearts beat with disquietude, save
only the heart of Michel Ardan.  That imperturbable personage
came and went with his habitual business-like air, while nothing
whatever denoted that any unusual matter preoccupied his mind.

After dawn, an innumerable multitude covered the prairie which
extends, as far as the eye can reach, round Stones Hill.  Every
quarter of an hour the railway brought fresh accessions of
sightseers; and, according to the statement of the Tampa Town
_Observer_, not less than five millions of spectators thronged
the soil of Florida.

For a whole month previously, the mass of these persons had
bivouacked round the enclosure, and laid the foundations for a
town which was afterward called "Ardan's Town."  The whole plain
was covered with huts, cottages, and tents.  Every nation under
the sun was represented there; and every language might be heard
spoken at the same time.  It was a perfect Babel re-enacted.
All the various classes of American society were mingled
together in terms of absolute equality.  Bankers, farmers,
sailors, cotton-planters, brokers, merchants, watermen,
magistrates, elbowed each other in the most free-and-easy way.
Louisiana Creoles fraternized with farmers from Indiana;
Kentucky and Tennessee gentlemen and haughty Virginians
conversed with trappers and the half-savages of the lakes and
butchers from Cincinnati.  Broad-brimmed white hats and Panamas,
blue-cotton trousers, light-colored stockings, cambric frills,
were all here displayed; while upon shirt-fronts, wristbands,
and neckties, upon every finger, even upon the very ears, they
wore an assortment of rings, shirt-pins, brooches, and trinkets,
of which the value only equaled the execrable taste.  Women, children,
and servants, in equally expensive dress, surrounded their husbands,
fathers, or masters, who resembled the patriarchs of tribes in the
midst of their immense households.

At meal-times all fell to work upon the dishes peculiar to the
Southern States, and consumed with an appetite that threatened
speedy exhaustion of the victualing powers of Florida,
fricasseed frogs, stuffed monkey, fish chowder, underdone
'possum, and raccoon steaks.  And as for the liquors which
accompanied this indigestible repast!  The shouts, the
vociferations that resounded through the bars and taverns
decorated with glasses, tankards, and bottles of marvelous
shape, mortars for pounding sugar, and bundles of straws!
"Mint-julep" roars one of the barmen; "Claret sangaree!"
shouts another; "Cocktail!" "Brandy-smash!" "Real mint-julep
in the new style!"  All these cries intermingled produced a
bewildering and deafening hubbub.

But on this day, 1st of December, such sounds were rare.  No one
thought of eating or drinking, and at four P.M. there were vast
numbers of spectators who had not even taken their customary
lunch!  And, a still more significant fact, even the national
passion for play seemed quelled for the time under the general
excitement of the hour.

Up till nightfall, a dull, noiseless agitation, such as
precedes great catastrophes, ran through the anxious multitude.
An indescribable uneasiness pervaded all minds, an indefinable
sensation which oppressed the heart.  Every one wished it was over.

However, about seven o'clock, the heavy silence was dissipated.
The moon rose above the horizon.  Millions of hurrahs hailed
her appearance.  She was punctual to the rendezvous, and shouts
of welcome greeted her on all sides, as her pale beams shone
gracefully in the clear heavens.  At this moment the three
intrepid travelers appeared.  This was the signal for renewed
cries of still greater intensity.  Instantly the vast
assemblage, as with one accord, struck up the national hymn of
the United States, and "Yankee Doodle," sung by five million of
hearty throats, rose like a roaring tempest to the farthest
limits of the atmosphere.  Then a profound silence reigned
throughout the crowd.

The Frenchman and the two Americans had by this time entered the
enclosure reserved in the center of the multitude.  They were
accompanied by the members of the Gun Club, and by deputations
sent from all the European Observatories.  Barbicane, cool and
collected, was giving his final directions.  Nicholl, with
compressed lips, his arms crossed behind his back, walked with
a firm and measured step.  Michel Ardan, always easy, dressed in
thorough traveler's costume, leathern gaiters on his legs, pouch
by his side, in loose velvet suit, cigar in mouth, was full of
inexhaustible gayety, laughing, joking, playing pranks with J.
T. Maston.  In one word, he was the thorough "Frenchman" (and
worse, a "Parisian") to the last moment.

Ten o'clock struck!  The moment had arrived for taking their
places in the projectile!  The necessary operations for the
descent, and the subsequent removal of the cranes and
scaffolding that inclined over the mouth of the Columbiad,
required a certain period of time.

Barbicane had regulated his chronometer to the tenth part of a
second by that of Murchison the engineer, who was charged with
the duty of firing the gun by means of an electric spark.
Thus the travelers enclosed within the projectile were enabled
to follow with their eyes the impassive needle which marked the
precise moment of their departure.

The moment had arrived for saying "good-by!"  The scene was a
touching one.  Despite his feverish gayety, even Michel Ardan
was touched.  J. T. Maston had found in his own dry eyes one
ancient tear, which he had doubtless reserved for the occasion.
He dropped it on the forehead of his dear president.

"Can I not go?" he said, "there is still time!"

"Impossible, old fellow!" replied Barbicane.  A few moments
later, the three fellow-travelers had ensconced themselves in
the projectile, and screwed down the plate which covered the
entrance-aperture.  The mouth of the Columbiad, now completely
disencumbered, was open entirely to the sky.

The moon advanced upward in a heaven of the purest clearness,
outshining in her passage the twinkling light of the stars.
She passed over the constellation of the Twins, and was now
nearing the halfway point between the horizon and the zenith.
A terrible silence weighed upon the entire scene!  Not a breath of
wind upon the earth! not a sound of breathing from the countless
chests of the spectators!  Their hearts seemed afraid to beat!
All eyes were fixed upon the yawning mouth of the Columbiad.

Murchison followed with his eye the hand of his chronometer.
It wanted scarce forty seconds to the moment of departure, but
each second seemed to last an age!  At the twentieth there was
a general shudder, as it occurred to the minds of that vast
assemblage that the bold travelers shut up within the projectile
were also counting those terrible seconds.  Some few cries here
and there escaped the crowd.

"Thirty-five!-- thirty-six!-- thirty-seven!-- thirty-eight!--
thirty-nine!-- forty!  FIRE!!!"

Instantly Murchison pressed with his finger the key of the
electric battery, restored the current of the fluid, and
discharged the spark into the breech of the Columbiad.

An appalling unearthly report followed instantly, such as can be
compared to nothing whatever known, not even to the roar of
thunder, or the blast of volcanic explosions!  No words can
convey the slightest idea of the terrific sound!  An immense
spout of fire shot up from the bowels of the earth as from a crater.
The earth heaved up, and with great difficulty some few spectators
obtained a momentary glimpse of the projectile victoriously
cleaving the air in the midst of the fiery vapors!






CHAPTER XXVII


FOUL WEATHER


At the moment when that pyramid of fire rose to a prodigious
height into the air, the glare of flame lit up the whole of
Florida; and for a moment day superseded night over a
considerable extent of the country.  This immense canopy of fire
was perceived at a distance of one hundred miles out at sea, and
more than one ship's captain entered in his log the appearance
of this gigantic meteor.

The discharge of the Columbiad was accompanied by a
perfect earthquake.  Florida was shaken to its very depths.
The gases of the powder, expanded by heat, forced back the
atmospheric strata with tremendous violence, and this
artificial hurricane rushed like a water-spout through the air.

Not a single spectator remained on his feet!  Men, women
children, all lay prostrate like ears of corn under a tempest.
There ensued a terrible tumult; a large number of persons were
seriously injured.  J. T. Maston, who, despite all dictates of
prudence, had kept in advance of the mass, was pitched back 120
feet, shooting like a projectile over the heads of his
fellow-citizens.  Three hundred thousand persons remained deaf
for a time, and as though struck stupefied.

As soon as the first effects were over, the injured, the deaf,
and lastly, the crowd in general, woke up with frenzied cries.
"Hurrah for Ardan!  Hurrah for Barbicane!  Hurrah for Nicholl!"
rose to the skies.  Thousands of persons, noses in air, armed
with telescopes and race-glasses, were questioning space,
forgetting all contusions and emotions in the one idea of
watching for the projectile.  They looked in vain!  It was no
longer to be seen, and they were obliged to wait for telegrams
from Long's Peak.  The director of the Cambridge Observatory was
at his post on the Rocky Mountains; and to him, as a skillful
and persevering astronomer, all observations had been confided.

But an unforeseen phenomenon came in to subject the public
impatience to a severe trial.

The weather, hitherto so fine, suddenly changed; the sky became
heavy with clouds.  It could not have been otherwise after the
terrible derangement of the atmospheric strata, and the dispersion
of the enormous quantity of vapor arising from the combustion of
200,000 pounds of pyroxyle!

On the morrow the horizon was covered with clouds-- a thick and
impenetrable curtain between earth and sky, which unhappily
extended as far as the Rocky Mountains.  It was a fatality!
But since man had chosen so to disturb the atmosphere, he was
bound to accept the consequences of his experiment.

Supposing, now, that the experiment had succeeded, the travelers
having started on the 1st of December, at 10h. 46m. 40s. P.M.,
were due on the 4th at 0h. P.M. at their destination.  So that
up to that time it would have been very difficult after all to
have observed, under such conditions, a body so small as the shell.
Therefore they waited with what patience they might.

From the 4th to the 6th of December inclusive, the weather
remaining much the same in America, the great European
instruments of Herschel, Rosse, and Foucault, were constantly
directed toward the moon, for the weather was then magnificent;
but the comparative weakness of their glasses prevented any
trustworthy observations being made.

On the 7th the sky seemed to lighten.  They were in hopes now,
but their hope was of but short duration, and at night again
thick clouds hid the starry vault from all eyes.

Matters were now becoming serious, when on the 9th the sun
reappeared for an instant, as if for the purpose of teasing
the Americans.  It was received with hisses; and wounded, no
doubt, by such a reception, showed itself very sparing of its rays.

On the 10th, no change!  J. T. Maston went nearly mad, and great
fears were entertained regarding the brain of this worthy
individual, which had hitherto been so well preserved within his
gutta-percha cranium.

But on the 11th one of those inexplicable tempests peculiar to
those intertropical regions was let loose in the atmosphere.
A terrific east wind swept away the groups of clouds which had
been so long gathering, and at night the semi-disc of the orb of
night rode majestically amid the soft constellations of the sky.





CHAPTER XXVIII


A NEW STAR


That very night, the startling news so impatiently awaited,
burst like a thunderbolt over the United States of the Union,
and thence, darting across the ocean, ran through all the
telegraphic wires of the globe.  The projectile had been
detected, thanks to the gigantic reflector of Long's Peak!
Here is the note received by the director of the Observatory
of Cambridge.  It contains the scientific conclusion regarding
this great experiment of the Gun Club.


                                LONG'S PEAK, December 12.
To the Officers of the Observatory of Cambridge.
The projectile discharged by the Columbiad at Stones Hill has
been detected by Messrs. Belfast and J. T. Maston, 12th of
December, at 8:47 P.M., the moon having entered her last quarter.
This projectile has not arrived at its destination.  It has
passed by the side; but sufficiently near to be retained by the
lunar attraction.

The rectilinear movement has thus become changed into a circular
motion of extreme velocity, and it is now pursuing an elliptical
orbit round the moon, of which it has become a true satellite.

The elements of this new star we have as yet been unable to
determine; we do not yet know the velocity of its passage.
The distance which separates it from the surface of the moon
may be estimated at about 2,833 miles.

However, two hypotheses come here into our consideration.

1. Either the attraction of the moon will end by drawing them
into itself, and the travelers will attain their destination; or,

2. The projectile, following an immutable law, will continue to
gravitate round the moon till the end of time.

At some future time, our observations will be able to determine
this point, but till then the experiment of the Gun Club can
have no other result than to have provided our solar system with
a new star.
                                              J. BELFAST.


To how many questions did this unexpected _denouement_ give rise?
What mysterious results was the future reserving for the
investigation of science?  At all events, the names of Nicholl,
Barbicane, and Michel Ardan were certain to be immortalized in
the annals of astronomy!

When the dispatch from Long's Peak had once become known, there
was but one universal feeling of surprise and alarm.  Was it
possible to go to the aid of these bold travelers?  No! for they
had placed themselves beyond the pale of humanity, by crossing
the limits imposed by the Creator on his earthly creatures.
They had air enough for _two_ months; they had victuals enough
for _twelve;-- but after that?_  There was only one man who
would not admit that the situation was desperate-- he alone had
confidence; and that was their devoted friend J. T. Maston.

Besides, he never let them get out of sight.  His home was
henceforth the post at Long's Peak; his horizon, the mirror of
that immense reflector.  As soon as the moon rose above the
horizon, he immediately caught her in the field of the
telescope; he never let her go for an instant out of his
sight, and followed her assiduously in her course through the
stellar spaces.  He watched with untiring patience the passage
of the projectile across her silvery disc, and really the worthy
man remained in perpetual communication with his three friends,
whom he did not despair of seeing again some day.

"Those three men," said he, "have carried into space all the
resources of art, science, and industry.  With that, one can do
anything; and you will see that, some day, they will come out
all right."



ROUND THE MOON

A SEQUEL TO

FROM THE EARTH TO THE MOON





ROUND THE MOON




PRELIMINARY CHAPTER


THE FIRST PART OF THIS WORK, AND SERVING AS A PREFACE TO THE SECOND

During the year 186-, the whole world was greatly excited by a
scientific experiment unprecedented in the annals of science.
The members of the Gun Club, a circle of artillerymen formed at
Baltimore after the American war, conceived the idea of
putting themselves in communication with the moon!-- yes, with
the moon-- by sending to her a projectile.  Their president,
Barbicane, the promoter of the enterprise, having consulted the
astronomers of the Cambridge Observatory upon the subject, took
all necessary means to ensure the success of this extraordinary
enterprise, which had been declared practicable by the majority
of competent judges.  After setting on foot a public
subscription, which realized nearly L1,200,000, they began the
gigantic work.

According to the advice forwarded from the members of the
Observatory, the gun destined to launch the projectile had to be
fixed in a country situated between the 0 and 28th degrees of
north or south latitude, in order to aim at the moon when at the
zenith; and its initiatory velocity was fixed at twelve thousand
yards to the second.  Launched on the 1st of December, at 10hrs.
46m. 40s. P.M., it ought to reach the moon four days after its
departure, that is on the 5th of December, at midnight
precisely, at the moment of her attaining her perigee, that is
her nearest distance from the earth, which is exactly 86,410
leagues (French), or 238,833 miles mean distance (English).

The principal members of the Gun Club, President Barbicane,
Major Elphinstone, the secretary Joseph T. Maston, and other
learned men, held several meetings, at which the shape and
composition of the projectile were discussed, also the position
and nature of the gun, and the quality and quantity of powder
to be used.  It was decided:  First, that the projectile should
be a shell made of aluminum with a diameter of 108 inches and a
thickness of twelve inches to its walls; and should weigh
19,250 pounds.  Second, that the gun should be a Columbiad
cast in iron, 900 feet long, and run perpendicularly into
the earth.  Third, that the charge should contain 400,000 pounds
of gun-cotton, which, giving out six billions of litres of gas in
rear of the projectile, would easily carry it toward the orb of night.

These questions determined President Barbicane, assisted by
Murchison the engineer, to choose a spot situated in Florida, in
27@ 7' North latitude, and 77@ 3' West (Greenwich) longitude.
It was on this spot, after stupendous labor, that the Columbiad
was cast with full success.  Things stood thus, when an incident
took place which increased the interest attached to this great
enterprise a hundredfold.

A Frenchman, an enthusiastic Parisian, as witty as he was bold,
asked to be enclosed in the projectile, in order that he might
reach the moon, and reconnoiter this terrestrial satellite.
The name of this intrepid adventurer was Michel Ardan.  He landed
in America, was received with enthusiasm, held meetings, saw
himself carried in triumph, reconciled President Barbicane to
his mortal enemy, Captain Nicholl, and, as a token of
reconciliation, persuaded them both to start with him in
the projectile.  The proposition being accepted, the shape
of the projectile was slightly altered.  It was made of a
cylindro-conical form.  This species of aerial car was lined with
strong springs and partitions to deaden the shock of departure.
It was provided with food for a year, water for some months,
and gas for some days.  A self-acting apparatus supplied the
three travelers with air to breathe.  At the same time, on one
of the highest points of the Rocky Mountains, the Gun Club had
a gigantic telescope erected, in order that they might be able
to follow the course of the projectile through space.  All was
then ready.

On the 30th of November, at the hour fixed upon, from the midst
of an extraordinary crowd of spectators, the departure took place,
and for the first time, three human beings quitted the terrestrial
globe, and launched into inter-planetary space with almost a
certainty of reaching their destination.  These bold travelers,
Michel Ardan, President Barbicane, and Captain Nicholl, ought to
make the passage in ninety-seven hours, thirteen minutes, and
twenty seconds.  Consequently, their arrival on the lunar disc
could not take place until the 5th of December at twelve at night,
at the exact moment when the moon should be full, and not on the
4th, as some badly informed journalists had announced.

But an unforeseen circumstance, viz., the detonation produced
by the Columbiad, had the immediate effect of troubling the
terrestrial atmosphere, by accumulating a large quantity of
vapor, a phenomenon which excited universal indignation, for the
moon was hidden from the eyes of the watchers for several nights.

The worthy Joseph T. Maston, the staunchest friend of the three
travelers, started for the Rocky Mountains, accompanied by the
Hon. J. Belfast, director of the Cambridge Observatory, and
reached the station of Long's Peak, where the telescope was
erected which brought the moon within an apparent distance of
two leagues.  The honorable secretary of the Gun Club wished
himself to observe the vehicle of his daring friends.

The accumulation of the clouds in the atmosphere prevented all
observation on the 5th, 6th, 7th, 8th, 9th, and 10th of December.
Indeed it was thought that all observations would have to be put
off to the 3d of January in the following year; for the moon
entering its last quarter on the 11th, would then only present
an ever-decreasing portion of her disc, insufficient to allow
of their following the course of the projectile.

At length, to the general satisfaction, a heavy storm cleared
the atmosphere on the night of the 11th and 12th of December,
and the moon, with half-illuminated disc, was plainly to be seen
upon the black sky.

That very night a telegram was sent from the station of Long's
Peak by Joseph T. Maston and Belfast to the gentlemen of the
Cambridge Observatory, announcing that on the 11th of December
at 8h. 47m. P.M., the projectile launched by the Columbiad of
Stones Hill had been detected by Messrs. Belfast and Maston--
that it had deviated from its course from some unknown cause,
and had not reached its destination; but that it had passed near
enough to be retained by the lunar attraction; that its
rectilinear movement had been changed to a circular one, and
that following an elliptical orbit round the star of night it
had become its satellite.  The telegram added that the elements
of this new star had not yet been calculated; and indeed three
observations made upon a star in three different positions are
necessary to determine these elements.  Then it showed that the
distance separating the projectile from the lunar surface "might"
be reckoned at about 2,833 miles.

It ended with the double hypothesis: either the attraction of
the moon would draw it to herself, and the travelers thus attain
their end; or that the projectile, held in one immutable orbit,
would gravitate around the lunar disc to all eternity.

With such alternatives, what would be the fate of the travelers?
Certainly they had food for some time.  But supposing they did
succeed in their rash enterprise, how would they return?
Could they ever return?  Should they hear from them?
These questions, debated by the most learned pens of the day,
strongly engrossed the public attention.

It is advisable here to make a remark which ought to be well
considered by hasty observers.  When a purely speculative
discovery is announced to the public, it cannot be done with too
much prudence.  No one is obliged to discover either a planet,
a comet, or a satellite; and whoever makes a mistake in such a
case exposes himself justly to the derision of the mass.
Far better is it to wait; and that is what the impatient Joseph
T. Maston should have done before sending this telegram forth to
the world, which, according to his idea, told the whole result
of the enterprise.  Indeed this telegram contained two sorts of
errors, as was proved eventually.  First, errors of observation,
concerning the distance of the projectile from the surface of
the moon, for on the 11th of December it was impossible to see
it; and what Joseph T. Maston had seen, or thought he saw, could
not have been the projectile of the Columbiad.  Second, errors of
theory on the fate in store for the said projectile; for in making
it a satellite of the moon, it was putting it in direct
contradiction of all mechanical laws.

One single hypothesis of the observers of Long's Peak could ever
be realized, that which foresaw the case of the travelers (if
still alive) uniting their efforts with the lunar attraction to
attain the surface of the disc.

Now these men, as clever as they were daring, had survived the
terrible shock consequent on their departure, and it is their
journey in the projectile car which is here related in its most
dramatic as well as in its most singular details.  This recital
will destroy many illusions and surmises; but it will give a
true idea of the singular changes in store for such an
enterprise; it will bring out the scientific instincts of
Barbicane, the industrious resources of Nicholl, and the
audacious humor of Michel Ardan.  Besides this, it will prove
that their worthy friend, Joseph T. Maston, was wasting his
time, while leaning over the gigantic telescope he watched the
course of the moon through the starry space.





CHAPTER I


TWENTY MINUTES PAST TEN TO FORTY-SEVEN MINUTES PAST TEN P. M.

As ten o'clock struck, Michel Ardan, Barbicane, and Nicholl,
took leave of the numerous friends they were leaving on the earth.
The two dogs, destined to propagate the canine race on the lunar
continents, were already shut up in the projectile.

The three travelers approached the orifice of the enormous
cast-iron tube, and a crane let them down to the conical top of
the projectile.  There, an opening made for the purpose gave
them access to the aluminum car.  The tackle belonging to the
crane being hauled from outside, the mouth of the Columbiad was
instantly disencumbered of its last supports.

Nicholl, once introduced with his companions inside the
projectile, began to close the opening by means of a strong
plate, held in position by powerful screws.  Other plates,
closely fitted, covered the lenticular glasses, and the
travelers, hermetically enclosed in their metal prison, were
plunged in profound darkness.

"And now, my dear companions," said Michel Ardan, "let us
make ourselves at home; I am a domesticated man and strong
in housekeeping.  We are bound to make the best of our new
lodgings, and make ourselves comfortable.  And first let us
try and see a little.  Gas was not invented for moles."

So saying, the thoughtless fellow lit a match by striking it on
the sole of his boot; and approached the burner fixed to the
receptacle, in which the carbonized hydrogen, stored at high
pressure, sufficed for the lighting and warming of the
projectile for a hundred and forty-four hours, or six days and
six nights.  The gas caught fire, and thus lighted the
projectile looked like a comfortable room with thickly padded
walls, furnished with a circular divan, and a roof rounded in
the shape of a dome.

Michel Ardan examined everything, and declared himself satisfied
with his installation.

"It is a prison," said he, "but a traveling prison; and, with
the right of putting my nose to the window, I could well stand
a lease of a hundred years.  You smile, Barbicane.  Have you any
_arriere-pensee_?  Do you say to yourself, `This prison may be
our tomb?'  Tomb, perhaps; still I would not change it for
Mahomet's, which floats in space but never advances an inch!"

While Michel Ardan was speaking, Barbicane and Nicholl were
making their last preparations.

Nicholl's chronometer marked twenty minutes past ten P.M. when
the three travelers were finally enclosed in their projectile.
This chronometer was set within the tenth of a second by that of
Murchison the engineer.  Barbicane consulted it.

"My friends," said he, "it is twenty minutes past ten.  At forty-
seven minutes past ten Murchison will launch the electric spark
on the wire which communicates with the charge of the Columbiad.
At that precise moment we shall leave our spheroid.  Thus we
still have twenty-seven minutes to remain on the earth."

"Twenty-six minutes thirteen seconds," replied the methodical Nicholl.

"Well!" exclaimed Michel Ardan, in a good-humored tone, "much
may be done in twenty-six minutes.  The gravest questions of
morals and politics may be discussed, and even solved.
Twenty-six minutes well employed are worth more than twenty-six
years in which nothing is done.  Some seconds of a Pascal or a
Newton are more precious than the whole existence of a crowd of
raw simpletons----"

"And you conclude, then, you everlasting talker?" asked Barbicane.

"I conclude that we have twenty-six minutes left," replied Ardan.

"Twenty-four only," said Nicholl.

"Well, twenty-four, if you like, my noble captain," said Ardan;
"twenty-four minutes in which to investigate----"

"Michel," said Barbicane, "during the passage we shall have
plenty of time to investigate the most difficult questions.
For the present we must occupy ourselves with our departure."

"Are we not ready?"

"Doubtless; but there are still some precautions to be taken,
to deaden as much as possible the first shock."

"Have we not the water-cushions placed between the partition-
breaks, whose elasticity will sufficiently protect us?"

"I hope so, Michel," replied Barbicane gently, "but I am not sure."

"Ah, the joker!" exclaimed Michel Ardan.  "He hopes!--He is not
sure!-- and he waits for the moment when we are encased to make
this deplorable admission!  I beg to be allowed to get out!"

"And how?" asked Barbicane.

"Humph!" said Michel Ardan, "it is not easy; we are in the
train, and the guard's whistle will sound before twenty-four
minutes are over."

"Twenty," said Nicholl.

For some moments the three travelers looked at each other.
Then they began to examine the objects imprisoned with them.

"Everything is in its place," said Barbicane.  "We have now to
decide how we can best place ourselves to resist the shock.
Position cannot be an indifferent matter; and we must, as much
as possible, prevent the rush of blood to the head."

"Just so," said Nicholl.

"Then," replied Michel Ardan, ready to suit the action to the
word, "let us put our heads down and our feet in the air, like
the clowns in the grand circus."

"No," said Barbicane, "let us stretch ourselves on our sides; we
shall resist the shock better that way.  Remember that, when the
projectile starts, it matters little whether we are in it or
before it; it amounts to much the same thing."

"If it is only `much the same thing,' I may cheer up," said
Michel Ardan.

"Do you approve of my idea, Nicholl?" asked Barbicane.

"Entirely," replied the captain.  "We've still thirteen minutes
and a half."

"That Nicholl is not a man," exclaimed Michel; "he is a
chronometer with seconds, an escape, and eight holes."

But his companions were not listening; they were taking up their
last positions with the most perfect coolness.  They were like
two methodical travelers in a car, seeking to place themselves
as comfortably as possible.

We might well ask ourselves of what materials are the hearts of
these Americans made, to whom the approach of the most frightful
danger added no pulsation.

Three thick and solidly-made couches had been placed in
the projectile.  Nicholl and Barbicane placed them in the
center of the disc forming the floor.  There the three
travelers were to stretch themselves some moments before
their departure.

During this time, Ardan, not being able to keep still, turned in
his narrow prison like a wild beast in a cage, chatting with his
friends, speaking to the dogs Diana and Satellite, to whom, as
may be seen, he had given significant names.

"Ah, Diana!  Ah, Satellite!" he exclaimed, teasing them; "so you
are going to show the moon-dogs the good habits of the dogs of
the earth!  That will do honor to the canine race!  If ever we
do come down again, I will bring a cross type of `moon-dogs,'
which will make a stir!"

"If there _are_ dogs in the moon," said Barbicane.

"There are," said Michel Ardan, "just as there are horses, cows,
donkeys, and chickens.  I bet that we shall find chickens."

"A hundred dollars we shall find none!" said Nicholl.

"Done, my captain!" replied Ardan, clasping Nicholl's hand.
"But, by the bye, you have already lost three bets with our
president, as the necessary funds for the enterprise have been
found, as the operation of casting has been successful, and
lastly, as the Columbiad has been loaded without accident, six
thousand dollars."

"Yes," replied Nicholl.  "Thirty-seven minutes six seconds past ten."

"It is understood, captain.  Well, before another quarter of an
hour you will have to count nine thousand dollars to the
president; four thousand because the Columbiad will not burst,
and five thousand because the projectile will rise more than six
miles in the air."

"I have the dollars," replied Nicholl, slapping the pocket of
this coat.  "I only ask to be allowed to pay."

"Come, Nicholl.  I see that you are a man of method, which
I could never be; but indeed you have made a series of bets
of very little advantage to yourself, allow me to tell you."

"And why?" asked Nicholl.

"Because, if you gain the first, the Columbiad will have burst,
and the projectile with it; and Barbicane will no longer be
there to reimburse your dollars."

"My stake is deposited at the bank in Baltimore," replied
Barbicane simply; "and if Nicholl is not there, it will go to
his heirs."

"Ah, you practical men!" exclaimed Michel Ardan; "I admire you
the more for not being able to understand you."

"Forty-two minutes past ten!" said Nicholl.

"Only five minutes more!" answered Barbicane.

"Yes, five little minutes!" replied Michel Ardan; "and we are
enclosed in a projectile, at the bottom of a gun 900 feet long!
And under this projectile are rammed 400,000 pounds of gun-cotton,
which is equal to 1,600,000 pounds of ordinary powder!  And friend
Murchison, with his chronometer in hand, his eye fixed on the
needle, his finger on the electric apparatus, is counting the
seconds preparatory to launching us into interplanetary space."

"Enough, Michel, enough!" said Barbicane, in a serious voice;
"let us prepare.  A few instants alone separate us from an
eventful moment.  One clasp of the hand, my friends."

"Yes," exclaimed Michel Ardan, more moved than he wished to
appear; and the three bold companions were united in a last embrace.

"God preserve us!" said the religious Barbicane.

Michel Ardan and Nicholl stretched themselves on the couches
placed in the center of the disc.

"Forty-seven minutes past ten!" murmured the captain.

"Twenty seconds more!"  Barbicane quickly put out the gas and
lay down by his companions, and the profound silence was only
broken by the ticking of the chronometer marking the seconds.

Suddenly a dreadful shock was felt, and the projectile, under
the force of six billions of litres of gas, developed by the
combustion of pyroxyle, mounted into space.





CHAPTER II


THE FIRST HALF-HOUR


What had happened?  What effect had this frightful shock produced?
Had the ingenuity of the constructors of the projectile obtained
any happy result?  Had the shock been deadened, thanks to the
springs, the four plugs, the water-cushions, and the partition-breaks?
Had they been able to subdue the frightful pressure of the initiatory
speed of more than 11,000 yards, which was enough to traverse Paris
or New York in a second?  This was evidently the question suggested
to the thousand spectators of this moving scene.  They forgot the
aim of the journey, and thought only of the travelers.  And if
one of them-- Joseph T. Maston for example-- could have cast one
glimpse into the projectile, what would he have seen?

Nothing then.  The darkness was profound.  But its cylindro-
conical partitions had resisted wonderfully.  Not a rent or a
dent anywhere!  The wonderful projectile was not even heated
under the intense deflagration of the powder, nor liquefied,
as they seemed to fear, in a shower of aluminum.

The interior showed but little disorder; indeed, only a few
objects had been violently thrown toward the roof; but the most
important seemed not to have suffered from the shock at all;
their fixtures were intact.

On the movable disc, sunk down to the bottom by the smashing of
the partition-breaks and the escape of the water, three bodies
lay apparently lifeless.  Barbicane, Nicholl, and Michel Ardan--
did they still breathe? or was the projectile nothing now but a
metal coffin, bearing three corpses into space?

Some minutes after the departure of the projectile, one of
the bodies moved, shook its arms, lifted its head, and finally
succeeded in getting on its knees.  It was Michel Ardan.  He felt
himself all over, gave a sonorous "Hem!" and then said:

"Michel Ardan is whole.  How about the others?"

The courageous Frenchman tried to rise, but could not stand.
His head swam, from the rush of blood; he was blind; he was a
drunken man.

"Bur-r!" said he.  "It produces the same effect as two bottles
of Corton, though perhaps less agreeable to swallow."
Then, passing his hand several times across his forehead and
rubbing his temples, he called in a firm voice:

"Nicholl!  Barbicane!"

He waited anxiously.  No answer; not even a sigh to show that
the hearts of his companions were still beating.  He called again.
The same silence.

"The devil!" he exclaimed.  "They look as if they had fallen
from a fifth story on their heads.  Bah!" he added, with that
imperturbable confidence which nothing could check, "if a
Frenchman can get on his knees, two Americans ought to be able
to get on their feet.  But first let us light up."

Ardan felt the tide of life return by degrees.  His blood became
calm, and returned to its accustomed circulation.  Another effort
restored his equilibrium.  He succeeded in rising, drew a match
from his pocket, and approaching the burner lighted it.
The receiver had not suffered at all.  The gas had not escaped.
Besides, the smell would have betrayed it; and in that case
Michel Ardan could not have carried a lighted match with
impunity through the space filled with hydrogen.  The gas mixing
with the air would have produced a detonating mixture, and the
explosion would have finished what the shock had perhaps begun.
When the burner was lit, Ardan leaned over the bodies of his
companions:  they were lying one on the other, an inert mass,
Nicholl above, Barbicane underneath.

Ardan lifted the captain, propped him up against the divan, and
began to rub vigorously.  This means, used with judgment,
restored Nicholl, who opened his eyes, and instantly recovering
his presence of mind, seized Ardan's hand and looked around him.

"And Barbicane?" said he.

"Each in turn," replied Michel Ardan.  "I began with you,
Nicholl, because you were on the top.  Now let us look
to Barbicane."  Saying which, Ardan and Nicholl raised the
president of the Gun Club and laid him on the divan.  He seemed
to have suffered more than either of his companions; he was
bleeding, but Nicholl was reassured by finding that the
hemorrhage came from a slight wound on the shoulder, a mere
graze, which he bound up carefully.

Still, Barbicane was a long time coming to himself, which
frightened his friends, who did not spare friction.

"He breathes though," said Nicholl, putting his ear to the chest
of the wounded man.

"Yes," replied Ardan, "he breathes like a man who has some
notion of that daily operation.  Rub, Nicholl; let us rub harder."
And the two improvised practitioners worked so hard and so well
that Barbicane recovered his senses.  He opened his eyes, sat up,
took his two friends by the hands, and his first words were--

"Nicholl, are we moving?"

Nicholl and Ardan looked at each other; they had not yet
troubled themselves about the projectile; their first thought
had been for the traveler, not for the car.

"Well, are we really moving?" repeated Michel Ardan.

"Or quietly resting on the soil of Florida?" asked Nicholl.

"Or at the bottom of the Gulf of Mexico?" added Michel Ardan.

"What an idea!" exclaimed the president.

And this double hypothesis suggested by his companions had the
effect of recalling him to his senses.  In any case they could
not decide on the position of the projectile.  Its apparent
immovability, and the want of communication with the outside,
prevented them from solving the question.  Perhaps the projectile
was unwinding its course through space.  Perhaps after a short
rise it had fallen upon the earth, or even in the Gulf of Mexico--
a fall which the narrowness of the peninsula of Florida would
render not impossible.

The case was serious, the problem interesting, and one that must
be solved as soon as possible.  Thus, highly excited, Barbicane's
moral energy triumphed over physical weakness, and he rose to
his feet.  He listened.  Outside was perfect silence; but the
thick padding was enough to intercept all sounds coming from
the earth.  But one circumstance struck Barbicane, viz., that
the temperature inside the projectile was singularly high.
The president drew a thermometer from its case and consulted it.
The instrument showed 81@ Fahr.

"Yes," he exclaimed, "yes, we are moving!  This stifling heat,
penetrating through the partitions of the projectile, is
produced by its friction on the atmospheric strata.  It will
soon diminish, because we are already floating in space, and
after having nearly stifled, we shall have to suffer intense cold.

"What!" said Michel Ardan.  "According to your showing, Barbicane,
we are already beyond the limits of the terrestrial atmosphere?"

"Without a doubt, Michel.  Listen to me.  It is fifty-five
minutes past ten; we have been gone about eight minutes; and if
our initiatory speed has not been checked by the friction, six
seconds would be enough for us to pass through the forty miles
of atmosphere which surrounds the globe."

"Just so," replied Nicholl; "but in what proportion do you
estimate the diminution of speed by friction?"

"In the proportion of one-third, Nicholl.  This diminution is
considerable, but according to my calculations it is nothing less.
If, then, we had an initiatory speed of 12,000 yards, on leaving
the atmosphere this speed would be reduced to 9,165 yards.  In any
case we have already passed through this interval, and----"

"And then," said Michel Ardan, "friend Nicholl has lost his two
bets:  four thousand dollars because the Columbiad did not burst;
five thousand dollars because the projectile has risen more than
six miles.  Now, Nicholl, pay up."

"Let us prove it first," said the captain, "and we will
pay afterward.  It is quite possible that Barbicane's reasoning
is correct, and that I have lost my nine thousand dollars.  But a
new hypothesis presents itself to my mind, and it annuls the wager."

"What is that?" asked Barbicane quickly.

"The hypothesis that, for some reason or other, fire was never
set to the powder, and we have not started at all."

"My goodness, captain," exclaimed Michel Ardan, "that hypothesis
is not worthy of my brain!  It cannot be a serious one.  For have
we not been half annihilated by the shock?  Did I not recall you
to life?  Is not the president's shoulder still bleeding from the
blow it has received?"

"Granted," replied Nicholl; "but one question."

"Well, captain?"

"Did you hear the detonation, which certainly ought to be loud?"

"No," replied Ardan, much surprised; "certainly I did not hear
the detonation."

"And you, Barbicane?"

"Nor I, either."

"Very well," said Nicholl.

"Well now," murmured the president "why did we not hear the detonation?"

The three friends looked at each other with a disconcerted air.
It was quite an inexplicable phenomenon.  The projectile had
started, and consequently there must have been a detonation.

"Let us first find out where we are," said Barbicane, "and let
down this panel."

This very simple operation was soon accomplished.

The nuts which held the bolts to the outer plates of the
right-hand scuttle gave way under the pressure of the
English wrench.  These bolts were pushed outside, and the
buffers covered with India-rubber stopped up the holes which let
them through.  Immediately the outer plate fell back upon its
hinges like a porthole, and the lenticular glass which closed
the scuttle appeared.  A similar one was let into the thick
partition on the opposite side of the projectile, another in the
top of the dome, and finally a fourth in the middle of the base.
They could, therefore, make observations in four different
directions; the firmament by the side and most direct windows,
the earth or the moon by the upper and under openings in
the projectile.

Barbicane and his two companions immediately rushed to the
uncovered window.  But it was lit by no ray of light.
Profound darkness surrounded them, which, however, did not
prevent the president from exclaiming:

"No, my friends, we have not fallen back upon the earth; no, nor
are we submerged in the Gulf of Mexico.  Yes! we are mounting
into space.  See those stars shining in the night, and that
impenetrable darkness heaped up between the earth and us!"

"Hurrah! hurrah!" exclaimed Michel Ardan and Nicholl in one voice.

Indeed, this thick darkness proved that the projectile had left
the earth, for the soil, brilliantly lit by the moon-beams would
have been visible to the travelers, if they had been lying on
its surface.  This darkness also showed that the projectile had
passed the atmospheric strata, for the diffused light spread in
the air would have been reflected on the metal walls, which
reflection was wanting.  This light would have lit the window,
and the window was dark.  Doubt was no longer possible; the
travelers had left the earth.

"I have lost," said Nicholl.

"I congratulate you," replied Ardan.

"Here are the nine thousand dollars," said the captain, drawing
a roll of paper dollars from his pocket.

"Will you have a receipt for it?" asked Barbicane, taking the sum.

"If you do not mind," answered Nicholl; "it is more business-like."

And coolly and seriously, as if he had been at his strong-box,
the president drew forth his notebook, tore out a blank leaf,
wrote a proper receipt in pencil, dated and signed it with the
usual flourish, [1] and gave it to the captain, who carefully placed
it in his pocketbook.  Michel Ardan, taking off his hat, bowed to
his two companions without speaking.  So much formality under such
circumstances left him speechless.  He had never before seen
anything so "American."

[1] This is a purely French habit.

This affair settled, Barbicane and Nicholl had returned to the
window, and were watching the constellations.  The stars looked
like bright points on the black sky.  But from that side they
could not see the orb of night, which, traveling from east to
west, would rise by degrees toward the zenith.  Its absence drew
the following remark from Ardan:

"And the moon; will she perchance fail at our rendezvous?"

"Do not alarm yourself," said Barbicane; "our future globe is at
its post, but we cannot see her from this side; let us open the other."

"As Barbicane was about leaving the window to open the opposite
scuttle, his attention was attracted by the approach of a
brilliant object.  It was an enormous disc, whose colossal
dimension could not be estimated.  Its face, which was turned to
the earth, was very bright.  One might have thought it a small
moon reflecting the light of the large one.  She advanced with
great speed, and seemed to describe an orbit round the earth,
which would intersect the passage of the projectile.  This body
revolved upon its axis, and exhibited the phenomena of all
celestial bodies abandoned in space.

"Ah!" exclaimed Michel Ardan, "What is that? another projectile?"

Barbicane did not answer.  The appearance of this enormous body
surprised and troubled him.  A collision was possible, and might
be attended with deplorable results; either the projectile would
deviate from its path, or a shock, breaking its impetus, might
precipitate it to earth; or, lastly, it might be irresistibly
drawn away by the powerful asteroid.  The president caught at a
glance the consequences of these three hypotheses, either of
which would, one way or the other, bring their experiment to an
unsuccessful and fatal termination.  His companions stood
silently looking into space.  The object grew rapidly as it
approached them, and by an optical illusion the projectile
seemed to be throwing itself before it.

"By Jove!" exclaimed Michel Ardan, "we shall run into one another!"

Instinctively the travelers drew back.  Their dread was great,
but it did not last many seconds.  The asteroid passed several
hundred yards from the projectile and disappeared, not so much
from the rapidity of its course, as that its face being opposite
the moon, it was suddenly merged into the perfect darkness of space.

"A happy journey to you," exclaimed Michel Ardan, with a sigh
of relief.  "Surely infinity of space is large enough for a poor
little projectile to walk through without fear.  Now, what is
this portentous globe which nearly struck us?"

"I know," replied Barbicane.

"Oh, indeed! you know everything."

"It is," said Barbicane, "a simple meteorite, but an enormous one,
which the attraction of the earth has retained as a satellite."

"Is it possible!" exclaimed Michel Ardan; "the earth then has
two moons like Neptune?"

"Yes, my friends, two moons, though it passes generally for
having only one; but this second moon is so small, and its
speed so great, that the inhabitants of the earth cannot see it.
It was by noticing disturbances that a French astronomer, M. Petit,
was able to determine the existence of this second satellite and
calculate its elements.  According to his observations, this
meteorite will accomplish its revolution around the earth in
three hours and twenty minutes, which implies a wonderful rate
of speed."

"Do all astronomers admit the existence of this satellite?"
asked Nicholl.

"No," replied Barbicane; "but if, like us, they had met it, they
could no longer doubt it.  Indeed, I think that this meteorite,
which, had it struck the projectile, would have much embarrassed
us, will give us the means of deciding what our position in
space is."

"How?" said Ardan.

"Because its distance is known, and when we met it, we were
exactly four thousand six hundred and fifty miles from the
surface of the terrestrial globe."

"More than two thousand French leagues," exclaimed Michel Ardan.
"That beats the express trains of the pitiful globe called the earth."

"I should think so," replied Nicholl, consulting his
chronometer; "it is eleven o'clock, and it is only thirteen
minutes since we left the American continent."

"Only thirteen minutes?" said Barbicane.

"Yes," said Nicholl; "and if our initiatory speed of twelve
thousand yards has been kept up, we shall have made about twenty
thousand miles in the hour."

"That is all very well, my friends," said the president, "but
the insoluble question still remains.  Why did we not hear the
detonation of the Columbiad?"

For want of an answer the conversation dropped, and Barbicane
began thoughtfully to let down the shutter of the second side.
He succeeded; and through the uncovered glass the moon filled
the projectile with a brilliant light.  Nicholl, as an
economical man, put out the gas, now useless, and whose
brilliancy prevented any observation of the inter-planetary space.

The lunar disc shone with wonderful purity.  Her rays, no longer
filtered through the vapory atmosphere of the terrestrial globe,
shone through the glass, filling the air in the interior of the
projectile with silvery reflections.  The black curtain of the
firmament in reality heightened the moon's brilliancy, which in
this void of ether unfavorable to diffusion did not eclipse the
neighboring stars.  The heavens, thus seen, presented quite a
new aspect, and one which the human eye could never dream of.
One may conceive the interest with which these bold men watched
the orb of night, the great aim of their journey.

In its motion the earth's satellite was insensibly nearing the
zenith, the mathematical point which it ought to attain
ninety-six hours later.  Her mountains, her plains, every
projection was as clearly discernible to their eyes as if they
were observing it from some spot upon the earth; but its light
was developed through space with wonderful intensity.  The disc
shone like a platinum mirror.  Of the earth flying from under
their feet, the travelers had lost all recollection.

It was captain Nicholl who first recalled their attention to the
vanishing globe.

"Yes," said Michel Ardan, "do not let us be ungrateful to it.
Since we are leaving our country, let our last looks be directed
to it.  I wish to see the earth once more before it is quite
hidden from my eyes."

To satisfy his companions, Barbicane began to uncover the window
at the bottom of the projectile, which would allow them to
observe the earth direct.  The disc, which the force of the
projection had beaten down to the base, was removed, not
without difficulty.  Its fragments, placed carefully against a wall,
might serve again upon occasion.  Then a circular gap appeared,
nineteen inches in diameter, hollowed out of the lower part of
the projectile.  A glass cover, six inches thick and strengthened
with upper fastenings, closed it tightly.  Beneath was fixed an
aluminum plate, held in place by bolts.  The screws being undone,
and the bolts let go, the plate fell down, and visible
communication was established between the interior and the exterior.

Michel Ardan knelt by the glass.  It was cloudy, seemingly opaque.

"Well!" he exclaimed, "and the earth?"

"The earth?" said Barbicane.  "There it is."

"What! that little thread; that silver crescent?"

"Doubtless, Michel.  In four days, when the moon will be full,
at the very time we shall reach it, the earth will be new, and
will only appear to us as a slender crescent which will soon
disappear, and for some days will be enveloped in utter darkness."

"That the earth?" repeated Michel Ardan, looking with all his
eyes at the thin slip of his native planet.

The explanation given by President Barbicane was correct.
The earth, with respect to the projectile, was entering its
last phase.  It was in its octant, and showed a crescent finely
traced on the dark background of the sky.  Its light, rendered
bluish by the thick strata of the atmosphere was less intense
than that of the crescent moon, but it was of considerable
dimensions, and looked like an enormous arch stretched across
the firmament.  Some parts brilliantly lighted, especially on
its concave part, showed the presence of high mountains, often
disappearing behind thick spots, which are never seen on the
lunar disc.  They were rings of clouds placed concentrically
round the terrestrial globe.

While the travelers were trying to pierce the profound darkness,
a brilliant cluster of shooting stars burst upon their eyes.
Hundreds of meteorites, ignited by the friction of the
atmosphere, irradiated the shadow of the luminous train, and
lined the cloudy parts of the disc with their fire.  At this
period the earth was in its perihelion, and the month of
December is so propitious to these shooting stars, that
astronomers have counted as many as twenty-four thousand in
an hour.  But Michel Ardan, disdaining scientific reasonings,
preferred thinking that the earth was thus saluting the
departure of her three children with her most brilliant fireworks.

Indeed this was all they saw of the globe lost in the solar
world, rising and setting to the great planets like a simple
morning or evening star!  This globe, where they had left all
their affections, was nothing more than a fugitive crescent!

Long did the three friends look without speaking, though united
in heart, while the projectile sped onward with an
ever-decreasing speed.  Then an irresistible drowsiness crept
over their brain.  Was it weariness of body and mind?  No doubt;
for after the over-excitement of those last hours passed upon
earth, reaction was inevitable.

"Well," said Nicholl, "since we must sleep, let us sleep."

And stretching themselves on their couches, they were all three
soon in a profound slumber.

But they had not forgotten themselves more than a quarter of an
hour, when Barbicane sat up suddenly, and rousing his companions
with a loud voice, exclaimed----

"I have found it!"

"What have you found?" asked Michel Ardan, jumping from his bed.

"The reason why we did not hear the detonation of the Columbiad."

"And it is----?" said Nicholl.

"Because our projectile traveled faster than the sound!"





CHAPTER III


THEIR PLACE OF SHELTER


This curious but certainly correct explanation once given, the
three friends returned to their slumbers.  Could they have found
a calmer or more peaceful spot to sleep in?  On the earth,
houses, towns, cottages, and country feel every shock given to
the exterior of the globe.  On sea, the vessels rocked by the
waves are still in motion; in the air, the balloon oscillates
incessantly on the fluid strata of divers densities.
This projectile alone, floating in perfect space, in the midst
of perfect silence, offered perfect repose.

Thus the sleep of our adventurous travelers might have been
indefinitely prolonged, if an unexpected noise had not awakened
them at about seven o'clock in the morning of the 2nd of
December, eight hours after their departure.

This noise was a very natural barking.

"The dogs! it is the dogs!" exclaimed Michel Ardan, rising at once.

"They are hungry," said Nicholl.

"By Jove!" replied Michel, "we have forgotten them."

"Where are they?" asked Barbicane.

They looked and found one of the animals crouched under the divan.
Terrified and shaken by the initiatory shock, it had remained
in the corner till its voice returned with the pangs of hunger.
It was the amiable Diana, still very confused, who crept out of
her retreat, though not without much persuasion, Michel Ardan
encouraging her with most gracious words.

"Come, Diana," said he:  "come, my girl! thou whose destiny will
be marked in the cynegetic annals; thou whom the pagans would
have given as companion to the god Anubis, and Christians as
friend to St. Roch; thou who art rushing into interplanetary
space, and wilt perhaps be the Eve of all Selenite dogs! come,
Diana, come here."

Diana, flattered or not, advanced by degrees, uttering
plaintive cries.

"Good," said Barbicane:  "I see Eve, but where is Adam?"

"Adam?" replied Michel; "Adam cannot be far off; he is there
somewhere; we must call him.  Satellite! here, Satellite!"

But Satellite did not appear.  Diana would not leave off howling.
They found, however, that she was not bruised, and they gave her
a pie, which silenced her complaints.  As to Satellite, he seemed
quite lost.  They had to hunt a long time before finding him in
one of the upper compartments of the projectile, whither some
unaccountable shock must have violently hurled him.  The poor
beast, much hurt, was in a piteous state.

"The devil!" said Michel.

They brought the unfortunate dog down with great care.  Its skull
had been broken against the roof, and it seemed unlikely that he
could recover from such a shock.  Meanwhile, he was stretched
comfortably on a cushion.  Once there, he heaved a sigh.

"We will take care of you," said Michel; "we are responsible for
your existence.  I would rather lose an arm than a paw of my
poor Satellite."

Saying which, he offered some water to the wounded dog, who
swallowed it with avidity.

This attention paid, the travelers watched the earth and the
moon attentively.  The earth was now only discernible by a
cloudy disc ending in a crescent, rather more contracted than
that of the previous evening; but its expanse was still
enormous, compared with that of the moon, which was approaching
nearer and nearer to a perfect circle.

"By Jove!" said Michel Ardan, "I am really sorry that we did not
start when the earth was full, that is to say, when our globe
was in opposition to the sun."

"Why?" said Nicholl.

"Because we should have seen our continents and seas in a new
light-- the first resplendent under the solar rays, the latter
cloudy as represented on some maps of the world.  I should like
to have seen those poles of the earth on which the eye of man
has never yet rested.

"I dare say," replied Barbicane; "but if the earth had been
_full_, the moon would have been _new_; that is to say,
invisible, because of the rays of the sun.  It is better
for us to see the destination we wish to reach, than the point
of departure."

"You are right, Barbicane," replied Captain Nicholl; "and,
besides, when we have reached the moon, we shall have time
during the long lunar nights to consider at our leisure the
globe on which our likenesses swarm."

"Our likenesses!" exclaimed Michel Ardan; "They are no more our
likenesses than the Selenites are!  We inhabit a new world,
peopled by ourselves-- the projectile!  I am Barbicane's
likeness, and Barbicane is Nicholl's.  Beyond us, around us,
human nature is at an end, and we are the only population of
this microcosm until we become pure Selenites."

"In about eighty-eight hours," replied the captain.

"Which means to say?" asked Michel Ardan.

"That it is half-past eight," replied Nicholl.

"Very well," retorted Michel; "then it is impossible for me to
find even the shadow of a reason why we should not go to breakfast."

Indeed the inhabitants of the new star could not live without
eating, and their stomachs were suffering from the imperious
laws of hunger.  Michel Ardan, as a Frenchman, was declared
chief cook, an important function, which raised no rival.
The gas gave sufficient heat for the culinary apparatus, and
the provision box furnished the elements of this first feast.

The breakfast began with three bowls of excellent soup, thanks to
the liquefaction in hot water of those precious cakes of Liebig,
prepared from the best parts of the ruminants of the Pampas.
To the soup succeeded some beefsteaks, compressed by an hydraulic
press, as tender and succulent as if brought straight from the
kitchen of an English eating-house.  Michel, who was imaginative,
maintained that they were even "red."

Preserved vegetables ("fresher than nature," said the amiable
Michel) succeeded the dish of meat; and was followed by some
cups of tea with bread and butter, after the American fashion.

The beverage was declared exquisite, and was due to the
infusion of the choicest leaves, of which the emperor of Russia
had given some chests for the benefit of the travelers.

And lastly, to crown the repast, Ardan had brought out a fine
bottle of Nuits, which was found "by chance" in the
provision-box.  The three friends drank to the union of the
earth and her satellite.

And, as if he had not already done enough for the generous wine
which he had distilled on the slopes of Burgundy, the sun chose
to be part of the party.  At this moment the projectile emerged
from the conical shadow cast by the terrestrial globe, and the
rays of the radiant orb struck the lower disc of the projectile
direct occasioned by the angle which the moon's orbit makes with
that of the earth.

"The sun!" exclaimed Michel Ardan.

"No doubt," replied Barbicane; "I expected it."

"But," said Michel, "the conical shadow which the earth leaves
in space extends beyond the moon?"

"Far beyond it, if the atmospheric refraction is not taken into
consideration," said Barbicane.  "But when the moon is enveloped
in this shadow, it is because the centers of the three stars,
the sun, the earth, and the moon, are all in one and the same
straight line.  Then the _nodes_ coincide with the _phases_ of
the moon, and there is an eclipse.  If we had started when there
was an eclipse of the moon, all our passage would have been in
the shadow, which would have been a pity."

"Why?"

"Because, though we are floating in space, our projectile,
bathed in the solar rays, will receive light and heat.
It economizes the gas, which is in every respect a good economy."

Indeed, under these rays which no atmosphere can temper, either
in temperature or brilliancy, the projectile grew warm and
bright, as if it had passed suddenly from winter to summer.
The moon above, the sun beneath, were inundating it with their fire.

"It is pleasant here," said Nicholl.

"I should think so," said Michel Ardan.  "With a little earth
spread on our aluminum planet we should have green peas in
twenty-four hours.  I have but one fear, which is that the
walls of the projectile might melt."

"Calm yourself, my worthy friend," replied Barbicane; "the
projectile withstood a very much higher temperature than this as
it slid through the strata of the atmosphere.  I should not be
surprised if it did not look like a meteor on fire to the eyes
of the spectators in Florida."

"But then J. T. Maston will think we are roasted!"

"What astonishes me," said Barbicane, "is that we have not been.
That was a danger we had not provided for."

"I feared it," said Nicholl simply.

"And you never mentioned it, my sublime captain," exclaimed
Michel Ardan, clasping his friend's hand.

Barbicane now began to settle himself in the projectile as if he
was never to leave it.  One must remember that this aerial car
had a base with a _superficies_ of fifty-four square feet.
Its height to the roof was twelve feet.  Carefully laid out in
the inside, and little encumbered by instruments and traveling
utensils, which each had their particular place, it left the
three travelers a certain freedom of movement.  The thick window
inserted in the bottom could bear any amount of weight, and
Barbicane and his companions walked upon it as if it were solid
plank; but the sun striking it directly with its rays lit the
interior of the projectile from beneath, thus producing singular
effects of light.

They began by investigating the state of their store of water
and provisions, neither of which had suffered, thanks to the
care taken to deaden the shock.  Their provisions were abundant,
and plentiful enough to last the three travelers for more than
a year.  Barbicane wished to be cautious, in case the projectile
should land on a part of the moon which was utterly barren.
As to water and the reserve of brandy, which consisted of fifty
gallons, there was only enough for two months; but according to
the last observations of astronomers, the moon had a low, dense,
and thick atmosphere, at least in the deep valleys, and there
springs and streams could not fail.  Thus, during their passage,
and for the first year of their settlement on the lunar
continent, these adventurous explorers would suffer neither
hunger nor thirst.

Now about the air in the projectile.  There, too, they were secure.
Reiset and Regnaut's apparatus, intended for the production of
oxygen, was supplied with chlorate of potassium for two months.
They necessarily consumed a certain quantity of gas, for they
were obliged to keep the producing substance at a temperature
of above 400@.  But there again they were all safe.  The apparatus
only wanted a little care.  But it was not enough to renew the
oxygen; they must absorb the carbonic acid produced by expiration.
During the last twelve hours the atmosphere of the projectile had
become charged with this deleterious gas.  Nicholl discovered
the state of the air by observing Diana panting painfully.
The carbonic acid, by a phenomenon similar to that produced in
the famous Grotto del Cane, had collected at the bottom of the
projectile owing to its weight.  Poor Diana, with her head low,
would suffer before her masters from the presence of this gas.
But Captain Nicholl hastened to remedy this state of things,
by placing on the floor several receivers containing caustic
potash, which he shook about for a time, and this substance,
greedy of carbonic acid, soon completely absorbed it, thus
purifying the air.

An inventory of instruments was then begun.  The thermometers
and barometers had resisted, all but one minimum thermometer,
the glass of which was broken.  An excellent aneroid was drawn
from the wadded box which contained it and hung on the wall.
Of course it was only affected by and marked the pressure of the
air inside the projectile, but it also showed the quantity of
moisture which it contained.  At that moment its needle
oscillated between 25.24 and 25.08.

It was fine weather.

Barbicane had also brought several compasses, which he found intact.
One must understand that under present conditions their needles
were acting _wildly_, that is without any _constant_ direction.
Indeed, at the distance they were from the earth, the magnetic
pole could have no perceptible action upon the apparatus; but
the box placed on the lunar disc might perhaps exhibit some
strange phenomena.  In any case it would be interesting to see
whether the earth's satellite submitted like herself to its
magnetic influence.

A hypsometer to measure the height of the lunar mountains, a
sextant to take the height of the sun, glasses which would be
useful as they neared the moon, all these instruments were
carefully looked over, and pronounced good in spite of the
violent shock.

As to the pickaxes and different tools which were Nicholl's
especial choice; as to the sacks of different kinds of grain and
shrubs which Michel Ardan hoped to transplant into Selenite
ground, they were stowed away in the upper part of the projectile.
There was a sort of granary there, loaded with things which the
extravagant Frenchman had heaped up.  What they were no one knew,
and the good-tempered fellow did not explain.  Now and then he
climbed up by cramp-irons riveted to the walls, but kept the
inspection to himself.  He arranged and rearranged, he plunged
his hand rapidly into certain mysterious boxes, singing in one
of the falsest of voices an old French refrain to enliven
the situation.

Barbicane observed with some interest that his guns and other
arms had not been damaged.  These were important, because,
heavily loaded, they were to help lessen the fall of the
projectile, when drawn by the lunar attraction (after having
passed the point of neutral attraction) on to the moon's
surface; a fall which ought to be six times less rapid than it
would have been on the earth's surface, thanks to the difference
of bulk.  The inspection ended with general satisfaction, when
each returned to watch space through the side windows and the
lower glass coverlid.

There was the same view.  The whole extent of the celestial
sphere swarmed with stars and constellations of wonderful
purity, enough to drive an astronomer out of his mind!  On one
side the sun, like the mouth of a lighted oven, a dazzling disc
without a halo, standing out on the dark background of the sky!
On the other, the moon returning its fire by reflection, and
apparently motionless in the midst of the starry world.  Then, a
large spot seemingly nailed to the firmament, bordered by a
silvery cord; it was the earth!  Here and there nebulous masses
like large flakes of starry snow; and from the zenith to the nadir,
an immense ring formed by an impalpable dust of stars, the "Milky
Way," in the midst of which the sun ranks only as a star of the
fourth magnitude.  The observers could not take their eyes from
this novel spectacle, of which no description could give an
adequate idea.  What reflections it suggested!  What emotions
hitherto unknown awoke in their souls!  Barbicane wished to begin
the relation of his journey while under its first impressions,
and hour after hour took notes of all facts happening in the
beginning of the enterprise.  He wrote quietly, with his large
square writing, in a business-like style.

During this time Nicholl, the calculator, looked over the
minutes of their passage, and worked out figures with
unparalleled dexterity.  Michel Ardan chatted first with
Barbicane, who did not answer him, and then with Nicholl, who
did not hear him, with Diana, who understood none of his
theories, and lastly with himself, questioning and answering,
going and coming, busy with a thousand details; at one time bent
over the lower glass, at another roosting in the heights of the
projectile, and always singing.  In this microcosm he
represented French loquacity and excitability, and we beg you to
believe that they were well represented.  The day, or rather
(for the expression is not correct) the lapse of twelve hours,
which forms a day upon the earth, closed with a plentiful supper
carefully prepared.  No accident of any nature had yet happened
to shake the travelers' confidence; so, full of hope, already
sure of success, they slept peacefully, while the projectile
under an uniformly decreasing speed was crossing the sky.





CHAPTER IV


A LITTLE ALGEBRA


The night passed without incident.  The word "night," however,
is scarcely applicable.

The position of the projectile with regard to the sun did
not change.  Astronomically, it was daylight on the lower part,
and night on the upper; so when during this narrative these
words are used, they represent the lapse of time between rising
and setting of the sun upon the earth.

The travelers' sleep was rendered more peaceful by the
projectile's excessive speed, for it seemed absolutely motionless.
Not a motion betrayed its onward course through space.  The rate
of progress, however rapid it might be, cannot produce any
sensible effect on the human frame when it takes place in a
vacuum, or when the mass of air circulates with the body which
is carried with it.  What inhabitant of the earth perceives its
speed, which, however, is at the rate of 68,000 miles per hour?
Motion under such conditions is "felt" no more than repose; and
when a body is in repose it will remain so as long as no strange
force displaces it; if moving, it will not stop unless an
obstacle comes in its way.  This indifference to motion or
repose is called inertia.

Barbicane and his companions might have believed themselves
perfectly stationary, being shut up in the projectile; indeed,
the effect would have been the same if they had been on the
outside of it.  Had it not been for the moon, which was
increasing above them, they might have sworn that they were
floating in complete stagnation.

That morning, the 3rd of December, the travelers were awakened by
a joyous but unexpected noise; it was the crowing of a cock
which sounded through the car.  Michel Ardan, who was the first
on his feet, climbed to the top of the projectile, and shutting
a box, the lid of which was partly open, said in a low voice,
"Will you hold your tongue?  That creature will spoil my design!"

But Nicholl and Barbicane were awake.

"A cock!" said Nicholl.

"Why no, my friends," Michel answered quickly; "it was I who
wished to awake you by this rural sound."  So saying, he gave
vent to a splendid cock-a-doodledoo, which would have done honor
to the proudest of poultry-yards.

The two Americans could not help laughing.

"Fine talent that," said Nicholl, looking suspiciously at his companion.

"Yes," said Michel; "a joke in my country.  It is very Gallic;
they play the cock so in the best society."

Then turning the conversation:

"Barbicane, do you know what I have been thinking of all night?"

"No," answered the president.

"Of our Cambridge friends.  You have already remarked that I am
an ignoramus in mathematical subjects; and it is impossible for
me to find out how the savants of the observatory were able to
calculate what initiatory speed the projectile ought to have on
leaving the Columbiad in order to attain the moon."

"You mean to say," replied Barbicane, "to attain that neutral
point where the terrestrial and lunar attractions are equal;
for, starting from that point, situated about nine-tenths of the
distance traveled over, the projectile would simply fall upon
the moon, on account of its weight."

"So be it," said Michel; "but, once more; how could they
calculate the initiatory speed?"

"Nothing can be easier," replied Barbicane.

"And you knew how to make that calculation?" asked Michel Ardan.

"Perfectly.  Nicholl and I would have made it, if the
observatory had not saved us the trouble."

"Very well, old Barbicane," replied Michel; "they might have cut
off my head, beginning at my feet, before they could have made
me solve that problem."

"Because you do not know algebra," answered Barbicane quietly.

"Ah, there you are, you eaters of _x_^1; you think you have said
all when you have said `Algebra.'"

"Michel," said Barbicane, "can you use a forge without a hammer,
or a plow without a plowshare?"

"Hardly."

"Well, algebra is a tool, like the plow or the hammer, and a
good tool to those who know how to use it."

"Seriously?"

"Quite seriously."

"And can you use that tool in my presence?"

"If it will interest you."

"And show me how they calculated the initiatory speed of our car?"

"Yes, my worthy friend; taking into consideration all the
elements of the problem, the distance from the center of the
earth to the center of the moon, of the radius of the earth, of
its bulk, and of the bulk of the moon, I can tell exactly what
ought to be the initiatory speed of the projectile, and that by
a simple formula."

"Let us see."

"You shall see it; only I shall not give you the real course
drawn by the projectile between the moon and the earth in
considering their motion round the sun.  No, I shall consider
these two orbs as perfectly motionless, which will answer all
our purpose."

"And why?"

"Because it will be trying to solve the problem called `the
problem of the three bodies,' for which the integral calculus is
not yet far enough advanced."

"Then," said Michel Ardan, in his sly tone, "mathematics have
not said their last word?"

"Certainly not," replied Barbicane.

"Well, perhaps the Selenites have carried the integral calculus
farther than you have; and, by the bye, what is this
`integral calculus?'"

"It is a calculation the converse of the differential," replied
Barbicane seriously.

"Much obliged; it is all very clear, no doubt."

"And now," continued Barbicane, "a slip of paper and a bit of
pencil, and before a half-hour is over I will have found the
required formula."

Half an hour had not elapsed before Barbicane, raising his head,
showed Michel Ardan a page covered with algebraical signs, in
which the general formula for the solution was contained.

"Well, and does Nicholl understand what that means?"

"Of course, Michel," replied the captain.  "All these signs,
which seem cabalistic to you, form the plainest, the clearest,
and the most logical language to those who know how to read it."

"And you pretend, Nicholl," asked Michel, "that by means of
these hieroglyphics, more incomprehensible than the Egyptian
Ibis, you can find what initiatory speed it was necessary to
give the projectile?"

"Incontestably," replied Nicholl; "and even by this same formula
I can always tell you its speed at any point of its transit."

"On your word?"

"On my word."

"Then you are as cunning as our president."

"No, Michel; the difficult part is what Barbicane has done; that
is, to get an equation which shall satisfy all the conditions of
the problem.  The remainder is only a question of arithmetic,
requiring merely the knowledge of the four rules."

"That is something!" replied Michel Ardan, who for his life
could not do addition right, and who defined the rule as a
Chinese puzzle, which allowed one to obtain all sorts of totals.

"The expression _v_ zero, which you see in that equation, is the
speed which the projectile will have on leaving the atmosphere."

"Just so," said Nicholl; "it is from that point that we must
calculate the velocity, since we know already that the velocity
at departure was exactly one and a half times more than on
leaving the atmosphere."

"I understand no more," said Michel.

"It is a very simple calculation," said Barbicane.

"Not as simple as I am," retorted Michel.

"That means, that when our projectile reached the limits of the
terrestrial atmosphere it had already lost one-third of its
initiatory speed."

"As much as that?"

"Yes, my friend; merely by friction against the atmospheric strata.
You understand that the faster it goes the more resistance it meets
with from the air."

"That I admit," answered Michel; "and I understand it,
although your x's and zero's, and algebraic formula, are
rattling in my head like nails in a bag."

"First effects of algebra," replied Barbicane; "and now, to
finish, we are going to prove the given number of these
different expressions, that is, work out their value."

"Finish me!" replied Michel.

Barbicane took the paper, and began to make his calculations
with great rapidity.  Nicholl looked over and greedily read the
work as it proceeded.

"That's it! that's it!" at last he cried.

"Is it clear?" asked Barbicane.

"It is written in letters of fire," said Nicholl.

"Wonderful fellows!" muttered Ardan.

"Do you understand it at last?" asked Barbicane.

"Do I understand it?" cried Ardan; "my head is splitting with it."

"And now," said Nicholl, "to find out the speed of the
projectile when it leaves the atmosphere, we have only to
calculate that."

The captain, as a practical man equal to all difficulties, began
to write with frightful rapidity.  Divisions and multiplications
grew under his fingers; the figures were like hail on the white page.
Barbicane watched him, while Michel Ardan nursed a growing headache
with both hands.

"Very well?" asked Barbicane, after some minutes' silence.

"Well!" replied Nicholl; every calculation made, _v_ zero, that
is to say, the speed necessary for the projectile on leaving the
atmosphere, to enable it to reach the equal point of attraction,
ought to be----"

"Yes?" said Barbicane.

"Twelve thousand yards."

"What!" exclaimed Barbicane, starting; "you say----"

"Twelve thousand yards."

"The devil!" cried the president, making a gesture of despair.

"What is the matter?" asked Michel Ardan, much surprised.

"What is the matter! why, if at this moment our speed had
already diminished one-third by friction, the initiatory speed
ought to have been----"

"Seventeen thousand yards."

"And the Cambridge Observatory declared that twelve thousand
yards was enough at starting; and our projectile, which only
started with that speed----"

"Well?" asked Nicholl.

"Well, it will not be enough."

"Good."

"We shall not be able to reach the neutral point."

"The deuce!"

"We shall not even get halfway."

"In the name of the projectile!" exclaimed Michel Ardan, jumping
as if it was already on the point of striking the terrestrial globe.

"And we shall fall back upon the earth!"





CHAPTER V


THE COLD OF SPACE


This revelation came like a thunderbolt.  Who could have
expected such an error in calculation?  Barbicane would not
believe it.  Nicholl revised his figures: they were exact.
As to the formula which had determined them, they could not
suspect its truth; it was evident that an initiatory velocity of
seventeen thousand yards in the first second was necessary to
enable them to reach the neutral point.

The three friends looked at each other silently.  There was no
thought of breakfast.  Barbicane, with clenched teeth, knitted
brows, and hands clasped convulsively, was watching through
the window.  Nicholl had crossed his arms, and was examining
his calculations.  Michel Ardan was muttering:

"That is just like these scientific men:  they never do anything else.
I would give twenty pistoles if we could fall upon the Cambridge
Observatory and crush it, together with the whole lot of dabblers
in figures which it contains."

Suddenly a thought struck the captain, which he at once
communicated to Barbicane.

"Ah!" said he; "it is seven o'clock in the morning; we have
already been gone thirty-two hours; more than half our passage
is over, and we are not falling that I am aware of."

Barbicane did not answer, but after a rapid glance at the
captain, took a pair of compasses wherewith to measure the
angular distance of the terrestrial globe; then from the lower
window he took an exact observation, and noticed that the
projectile was apparently stationary.  Then rising and wiping
his forehead, on which large drops of perspiration were
standing, he put some figures on paper.  Nicholl understood that
the president was deducting from the terrestrial diameter the
projectile's distance from the earth.  He watched him anxiously.

"No," exclaimed Barbicane, after some moments, "no, we are not
falling! no, we are already more than 50,000 leagues from the earth.
We have passed the point at which the projectile would have stopped
if its speed had only been 12,000 yards at starting.  We are still
going up."

"That is evident," replied Nicholl; "and we must conclude that
our initial speed, under the power of the 400,000 pounds of
gun-cotton, must have exceeded the required 12,000 yards.
Now I can understand how, after thirteen minutes only, we met the
second satellite, which gravitates round the earth at more than
2,000 leagues' distance."

"And this explanation is the more probable," added Barbicane,
"Because, in throwing off the water enclosed between its
partition-breaks, the projectile found itself lightened of a
considerable weight."

"Just so," said Nicholl.

"Ah, my brave Nicholl, we are saved!"

"Very well then," said Michel Ardan quietly; "as we are safe,
let us have breakfast."

Nicholl was not mistaken.  The initial speed had been, very
fortunately, much above that estimated by the Cambridge
Observatory; but the Cambridge Observatory had nevertheless made
a mistake.

The travelers, recovered from this false alarm, breakfasted merrily.
If they ate a good deal, they talked more.  Their confidence was
greater after than before "the incident of the algebra."

"Why should we not succeed?" said Michel Ardan; "why should we
not arrive safely?  We are launched; we have no obstacle before
us, no stones in the way; the road is open, more so than that of
a ship battling with the sea; more open than that of a balloon
battling with the wind; and if a ship can reach its destination,
a balloon go where it pleases, why cannot our projectile attain
its end and aim?"

"It _will_ attain it," said Barbicane.

"If only to do honor to the Americans," added Michel Ardan, "the
only people who could bring such an enterprise to a happy termination,
and the only one which could produce a President Barbicane.  Ah, now
we are no longer uneasy, I begin to think, What will become of us?
We shall get right royally weary."

Barbicane and Nicholl made a gesture of denial.

"But I have provided for the contingency, my friends," replied
Michel; "you have only to speak, and I have chess, draughts,
cards, and dominoes at your disposal; nothing is wanting but a
billiard-table."

"What!" exclaimed Barbicane; "you brought away such trifles?"

"Certainly," replied Michel, "and not only to distract
ourselves, but also with the laudable intention of endowing the
Selenite smoking divans with them."

"My friend," said Barbicane, "if the moon is inhabited, its
inhabitants must have appeared some thousands of years before
those of the earth, for we cannot doubt that their star is much
older than ours.  If then these Selenites have existed their
hundreds of thousands of years, and if their brain is of the same
organization of the human brain, they have already invented all
that we have invented, and even what we may invent in future ages.
They have nothing to learn from _us_, and we have everything to
learn from _them_."

"What!" said Michel; "you believe that they have artists like
Phidias, Michael Angelo, or Raphael?"

"Yes."

"Poets like Homer, Virgil, Milton, Lamartine, and Hugo?"

"I am sure of it."

"Philosophers like Plato, Aristotle, Descartes, Kant?"

"I have no doubt of it."

"Scientific men like Archimedes, Euclid, Pascal, Newton?"

"I could swear it."

"Comic writers like Arnal, and photographers like-- like Nadar?"

"Certain."

"Then, friend Barbicane, if they are as strong as we are, and
even stronger-- these Selenites-- why have they not tried to
communicate with the earth? why have they not launched a lunar
projectile to our terrestrial regions?"

"Who told you that they have never done so?" said Barbicane seriously.

"Indeed," added Nicholl, "it would be easier for them than for
us, for two reasons; first, because the attraction on the moon's
surface is six times less than on that of the earth, which would
allow a projectile to rise more easily; secondly, because it
would be enough to send such a projectile only at 8,000 leagues
instead of 80,000, which would require the force of projection
to be ten times less strong."

"Then," continued Michel, "I repeat it, why have they not done it?"

"And I repeat," said Barbicane; "who told you that they have not
done it?"

"When?"

"Thousands of years before man appeared on earth."

"And the projectile-- where is the projectile?  I demand to see
the projectile."

"My friend," replied Barbicane, "the sea covers five-sixths of
our globe.  From that we may draw five good reasons for
supposing that the lunar projectile, if ever launched, is now at
the bottom of the Atlantic or the Pacific, unless it sped into
some crevasse at that period when the crust of the earth was not
yet hardened."

"Old Barbicane," said Michel, "you have an answer for
everything, and I bow before your wisdom.  But there is one
hypothesis that would suit me better than all the others, which
is, the Selenites, being older than we, are wiser, and have not
invented gunpowder."

At this moment Diana joined in the conversation by a sonorous barking.
She was asking for her breakfast.

"Ah!" said Michel Ardan, "in our discussion we have forgotten
Diana and Satellite."

Immediately a good-sized pie was given to the dog, which
devoured it hungrily.

"Do you see, Barbicane," said Michel, "we should have made a
second Noah's ark of this projectile, and borne with us to the
moon a couple of every kind of domestic animal."

"I dare say; but room would have failed us."

"Oh!" said Michel, "we might have squeezed a little."

"The fact is," replied Nicholl, "that cows, bulls, and horses,
and all ruminants, would have been very useful on the lunar
continent, but unfortunately the car could neither have been
made a stable nor a shed."

"Well, we might have at least brought a donkey, only a little
donkey; that courageous beast which old Silenus loved to mount.
I love those old donkeys; they are the least favored animals in
creation; they are not only beaten while alive, but even after
they are dead."

"How do you make that out?" asked Barbicane.  "Why," said
Michel, "they make their skins into drums."

Barbicane and Nicholl could not help laughing at this ridiculous remark.
But a cry from their merry companion stopped them.  The latter was
leaning over the spot where Satellite lay.  He rose, saying:

"My good Satellite is no longer ill."

"Ah!" said Nicholl.

"No," answered Michel, "he is dead!  There," added he, in a
piteous tone, "that is embarrassing.  I much fear, my poor
Diana, that you will leave no progeny in the lunar regions!"

Indeed the unfortunate Satellite had not survived its wound.
It was quite dead.  Michel Ardan looked at his friends with a
rueful countenance.

"One question presents itself," said Barbicane.  "We cannot keep
the dead body of this dog with us for the next forty-eight hours."

"No! certainly not," replied Nicholl; "but our scuttles are
fixed on hinges; they can be let down.  We will open one, and
throw the body out into space."

The president thought for some moments, and then said:

"Yes, we must do so, but at the same time taking very great precautions."

"Why?" asked Michel.

"For two reasons which you will understand," answered Barbicane.
"The first relates to the air shut up in the projectile, and of
which we must lose as little as possible."

"But we manufacture the air?"

"Only in part.  We make only the oxygen, my worthy Michel; and
with regard to that, we must watch that the apparatus does not
furnish the oxygen in too great a quantity; for an excess would
bring us very serious physiological troubles.  But if we make
the oxygen, we do not make the azote, that medium which the
lungs do not absorb, and which ought to remain intact; and that
azote will escape rapidly through the open scuttles."

"Oh! the time for throwing out poor Satellite?" said Michel.

"Agreed; but we must act quickly."

"And the second reason?" asked Michel.

"The second reason is that we must not let the outer cold, which
is excessive, penetrate the projectile or we shall be frozen to death."

"But the sun?"

"The sun warms our projectile, which absorbs its rays; but it
does not warm the vacuum in which we are floating at this moment.
Where there is no air, there is no more heat than diffused light;
and the same with darkness; it is cold where the sun's rays do not
strike direct.  This temperature is only the temperature produced
by the radiation of the stars; that is to say, what the
terrestrial globe would undergo if the sun disappeared one day."

"Which is not to be feared," replied Nicholl.

"Who knows?" said Michel Ardan.  "But, in admitting that the sun
does not go out, might it not happen that the earth might move
away from it?"

"There!" said Barbicane, "there is Michel with his ideas."

"And," continued Michel, "do we not know that in 1861 the earth
passed through the tail of a comet?  Or let us suppose a comet
whose power of attraction is greater than that of the sun.
The terrestrial orbit will bend toward the wandering star, and
the earth, becoming its satellite, will be drawn such a distance
that the rays of the sun will have no action on its surface."

"That _might_ happen, indeed," replied Barbicane, "but the
consequences of such a displacement need not be so formidable as
you suppose."

"And why not?"

"Because the heat and cold would be equalized on our globe.
It has been calculated that, had our earth been carried along in
its course by the comet of 1861, at its perihelion, that is, its
nearest approach to the sun, it would have undergone a heat
28,000 times greater than that of summer.  But this heat, which
is sufficient to evaporate the waters, would have formed a thick
ring of cloud, which would have modified that excessive
temperature; hence the compensation between the cold of the
aphelion and the heat of the perihelion."

"At how many degrees," asked Nicholl, "is the temperature of the
planetary spaces estimated?"

"Formerly," replied Barbicane, "it was greatly exagerated; but
now, after the calculations of Fourier, of the French Academy of
Science, it is not supposed to exceed 60@ Centigrade below zero."

"Pooh!" said Michel, "that's nothing!"

"It is very much," replied Barbicane; "the temperature which was
observed in the polar regions, at Melville Island and Fort
Reliance, that is 76@ Fahrenheit below zero."

"If I mistake not," said Nicholl, "M. Pouillet, another savant,
estimates the temperature of space at 250@ Fahrenheit below zero.
We shall, however, be able to verify these calculations for ourselves."

"Not at present; because the solar rays, beating directly
upon our thermometer, would give, on the contrary, a very high
temperature.  But, when we arrive in the moon, during its
fifteen days of night at either face, we shall have leisure to
make the experiment, for our satellite lies in a vacuum."

"What do you mean by a vacuum?" asked Michel.  "Is it perfectly such?"

"It is absolutely void of air."

"And is the air replaced by nothing whatever?"

"By the ether only," replied Barbicane.

"And pray what is the ether?"

"The ether, my friend, is an agglomeration of imponderable
atoms, which, relatively to their dimensions, are as far removed
from each other as the celestial bodies are in space.  It is
these atoms which, by their vibratory motion, produce both light
and heat in the universe."

They now proceeded to the burial of Satellite.  They had merely
to drop him into space, in the same way that sailors drop a body
into the sea; but, as President Barbicane suggested, they must
act quickly, so as to lose as little as possible of that air
whose elasticity would rapidly have spread it into space.
The bolts of the right scuttle, the opening of which measured
about twelve inches across, were carefully drawn, while Michel,
quite grieved, prepared to launch his dog into space.  The glass,
raised by a powerful lever, which enabled it to overcome the
pressure of the inside air on the walls of the projectile,
turned rapidly on its hinges, and Satellite was thrown out.
Scarcely a particle of air could have escaped, and the operation
was so successful that later on Barbicane did not fear to
dispose of the rubbish which encumbered the car.





CHAPTER VI


QUESTION AND ANSWER


On the 4th of December, when the travelers awoke after
fifty-four hours' journey, the chronometer marked five o'clock
of the terrestrial morning.  In time it was just over five
hours and forty minutes, half of that assigned to their sojourn
in the projectile; but they had already accomplished nearly
seven-tenths of the way.  This peculiarity was due to their
regularly decreasing speed.

Now when they observed the earth through the lower window,
it looked like nothing more than a dark spot, drowned in the
solar rays.  No more crescent, no more cloudy light!  The next
day, at midnight, the earth would be _new_, at the very moment
when the moon would be full.  Above, the orb of night was nearing
the line followed by the projectile, so as to meet it at the
given hour.  All around the black vault was studded with brilliant
points, which seemed to move slowly; but, at the great distance
they were from them, their relative size did not seem to change.
The sun and stars appeared exactly as they do to us upon earth.
As to the moon, she was considerably larger; but the travelers'
glasses, not very powerful, did not allow them as yet to make
any useful observations upon her surface, or reconnoiter her
topographically or geologically.

Thus the time passed in never-ending conversations all about
the moon.  Each one brought forward his own contingent of
particular facts; Barbicane and Nicholl always serious, Michel
Ardan always enthusiastic.  The projectile, its situation,
its direction, incidents which might happen, the precautions
necessitated by their fall on to the moon, were inexhaustible
matters of conjecture.

As they were breakfasting, a question of Michel's, relating to
the projectile, provoked rather a curious answer from Barbicane,
which is worth repeating.  Michel, supposing it to be roughly
stopped, while still under its formidable initial speed, wished
to know what the consequences of the stoppage would have been.

"But," said Barbicane, "I do not see how it could have been stopped."

"But let us suppose so," said Michel.

"It is an impossible supposition," said the practical Barbicane;
"unless that impulsive force had failed; but even then its speed
would diminish by degrees, and it would not have stopped suddenly."

"Admit that it had struck a body in space."

"What body?"

"Why that enormous meteor which we met."

"Then," said Nicholl, "the projectile would have been broken
into a thousand pieces, and we with it."

"More than that," replied Barbicane; "we should have been burned
to death."

"Burned?" exclaimed Michel, "by Jove!  I am sorry it did not
happen, `just to see.'"

"And you would have seen," replied Barbicane.  "It is known now
that heat is only a modification of motion.  When water is
warmed-- that is to say, when heat is added to it--its particles
are set in motion."

"Well," said michel, "that is an ingenious theory!"

"And a true one, my worthy friend; for it explains every
phenomenon of caloric.  Heat is but the motion of atoms, a
simple oscillation of the particles of a body.  When they apply
the brake to a train, the train comes to a stop; but what
becomes of the motion which it had previously possessed?  It is
transformed into heat, and the brake becomes hot.  Why do they
grease the axles of the wheels?  To prevent their heating,
because this heat would be generated by the motion which is thus
lost by transformation."

"Yes, I understand," replied Michel, "perfectly.  For example,
when I have run a long time, when I am swimming, when I am
perspiring in large drops, why am I obliged to stop?
Simply because my motion is changed into heat."

Barbicane could not help smiling at Michel's reply; then,
returning to his theory, said:

"Thus, in case of a shock, it would have been with our
projectile as with a ball which falls in a burning state after
having struck the metal plate; it is its motion which is turned
into heat.  Consequently I affirm that, if our projectile had
struck the meteor, its speed thus suddenly checked would have
raised a heat great enough to turn it into vapor instantaneously."

"Then," asked Nicholl, "what would happen if the earth's motion
were to stop suddenly?"

"Her temperature would be raised to such a pitch," said
Barbicane, "that she would be at once reduced to vapor."

"Well," said Michel, "that is a way of ending the earth which
will greatly simplify things."

"And if the earth fell upon the sun?" asked Nicholl.

"According to calculation," replied Barbicane, "the fall would
develop a heat equal to that produced by 16,000 globes of coal,
each equal in bulk to our terrestrial globe."

"Good additional heat for the sun," replied Michel Ardan, "of
which the inhabitants of Uranus or Neptune would doubtless not
complain; they must be perished with cold on their planets."

"Thus, my friends," said Barbicane, "all motion suddenly stopped
produces heat.  And this theory allows us to infer that the heat
of the solar disc is fed by a hail of meteors falling
incessantly on its surface.  They have even calculated----"

"Oh, dear!" murmured Michel, "the figures are coming."

"They have even calculated," continued the imperturbable Barbicane,
"that the shock of each meteor on the sun ought to produce a heat
equal to that of 4,000 masses of coal of an equal bulk."

"And what is the solar heat?" asked Michel.

"It is equal to that produced by the combustion of a stratum of
coal surrounding the sun to a depth of forty-seven miles."

"And that heat----"

"Would be able to boil two billions nine hundred millions of
cubic myriameters [2] of water."

[2] The myriameter is equal to rather more than 10,936
cubic yards English.

"And it does not roast us!" exclaimed Michel.

"No," replied Barbicane, "because the terrestrial atmosphere
absorbs four-tenths of the solar heat; besides, the quantity of
heat intercepted by the earth is but a billionth part of the
entire radiation."

"I see that all is for the best," said Michel, "and that this
atmosphere is a useful invention; for it not only allows us to
breathe, but it prevents us from roasting."

"Yes!" said Nicholl, "unfortunately, it will not be the same in
the moon."

"Bah!" said Michel, always hopeful.  "If there are inhabitants,
they must breathe.  If there are no longer any, they must have
left enough oxygen for three people, if only at the bottom of
ravines, where its own weight will cause it to accumulate, and
we will not climb the mountains; that is all."  And Michel,
rising, went to look at the lunar disc, which shone with
intolerable brilliancy.

"By Jove!" said he, "it must be hot up there!"

"Without considering," replied Nicholl, "that the day lasts 360 hours!"

"And to compensate that," said Barbicane, "the nights have the
same length; and as heat is restored by radiation, their
temperature can only be that of the planetary space."

"A pretty country, that!" exclaimed Michel.  "Never mind!
I wish I was there!  Ah! my dear comrades, it will be rather
curious to have the earth for our moon, to see it rise on the
horizon, to recognize the shape of its continents, and to say
to oneself, `There is America, there is Europe;' then to follow
it when it is about to lose itself in the sun's rays!  By the
bye, Barbicane, have the Selenites eclipses?"

"Yes, eclipses of the sun," replied Barbicane, "when the centers
of the three orbs are on a line, the earth being in the middle.
But they are only partial, during which the earth, cast like a
screen upon the solar disc, allows the greater portion to be seen."

"And why," asked Nicholl, "is there no total eclipse?  Does not
the cone of the shadow cast by the earth extend beyond the moon?"

"Yes, if we do not take into consideration the refraction
produced by the terrestrial atmosphere.  No, if we take that
refraction into consideration.  Thus let <lower case delta> be
the horizontal parallel, and _p_ the apparent semidiameter----"

"Oh!" said Michel.  "Do speak plainly, you man of algebra!"

"Very well, replied Barbicane; "in popular language the mean
distance from the moon to the earth being sixty terrestrial
radii, the length of the cone of the shadow, on account of
refraction, is reduced to less than forty-two radii.
The result is that when there are eclipses, the moon finds
itself beyond the cone of pure shadow, and that the sun sends
her its rays, not only from its edges, but also from its center."

"Then," said Michel, in a merry tone, "why are there eclipses,
when there ought not to be any?"

"Simply because the solar rays are weakened by this refraction,
and the atmosphere through which they pass extinguished the
greater part of them!"

"That reason satisfies me," replied Michel.  "Besides we shall
see when we get there.  Now, tell me, Barbicane, do you believe
that the moon is an old comet?"

"There's an idea!"

"Yes," replied Michel, with an amiable swagger, "I have a few
ideas of that sort."

"But that idea does not spring from Michel," answered Nicholl.

"Well, then, I am a plagiarist."

"No doubt about it.  According to the ancients, the Arcadians
pretend that their ancestors inhabited the earth before the moon
became her satellite.  Starting from this fact, some scientific
men have seen in the moon a comet whose orbit will one day bring
it so near to the earth that it will be held there by its attraction."

"Is there any truth in this hypothesis?" asked Michel.

"None whatever," said Barbicane, "and the proof is, that the
moon has preserved no trace of the gaseous envelope which always
accompanies comets."

"But," continued Nicholl, "Before becoming the earth's satellite,
could not the moon, when in her perihelion, pass so near the sun
as by evaporation to get rid of all those gaseous substances?"

"It is possible, friend Nicholl, but not probable."

"Why not?"

"Because-- Faith I do not know."

"Ah!" exclaimed Michel, "what hundred of volumes we might make
of all that we do not know!"

"Ah! indeed.  What time is it?" asked Barbicane.

"Three o'clock," answered Nicholl.

"How time goes," said Michel, "in the conversation of scientific
men such as we are!  Certainly, I feel I know too much!  I feel
that I am becoming a well!"

Saying which, Michel hoisted himself to the roof of the projectile,
"to observe the moon better," he pretended.  During this time his
companions were watching through the lower glass.  Nothing new to note!

When Michel Ardan came down, he went to the side scuttle; and
suddenly they heard an exclamation of surprise!

"What is it?" asked Barbicane.

The president approached the window, and saw a sort of flattened
sack floating some yards from the projectile.  This object
seemed as motionless as the projectile, and was consequently
animated with the same ascending movement.

"What is that machine?" continued Michel Ardan.  "Is it one of
the bodies which our projectile keeps within its attraction, and
which will accompany it to the moon?"

"What astonishes me," said Nicholl, "is that the specific weight
of the body, which is certainly less than that of the
projectile, allows it to keep so perfectly on a level with it."

"Nicholl," replied Barbicane, after a moment's reflection, "I do
not know what the object it, but I do know why it maintains our level."

"And why?"

"Because we are floating in space, my dear captain, and in space
bodies fall or move (which is the same thing) with equal speed
whatever be their weight or form; it is the air, which by its
resistance creates these differences in weight.  When you create
a vacuum in a tube, the objects you send through it, grains of
dust or grains of lead, fall with the same rapidity.  Here in
space is the same cause and the same effect."

"Just so," said Nicholl, "and everything we throw out of the
projectile will accompany it until it reaches the moon."

"Ah! fools that we are!" exclaimed Michel.

"Why that expletive?" asked Barbicane.

"Because we might have filled the projectile with useful objects,
books, instruments, tools, etc.  We could have thrown them all
out, and all would have followed in our train.  But happy thought!
Why cannot we walk outside like the meteor?  Why cannot we launch
into space through the scuttle?  What enjoyment it would be to
feel oneself thus suspended in ether, more favored than the birds
who must use their wings to keep themselves up!"

"Granted," said Barbicane, "but how to breathe?"

"Hang the air, to fail so inopportunely!"

"But if it did not fail, Michel, your density being less than
that of the projectile, you would soon be left behind."

"Then we must remain in our car?"

"We must!"

"Ah!" exclaimed Michel, in a load voice.

"What is the matter," asked Nicholl.

"I know, I guess, what this pretended meteor is!  It is no
asteroid which is accompanying us!  It is not a piece of a planet."

"What is it then?" asked Barbicane.

"It is our unfortunate dog!  It is Diana's husband!"

Indeed, this deformed, unrecognizable object, reduced to
nothing, was the body of Satellite, flattened like a bagpipe
without wind, and ever mounting, mounting!





CHAPTER VII


A MOMENT OF INTOXICATION


Thus a phenomenon, curious but explicable, was happening under
these strange conditions.

Every object thrown from the projectile would follow the same
course and never stop until it did.  There was a subject for
conversation which the whole evening could not exhaust.

Besides, the excitement of the three travelers increased as they
drew near the end of their journey.  They expected unforseen
incidents, and new phenomena; and nothing would have astonished
them in the frame of mind they then were in.  Their overexcited
imagination went faster than the projectile, whose speed was
evidently diminishing, though insensibly to themselves.  But the
moon grew larger to their eyes, and they fancied if they
stretched out their hands they could seize it.

The next day, the 5th of November, at five in the morning,
all three were on foot.  That day was to be the last of their
journey, if all calculations were true.  That very night, at
twelve o'clock, in eighteen hours, exactly at the full moon,
they would reach its brilliant disc.  The next midnight would
see that journey ended, the most extraordinary of ancient or
modern times.  Thus from the first of the morning, through the
scuttles silvered by its rays, they saluted the orb of night
with a confident and joyous hurrah.

The moon was advancing majestically along the starry firmament.
A few more degrees, and she would reach the exact point where
her meeting with the projectile was to take place.

According to his own observations, Barbicane reckoned that they
would land on her northern hemisphere, where stretch immense plains,
and where mountains are rare.  A favorable circumstance if, as
they thought, the lunar atmosphere was stored only in its depths.

"Besides," observed Michel Ardan, "a plain is easier to
disembark upon than a mountain.  A Selenite, deposited in Europe
on the summit of Mont Blanc, or in  Asia on the top of the
Himalayas, would not be quite in the right place."

"And," added Captain Nicholl, "on a flat ground, the projectile
will remain motionless when it has once touched; whereas on a
declivity it would roll like an avalanche, and not being
squirrels we should not come out safe and sound.  So it is all
for the best."

Indeed, the success of the audacious attempt no longer
appeared doubtful.  But Barbicane was preoccupied with one
thought; but not wishing to make his companions uneasy, he
kept silence on this subject.

The direction the projectile was taking toward the moon's
northern hemisphere, showed that her course had been
slightly altered.  The discharge, mathematically calculated,
would carry the projectile to the very center of the lunar disc.
If it did not land there, there must have been some deviation.
What had caused it?  Barbicane could neither imagine nor
determine the importance of the deviation, for there were no
points to go by.

He hoped, however, that it would have no other result than that
of bringing them nearer the upper border of the moon, a region
more suitable for landing.

Without imparting his uneasiness to his companions, Barbicane
contented himself with constantly observing the moon, in order
to see whether the course of the projectile would not be
altered; for the situation would have been terrible if it failed
in its aim, and being carried beyond the disc should be launched
into interplanetary space.  At that moment, the moon, instead of
appearing flat like a disc, showed its convexity.  If the sun's
rays had struck it obliquely, the shadow thrown would have brought
out the high mountains, which would have been clearly detached.
The eye might have gazed into the crater's gaping abysses,
and followed the capricious fissures which wound through the
immense plains.  But all relief was as yet leveled in
intense brilliancy.  They could scarcely distinguish those
large spots which give the moon the appearance of a human face.

"Face, indeed!" said Michel Ardan; "but I am sorry for the
amiable sister of Apollo.  A very pitted face!"

But the travelers, now so near the end, were incessantly
observing this new world.  They imagined themselves walking
through its unknown countries, climbing its highest peaks,
descending into its lowest depths.  Here and there they fancied
they saw vast seas, scarcely kept together under so rarefied an
atmosphere, and water-courses emptying the mountain tributaries.
Leaning over the abyss, they hoped to catch some sounds from
that orb forever mute in the solitude of space.  That last day
left them.

They took down the most trifling details.  A vague uneasiness
took possession of them as they neared the end.  This uneasiness
would have been doubled had they felt how their speed had decreased.
It would have seemed to them quite insufficient to carry them to
the end.  It was because the projectile then "weighed" almost nothing.
Its weight was ever decreasing, and would be entirely annihilated on
that line where the lunar and terrestrial attractions would
neutralize each other.

But in spite of his preoccupation, Michel Ardan did not forget
to prepare the morning repast with his accustomed punctuality.
They ate with a good appetite.  Nothing was so excellent as the
soup liquefied by the heat of the gas; nothing better than the
preserved meat.  Some glasses of good French wine crowned the
repast, causing Michel Ardan to remark that the lunar vines,
warmed by that ardent sun, ought to distill even more generous
wines; that is, if they existed.  In any case, the far-seeing
Frenchman had taken care not to forget in his collection some
precious cuttings of the Medoc and Cote d'Or, upon which he
founded his hopes.

Reiset and Regnaut's apparatus worked with great regularity.
Not an atom of carbonic acid resisted the potash; and as to
the oxygen, Captain Nicholl said "it was of the first quality."
The little watery vapor enclosed in the projectile mixing with
the air tempered the dryness; and many apartments in London,
Paris, or New York, and many theaters, were certainly not in
such a healthy condition.

But that it might act with regularity, the apparatus must be
kept in perfect order; so each morning Michel visited the escape
regulators, tried the taps, and regulated the heat of the gas by
the pyrometer.  Everything had gone well up to that time, and
the travelers, imitating the worthy Joseph T. Maston, began to
acquire a degree of embonpoint which would have rendered them
unrecognizable if their imprisonment had been prolonged to
some months.  In a word, they behaved like chickens in a coop;
they were getting fat.

In looking through the scuttle Barbicane saw the specter of the
dog, and other divers objects which had been thrown from the
projectile, obstinately following them.  Diana howled
lugubriously on seeing the remains of Satellite, which seemed as
motionless as if they reposed on solid earth.

"Do you know, my friends," said Michel Ardan, "that if one of us
had succumbed to the shock consequent on departure, we should
have had a great deal of trouble to bury him?  What am I saying?
to _etherize_ him, as here ether takes the place of earth.
You see the accusing body would have followed us into space like
a remorse."

"That would have been sad," said Nicholl.

"Ah!" continued Michel, "what I regret is not being able to take a
walk outside.  What voluptuousness to float amid this radiant ether,
to bathe oneself in it, to wrap oneself in the sun's pure rays.
If Barbicane had only thought of furnishing us with a diving
apparatus and an air-pump, I could have ventured out and assumed
fanciful attitudes of feigned monsters on the top of the projectile."

"Well, old Michel," replied Barbicane, "you would not have made
a feigned monster long, for in spite of your diver's dress, swollen
by the expansion of air within you, you would have burst like a
shell, or rather like a balloon which has risen too high.  So do
not regret it, and do not forget this-- as long as we float in
space, all sentimental walks beyond the projectile are forbidden."

Michel Ardan allowed himself to be convinced to a certain extent.
He admitted that the thing was difficult but not impossible,
a word which he never uttered.

The conversation passed from this subject to another, not failing
him for an instant.  It seemed to the three friends as though,
under present conditions, ideas shot up in their brains as leaves
shoot at the first warmth of spring.  They felt bewildered.  In the
middle of the questions and answers which crossed each other,
Nicholl put one question which did not find an immediate solution.

"Ah, indeed!" said he; "it is all very well to go to the moon,
but how to get back again?"

His two interlocutors looked surprised.  One would have thought
that this possibility now occurred to them for the first time.

"What do you mean by that, Nicholl?" asked Barbicane gravely.

"To ask for means to leave a country," added Michel, "When we
have not yet arrived there, seems to me rather inopportune."

"I do not say that, wishing to draw back," replied Nicholl;
"but I repeat my question, and I ask, `How shall we return?'"

"I know nothing about it," answered Barbicane.

"And I," said Michel, "if I had known how to return, I would
never have started."

"There's an answer!" cried Nicholl.

"I quite approve of Michel's words," said Barbicane; "and add,
that the question has no real interest.  Later, when we think it
is advisable to return, we will take counsel together.  If the
Columbiad is not there, the projectile will be."

"That is a step certainly.  A ball without a gun!"

"The gun," replied Barbicane, "can be manufactured.  The powder
can be made.  Neither metals, saltpeter, nor coal can fail in
the depths of the moon, and we need only go 8,000 leagues in
order to fall upon the terrestrial globe by virtue of the mere
laws of weight."

"Enough," said Michel with animation.  "Let it be no longer a
question of returning: we have already entertained it too long.
As to communicating with our former earthly colleagues, that
will not be difficult."

"And how?"

"By means of meteors launched by lunar volcanoes."

"Well thought of, Michel," said Barbicane in a convinced tone
of voice.  "Laplace has calculated that a force five times greater
than that of our gun would suffice to send a meteor from the
moon to the earth, and there is not one volcano which has not a
greater power of propulsion than that."

"Hurrah!" exclaimed Michel; "these meteors are handy postmen,
and cost nothing.  And how we shall be able to laugh at the
post-office administration!  But now I think of it----"

"What do you think of?"

"A capital idea.  Why did we not fasten a thread to our
projectile, and we could have exchanged telegrams with the earth?"

"The deuce!" answered Nicholl.  "Do you consider the weight of
a thread 250,000 miles long nothing?"

"As nothing.  They could have trebled the Columbiad's charge;
they could have quadrupled or quintupled it!" exclaimed Michel,
with whom the verb took a higher intonation each time.

"There is but one little objection to make to your proposition,"
replied Barbicane, "which is that, during the rotary motion of
the globe, our thread would have wound itself round it like a
chain on a capstan, and that it would inevitably have brought us
to the ground."

"By the thirty-nine stars of the Union!" said Michel, "I have
nothing but impracticable ideas to-day; ideas worthy of J.
T. Maston.  But I have a notion that, if we do not return to
earth, J. T. Maston will be able to come to us."

"Yes, he'll come," replied Barbicane; "he is a worthy and a
courageous comrade.  Besides, what is easier?  Is not the
Columbiad still buried in the soil of Florida?  Is cotton and
nitric acid wanted wherewith to manufacture the pyroxyle?
Will not the moon pass the zenith of Florida?  In eighteen
years' time will she not occupy exactly the same place as to-day?"

"Yes," continued Michel, "yes, Maston will come, and with him
our friends Elphinstone, Blomsberry, all the members of the Gun
Club, and they will be well received.  And by and by they will
run trains of projectiles between the earth and the moon!
Hurrah for J. T. Maston!"

It is probable that, if the Hon. J. T. Maston did not hear the
hurrahs uttered in his honor, his ears at least tingled.  What was
he doing then?  Doubtless, posted in the Rocky Mountains, at the
station of Long's Peak, he was trying to find the invisible
projectile gravitating in space.  If he was thinking of his dear
companions, we must allow that they were not far behind him; and
that, under the influence of a strange excitement, they were
devoting to him their best thoughts.

But whence this excitement, which was evidently growing upon the
tenants of the projectile?  Their sobriety could not be doubted.
This strange irritation of the brain, must it be attributed to
the peculiar circumstances under which they found themselves, to
their proximity to the orb of night, from which only a few hours
separated them, to some secret influence of the moon acting upon
their nervous system?  Their faces were as rosy as if they had
been exposed to the roaring flames of an oven; their voices
resounded in loud accents; their words escaped like a champagne
cork driven out by carbonic acid; their gestures became annoying,
they wanted so much room to perform them; and, strange to say,
they none of them noticed this great tension of the mind.

"Now," said Nicholl, in a short tone, "now that I do not know
whether we shall ever return from the moon, I want to know what
we are going to do there?"

"What we are going to do there?" replied Barbicane, stamping
with his foot as if he was in a fencing saloon; "I do not know."

"You do not know!" exclaimed Michel, with a bellow which
provoked a sonorous echo in the projectile.

"No, I have not even thought about it," retorted Barbicane, in
the same loud tone.

"Well, I know," replied Michel.

"Speak, then," cried Nicholl, who could no longer contain the
growling of his voice.

"I shall speak if it suits me," exclaimed Michel, seizing his
companions' arms with violence.

"_It must_ suit you," said Barbicane, with an eye on fire and a
threatening hand.  "It was you who drew us into this frightful
journey, and we want to know what for."

"Yes," said the captain, "now that I do not know _where_ I am
going, I want to know _why_ I am going."

"Why?" exclaimed Michel, jumping a yard high, "why?  To take
possession of the moon in the name of the United States; to add
a fortieth State to the Union; to colonize the lunar regions;
to cultivate them, to people them, to transport thither all the
prodigies of art, of science, and industry; to civilize the
Selenites, unless they are more civilized than we are; and to
constitute them a republic, if they are not already one!"

"And if there are no Selenites?" retorted Nicholl, who, under the
influence of this unaccountable intoxication, was very contradictory.

"Who said that there were no Selenites?" exclaimed Michel in a
threatening tone.

"I do," howled Nicholl.

"Captain," said Michel, "do not repreat that insolence, or I
will knock your teeth down your throat!"

The two adversaries were going to fall upon each other, and the
incoherent discussion threatened to merge into a fight, when
Barbicane intervened with one bound.

"Stop, miserable men," said he, separating his two companions;
"if there are no Selenites, we will do without them."

"Yes," exclaimed Michel, who was not particular; "yes, we will
do without them.  We have only to make Selenites.  Down with
the Selenites!"

"The empire of the moon belongs to us," said Nicholl.

"Let us three constitute the republic."

"I will be the congress," cried Michel.

"And I the senate," retorted Nicholl.

"And Barbicane, the president," howled Michel.

"Not a president elected by the nation," replied Barbicane.

"Very well, a president elected by the congress," cried Michel;
"and as I am the congress, you are unanimously elected!"

"Hurrah! hurrah! hurrah! for President Barbicane," exclaimed Nicholl.

"Hip! hip! hip!" vociferated Michel Ardan.

Then the president and the senate struck up in a tremendous
voice the popular song "Yankee Doodle," while from the congress
resounded the masculine tones of the "Marseillaise."

Then they struck up a frantic dance, with maniacal gestures,
idiotic stampings, and somersaults like those of the boneless
clowns in the circus.  Diana, joining in the dance, and howling
in her turn, jumped to the top of the projectile.  An unaccountable
flapping of wings was then heard amid most fantastic cock-crows,
while five or six hens fluttered like bats against the walls.

Then the three traveling companions, acted upon by some
unaccountable influence above that of intoxication, inflamed by
the air which had set their respiratory apparatus on fire, fell
motionless to the bottom of the projectile.





CHAPTER VIII


AT SEVENTY-EIGHT THOUSAND FIVE HUNDRED AND FOURTEEN LEAGUES

What had happened?  Whence the cause of this singular
intoxication, the consequences of which might have been
very disastrous?  A simple blunder of Michel's, which,
fortunately, Nicholl was able to correct in time.

After a perfect swoon, which lasted some minutes, the captain,
recovering first, soon collected his scattered senses.
Although he had breakfasted only two hours before, he felt a
gnawing hunger, as if he had not eaten anything for several days.
Everything about him, stomach and brain, were overexcited to the
highest degree.  He got up and demanded from Michel a
supplementary repast.  Michel, utterly done up, did not answer.

Nicholl then tried to prepare some tea destined to help the
absorption of a dozen sandwiches.  He first tried to get some
fire, and struck a match sharply.  What was his surprise to see
the sulphur shine with so extraordinary a brilliancy as to be
almost unbearable to the eye.  From the gas-burner which he lit
rose a flame equal to a jet of electric light.

A revelation dawned on Nicholl's mind.  That intensity of light,
the physiological troubles which had arisen in him, the
overexcitement of all his moral and quarrelsome faculties-- he
understood all.

"The oxygen!" he exclaimed.

And leaning over the air apparatus, he saw that the tap was
allowing the colorless gas to escape freely, life-giving, but in
its pure state producing the gravest disorders in the system.
Michel had blunderingly opened the tap of the apparatus to the full.

Nicholl hastened to stop the escape of oxygen with which the
atmosphere was saturated, which would have been the death of the
travelers, not by suffocation, but by combustion.  An hour
later, the air less charged with it restored the lungs to their
normal condition.  By degrees the three friends recovered from
their intoxication; but they were obliged to sleep themselves
sober over their oxygen as a drunkard does over his wine.

When Michel learned his share of the responsibility of this
incident, he was not much disconcerted.  This unexpected
drunkenness broke the monotony of the journey.  Many foolish
things had been said while under its influence, but also
quickly forgotten.

"And then," added the merry Frenchman, "I am not sorry to have
tasted a little of this heady gas.  Do you know, my friends,
that a curious establishment might be founded with rooms of
oxygen, where people whose system is weakened could for a few
hours live a more active life.  Fancy parties where the room was
saturated with this heroic fluid, theaters where it should be
kept at high pressure; what passion in the souls of the actors
and spectators! what fire, what enthusiasm!  And if, instead of
an assembly only a whole people could be saturated, what activity
in its functions, what a supplement to life it would derive.
From an exhausted nation they might make a great and strong one,
and I know more than one state in old Europe which ought to put
itself under the regime of oxygen for the sake of its health!"

Michel spoke with so much animation that one might have fancied
that the tap was still too open.  But a few words from Barbicane
soon shattered his enthusiasm.

"That is all very well, friend Michel," said he, "but will you
inform us where these chickens came from which have mixed
themselves up in our concert?"

"Those chickens?"

"Yes."

Indeed, half a dozen chickens and a fine cock were walking
about, flapping their wings and chattering.

"Ah, the awkward things!" exclaimed Michel.  "The oxygen has
made them revolt."

"But what do you want to do with these chickens?" asked Barbicane.

"To acclimatize them in the moon, by Jove!"

"Then why did you hide them?"

"A joke, my worthy president, a simple joke, which has proved a
miserable failure.  I wanted to set them free on the lunar
continent, without saying anything.  Oh, what would have been
your amazement on seeing these earthly-winged animals pecking in
your lunar fields!"

"You rascal, you unmitigated rascal," replied Barbicane, "you do
not want oxygen to mount to the head.  You are always what we
were under the influence of the gas; you are always foolish!"

"Ah, who says that we were not wise then?" replied Michel Ardan.

After this philosophical reflection, the three friends set about
restoring the order of the projectile.  Chickens and cock were
reinstated in their coop.  But while proceeding with this
operation, Barbicane and his two companions had a most desired
perception of a new phenomenon.  From the moment of leaving the
earth, their own weight, that of the projectile, and the objects
it enclosed, had been subject to an increasing diminution.  If they
could not prove this loss of the projectile, a moment would arrive
when it would be sensibly felt upon themselves and the utensils
and instruments they used.

It is needless to say that a scale would not show this loss; for
the weight destined to weight the object would have lost exactly
as much as the object itself; but a spring steelyard for
example, the tension of which was independent of the attraction,
would have given a just estimate of this loss.

We know that the attraction, otherwise called the weight, is in
proportion to the densities of the bodies, and inversely as the
squares of the distances.  Hence this effect:  If the earth had
been alone in space, if the other celestial bodies had been
suddenly annihilated, the projectile, according to Newton's
laws, would weigh less as it got farther from the earth, but
without ever losing its weight entirely, for the terrestrial
attraction would always have made itself felt, at whatever distance.

But, in reality, a time must come when the projectile would no
longer be subject to the law of weight, after allowing for the
other celestial bodies whose effect could not be set down as zero.
Indeed, the projectile's course was being traced between
the earth and the moon.  As it distanced the earth, the
terrestrial attraction diminished: but the lunar attraction
rose in proportion.  There must come a point where these two
attractions would neutralize each other:  the projectile would
possess weight no longer.  If the moon's and the earth's
densities had been equal, this point would have been at an equal
distance between the two orbs.  But taking the different
densities into consideration, it was easy to reckon that this
point would be situated at 47/60ths of the whole journey,
_i.e._, at 78,514 leagues from the earth.  At this point, a body
having no principle of speed or displacement in itself, would
remain immovable forever, being attracted equally by both orbs,
and not being drawn more toward one than toward the other.

Now if the projectile's impulsive force had been correctly
calculated, it would attain this point without speed, having
lost all trace of weight, as well as all the objects within it.
What would happen then?  Three hypotheses presented themselves.

1. Either it would retain a certain amount of motion, and pass
the point of equal attraction, and fall upon the moon by virtue
of the excess of the lunar attraction over the terrestrial.

2. Or, its speed failing, and unable to reach the point of equal
attraction, it would fall upon the moon by virtue of the excess
of the lunar attraction over the terrestrial.

3. Or, lastly, animated with sufficient speed to enable it to
reach the neutral point, but not sufficient to pass it, it would
remain forever suspended in that spot like the pretended tomb of
Mahomet, between the zenith and the nadir.

Such was their situation; and Barbicane clearly explained the
consequences to his traveling companions, which greatly
interested them.  But how should they know when the projectile
had reached this neutral point situated at that distance,
especially when neither themselves, nor the objects enclosed in
the projectile, would be any longer subject to the laws of weight?

Up to this time, the travelers, while admitting that this action
was constantly decreasing, had not yet become sensible to its
total absence.

But that day, about eleven o'clock in the morning, Nicholl
having accidentally let a glass slip from his hand, the glass,
instead of falling, remained suspended in the air.

"Ah!" exclaimed Michel Ardan, "that is rather an amusing piece
of natural philosophy."

And immediately divers other objects, firearms and bottles,
abandoned to themselves, held themselves up as by enchantment.
Diana too, placed in space by Michel, reproduced, but without
any trick, the wonderful suspension practiced by Caston and
Robert Houdin.  Indeed the dog did not seem to know that she was
floating in air.

The three adventurous companions were surprised and stupefied,
despite their scientific reasonings.  They felt themselves being
carried into the domain of wonders! they felt that weight was
really wanting to their bodies.  If they stretched out their
arms, they did not attempt to fall.  Their heads shook on
their shoulders.  Their feet no longer clung to the floor of
the projectile.  They were like drunken men having no stability
in themselves.

Fancy has depicted men without reflection, others without shadow.
But here reality, by the neutralizations of attractive forces,
produced men in whom nothing had any weight, and who weighed
nothing themselves.

Suddenly Michel, taking a spring, left the floor and remained
suspended in the air, like Murillo's monk of the _Cusine des Anges_.

The two friends joined him instantly, and all three formed a
miraculous "Ascension" in the center of the projectile.

"Is it to be believed? is it probable? is it possible?"
exclaimed Michel; "and yet it is so.  Ah! if Raphael had seen us
thus, what an `Assumption' he would have thrown upon canvas!"

"The `Assumption' cannot last," replied Barbicane.  "If the
projectile passes the neutral point, the lunar attraction will
draw us to the moon."

"Then our feet will be upon the roof," replied Michel.

"No," said Barbicane, "because the projectile's center of
gravity is very low; it will only turn by degrees."

"Then all our portables will be upset from top to bottom, that
is a fact."

"Calm yourself, Michel," replied Nicholl; "no upset is to be
feared; not a thing will move, for the projectile's evolution
will be imperceptible."

"Just so," continued Barbicane; "and when it has passed the
point of equal attraction, its base, being the heavier, will
draw it perpendicularly to the moon; but, in order that this
phenomenon should take place, we must have passed the neutral line."

"Pass the neutral line," cried Michel; "then let us do as the
sailors do when they cross the equator."

A slight side movement brought Michel back toward the padded
side; thence he took a bottle and glasses, placed them "in
space" before his companions, and, drinking merrily, they
saluted the line with a triple hurrah.  The influence of these
attractions scarcely lasted an hour; the travelers felt
themselves insensibly drawn toward the floor, and Barbicane
fancied that the conical end of the projectile was varying a
little from its normal direction toward the moon.  By an inverse
motion the base was approaching first; the lunar attraction was
prevailing over the terrestrial; the fall toward the moon was
beginning, almost imperceptibly as yet, but by degrees the
attractive force would become stronger, the fall would be more
decided, the projectile, drawn by its base, would turn its cone
to the earth, and fall with ever-increasing speed on to the
surface of the Selenite continent; their destination would then
be attained.  Now nothing could prevent the success of their
enterprise, and Nicholl and Michel Ardan shared Barbicane's joy.

Then they chatted of all the phenomena which had astonished them
one after the other, particularly the neutralization of the laws
of weight.  Michel Ardan, always enthusiastic, drew conclusions
which were purely fanciful.

"Ah, my worthy friends," he exclaimed, "what progress we should
make if on earth we could throw off some of that weight, some of
that chain which binds us to her; it would be the prisoner set
at liberty; no more fatigue of either arms or legs.  Or, if it
is true that in order to fly on the earth's surface, to keep
oneself suspended in the air merely by the play of the muscles,
there requires a strength a hundred and fifty times greater than
that which we possess, a simple act of volition, a caprice,
would bear us into space, if attraction did not exist."

"Just so," said Nicholl, smiling; "if we could succeed in
suppressing weight as they suppress pain by anaesthesia,
that would change the face of modern society!"

"Yes," cried Michel, full of his subject, "destroy weight, and
no more burdens!"

"Well said," replied Barbicane; "but if nothing had any weight,
nothing would keep in its place, not even your hat on your head,
worthy Michel; nor your house, whose stones only adhere by
weight; nor a boat, whose stability on the waves is only caused
by weight; not even the ocean, whose waves would no longer be
equalized by terrestrial attraction; and lastly, not even the
atmosphere, whose atoms, being no longer held in their places,
would disperse in space!"

"That is tiresome," retorted Michel; "nothing like these
matter-of-fact people for bringing one back to the bare reality."

"But console yourself, Michel," continued Barbicane, "for if no
orb exists from whence all laws of weight are banished, you are
at least going to visit one where it is much less than on the earth."

"The moon?"

"Yes, the moon, on whose surface objects weigh six times less
than on the earth, a phenomenon easy to prove."

"And we shall feel it?" asked Michel.

"Evidently, as two hundred pounds will only weigh thirty pounds
on the surface of the moon."

"And our muscular strength will not diminish?"

"Not at all; instead of jumping one yard high, you will rise
eighteen feet high."

"But we shall be regular Herculeses in the moon!" exclaimed Michel.

"Yes," replied Nicholl; "for if the height of the Selenites is
in proportion to the density of their globe, they will be
scarcely a foot high."

"Lilliputians!" ejaculated Michel; "I shall play the part
of Gulliver.  We are going to realize the fable of the giants.
This is the advantage of leaving one's own planet and
over-running the solar world."

"One moment, Michel," answered Barbicane; "if you wish to play
the part of Gulliver, only visit the inferior planets, such as
Mercury, Venus, or Mars, whose density is a little less than
that of the earth; but do not venture into the great planets,
Jupiter, Saturn, Uranus, Neptune; for there the order will be
changed, and you will become Lilliputian."

"And in the sun?"

"In the sun, if its density is thirteen hundred and twenty-four
thousand times greater, and the attraction is twenty-seven times
greater than on the surface of our globe, keeping everything in
proportion, the inhabitants ought to be at least two hundred
feet high."

"By Jove!" exclaimed Michel; "I should be nothing more than a
pigmy, a shrimp!"

"Gulliver with the giants," said Nicholl.

"Just so," replied Barbicane.

"And it would not be quite useless to carry some pieces of
artillery to defend oneself."

"Good," replied Nicholl; "your projectiles would have no effect
on the sun; they would fall back upon the earth after some minutes."

"That is a strong remark."

"It is certain," replied Barbicane; "the attraction is so great
on this enormous orb, that an object weighing 70,000 pounds on
the earth would weigh but 1,920 pounds on the surface of the sun.
If you were to fall upon it you would weigh-- let me see-- about
5,000 pounds, a weight which you would never be able to raise again."

"The devil!" said Michel; "one would want a portable crane.
However, we will be satisfied with the moon for the present;
there at least we shall cut a great figure.  We will see about
the sun by and by."





CHAPTER IX


THE CONSEQUENCES OF A DEVIATION


Barbicane had now no fear of the issue of the journey, at least
as far as the projectile's impulsive force was concerned; its
own speed would carry it beyond the neutral line; it would
certainly not return to earth; it would certainly not remain
motionless on the line of attraction.  One single hypothesis
remained to be realized, the arrival of the projectile at its
destination by the action of the lunar attraction.

It was in reality a fall of 8,296 leagues on an orb, it is true,
where weight could only be reckoned at one sixth of terrestrial
weight; a formidable fall, nevertheless, and one against which
every precaution must be taken without delay.

These precautions were of two sorts, some to deaden the shock
when the projectile should touch the lunar soil, others to delay
the fall, and consequently make it less violent.

To deaden the shock, it was a pity that Barbicane was no longer
able to employ the means which had so ably weakened the shock at
departure, that is to say, by water used as springs and the
partition breaks.

The partitions still existed, but water failed, for they could
not use their reserve, which was precious, in case during the
first days the liquid element should be found wanting on lunar soil.

And indeed this reserve would have been quite insufficient for
a spring.  The layer of water stored in the projectile at
the time of starting upon their journey occupied no less than
three feet in depth, and spread over a surface of not less than
fifty-four square feet.  Besides, the cistern did not contain
one-fifth part of it; they must therefore give up this efficient
means of deadening the shock of arrival.  Happily, Barbicane,
not content with employing water, had furnished the movable disc
with strong spring plugs, destined to lessen the shock against
the base after the breaking of the horizontal partitions.
These plugs still existed; they had only to readjust them and
replace the movable disc; every piece, easy to handle, as their
weight was now scarcely felt, was quickly mounted.

The different pieces were fitted without trouble, it being only
a matter of bolts and screws; tools were not wanting, and soon
the reinstated disc lay on steel plugs, like a table on its legs.
One inconvenience resulted from the replacing of the disc,
the lower window was blocked up; thus it was impossible for
the travelers to observe the moon from that opening while
they were being precipitated perpendicularly upon her; but they
were obliged to give it up; even by the side openings they could
still see vast lunar regions, as an aeronaut sees the earth from
his car.

This replacing of the disc was at least an hour's work.  It was
past twelve when all preparations were finished.  Barbicane took
fresh observations on the inclination of the projectile, but to
his annoyance it had not turned over sufficiently for its fall;
it seemed to take a curve parallel to the lunar disc.  The orb
of night shone splendidly into space, while opposite, the orb of
day blazed with fire.

Their situation began to make them uneasy.

"Are we reaching our destination?" said Nicholl.

"Let us act as if we were about reaching it," replied Barbicane.

"You are sceptical," retorted Michel Ardan.  "We shall arrive,
and that, too, quicker than we like."

This answer brought Barbicane back to his preparations, and he
occupied himself with placing the contrivances intended to break
their descent.  We may remember the scene of the meeting held at
Tampa Town, in Florida, when Captain Nicholl came forward as
Barbicane's enemy and Michel Ardan's adversary.  To Captain
Nicholl's maintaining that the projectile would smash like glass,
Michel replied that he would break their fall by means of rockets
properly placed.

Thus, powerful fireworks, taking their starting-point from the
base and bursting outside, could, by producing a recoil, check
to a certain degree the projectile's speed.  These rockets were
to burn in space, it is true; but oxygen would not fail them,
for they could supply themselves with it, like the lunar
volcanoes, the burning of which has never yet been stopped by
the want of atmosphere round the moon.

Barbicane had accordingly supplied himself with these fireworks,
enclosed in little steel guns, which could be screwed on to the
base of the projectile.  Inside, these guns were flush with the
bottom; outside, they protruded about eighteen inches.  There were
twenty of them.  An opening left in the disc allowed them to light
the match with which each was provided.  All the effect was
felt outside.  The burning mixture had already been rammed
into each gun.  They had, then, nothing to do but raise the
metallic buffers fixed in the base, and replace them by the
guns, which fitted closely in their places.

This new work was finished about three o'clock, and after taking
all these precautions there remained but to wait.  But the
projectile was perceptibly nearing the moon, and evidently
succumbed to her influence to a certain degree; though its
own velocity also drew it in an oblique direction.  From these
conflicting influences resulted a line which might become
a tangent.  But it was certain that the projectile would not
fall directly on the moon; for its lower part, by reason of
its weight, ought to be turned toward her.

Barbicane's uneasiness increased as he saw his projectile resist
the influence of gravitation.  The Unknown was opening before
him, the Unknown in interplanetary space.  The man of science
thought he had foreseen the only three hypotheses possible-- the
return to the earth, the return to the moon, or stagnation on
the neutral line; and here a fourth hypothesis, big with all the
terrors of the Infinite, surged up inopportunely.  To face it
without flinching, one must be a resolute savant like Barbicane,
a phlegmatic being like Nicholl, or an audacious adventurer like
Michel Ardan.

Conversation was started upon this subject.  Other men would
have considered the question from a practical point of view;
they would have asked themselves whither their projectile
carriage was carrying them.  Not so with these; they sought for
the cause which produced this effect.

"So we have become diverted from our route," said Michel; "but why?"

"I very much fear," answered Nicholl, "that, in spite of
all precautions taken, the Columbiad was not fairly pointed.
An error, however small, would be enough to throw us out of
the moon's attraction."

"Then they must have aimed badly?" asked Michel.

"I do not think so," replied Barbicane.  "The perpendicularity
of the gun was exact, its direction to the zenith of the spot
incontestible; and the moon passing to the zenith of the spot,
we ought to reach it at the full.  There is another reason,
but it escapes me."

"Are we not arriving too late?" asked Nicholl.

"Too late?" said Barbicane.

"Yes," continued Nicholl.  "The Cambridge Observatory's note
says that the transit ought to be accomplished in ninety-seven
hours thirteen minutes and twenty seconds; which means to say,
that _sooner_ the moon will _not_ be at the point indicated, and
_later_ it will have passed it."

"True," replied Barbicane.  "But we started the 1st of December,
at thirteen minutes and twenty-five seconds to eleven at night;
and we ought to arrive on the 5th at midnight, at the exact
moment when the moon would be full; and we are now at the
5th of December.  It is now half-past three in the evening;
half-past eight ought to see us at the end of our journey.
Why do we not arrive?"

"Might it not be an excess of speed?" answered Nicholl; "for we
know now that its initial velocity was greater than they supposed."

"No! a hundred times, no!" replied Barbicane.  "An excess of
speed, if the direction of the projectile had been right, would
not have prevented us reaching the moon.  No, there has been
a deviation.  We have been turned out of our course."

"By whom? by what?" asked Nicholl.

"I cannot say," replied Barbicane.

"Very well, then, Barbicane," said Michel, "do you wish to know
my opinion on the subject of finding out this deviation?"

"Speak."

"I would not give half a dollar to know it.  That we have
deviated is a fact.  Where we are going matters little; we shall
soon see.  Since we are being borne along in space we shall end
by falling into some center of attraction or other."

Michel Ardan's indifference did not content Barbicane.  Not that
he was uneasy about the future, but he wanted to know at any
cost _why_ his projectile had deviated.

But the projectile continued its course sideways to the moon,
and with it the mass of things thrown out.  Barbicane could even
prove, by the elevations which served as landmarks upon the
moon, which was only two thousand leagues distant, that its
speed was becoming uniform-- fresh proof that there was no fall.
Its impulsive force still prevailed over the lunar attraction,
but the projectile's course was certainly bringing it nearer to
the moon, and they might hope that at a nearer point the weight,
predominating, would cause a decided fall.

The three friends, having nothing better to do, continued their
observations; but they could not yet determine the topographical
position of the satellite; every relief was leveled under the
reflection of the solar rays.

They watched thus through the side windows until eight o'clock
at night.  The moon had grown so large in their eyes that it
filled half of the firmament.  The sun on one side, and the orb
of night on the other, flooded the projectile with light.

At that moment Barbicane thought he could estimate the distance
which separated them from their aim at no more than 700 leagues.
The speed of the projectile seemed to him to be more than 200
yards, or about 170 leagues a second.  Under the centripetal
force, the base of the projectile tended toward the moon; but
the centrifugal still prevailed; and it was probable that its
rectilineal course would be changed to a curve of some sort,
the nature of which they could not at present determine.

Barbicane was still seeking the solution of his insoluble problem.
Hours passed without any result.  The projectile was evidently
nearing the moon, but it was also evident that it would never
reach her.  As to the nearest distance at which it would pass her,
that must be the result of two forces, attraction and repulsion,
affecting its motion.

"I ask but one thing," said Michel; "that we may pass near
enough to penetrate her secrets."

"Cursed be the thing that has caused our projectile to deviate
from its course," cried Nicholl.

And, as if a light had suddenly broken in upon his mind, Barbicane
answered, "Then cursed be the meteor which crossed our path."

"What?" said Michel Ardan.

"What do you mean?" exclaimed Nicholl.

"I mean," said Barbicane in a decided tone, "I mean that our
deviation is owing solely to our meeting with this erring body."

"But it did not even brush us as it passed," said Michel.

"What does that matter?  Its mass, compared to that of our
projectile, was enormous, and its attraction was enough to
influence our course."

"So little?" cried Nicholl.

"Yes, Nicholl; but however little it might be," replied
Barbicane, "in a distance of 84,000 leagues, it wanted no more
to make us miss the moon."





CHAPTER X


THE OBSERVERS OF THE MOON


Barbicane had evidently hit upon the only plausible reason
of this deviation.  However slight it might have been, it
had sufficed to modify the course of the projectile.  It was
a fatality.  The bold attempt had miscarried by a fortuitous
circumstance; and unless by some exceptional event, they could
now never reach the moon's disc.

Would they pass near enough to be able to solve certain physical
and geological questions until then insoluble?  This was the
question, and the only one, which occupied the minds of these
bold travelers.  As to the fate in store for themselves, they
did not even dream of it.

But what would become of them amid these infinite solitudes,
these who would soon want air?  A few more days, and they would
fall stifled in this wandering projectile.  But some days to
these intrepid fellows was a century; and they devoted all their
time to observe that moon which they no longer hoped to reach.

The distance which had then separated the projectile from the
satellite was estimated at about two hundred leagues.  Under these
conditions, as regards the visibility of the details of the disc,
the travelers were farther from the moon than are the inhabitants
of earth with their powerful telescopes.

Indeed, we know that the instrument mounted by Lord Rosse at
Parsonstown, which magnifies 6,500 times, brings the moon to
within an apparent distance of sixteen leagues.  And more than
that, with the powerful one set up at Long's Peak, the orb of
night, magnified 48,000 times, is brought to within less than
two leagues, and objects having a diameter of thirty feet are
seen very distinctly.  So that, at this distance, the
topographical details of the moon, observed without glasses,
could not be determined with precision.  The eye caught the vast
outline of those immense depressions inappropriately called
"seas," but they could not recognize their nature.  The prominence
of the mountains disappeared under the splendid irradiation
produced by the reflection of the solar rays.  The eye, dazzled
as if it was leaning over a bath of molten silver, turned from
it involuntarily; but the oblong form of the orb was quite clear.
It appeared like a gigantic egg, with the small end turned toward
the earth.  Indeed the moon, liquid and pliable in the first days
of its formation, was originally a perfect sphere; but being soon
drawn within the attraction of the earth, it became elongated
under the influence of gravitation.  In becoming a satellite,
she lost her native purity of form; her center of gravity was in
advance of the center of her figure; and from this fact some
savants draw the conclusion that the air and water had taken
refuge on the opposite surface of the moon, which is never seen
from the earth.  This alteration in the primitive form of the
satellite was only perceptible for a few moments.  The distance
of the projectile from the moon diminished very rapidly under
its speed, though that was much less than its initial velocity--
but eight or nine times greater than that which propels our
express trains.  The oblique course of the projectile, from its
very obliquity, gave Michel Ardan some hopes of striking the
lunar disc at some point or other.  He could not think that they
would never reach it.  No! he could not believe it; and this
opinion he often repeated.  But Barbicane, who was a better
judge, always answered him with merciless logic.

"No, Michel, no!  We can only reach the moon by a fall, and we
are not falling.  The centripetal force keeps us under the
moon's influence, but the centrifugal force draws us
irresistibly away from it."

This was said in a tone which quenched Michel Ardan's last hope.

The portion of the moon which the projectile was nearing was the
northern hemisphere, that which the selenographic maps place
below; for these maps are generally drawn after the outline
given by the glasses, and we know that they reverse the objects.
Such was the _Mappa Selenographica_ of Boeer and Moedler which
Barbicane consulted.  This northern hemisphere presented vast
plains, dotted with isolated mountains.

At midnight the moon was full.  At that precise moment the
travelers should have alighted upon it, if the mischievous
meteor had not diverted their course.  The orb was exactly in
the condition determined by the Cambridge Observatory.  It was
mathematically at its perigee, and at the zenith of the
twenty-eighth parallel.  An observer placed at the bottom of the
enormous Columbiad, pointed perpendicularly to the horizon,
would have framed the moon in the mouth of the gun.  A straight
line drawn through the axis of the piece would have passed
through the center of the orb of night.  It is needless to say,
that during the night of the 5th-6th of December, the travelers
took not an instant's rest.  Could they close their eyes when so
near this new world?  No!  All their feelings were concentrated
in one single thought:-- See!  Representatives of the earth, of
humanity, past and present, all centered in them!  It is through
their eyes that the human race look at these lunar regions, and
penetrate the secrets of their satellite!  A strange emotion
filled their hearts as they went from one window to the other.
Their observations, reproduced by Barbicane, were rigidly determined.
To take them, they had glasses; to correct them, maps.

As regards the optical instruments at their disposal, they had
excellent marine glasses specially constructed for this journey.
They possessed magnifying powers of 100.  They would thus have
brought the moon to within a distance (apparent) of less than
2,000 leagues from the earth.  But then, at a distance which for
three hours in the morning did not exceed sixty-five miles, and
in a medium free from all atmospheric disturbances, these
instruments could reduce the lunar surface to within less than
1,500 yards!





CHAPTER XI


FANCY AND REALITY


"Have you ever seen the moon?" asked a professor, ironically,
of one of his pupils.

"No, sir!" replied the pupil, still more ironically, "but I must
say I have heard it spoken of."

In one sense, the pupil's witty answer might be given by a large
majority of sublunary beings.  How many people have heard speak
of the moon who have never seen it-- at least through a glass or
a telescope!  How many have never examined the map of their satellite!

In looking at a selenographic map, one peculiarity strikes us.
Contrary to the arrangement followed for that of the Earth and
Mars, the continents occupy more particularly the southern
hemisphere of the lunar globe.  These continents do not show
such decided, clear, and regular boundary lines as South
America, Africa, and the Indian peninsula.  Their angular,
capricious, and deeply indented coasts are rich in gulfs
and peninsulas.  They remind one of the confusion in the
islands of the Sound, where the land is excessively indented.
If navigation ever existed on the surface of the moon, it must
have been wonderfully difficult and dangerous; and we may well
pity the Selenite sailors and hydrographers; the former, when
they came upon these perilous coasts, the latter when they
took the soundings of its stormy banks.

We may also notice that, on the lunar sphere, the south pole is
much more continental than the north pole.  On the latter, there
is but one slight strip of land separated from other continents
by vast seas.  Toward the south, continents clothe almost the
whole of the hemisphere.  It is even possible that the Selenites
have already planted the flag on one of their poles, while
Franklin, Ross, Kane, Dumont, d'Urville, and Lambert have never
yet been able to attain that unknown point of the terrestrial globe.

As to islands, they are numerous on the surface of the moon.
Nearly all oblong or circular, and as if traced with the
compass, they seem to form one vast archipelago, equal to that
charming group lying between Greece and Asia Minor, and which
mythology in ancient times adorned with most graceful legends.
Involuntarily the names of Naxos, Tenedos, and Carpathos, rise
before the mind, and we seek vainly for Ulysses' vessel or the
"clipper" of the Argonauts.  So at least it was in Michel
Ardan's eyes.  To him it was a Grecian archipelago that he saw
on the map.  To the eyes of his matter-of-fact companions, the
aspect of these coasts recalled rather the parceled-out land of
New Brunswick and Nova Scotia, and where the Frenchman
discovered traces of the heroes of fable, these Americans
were marking the most favorable points for the establishment
of stores in the interests of lunar commerce and industry.

After wandering over these vast continents, the eye is attracted
by the still greater seas.  Not only their formation, but their
situation and aspect remind one of the terrestrial oceans; but
again, as on earth, these seas occupy the greater portion of
the globe.  But in point of fact, these are not liquid spaces,
but plains, the nature of which the travelers hoped soon
to determine.  Astronomers, we must allow, have graced these
pretended seas with at least odd names, which science has
respected up to the present time.  Michel Ardan was right when
he compared this map to a "Tendre card," got up by a Scudary or
a Cyrano de Bergerac.  "Only," said he, "it is no longer the
sentimental card of the seventeenth century, it is the card of
life, very neatly divided into two parts, one feminine, the
other masculine; the right hemisphere for woman, the left for man."

In speaking thus, Michel made his prosaic companions shrug
their shoulders.  Barbicane and Nicholl looked upon the lunar
map from a very different point of view to that of their
fantastic friend.  Nevertheless, their fantastic friend was a
little in the right.  Judge for yourselves.

In the left hemisphere stretches the "Sea of Clouds," where
human reason is so often shipwrecked.  Not far off lies the "Sea
of Rains," fed by all the fever of existence.  Near this is the
"Sea of Storms," where man is ever fighting against his
passions, which too often gain the victory.  Then, worn out by
deceit, treasons, infidelity, and the whole body of terrestrial
misery, what does he find at the end of his career? that vast
"Sea of Humors," barely softened by some drops of the waters
from the "Gulf of Dew!"  Clouds, rain, storms, and humors-- does
the life of man contain aught but these? and is it not summed up
in these four words?

The right hemisphere, "dedicated to the ladies," encloses
smaller seas, whose significant names contain every incident of
a feminine existence.  There is the "Sea of Serenity," over
which the young girl bends; "The Lake of Dreams," reflecting a
joyous future; "The Sea of Nectar," with its waves of tenderness
and breezes of love; "The Sea of Fruitfulness;" "The Sea of
Crises;" then the "Sea of Vapors," whose dimensions are perhaps
a little too confined; and lastly, that vast "Sea of
Tranquillity," in which every false passion, every useless
dream, every unsatisfied desire is at length absorbed, and whose
waves emerge peacefully into the "Lake of Death!"

What a strange succession of names!  What a singular division of
the moon's two hemispheres, joined to one another like man and
woman, and forming that sphere of life carried into space!
And was not the fantastic Michel right in thus interpreting the
fancies of the ancient astronomers?  But while his imagination
thus roved over "the seas," his grave companions were considering
things more geographically.  They were learning this new world
by heart.  They were measuring angles and diameters.





CHAPTER XII


OROGRAPHIC DETAILS


The course taken by the projectile, as we have before remarked, was
bearing it toward the moon's northern hemisphere.  The travelers
were far from the central point which they would have struck,
had their course not been subject to an irremediable deviation.
It was past midnight; and Barbicane then estimated the distance
at seven hundred and fifty miles, which was a little greater than
the length of the lunar radius, and which would diminish as it
advanced nearer to the North Pole.  The projectile was then not
at the altitude of the equator; but across the tenth parallel,
and from that latitude, carefully taken on the map to the pole,
Barbicane and his two companions were able to observe the moon
under the most favorable conditions.  Indeed, by means of glasses,
the above-named distance was reduced to little more than
fourteen miles.  The telescope of the Rocky Mountains brought
the moon much nearer; but the terrestrial atmosphere singularly
lessened its power.  Thus Barbicane, posted in his projectile,
with the glasses to his eyes, could seize upon details which were
almost imperceptible to earthly observers.

"My friends," said the president, in a serious voice, "I do not
know whither we are going; I do not know if we shall ever see
the terrestrial globe again.  Nevertheless, let us proceed as if
our work would one day by useful to our fellow-men.  Let us keep
our minds free from every other consideration.  We are
astronomers; and this projectile is a room in the Cambridge
University, carried into space.  Let us make our observations!"

This said, work was begun with great exactness; and they
faithfully reproduced the different aspects of the moon,
at the different distances which the projectile reached.

At the time that the projectile was as high as the tenth
parallel, north latitude, it seemed rigidly to follow the
twentieth degree, east longitude.  We must here make one
important remark with regard to the map by which they were
taking observations.  In the selenographical maps where, on
account of the reversing of the objects by the glasses, the
south is above and the north below, it would seem natural that,
on account of that inversion, the east should be to the left
hand, and the west to the right.  But it is not so.  If the map
were turned upside down, showing the moon as we see her, the
east would be to the left, and the west to the right, contrary
to that which exists on terrestrial maps.  The following is the
reason of this anomaly.  Observers in the northern hemisphere
(say in Europe) see the moon in the south-- according to them.
When they take observations, they turn their backs to the north,
the reverse position to that which they occupy when they study
a terrestrial map.  As they turn their backs to the north, the
east is on their left, and the west to their right.  To observers
in the southern hemisphere (Patagonia for example), the moon's
west would be quite to their left, and the east to their right,
as the south is behind them.  Such is the reason of the apparent
reversing of these two cardinal points, and we must bear it in mind
in order to be able to follow President Barbicane's observations.

With the help of Boeer and Moedler's _Mappa Selenographica_,
the travelers were able at once to recognize that portion
of the disc enclosed within the field of their glasses.

"What are we looking at, at this moment?" asked Michel.

"At the northern part of the `Sea of Clouds,'" answered Barbicane.
"We are too far off to recognize its nature.  Are these plains
composed of arid sand, as the first astronomer maintained?
Or are they nothing but immense forests, according to M. Warren
de la Rue's opinion, who gives the moon an atmosphere, though
a very low and a very dense one?  That we shall know by and by.
We must affirm nothing until we are in a position to do so."

This "Sea of Clouds" is rather doubtfully marked out upon the maps.
It is supposed that these vast plains are strewn with blocks of
lava from the neighboring volcanoes on its right, Ptolemy,
Purbach, Arzachel.  But the projectile was advancing, and sensibly
nearing it.  Soon there appeared the heights which bound this sea
at this northern limit.  Before them rose a mountain radiant with
beauty, the top of which seemed lost in an eruption of solar rays.

"That is--?" asked Michel.

"Copernicus," replied Barbicane.

"Let us see Copernicus."

This mount, situated in 9@ north latitude and 20@ east
longitude, rose to a height of 10,600 feet above the surface of
the moon.  It is quite visible from the earth; and astronomers
can study it with ease, particularly during the phase between
the last quarter and the new moon, because then the shadows are
thrown lengthways from east to west, allowing them to measure
the heights.

This Copernicus forms the most important of the radiating
system, situated in the southern hemisphere, according to Tycho
Brahe.  It rises isolated like a gigantic lighthouse on that
portion of the "Sea of Clouds," which is bounded by the "Sea of
Tempests," thus lighting by its splendid rays two oceans at
a time.  It was a sight without an equal, those long luminous
trains, so dazzling in the full moon, and which, passing the
boundary chain on the north, extends to the "Sea of Rains."
At one o'clock of the terrestrial morning, the projectile,
like a balloon borne into space, overlooked the top of this
superb mount.  Barbicane could recognize perfectly its
chief features.  Copernicus is comprised in the series of
ringed mountains of the first order, in the division of
great circles.  Like Kepler and Aristarchus, which overlook
the "Ocean of Tempests," sometimes it appeared like a brilliant
point through the cloudy light, and was taken for a volcano
in activity.  But it is only an extinct one-- like all on that
side of the moon.  Its circumference showed a diameter of about
twenty-two leagues.  The glasses discovered traces of
stratification produced by successive eruptions, and the
neighborhood was strewn with volcanic remains which still choked
some of the craters.

"There exist," said Barbicane, "several kinds of circles on the
surface of the moon, and it is easy to see that Copernicus
belongs to the radiating class.  If we were nearer, we should
see the cones bristling on the inside, which in former times
were so many fiery mouths.  A curious arrangement, and one
without an exception on the lunar disc, is that the interior
surface of these circles is the reverse of the exterior, and
contrary to the form taken by terrestrial craters.  It follows,
then, that the general curve of the bottom of these circles
gives a sphere of a smaller diameter than that of the moon."

"And why this peculiar disposition?" asked Nicholl.

"We do not know," replied Barbicane.

"What splendid radiation!" said Michel.  "One could hardly see
a finer spectacle, I think."

"What would you say, then," replied Barbicane, "if chance should
bear us toward the southern hemisphere?"

"Well, I should say that it was still more beautiful," retorted
Michel Ardan.

At this moment the projectile hung perpendicularly over the circle.
The circumference of Copernicus formed almost a perfect circle,
and its steep escarpments were clearly defined.  They could even
distinguish a second ringed enclosure.  Around spread a grayish
plain, of a wild aspect, on which every relief was marked in yellow.
At the bottom of the circle, as if enclosed in a jewel case,
sparkled for one instant two or three eruptive cones, like enormous
dazzling gems.  Toward the north the escarpments were lowered by a
depression which would probably have given access to the interior
of the crater.

In passing over the surrounding plains, Barbicane noticed a
great number of less important mountains; and among others a
little ringed one called Guy Lussac, the breadth of which
measured twelve miles.

Toward the south, the plain was very flat, without one
elevation, without one projection.  Toward the north, on the
contrary, till where it was bounded by the "Sea of Storms," it
resembled a liquid surface agitated by a storm, of which the
hills and hollows formed a succession of waves suddenly congealed.
Over the whole of this, and in all directions, lay the luminous
lines, all converging to the summit of Copernicus.

The travelers discussed the origin of these strange rays; but they
could not determine their nature any more than terrestrial observers.

"But why," said Nicholl, "should not these rays be simply spurs
of mountains which reflect more vividly the light of the sun?"

"No," replied Barbicane; "if it was so, under certain conditions
of the moon, these ridges would cast shadows, and they do not
cast any."

And indeed, these rays only appeared when the orb of day was in
opposition to the moon, and disappeared as soon as its rays
became oblique.

"But how have they endeavored to explain these lines of light?"
asked Michel; "for I cannot believe that savants would ever be
stranded for want of an explanation."

"Yes," replied Barbicane; "Herschel has put forward an opinion,
but he did not venture to affirm it."

"Never mind.  What was the opinion?"

"He thought that these rays might be streams of cooled lava
which shone when the sun beat straight upon them.  It may be so;
but nothing can be less certain.  Besides, if we pass nearer to
Tycho, we shall be in a better position to find out the cause of
this radiation."

"Do you know, my friends, what that plain, seen from the height
we are at, resembles?" said Michel.

"No," replied Nicholl.

"Very well; with all those pieces of lava lengthened like rockets,
it resembles an immense game of spelikans thrown pellmell.
There wants but the hook to pull them out one by one."

"Do be serious," said Barbicane.

"Well, let us be serious," replied Michel quietly; "and instead
of spelikans, let us put bones.  This plain, would then be
nothing but an immense cemetery, on which would repose the
mortal remains of thousands of extinct generations.  Do you
prefer that high-flown comparison?"

"One is as good as the other," retorted Barbicane.

"My word, you are difficult to please," answered Michel.

"My worthy friend," continued the matter-of-fact Barbicane, "it
matters but little what it _resembles_, when we do not know what
it _is_."

"Well answered," exclaimed Michel.  "That will teach me to
reason with savants."

But the projectile continued to advance with almost uniform
speed around the lunar disc.  The travelers, we may easily
imagine, did not dream of taking a moment's rest.  Every minute
changed the landscape which fled from beneath their gaze.
About half past one o'clock in the morning, they caught a glimpse
of the tops of another mountain.  Barbicane, consulting his map,
recognized Eratosthenes.

It was a ringed mountain nine thousand feet high, and one of
those circles so numerous on this satellite.  With regard to
this, Barbicane related Kepler's singular opinion on the
formation of circles.  According to that celebrated
mathematician, these crater-like cavities had been dug by the
hand of man.

"For what purpose?" asked Nicholl.

"For a very natural one," replied Barbicane.  "The Selenites
might have undertaken these immense works and dug these enormous
holes for a refuge and shield from the solar rays which beat
upon them during fifteen consecutive days."

"The Selenites are not fools," said Michel.

"A singular idea," replied Nicholl; "but it is probable that
Kepler did not know the true dimensions of these circles, for
the digging of them would have been the work of giants quite
impossible for the Selenites."

"Why? if weight on the moon's surface is six times less than on
the earth?" said Michel.

"But if the Selenites are six times smaller?" retorted Nicholl.

"And if there are _no_ Selenites?" added Barbicane.

This put an end to the discussion.

Soon Eratosthenes disappeared under the horizon without the
projectile being sufficiently near to allow close observation.
This mountain separated the Apennines from the Carpathians. In the
lunar orography they have discerned some chains of mountains, which
are chiefly distributed over the northern hemisphere.  Some, however,
occupy certain portions of the southern hemisphere also.

About two o'clock in the morning Barbicane found that they were
above the twentieth lunar parallel.  The distance of the
projectile from the moon was not more than six hundred miles.
Barbicane, now perceiving that the projectile was steadily
approaching the lunar disc, did not despair; if not of reaching
her, at least of discovering the secrets of her configuration.





CHAPTER XIII


LUNAR LANDSCAPES


At half-past two in the morning, the projectile was over the
thirteenth lunar parallel and at the effective distance of five
hundred miles, reduced by the glasses to five.  It still seemed
impossible, however, that it could ever touch any part of the disc.
Its motive speed, comparatively so moderate, was inexplicable to
President Barbicane.  At that distance from the moon it must have
been considerable, to enable it to bear up against her attraction.
Here was a phenomenon the cause of which escaped them again.
Besides, time failed them to investigate the cause.  All lunar
relief was defiling under the eyes of the travelers, and they
would not lose a single detail.

Under the glasses the disc appeared at the distance of five
miles.  What would an aeronaut, borne to this distance from the
earth, distinguish on its surface?  We cannot say, since the
greatest ascension has not been more than 25,000 feet.

This, however, is an exact description of what Barbicane and his
companions saw at this height.  Large patches of different
colors appeared on the disc.  Selenographers are not agreed upon
the nature of these colors.  There are several, and rather
vividly marked.  Julius Schmidt pretends that, if the
terrestrial oceans were dried up, a Selenite observer could not
distinguish on the globe a greater diversity of shades between
the oceans and the continental plains than those on the moon
present to a terrestrial observer.  According to him, the color
common to the vast plains known by the name of "seas" is a dark
gray mixed with green and brown.  Some of the large craters
present the same appearance.  Barbicane knew this opinion of the
German selenographer, an opinion shared by Boeer and Moedler.
Observation has proved that right was on their side, and not on
that of some astronomers who admit the existence of only gray on
the moon's surface.  In some parts green was very distinct, such
as springs, according to Julius Schmidt, from the seas of
"Serenity and Humors."  Barbicane also noticed large craters,
without any interior cones, which shed a bluish tint similar to
the reflection of a sheet of steel freshly polished.  These colors
belonged really to the lunar disc, and did not result, as some
astronomers say, either from the imperfection in the objective
of the glasses or from the interposition of the terrestrial atmosphere.

Not a doubt existed in Barbicane's mind with regard to it, as he
observed it through space, and so could not commit any optical error.
He considered the establishment of this fact as an acquisition
to science.  Now, were these shades of green, belonging to
tropical vegetation, kept up by a low dense atmosphere?  He could
not yet say.

Farther on, he noticed a reddish tint, quite defined.  The same
shade had before been observed at the bottom of an isolated
enclosure, known by the name of Lichtenburg's circle, which is
situated near the Hercynian mountains, on the borders of the
moon; but they could not tell the nature of it.

They were not more fortunate with regard to another peculiarity
of the disc, for they could not decide upon the cause of it.

Michel Ardan was watching near the president, when he noticed
long white lines, vividly lighted up by the direct rays of the sun.
It was a succession of luminous furrows, very different from the
radiation of Copernicus not long before; they ran parallel with
each other.

Michel, with his usual readiness, hastened to exclaim:

"Look there! cultivated fields!"

"Cultivated fields!" replied Nicholl, shrugging his shoulders.

"Plowed, at all events," retorted Michel Ardan; "but what
laborers those Selenites must be, and what giant oxen they must
harness to their plow to cut such furrows!"

"They are not furrows," said Barbicane; "they are _rifts_."

"Rifts? stuff!" replied Michel mildly; "but what do you mean by
`rifts' in the scientific world?"

Barbicane immediately enlightened his companion as to what he
knew about lunar rifts.  He knew that they were a kind of furrow
found on every part of the disc which was not mountainous; that
these furrows, generally isolated, measured from 400 to 500
leagues in length; that their breadth varied from 1,000 to 1,500
yards, and that their borders were strictly parallel; but he
knew nothing more either of their formation or their nature.

Barbicane, through his glasses, observed these rifts with
great attention.  He noticed that their borders were formed of
steep declivities; they were long parallel ramparts, and with some
small amount of imagination he might have admitted the existence
of long lines of fortifications, raised by Selenite engineers.
Of these different rifts some were perfectly straight, as if cut
by a line; others were slightly curved, though still keeping
their borders parallel; some crossed each other, some cut through
craters; here they wound through ordinary cavities, such as
Posidonius or Petavius; there they wound through the seas, such
as the "Sea of Serenity."

These natural accidents naturally excited the imaginations of
these terrestrial astronomers.  The first observations had not
discovered these rifts.  Neither Hevelius, Cassin, La Hire, nor
Herschel seemed to have known them.  It was Schroeter who in
1789 first drew attention to them.  Others followed who studied
them, as Pastorff, Gruithuysen, Boeer, and Moedler.  At this
time their number amounts to seventy; but, if they have been
counted, their nature has not yet been determined; they are
certainly _not_ fortifications, any more than they are the
ancient beds of dried-up rivers; for, on one side, the waters,
so slight on the moon's surface, could never have worn such
drains for themselves; and, on the other, they often cross
craters of great elevation.

We must, however, allow that Michel Ardan had "an idea," and
that, without knowing it, he coincided in that respect with
Julius Schmidt.

"Why," said he, "should not these unaccountable appearances be
simply phenomena of vegetation?"

"What do you mean?" asked Barbicane quickly.

"Do not excite yourself, my worthy president," replied Michel;
"might it not be possible that the dark lines forming that
bastion were rows of trees regularly placed?"

"You stick to your vegetation, then?" said Barbicane.

"I like," retorted Michel Ardan, "to explain what you savants
cannot explain; at least my hypotheses has the advantage of
indicating why these rifts disappear, or seem to disappear, at
certain seasons."

"And for what reason?"

"For the reason that the trees become invisible when they lose
their leaves, and visible again when they regain them."

"Your explanation is ingenious, my dear companion," replied
Barbicane, "but inadmissible."

"Why?"

"Because, so to speak, there are no seasons on the moon's surface,
and that, consequently, the phenomena of vegetation of which you
speak cannot occur."

Indeed, the slight obliquity of the lunar axis keeps the sun at
an almost equal height in every latitude.  Above the equatorial
regions the radiant orb almost invariably occupies the zenith,
and does not pass the limits of the horizon in the polar
regions; thus, according to each region, there reigns a
perpetual winter, spring, summer, or autumn, as in the planet
Jupiter, whose axis is but little inclined upon its orbit.

What origin do they attribute to these rifts?  That is a
question difficult to solve.  They are certainly anterior to the
formation of craters and circles, for several have introduced
themselves by breaking through their circular ramparts.  Thus it
may be that, contemporary with the later geological epochs, they
are due to the expansion of natural forces.

But the projectile had now attained the fortieth degree of lunar
latitude, at a distance not exceeding 40 miles.  Through the
glasses objects appeared to be only four miles distant.

At this point, under their feet, rose Mount Helicon, 1,520 feet
high, and round about the left rose moderate elevations,
enclosing a small portion of the "Sea of Rains," under the name
of the Gulf of Iris.  The terrestrial atmosphere would have to
be one hundred and seventy times more transparent than it is,
to allow astronomers to make perfect observations on the moon's
surface; but in the void in which the projectile floated no
fluid interposed itself between the eye of the observer and
the object observed.  And more, Barbicane found himself carried
to a greater distance than the most powerful telescopes had
ever done before, either that of Lord Rosse or that of the
Rocky Mountains.  He was, therefore, under extremely favorable
conditions for solving that great question of the habitability
of the moon; but the solution still escaped him; he could
distinguish nothing but desert beds, immense plains, and toward
the north, arid mountains.  Not a work betrayed the hand of man;
not a ruin marked his course; not a group of animals was to be
seen indicating life, even in an inferior degree.  In no part
was there life, in no part was there an appearance of vegetation.
Of the three kingdoms which share the terrestrial globe between
them, one alone was represented on the lunar and that the mineral.

"Ah, indeed!" said Michel Ardan, a little out of countenance;
"then you see no one?"

"No," answered Nicholl; "up to this time, not a man, not an
animal, not a tree!  After all, whether the atmosphere has taken
refuge at the bottom of cavities, in the midst of the circles,
or even on the opposite face of the moon, we cannot decide."

"Besides," added Barbicane, "even to the most piercing eye a man
cannot be distinguished farther than three and a half miles off;
so that, if there are any Selenites, they can see our projectile,
but we cannot see them."

Toward four in the morning, at the height of the fiftieth
parallel, the distance was reduced to 300 miles.  To the left
ran a line of mountains capriciously shaped, lying in the
full light.  To the right, on the contrary, lay a black hollow
resembling a vast well, unfathomable and gloomy, drilled into
the lunar soil.

This hole was the "Black Lake"; it was Pluto, a deep circle
which can be conveniently studied from the earth, between the
last quarter and the new moon, when the shadows fall from west
to east.

This black color is rarely met with on the surface of
the satellite.  As yet it has only been recognized in the depths
of the circle of Endymion, to the east of the "Cold Sea," in the
northern hemisphere, and at the bottom of Grimaldi's circle, on
the equator, toward the eastern border of the orb.

Pluto is an annular mountain, situated in 51@ north latitude,
and 9@ east longitude.  Its circuit is forty-seven miles long
and thirty-two broad.

Barbicane regretted that they were not passing directly above
this vast opening.  There was an abyss to fathom, perhaps some
mysterious phenomenon to surprise; but the projectile's course
could not be altered.  They must rigidly submit.  They could not
guide a balloon, still less a projectile, when once enclosed
within its walls.  Toward five in the morning the northern
limits of the "Sea of Rains" was at length passed.  The mounts
of Condamine and Fontenelle remained-- one on the right, the
other on the left.  That part of the disc beginning with 60@ was
becoming quite mountainous.  The glasses brought them to within
two miles, less than that separating the summit of Mont Blanc
from the level of the sea.  The whole region was bristling with
spikes and circles.  Toward the 60@ Philolaus stood predominant
at a height of 5,550 feet with its elliptical crater, and seen
from this distance, the disc showed a very fantastical appearance.
Landscapes were presented to the eye under very different
conditions from those on the earth, and also very inferior to them.

The moon having no atmosphere, the consequences arising from
the absence of this gaseous envelope have already been shown.
No twilight on her surface; night following day and day following
night with the suddenness of a lamp which is extinguished or
lighted amid profound darkness-- no transition from cold to
heat, the temperature falling in an instant from boiling point
to the cold of space.

Another consequence of this want of air is that absolute
darkness reigns where the sun's rays do not penetrate.
That which on earth is called diffusion of light, that luminous
matter which the air holds in suspension, which creates the
twilight and the daybreak, which produces the _umbrae_ and
_penumbrae_, and all the magic of _chiaro-oscuro_, does not
exist on the moon.  Hence the harshness of contrasts, which
only admit of two colors, black and white.  If a Selenite
were to shade his eyes from the sun's rays, the sky would seem
absolutely black, and the stars would shine to him as on the
darkest night.  Judge of the impression produced on Barbicane
and his three friends by this strange scene!  Their eyes
were confused.  They could no longer grasp the respective
distances of the different plains.  A lunar landscape without
the softening of the phenomena of _chiaro-oscuro_ could not be
rendered by an earthly landscape painter; it would be spots of
ink on a white page-- nothing more.

This aspect was not altered even when the projectile, at the
height of 80@, was only separated from the moon by a distance
of fifty miles; nor even when, at five in the morning, it
passed at less than twenty-five miles from the mountain of
Gioja, a distance reduced by the glasses to a quarter of a mile.
It seemed as if the moon might be touched by the hand!
It seemed impossible that, before long, the projectile would
not strike her, if only at the north pole, the brilliant arch
of which was so distinctly visible on the black sky.

Michel Ardan wanted to open one of the scuttles and throw
himself on to the moon's surface!  A very useless attempt; for
if the projectile could not attain any point whatever of the
satellite, Michel, carried along by its motion, could not attain
it either.

At that moment, at six o'clock, the lunar pole appeared.  The disc
only presented to the travelers' gaze one half brilliantly lit up,
while the other disappeared in the darkness.  Suddenly the
projectile passed the line of demarcation between intense light
and absolute darkness, and was plunged in profound night!





CHAPTER XIV


THE NIGHT OF THREE HUNDRED AND FIFTY-FOUR HOURS AND A HALF

At the moment when this phenomenon took place so rapidly, the
projectile was skirting the moon's north pole at less than
twenty-five miles distance.  Some seconds had sufficed to plunge
it into the absolute darkness of space.  The transition was so
sudden, without shade, without gradation of light, without
attenuation of the luminous waves, that the orb seemed to have
been extinguished by a powerful blow.

"Melted, disappeared!" Michel Ardan exclaimed, aghast.

Indeed, there was neither reflection nor shadow.  Nothing more
was to be seen of that disc, formerly so dazzling.  The darkness
was complete. and rendered even more so by the rays from the stars.
It was "that blackness" in which the lunar nights are insteeped,
which last three hundred and fifty-four hours and a half at each
point of the disc, a long night resulting from the equality of
the translatory and rotary movements of the moon.  The projectile,
immerged in the conical shadow of the satellite, experienced the
action of the solar rays no more than any of its invisible points.

In the interior, the obscurity was complete.  They could not see
each other.  Hence the necessity of dispelling the darkness.
However desirous Barbicane might be to husband the gas, the
reserve of which was small, he was obliged to ask from it a
fictitious light, an expensive brilliancy which the sun then refused.

"Devil take the radiant orb!" exclaimed Michel Ardan, "which
forces us to expend gas, instead of giving us his rays gratuitously."

"Do not let us accuse the sun," said Nicholl, "it is not his
fault, but that of the moon, which has come and placed herself
like a screen between us and it."

"It is the sun!" continued Michel.

"It is the moon!" retorted Nicholl.

An idle dispute, which Barbicane put an end to by saying:

"My friends, it is neither the fault of the sun nor of the moon;
it is the fault of the _projectile_, which, instead of rigidly
following its course, has awkwardly missed it.  To be more just,
it is the fault of that unfortunate meteor which has so
deplorably altered our first direction."

"Well," replied Michel Ardan, "as the matter is settled, let us
have breakfast.  After a whole night of watching it is fair to
build ourselves up a little."

This proposal meeting with no contradiction, Michel prepared the
repast in a few minutes.  But they ate for eating's sake, they
drank without toasts, without hurrahs.  The bold travelers being
borne away into gloomy space, without their accustomed
_cortege_ of rays, felt a vague uneasiness in their hearts.
The "strange" shadow so dear to Victor Hugo's pen bound them on
all sides.  But they talked over the interminable night of three
hundred and fifty-four hours and a half, nearly fifteen days,
which the law of physics has imposed on the inhabitants of the moon.

Barbicane gave his friends some explanation of the causes and
the consequences of this curious phenomenon.

"Curious indeed," said they; "for, if each hemisphere of the
moon is deprived of solar light for fifteen days, that above
which we now float does not even enjoy during its long night any
view of the earth so beautifully lit up.  In a word she has no
moon (applying this designation to our globe) but on one side of
her disc.  Now if this were the case with the earth-- if, for
example, Europe never saw the moon, and she was only visible at
the antipodes, imagine to yourself the astonishment of a
European on arriving in Australia."

"They would make the voyage for nothing but to see the moon!"
replied Michel.

"Very well!" continued Barbicane, "that astonishment is reserved
for the Selenites who inhabit the face of the moon opposite to
the earth, a face which is ever invisible to our countrymen of
the terrestrial globe."

"And which we should have seen," added Nicholl, "if we had arrived
here when the moon was new, that is to say fifteen days later."

"I will add, to make amends," continued Barbicane, "that the
inhabitants of the visible face are singularly favored by nature,
to the detriment of their brethren on the invisible face.
The latter, as you see, have dark nights of 354 hours, without
one single ray to break the darkness.  The other, on the contrary,
when the sun which has given its light for fifteen days sinks
below the horizon, see a splendid orb rise on the opposite horizon.
It is the earth, which is thirteen times greater than the
diminutive moon that we know-- the earth which developes itself
at a diameter of two degrees, and which sheds a light thirteen
times greater than that qualified by atmospheric strata-- the
earth which only disappears at the moment when the sun reappears
in its turn!"

"Nicely worded!" said Michel, "slightly academical perhaps."

"It follows, then," continued Barbicane, without knitting his
brows, "that the visible face of the disc must be very agreeable
to inhabit, since it always looks on either the sun when the
moon is full, or on the earth when the moon is new."

"But," said Nicholl, "that advantage must be well compensated by
the insupportable heat which the light brings with it."

"The inconvenience, in that respect, is the same for the two
faces, for the earth's light is evidently deprived of heat.
But the invisible face is still more searched by the heat than
the visible face.  I say that for _you_, Nicholl, because Michel
will probably not understand."

"Thank you," said Michel.

"Indeed," continued Barbicane, "when the invisible face receives
at the same time light and heat from the sun, it is because the
moon is new; that is to say, she is situated between the sun and
the earth.  It follows, then, considering the position which she
occupies in opposition when full, that she is nearer to the sun
by twice her distance from the earth; and that distance may be
estimated at the two-hundredth part of that which separates the
sun from the earth, or in round numbers 400,000 miles.  So that
invisible face is so much nearer to the sun when she receives
its rays."

"Quite right," replied Nicholl.

"On the contrary," continued Barbicane.

"One moment," said Michel, interrupting his grave companion.

"What do you want?"

"I ask to be allowed to continue the explanation."

"And why?"

"To prove that I understand."

"Get along with you," said Barbicane, smiling.

"On the contrary," said Michel, imitating the tone and gestures
of the president, "on the contrary, when the visible face of the
moon is lit by the sun, it is because the moon is full, that is
to say, opposite the sun with regard to the earth.  The distance
separating it from the radiant orb is then increased in round
numbers to 400,000 miles, and the heat which she receives must
be a little less."

"Very well said!" exclaimed Barbicane.  "Do you know, Michel,
that, for an amateur, you are intelligent."

"Yes," replied Michel coolly, "we are all so on the Boulevard
des Italiens."

Barbicane gravely grasped the hand of his amiable companion, and
continued to enumerate the advantages reserved for the inhabitants
of the visible face.

Among others, he mentioned eclipses of the sun, which only take
place on this side of the lunar disc; since, in order that they
may take place, it is necessary for the moon to be _in
opposition_.  These eclipses, caused by the interposition of the
earth between the moon and the sun, can last _two hours_; during
which time, by reason of the rays refracted by its atmosphere,
the terrestrial globe can appear as nothing but a black point
upon the sun.

"So," said Nicholl, "there is a hemisphere, that invisible
hemisphere which is very ill supplied, very ill treated,
by nature."

"Never mind," replied Michel; "if we ever become Selenites, we
will inhabit the visible face.  I like the light."

"Unless, by any chance," answered Nicholl, "the atmosphere should
be condensed on the other side, as certain astronomers pretend."

"That would be a consideration," said Michel.

Breakfast over, the observers returned to their post.  They tried
to see through the darkened scuttles by extinguishing all light
in the projectile; but not a luminous spark made its way through
the darkness.

One inexplicable fact preoccupied Barbicane.  Why, having passed
within such a short distance of the moon--about twenty-five
miles only-- why the projectile had not fallen?  If its speed
had been enormous, he could have understood that the fall would
not have taken place; but, with a relatively moderate speed,
that resistance to the moon's attraction could not be explained.
Was the projectile under some foreign influence?  Did some kind
of body retain it in the ether?  It was quite evident that it
could never reach any point of the moon.  Whither was it going?
Was it going farther from, or nearing, the disc?  Was it being
borne in that profound darkness through the infinity of space?
How could they learn, how calculate, in the midst of this night?
All these questions made Barbicane uneasy, but he could not
solve them.

Certainly, the invisible orb was _there_, perhaps only some few
miles off; but neither he nor his companions could see it.
If there was any noise on its surface, they could not hear it.
Air, that medium of sound, was wanting to transmit the groanings
of that moon which the Arabic legends call "a man already half
granite, and still breathing."

One must allow that that was enough to aggravate the most
patient observers.  It was just that unknown hemisphere which
was stealing from their sight.  That face which fifteen days
sooner, or fifteen days later, had been, or would be, splendidly
illuminated by the solar rays, was then being lost in utter darkness.
In fifteen days where would the projectile be?  Who could say?
Where would the chances of conflicting attractions have drawn
it to?  The disappointment of the travelers in the midst of this
utter darkness may be imagined.  All observation of the lunar
disc was impossible.  The constellations alone claimed all their
attention; and we must allow that the astronomers Faye, Charconac,
and Secchi, never found themselves in circumstances so favorable
for their observation.

Indeed, nothing could equal the splendor of this starry world,
bathed in limpid ether.  Its diamonds set in the heavenly vault
sparkled magnificently.  The eye took in the firmament from the
Southern Cross to the North Star, those two constellations which
in 12,000 years, by reason of the succession of equinoxes, will
resign their part of the polar stars, the one to Canopus in the
southern hemisphere, the other to Wega in the northern.
Imagination loses itself in this sublime Infinity, amid which
the projectile was gravitating, like a new star created by the
hand of man.  From a natural cause, these constellations shone
with a soft luster; they did not twinkle, for there was no
atmosphere which, by the intervention of its layers unequally
dense and of different degrees of humidity, produces
this scintillation.  These stars were soft eyes, looking out
into the dark night, amid the silence of absolute space.

Long did the travelers stand mute, watching the constellated
firmament, upon which the moon, like a vast screen, made an
enormous black hole.  But at length a painful sensation drew
them from their watchings.  This was an intense cold, which soon
covered the inside of the glass of the scuttles with a thick
coating of ice.  The sun was no longer warming the projectile
with its direct rays, and thus it was losing the heat stored up
in its walls by degrees.  This heat was rapidly evaporating into
space by radiation, and a considerably lower temperature was
the result.  The humidity of the interior was changed into ice
upon contact with the glass, preventing all observation.

Nicholl consulted the thermometer, and saw that it had fallen to
seventeen degrees (Centigrade) below zero. [3]  So that, in spite
of the many reasons for economizing, Barbicane, after having
begged light from the gas, was also obliged to beg for heat.
The projectile's low temperature was no longer endurable.
Its tenants would have been frozen to death.

[3] 1@ Fahrenheit.

"Well!" observed Michel, "we cannot reasonably complain of the
monotony of our journey!  What variety we have had, at least
in temperature.  Now we are blinded with light and saturated with
heat, like the Indians of the Pampas! now plunged into profound
darkness, amid the cold, like the Esquimaux of the north pole.
No, indeed! we have no right to complain; nature does wonders in
our honor."

"But," asked Nicholl, "what is the temperature outside?"

"Exactly that of the planetary space," replied Barbicane.

"Then," continued Michel Ardan, "would not this be the time to
make the experiment which we dared not attempt when we were
drowned in the sun's rays?

"It is now or never," replied Barbicane, "for we are in a good
position to verify the temperature of space, and see if Fourier
or Pouillet's calculations are exact."

"In any case it is cold," said Michel.  "See! the steam of the
interior is condensing on the glasses of the scuttles.  If the fall
continues, the vapor of our breath will fall in snow around us."

"Let us prepare a thermometer," said Barbicane.

We may imagine that an ordinary thermometer would afford no
result under the circumstances in which this instrument was to
be exposed.  The mercury would have been frozen in its ball,
as below 42@ Fahrenheit below zero it is no longer liquid.
But Barbicane had furnished himself with a spirit thermometer
on Wafferdin's system, which gives the minima of excessively
low temperatures.

Before beginning the experiment, this instrument was compared
with an ordinary one, and then Barbicane prepared to use it.

"How shall we set about it?" asked Nicholl.

"Nothing is easier," replied Michel Ardan, who was never at a loss.
"We open the scuttle rapidly; throw out the instrument; it follows
the projectile with exemplary docility; and a quarter of an hour
after, draw it in."

"With the hand?" asked Barbicane.

"With the hand," replied Michel.

"Well, then, my friend, do not expose yourself," answered
Barbicane, "for the hand that you draw in again will be nothing
but a stump frozen and deformed by the frightful cold."

"Really!"

"You will feel as if you had had a terrible burn, like that of
iron at a white heat; for whether the heat leaves our bodies
briskly or enters briskly, it is exactly the same thing.
Besides, I am not at all certain that the objects we have thrown
out are still following us."

"Why not?" asked Nicholl.

"Because, if we are passing through an atmosphere of the
slightest density, these objects will be retarded.  Again, the
darkness prevents our seeing if they still float around us.
But in order not to expose ourselves to the loss of our
thermometer, we will fasten it, and we can then more easily
pull it back again."

Barbicane's advice was followed.  Through the scuttle rapidly
opened, Nicholl threw out the instrument, which was held by a
short cord, so that it might be more easily drawn up.  The scuttle
had not been opened more than a second, but that second had sufficed
to let in a most intense cold.

"The devil!" exclaimed Michel Ardan, "it is cold enough to
freeze a white bear."

Barbicane waited until half an hour had elapsed, which was more
than time enough to allow the instrument to fall to the level of
the surrounding temperature.  Then it was rapidly pulled in.

Barbicane calculated the quantity of spirits of wine overflowed
into the little vial soldered to the lower part of the
instrument, and said:

"A hundred and forty degrees Centigrade [4] below zero!"

[4] 218 degrees Fahrenheit below zero.

M. Pouillet was right and Fourier wrong.  That was the undoubted
temperature of the starry space.  Such is, perhaps, that of the
lunar continents, when the orb of night has lost by radiation
all the heat which fifteen days of sun have poured into her.





CHAPTER XV


HYPERBOLA OR PARABOLA


We may, perhaps, be astonished to find Barbicane and his
companions so little occupied with the future reserved for them
in their metal prison which was bearing them through the
infinity of space.  Instead of asking where they were going,
they passed their time making experiments, as if they had been
quietly installed in their own study.

We might answer that men so strong-minded were above such
anxieties-- that they did not trouble themselves about such
trifles-- and that they had something else to do than to
occupy their minds with the future.

The truth was that they were not masters of their projectile;
they could neither check its course, nor alter its direction.

A sailor can change the head of his ship as he pleases; an
aeronaut can give a vertical motion to his balloon.  They, on
the contrary, had no power over their vehicle.  Every maneuver
was forbidden.  Hence the inclination to let things alone, or as
the sailors say, "let her run."

Where did they find themselves at this moment, at eight o'clock in
the morning of the day called upon the earth the 6th of December?
Very certainly in the neighborhood of the moon, and even near
enough for her to look to them like an enormous black screen upon
the firmament.  As to the distance which separated them, it was
impossible to estimate it.  The projectile, held by some
unaccountable force, had been within four miles of grazing the
satellite's north pole.

But since entering the cone of shadow these last two hours, had
the distance increased or diminished?  Every point of mark was
wanting by which to estimate both the direction and the speed of
the projectile.

Perhaps it was rapidly leaving the disc, so that it would soon
quit the pure shadow.  Perhaps, again, on the other hand, it
might be nearing it so much that in a short time it might strike
some high point on the invisible hemisphere, which would doubtlessly
have ended the journey much to the detriment of the travelers.

A discussion arose on this subject, and Michel Ardan, always
ready with an explanation, gave it as his opinion that the
projectile, held by the lunar attraction, would end by falling
on the surface of the terrestrial globe like an aerolite.

"First of all, my friend," answered Barbicane, "every aerolite
does not fall to the earth; it is only a small proportion which
do so; and if we had passed into an aerolite, it does not necessarily
follow that we should ever reach the surface of the moon."

"But how if we get near enough?" replied Michel.

"Pure mistake," replied Barbicane.  "Have you not seen shooting
stars rush through the sky by thousands at certain seasons?"

"Yes."

"Well, these stars, or rather corpuscles, only shine when they
are heated by gliding over the atmospheric layers.  Now, if
they enter the atmosphere, they pass at least within forty
miles of the earth, but they seldom fall upon it.  The same with
our projectile.  It may approach very near to the moon, and not
yet fall upon it."

"But then," asked Michel, "I shall be curious to know how our
erring vehicle will act in space?"

"I see but two hypotheses," replied Barbicane, after some
moments' reflection.

"What are they?"

"The projectile has the choice between two mathematical curves,
and it will follow one or the other according to the speed with
which it is animated, and which at this moment I cannot estimate."

"Yes," said Nicholl, "it will follow either a parabola or
a hyperbola."

"Just so," replied Barbicane.  "With a certain speed it will
assume the parabola, and with a greater the hyperbola."

"I like those grand words," exclaimed Michel Ardan; "one knows
directly what they mean.  And pray what is your parabola, if
you please?"

"My friend," answered the captain, "the parabola is a curve of
the second order, the result of the section of a cone
intersected by a plane parallel to one of the sides."

"Ah! ah!" said Michel, in a satisfied tone.

"It is very nearly," continued Nicholl, "the course described by
a bomb launched from a mortar."

"Perfect!  And the hyperbola?"

"The hyperbola, Michel, is a curve of the second order, produced
by the intersection of a conic surface and a plane parallel to
its axis, and constitutes two branches separated one from the other,
both tending indefinitely in the two directions."

"Is it possible!" exclaimed Michel Ardan in a serious tone, as
if they had told him of some serious event.  "What I particularly
like in your definition of the hyperbola (I was going to say
hyperblague) is that it is still more obscure than the word you
pretend to define."

Nicholl and Barbicane cared little for Michel Ardan's fun.
They were deep in a scientific discussion.  What curve would
the projectile follow? was their hobby.  One maintained the
hyperbola, the other the parabola.  They gave each other reasons
bristling with _x_.  Their arguments were couched in language
which made Michel jump.  The discussion was hot, and neither
would give up his chosen curve to his adversary.

This scientific dispute lasted so long that it made Michel
very impatient.

"Now, gentlemen cosines, will you cease to throw parabolas and
hyperbolas at each other's heads?  I want to understand the only
interesting question in the whole affair.  We shall follow one
or the other of these curves?  Good.  But where will they lead
us to?"

"Nowhere," replied Nicholl.

"How, nowhere?"

"Evidently," said Barbicane, "they are open curves, which may be
prolonged indefinitely."

"Ah, savants!" cried Michel; "and what are either the one or the
other to us from the moment we know that they equally lead us
into infinite space?"

Barbicane and Nicholl could not forbear smiling.  They had just
been creating "art for art's sake."  Never had so idle a question
been raised at such an inopportune moment.  The sinister truth
remained that, whether hyperbolically or parabolically borne away,
the projectile would never again meet either the earth or the moon.

What would become of these bold travelers in the immediate future?
If they did not die of hunger, if they did not die of thirst,
in some days, when the gas failed, they would die from want of air,
unless the cold had killed them first.  Still, important as it was
to economize the gas, the excessive lowness of the surrounding
temperature obliged them to consume a certain quantity.
Strictly speaking, they could do without its _light_, but not
without its _heat_.  Fortunately the caloric generated by Reiset's
and Regnaut's apparatus raised the temperature of the interior
of the projectile a little, and without much expenditure they
were able to keep it bearable.

But observations had now become very difficult.  the dampness of
the projectile was condensed on the windows and congealed immediately.
This cloudiness had to be dispersed continually.  In any case
they might hope to be able to discover some phenomena of the
highest interest.

But up to this time the disc remained dumb and dark.  It did not
answer the multiplicity of questions put by these ardent minds;
a matter which drew this reflection from Michel, apparently a
just one:

"If ever we begin this journey over again, we shall do well to
choose the time when the moon is at the full."

"Certainly," said Nicholl, "that circumstance will be more favorable.
I allow that the moon, immersed in the sun's rays, will not be
visible during the transit, but instead we should see the earth,
which would be full.  And what is more, if we were drawn round the
moon, as at this moment, we should at least have the advantage of
seeing the invisible part of her disc magnificently lit."

"Well said, Nicholl," replied Michel Ardan.  "What do you
think, Barbicane?"

"I think this," answered the grave president:  "If ever we begin
this journey again, we shall start at the same time and under
the same conditions.  Suppose we had attained our end, would it
not have been better to have found continents in broad daylight
than a country plunged in utter darkness?  Would not our first
installation have been made under better circumstances?
Yes, evidently.  As to the invisible side, we could have visited
it in our exploring expeditions on the lunar globe.  So that the
time of the full moon was well chosen.  But we ought to have
arrived at the end; and in order to have so arrived, we ought
to have suffered no deviation on the road."

"I have nothing to say to that," answered Michel Ardan.
"Here is, however, a good opportunity lost of observing the
other side of the moon."

But the projectile was now describing in the shadow that
incalculable course which no sight-mark would allow them
to ascertain.  Had its direction been altered, either by the
influence of the lunar attraction, or by the action of some
unknown star?  Barbicane could not say.  But a change had taken
place in the relative position of the vehicle; and Barbicane
verified it about four in the morning.

The change consisted in this, that the base of the projectile
had turned toward the moon's surface, and was so held by a
perpendicular passing through its axis.  The attraction, that is
to say the weight, had brought about this alteration.  The heaviest
part of the projectile inclined toward the invisible disc as if it
would fall upon it.

Was it falling?  Were the travelers attaining that much desired end?
No.  And the observation of a sign-point, quite inexplicable in
itself, showed Barbicane that his projectile was not nearing the
moon, and that it had shifted by following an almost concentric curve.

This point of mark was a luminous brightness, which Nicholl
sighted suddenly, on the limit of the horizon formed by the
black disc.  This point could not be confounded with a star.
It was a reddish incandescence which increased by degrees, a
decided proof that the projectile was shifting toward it and
not falling normally on the surface of the moon.

"A volcano! it is a volcano in action!" cried Nicholl; "a
disemboweling of the interior fires of the moon!  That world is
not quite extinguished."

"Yes, an eruption," replied Barbicane, who was carefully
studying the phenomenon through his night glass.  "What should
it be, if not a volcano?"

"But, then," said Michel Ardan, "in order to maintain that
combustion, there must be air.  So the atmosphere does surround
that part of the moon."

"Perhaps so," replied Barbicane, "but not necessarily.

The volcano, by the decomposition of certain substances, can
provide its own oxygen, and thus throw flames into space.  It seems
to me that the deflagration, by the intense brilliancy of the
substances in combustion, is produced in pure oxygen.  We must
not be in a hurry to proclaim the existence of a lunar atmosphere."

The fiery mountain must have been situated about the 45@ south
latitude on the invisible part of the disc; but, to Barbicane's
great displeasure, the curve which the projectile was describing
was taking it far from the point indicated by the eruption.
Thus he could not determine its nature exactly.  Half an hour
after being sighted, this luminous point had disappeared behind
the dark horizon; but the verification of this phenomenon was
of considerable consequence in their selenographic studies.
It proved that all heat had not yet disappeared from the bowels
of this globe; and where heat exists, who can affirm that the
vegetable kingdom, nay, even the animal kingdom itself, has not
up to this time resisted all destructive influences?  The existence
of this volcano in eruption, unmistakably seen by these earthly
savants, would doubtless give rise to many theories favorable
to the grave question of the habitability of the moon.

Barbicane allowed himself to be carried away by these reflections.
He forgot himself in a deep reverie in which the mysterious
destiny of the lunar world was uppermost.  He was seeking to
combine together the facts observed up to that time, when a new
incident recalled him briskly to reality.  This incident was more
than a cosmical phenomenon; it was a threatened danger, the
consequence of which might be disastrous in the extreme.

Suddenly, in the midst of the ether, in the profound darkness, an
enormous mass appeared.  It was like a moon, but an incandescent
moon whose brilliancy was all the more intolerable as it cut
sharply on the frightful darkness of space.  This mass, of a
circular form, threw a light which filled the projectile.
The forms of Barbicane, Nicholl, and Michel Ardan, bathed in
its white sheets, assumed that livid spectral appearance which
physicians produce with the fictitious light of alcohol
impregnated with salt.

"By Jove!" cried Michel Ardan, "we are hideous.  What is that
ill-conditioned moon?"

"A meteor," replied Barbicane.

"A meteor burning in space?"

"Yes."

This shooting globe suddenly appearing in shadow at a distance
of at most 200 miles, ought, according to Barbicane, to have a
diameter of 2,000 yards.  It advanced at a speed of about one
mile and a half per second.  It cut the projectile's path and
must reach it in some minutes.  As it approached it grew to
enormous proportions.

Imagine, if possible, the situation of the travelers!  It is
impossible to describe it.  In spite of their courage, their
_sang-froid_, their carelessness of danger, they were mute,
motionless with stiffened limbs, a prey to frightful terror.
Their projectile, the course of which they could not alter, was
rushing straight on this ignited mass, more intense than the
open mouth of an oven.  It seemed as though they were being
precipitated toward an abyss of fire.

Barbicane had seized the hands of his two companions, and all
three looked through their half-open eyelids upon that asteroid
heated to a white heat.  If thought was not destroyed within
them, if their brains still worked amid all this awe, they must
have given themselves up for lost.

Two minutes after the sudden appearance of the meteor (to them
two centuries of anguish) the projectile seemed almost about to
strike it, when the globe of fire burst like a bomb, but without
making any noise in that void where sound, which is but the
agitation of the layers of air, could not be generated.

Nicholl uttered a cry, and he and his companions rushed to
the scuttle.  What a sight!  What pen can describe it?
What palette is rich enough in colors to reproduce so magnificent
a spectacle?

It was like the opening of a crater, like the scattering of an
immense conflagration.  Thousands of luminous fragments lit up
and irradiated space with their fires.  Every size, every color,
was there intermingled.  There were rays of yellow and pale
yellow, red, green, gray-- a crown of fireworks of all colors.
Of the enormous and much-dreaded globe there remained nothing
but these fragments carried in all directions, now become
asteroids in their turn, some flaming like a sword, some
surrounded by a whitish cloud, and others leaving behind them
trains of brilliant cosmical dust.

These incandescent blocks crossed and struck each other,
scattering still smaller fragments, some of which struck
the projectile.  Its left scuttle was even cracked by a
violent shock.  It seemed to be floating amid a hail of
howitzer shells, the smallest of which might destroy
it instantly.

The light which saturated the ether was so wonderfully intense,
that Michel, drawing Barbicane and Nicholl to his window,
exclaimed, "The invisible moon, visible at last!"

And through a luminous emanation, which lasted some seconds, the
whole three caught a glimpse of that mysterious disc which the eye
of man now saw for the first time.  What could they distinguish
at a distance which they could not estimate?  Some lengthened
bands along the disc, real clouds formed in the midst of a very
confined atmosphere, from which emerged not only all the mountains,
but also projections of less importance; its circles, its yawning
craters, as capriciously placed as on the visible surface.
Then immense spaces, no longer arid plains, but real seas, oceans,
widely distributed, reflecting on their liquid surface all the
dazzling magic of the fires of space; and, lastly, on the surface
of the continents, large dark masses, looking like immense forests
under the rapid illumination of a brilliance.

Was it an illusion, a mistake, an optical illusion?  Could they
give a scientific assent to an observation so superficially obtained?
Dared they pronounce upon the question of its habitability after
so slight a glimpse of the invisible disc?

But the lightnings in space subsided by degrees; its accidental
brilliancy died away; the asteroids dispersed in different
directions and were extinguished in the distance.

The ether returned to its accustomed darkness; the stars, eclipsed
for a moment, again twinkled in the firmament, and the disc, so
hastily discerned, was again buried in impenetrable night.





CHAPTER XVI


THE SOUTHERN HEMISPHERE


The projectile had just escaped a terrible danger, and a very
unforseen one.  Who would have thought of such an encounter
with meteors?  These erring bodies might create serious perils
for the travelers.  They were to them so many sandbanks upon
that sea of ether which, less fortunate than sailors, they could
not escape.  But did these adventurers complain of space?  No, not
since nature had given them the splendid sight of a cosmical
meteor bursting from expansion, since this inimitable firework,
which no Ruggieri could imitate, had lit up for some seconds the
invisible glory of the moon.  In that flash, continents, seas,
and forests had become visible to them.  Did an atmosphere,
then, bring to this unknown face its life-giving atoms?
Questions still insoluble, and forever closed against
human curiousity!

It was then half-past three in the afternoon.  The projectile
was following its curvilinear direction round the moon.  Had its
course again been altered by the meteor?  It was to be feared so.
But the projectile must describe a curve unalterably determined
by the laws of mechanical reasoning.  Barbicane was inclined to
believe that this curve would be rather a parabola than a hyperbola.
But admitting the parabola, the projectile must quickly have
passed through the cone of shadow projected into space opposite
the sun.  This cone, indeed, is very narrow, the angular diameter
of the moon being so little when compared with the diameter of
the orb of day; and up to this time the projectile had been
floating in this deep shadow.  Whatever had been its speed
(and it could not have been insignificant), its period of
occultation continued.  That was evident, but perhaps that would
not have been the case in a supposedly rigidly parabolical
trajectory-- a new problem which tormented Barbicane's brain,
imprisoned as he was in a circle of unknowns which he could
not unravel.

Neither of the travelers thought of taking an instant's repose.
Each one watched for an unexpected fact, which might throw some
new light on their uranographic studies.  About five o'clock,
Michel Ardan distributed, under the name of dinner, some pieces
of bread and cold meat, which were quickly swallowed without
either of them abandoning their scuttle, the glass of which was
incessantly encrusted by the condensation of vapor.

About forty-five minutes past five in the evening, Nicholl,
armed with his glass, sighted toward the southern border of the
moon, and in the direction followed by the projectile, some
bright points cut upon the dark shield of the sky.  They looked
like a succession of sharp points lengthened into a tremulous line.
They were very bright.  Such appeared the terminal line of the
moon when in one of her octants.

They could not be mistaken.  It was no longer a simple meteor.
This luminous ridge had neither color nor motion.  Nor was it a
volcano in eruption.  And Barbicane did not hesitate to
pronounce upon it.

"The sun!" he exclaimed.

"What! the sun?" answered Nicholl and Michel Ardan.

"Yes, my friends, it is the radiant orb itself lighting up the
summit of the mountains situated on the southern borders of
the moon.  We are evidently nearing the south pole."

"After having passed the north pole," replied Michel.  "We have
made the circuit of our satellite, then?"

"Yes, my good Michel."

"Then, no more hyperbolas, no more parabolas, no more open
curves to fear?"

"No, but a closed curve."

"Which is called----"

"An ellipse.  Instead of losing itself in interplanetary space,
it is probable that the projectile will describe an elliptical
orbit around the moon."

"Indeed!"

"And that it will become _her_ satellite."

"Moon of the moon!" cried Michel Ardan.

"Only, I would have you observe, my worthy friend," replied
Barbicane, "that we are none the less lost for that."

"Yes, in another manner, and much more pleasantly," answered the
careless Frenchman with his most amiable smile.





CHAPTER XVII


TYCHO


At six in the evening the projectile passed the south pole at
less than forty miles off, a distance equal to that already
reached at the north pole.  The elliptical curve was being
rigidly carried out.

At this moment the travelers once more entered the blessed rays
of the sun.  They saw once more those stars which move slowly
from east to west.  The radiant orb was saluted by a triple hurrah.
With its light it also sent heat, which soon pierced the metal walls.
The glass resumed its accustomed appearance.  The layers of ice
melted as if by enchantment; and immediately, for economy's sake,
the gas was put out, the air apparatus alone consuming its
usual quantity.

"Ah!" said Nicholl, "these rays of heat are good.  With what
impatience must the Selenites wait the reappearance of the orb
of day."

"Yes," replied Michel Ardan, "imbibing as it were the brilliant
ether, light and heat, all life is contained in them."

At this moment the bottom of the projectile deviated somewhat
from the lunar surface, in order to follow the slightly
lengthened elliptical orbit.  From this point, had the earth
been at the full, Barbicane and his companions could have
seen it, but immersed in the sun's irradiation she was
quite invisible.  Another spectacle attracted their attention,
that of the southern part of the moon, brought by the glasses
to within 450 yards.  They did not again leave the scuttles,
and noted every detail of this fantastical continent.

Mounts Doerful and Leibnitz formed two separate groups very near
the south pole.  The first group extended from the pole to the
eighty-fourth parallel, on the eastern part of the orb; the
second occupied the eastern border, extending from the 65@ of
latitude to the pole.

On their capriciously formed ridge appeared dazzling sheets, as
mentioned by Pere Secchi.  With more certainty than the
illustrious Roman astronomer, Barbicane was enabled to recognize
their nature.

"They are snow," he exclaimed.

"Snow?" repeated Nicholl.

"Yes, Nicholl, snow; the surface of which is deeply frozen.
See how they reflect the luminous rays.  Cooled lava would never
give out such intense reflection.  There must then be water,
there must be air on the moon.  As little as you please, but the
fact can no longer be contested."  No, it could not be.  And if
ever Barbicane should see the earth again, his notes will bear
witness to this great fact in his selenographic observations.

These mountains of Doerful and Leibnitz rose in the midst of
plains of a medium extent, which were bounded by an indefinite
succession of circles and annular ramparts.  These two chains
are the only ones met with in this region of circles.
Comparatively but slightly marked, they throw up here and there
some sharp points, the highest summit of which attains an
altitude of 24,600 feet.

But the projectile was high above all this landscape, and the
projections disappeared in the intense brilliancy of the disc.
And to the eyes of the travelers there reappeared that original
aspect of the lunar landscapes, raw in tone, without gradation
of colors, and without degrees of shadow, roughly black and
white, from the want of diffusion of light.

But the sight of this desolate world did not fail to captivate
them by its very strangeness.  They were moving over this region
as if they had been borne on the breath of some storm, watching
heights defile under their feet, piercing the cavities with their
eyes, going down into the rifts, climbing the ramparts, sounding
these mysterious holes, and leveling all cracks.  But no trace
of vegetation, no appearance of cities; nothing but stratification,
beds of lava, overflowings polished like immense mirrors,
reflecting the sun's rays with overpowering brilliancy.
Nothing belonging to a _living_ world-- everything to a dead
world, where avalanches, rolling from the summits of the mountains,
would disperse noiselessly at the bottom of the abyss, retaining
the motion, but wanting the sound.  In any case it was the image
of death, without its being possible even to say that life had ever
existed there.

Michel Ardan, however, thought he recognized a heap of ruins,
to which he drew Barbicane's attention.  It was about the 80th
parallel, in 30@ longitude.  This heap of stones, rather
regularly placed, represented a vast fortress, overlooking a
long rift, which in former days had served as a bed to the
rivers of prehistorical times.  Not far from that, rose to a
height of 17,400 feet the annular mountain of Short, equal to
the Asiatic Caucasus.  Michel Ardan, with his accustomed ardor,
maintained "the evidences" of his fortress.  Beneath it he
discerned the dismantled ramparts of a town; here the still
intact arch of a portico, there two or three columns lying under
their base; farther on, a succession of arches which must have
supported the conduit of an aqueduct; in another part the sunken
pillars of a gigantic bridge, run into the thickest parts of
the rift.  He distinguished all this, but with so much imagination
in his glance, and through glasses so fantastical, that we must
mistrust his observation.  But who could affirm, who would dare
to say, that the amiable fellow did not really see that which
his two companions would not see?

Moments were too precious to be sacrificed in idle discussion.
The selenite city, whether imaginary or not, had already
disappeared afar off.  The distance of the projectile from the
lunar disc was on the increase, and the details of the soil were
being lost in a confused jumble.  The reliefs, the circles,
the craters, and the plains alone remained, and still showed
their boundary lines distinctly.  At this moment, to the left,
lay extended one of the finest circles of lunar orography,
one of the curiosities of this continent.  It was Newton,
which Barbicane recognized without trouble, by referring to
the _Mappa Selenographica_.

Newton is situated in exactly 77@ south latitude, and 16@
east longitude.  It forms an annular crater, the ramparts of
which, rising to a height of 21,300 feet, seemed to be impassable.

Barbicane made his companions observe that the height of this
mountain above the surrounding plain was far from equaling the
depth of its crater.  This enormous hole was beyond all
measurement, and formed a gloomy abyss, the bottom of which the
sun's rays could never reach.  There, according to Humboldt,
reigns utter darkness, which the light of the sun and the earth
cannot break.  Mythologists could well have made it the mouth of hell.

"Newton," said Barbicane, "is the most perfect type of these
annular mountains, of which the earth possesses no sample.
They prove that the moon's formation, by means of cooling, is
due to violent causes; for while, under the pressure of internal
fires the reliefs rise to considerable height, the depths withdraw
far below the lunar level."

"I do not dispute the fact," replied Michel Ardan.

Some minutes after passing Newton, the projectile directly
overlooked the annular mountains of Moret.  It skirted at some
distance the summits of Blancanus, and at about half-past seven
in the evening reached the circle of Clavius.

This circle, one of the most remarkable of the disc, is situated
in 58@ south latitude, and 15@ east longitude.  Its height is
estimated at 22,950 feet.  The travelers, at a distance of
twenty-four miles (reduced to four by their glasses) could
admire this vast crater in its entirety.

"Terrestrial volcanoes," said Barbicane, "are but mole-hills
compared with those of the moon.  Measuring the old craters
formed by the first eruptions of Vesuvius and Etna, we find them
little more than three miles in breadth.  In France the circle
of Cantal measures six miles across; at Ceyland the circle of
the island is forty miles, which is considered the largest on
the globe.  What are these diameters against that of Clavius,
which we overlook at this moment?"

"What is its breadth?" asked Nicholl.

"It is 150 miles," replied Barbicane.  "This circle is certainly
the most important on the moon, but many others measure 150,
100, or 75 miles."

"Ah! my friends," exclaimed Michel, "can you picture to
yourselves what this now peaceful orb of night must have been
when its craters, filled with thunderings, vomited at the same
time smoke and tongues of flame.  What a wonderful spectacle
then, and now what decay!  This moon is nothing more than a thin
carcase of fireworks, whose squibs, rockets, serpents, and suns,
after a superb brilliancy, have left but sadly broken cases.
Who can say the cause, the reason, the motive force of
these cataclysms?"

Barbicane was not listening to Michel Ardan; he was
contemplating these ramparts of Clavius, formed by large
mountains spread over several miles.  At the bottom of the
immense cavity burrowed hundreds of small extinguished craters,
riddling the soil like a colander, and overlooked by a peak
15,000 feet high.

Around the plain appeared desolate.  Nothing so arid as these
reliefs, nothing so sad as these ruins of mountains, and (if we
may so express ourselves) these fragments of peaks and mountains
which strewed the soil.  The satellite seemed to have burst at
this spot.

The projectile was still advancing, and this movement did
not subside.  Circles, craters, and uprooted mountains succeeded
each other incessantly.  No more plains; no more seas.  A never
ending Switzerland and Norway.  And lastly, in the canter of
this region of crevasses, the most splendid mountain on the
lunar disc, the dazzling Tycho, in which posterity will ever
preserve the name of the illustrious Danish astronomer.

In observing the full moon in a cloudless sky no one has failed
to remark this brilliant point of the southern hemisphere.
Michel Ardan used every metaphor that his imagination could
supply to designate it by.  To him this Tycho was a focus of
light, a center of irradiation, a crater vomiting rays.  It was
the tire of a brilliant wheel, an _asteria_ enclosing the disc
with its silver tentacles, an enormous eye filled with flames,
a glory carved for Pluto's head, a star launched by the
Creator's hand, and crushed against the face of the moon!

Tycho forms such a concentration of light that the inhabitants
of the earth can see it without glasses, though at a distance
of 240,000 miles!  Imagine, then, its intensity to the eye of
observers placed at a distance of only fifty miles!  Seen through
this pure ether, its brilliancy was so intolerable that Barbicane
and his friends were obliged to blacken their glasses with the gas
smoke before they could bear the splendor.  Then silent, scarcely
uttering an interjection of admiration, they gazed, they contemplated.
All their feelings, all their impressions, were concentrated in that
look, as under any violent emotion all life is concentrated at the heart.

Tycho belongs to the system of radiating mountains, like
Aristarchus and Copernicus; but it is of all the most complete
and decided, showing unquestionably the frightful volcanic
action to which the formation of the moon is due.  Tycho is
situated in 43@ south latitude, and 12@ east longitude.  Its center
is occupied by a crater fifty miles broad.  It assumes a slightly
elliptical form, and is surrounded by an enclosure of annular
ramparts, which on the east and west overlook the outer plain from
a height of 15,000 feet.  It is a group of Mont Blancs, placed
round one common center and crowned by radiating beams.

What this incomparable mountain really is, with all the
projections converging toward it, and the interior excrescences
of its crater, photography itself could never represent.
Indeed, it is during the full moon that Tycho is seen in all
its splendor.  Then all shadows disappear, the foreshortening
of perspective disappears, and all proofs become white-- a
disagreeable fact:  for this strange region would have been
marvelous if reproduced with photographic exactness.  It is
but a group of hollows, craters, circles, a network of crests;
then, as far as the eye could see, a whole volcanic network
cast upon this encrusted soil.  One can then understand that
the bubbles of this central eruption have kept their first form.
Crystallized by cooling, they have stereotyped that aspect
which the moon formerly presented when under the Plutonian forces.

The distance which separated the travelers from the annular
summits of Tycho was not so great but that they could catch
the principal details.  Even on the causeway forming the
fortifications of Tycho, the mountains hanging on to the
interior and exterior sloping flanks rose in stories like
gigantic terraces.  They appeared to be higher by 300 or 400
feet to the west than to the east.  No system of terrestrial
encampment could equal these natural fortifications.  A town
built at the bottom of this circular cavity would have been
utterly inaccessible.

Inaccessible and wonderfully extended over this soil covered
with picturesque projections!  Indeed, nature had not left the
bottom of this crater flat and empty.  It possessed its own
peculiar orography, a mountainous system, making it a world
in itself.  The travelers could distinguish clearly cones,
central hills, remarkable positions of the soil, naturally
placed to receive the _chefs-d'oeuvre_ of Selenite architecture.
There was marked out the place for a temple, here the ground of a
forum, on this spot the plan of a palace, in another the plateau
for a citadel; the whole overlooked by a central mountain of
1,500 feet.  A vast circle, in which ancient Rome could have
been held in its entirety ten times over.

"Ah!" exclaimed Michel Ardan, enthusiastic at the sight; "what
a grand town might be constructed within that ring of mountains!
A quiet city, a peaceful refuge, beyond all human misery.  How calm
and isolated those misanthropes, those haters of humanity might
live there, and all who have a distaste for social life!"

"All!  It would be too small for them," replied Barbicane simply.





CHAPTER XVIII


GRAVE QUESTIONS


But the projectile had passed the _enceinte_ of Tycho, and
Barbicane and his two companions watched with scrupulous
attention the brilliant rays which the celebrated mountain shed
so curiously over the horizon.

What was this radiant glory?  What geological phenomenon had
designed these ardent beams?  This question occupied Barbicane's mind.

Under his eyes ran in all directions luminous furrows, raised at
the edges and concave in the center, some twelve miles, others
thirty miles broad.  These brilliant trains extended in some
places to within 600 miles of Tycho, and seemed to cover,
particularly toward the east, the northeast and the north, the
half of the southern hemisphere.  One of these jets extended as
far as the circle of Neander, situated on the 40th meridian.
Another, by a slight curve, furrowed the "Sea of Nectar," breaking
against the chain of Pyrenees, after a circuit of 800 miles.
Others, toward the west, covered the "Sea of Clouds" and
the "Sea of Humors" with a luminous network.  What was the
origin of these sparkling rays, which shone on the plains as
well as on the reliefs, at whatever height they might be?
All started from a common center, the crater of Tycho.
They sprang from him.  Herschel attributed their brilliancy to
currents of lava congealed by the cold; an opinion, however,
which has not been generally adopted.  Other astronomers have
seen in these inexplicable rays a kind of moraines, rows of
erratic blocks, which had been thrown up at the period of
Tycho's formation.

"And why not?" asked Nicholl of Barbicane, who was relating and
rejecting these different opinions.

"Because the regularity of these luminous lines, and the
violence necessary to carry volcanic matter to such distances,
is inexplicable."

"Eh! by Jove!" replied Michel Ardan, "it seems easy enough to me
to explain the origin of these rays."

"Indeed?" said Barbicane.

"Indeed," continued Michel.  "It is enough to say that it is a
vast star, similar to that produced by a ball or a stone thrown
at a square of glass!"

"Well!" replied Barbicane, smiling.  "And what hand would be
powerful enough to throw a ball to give such a shock as that?"

"The hand is not necessary," answered Nicholl, not at all
confounded; "and as to the stone, let us suppose it to be a comet."

"Ah! those much-abused comets!" exclaimed Barbicane.  "My brave
Michel, your explanation is not bad; but your comet is useless.
The shock which produced that rent must have some from the
inside of the star.  A violent contraction of the lunar crust,
while cooling, might suffice to imprint this gigantic star."

"A contraction! something like a lunar stomach-ache." said
Michel Ardan.

"Besides," added Barbicane, "this opinion is that of an English
savant, Nasmyth, and it seems to me to sufficiently explain the
radiation of these mountains."

"That Nasmyth was no fool!" replied Michel.

Long did the travelers, whom such a sight could never weary,
admire the splendors of Tycho.  Their projectile, saturated with
luminous gleams in the double irradiation of sun and moon, must
have appeared like an incandescent globe.  They had passed
suddenly from excessive cold to intense heat.  Nature was thus
preparing them to become Selenites.  Become Selenites!  That idea
brought up once more the question of the habitability of the moon.
After what they had seen, could the travelers solve it?  Would they
decide for or against it?  Michel Ardan persuaded his two friends
to form an opinion, and asked them directly if they thought that
men and animals were represented in the lunar world.

"I think that we can answer," said Barbicane; "but according to
my idea the question ought not to be put in that form.  I ask it
to be put differently."

"Put it your own way," replied Michel.

"Here it is," continued Barbicane.  "The problem is a double one,
and requires a double solution.  Is the moon _habitable_?  Has the
moon ever been _inhabitable_?"

"Good!" replied Nicholl.  "First let us see whether the moon
is habitable."

"To tell the truth, I know nothing about it," answered Michel.

"And I answer in the negative," continued Barbicane.  "In her
actual state, with her surrounding atmosphere certainly very
much reduced, her seas for the most part dried up, her
insufficient supply of water restricted, vegetation, sudden
alternations of cold and heat, her days and nights of 354
hours-- the moon does not seem habitable to me, nor does she
seem propitious to animal development, nor sufficient for the
wants of existence as we understand it."

"Agreed," replied Nicholl.  "But is not the moon habitable for
creatures differently organized from ourselves?"

"That question is more difficult to answer, but I will try; and
I ask Nicholl if _motion_ appears to him to be a necessary
result of _life_, whatever be its organization?"

"Without a doubt!" answered Nicholl.

"Then, my worthy companion, I would answer that we have observed
the lunar continent at a distance of 500 yards at most, and that
nothing seemed to us to move on the moon's surface.  The presence
of any kind of life would have been betrayed by its attendant marks,
such as divers buildings, and even by ruins.  And what have
we seen?  Everywhere and always the geological works of nature,
never the work of man.  If, then, there exist representatives
of the animal kingdom on the moon, they must have fled to those
unfathomable cavities which the eye cannot reach; which I cannot
admit, for they must have left traces of their passage on those
plains which the atmosphere must cover, however slightly raised
it may be.  These traces are nowhere visible.  There remains but
one hypothesis, that of a living race to which motion, which is
life, is foreign."

"One might as well say, living creatures which do not live,"
replied Michel.

"Just so," said Barbicane, "which for us has no meaning."

"Then we may form our opinion?" said Michel.

"Yes," replied Nicholl.

"Very well," continued Michel Ardan, "the Scientific Commission
assembled in the projectile of the Gun Club, after having
founded their argument on facts recently observed, decide
unanimously upon the question of the habitability of the moon--
`_No!_ the moon is not habitable.'"

This decision was consigned by President Barbicane to his
notebook, where the process of the sitting of the 6th of
December may be seen.

"Now," said Nicholl, "let us attack the second question, an
indispensable complement of the first.  I ask the honorable
commission, if the moon is not habitable, has she ever been
inhabited, Citizen Barbicane?"

"My friends," replied Barbicane, "I did not undertake this
journey in order to form an opinion on the past habitability of
our satellite; but I will add that our personal observations
only confirm me in this opinion.  I believe, indeed I affirm,
that the moon has been inhabited by a human race organized like
our own; that she has produced animals anatomically formed like
the terrestrial animals:  but I add that these races, human and
animal, have had their day, and are now forever extinct!"

"Then," asked Michel, "the moon must be older than the earth?"

"No!" said Barbicane decidedly, "but a world which has grown old
quicker, and whose formation and deformation have been more rapid.
Relatively, the organizing force of matter has been much more
violent in the interior of the moon than in the interior of the
terrestrial globe.  The actual state of this cracked, twisted,
and burst disc abundantly proves this.  The moon and the earth
were nothing but gaseous masses originally.  These gases have
passed into a liquid state under different influences, and the
solid masses have been formed later. But most certainly our
sphere was still gaseous or liquid, when the moon was solidified
by cooling, and had become habitable."

"I believe it," said Nicholl.

"Then," continued Barbicane, "an atmosphere surrounded it, the
waters contained within this gaseous envelope could not evaporate.
Under the influence of air, water, light, solar heat, and central
heat, vegetation took possession of the continents prepared to
receive it, and certainly life showed itself about this period,
for nature does not expend herself in vain; and a world so
wonderfully formed for habitation must necessarily be inhabited."

"But," said Nicholl, "many phenomena inherent in our satellite
might cramp the expansion of the animal and vegetable kingdom.
For example, its days and nights of 354 hours?"

"At the terrestrial poles they last six months," said Michel.

"An argument of little value, since the poles are not inhabited."

"Let us observe, my friends," continued Barbicane, "that if in
the actual state of the moon its long nights and long days
created differences of temperature insupportable to
organization, it was not so at the historical period of time.
The atmosphere enveloped the disc with a fluid mantle; vapor
deposited itself in the shape of clouds; this natural screen
tempered the ardor of the solar rays, and retained the
nocturnal radiation.  Light, like heat, can diffuse itself in
the air; hence an equality between the influences which no longer
exists, now that atmosphere has almost entirely disappeared.
And now I am going to astonish you."

"Astonish us?" said Michel Ardan.

"I firmly believe that at the period when the moon was inhabited,
the nights and days did not last 354 hours!"

"And why?" asked Nicholl quickly.

"Because most probably then the rotary motion of the moon upon
her axis was not equal to her revolution, an equality which
presents each part of her disc during fifteen days to the action
of the solar rays."

"Granted," replied Nicholl, "but why should not these two
motions have been equal, as they are really so?"

"Because that equality has only been determined by
terrestrial attraction.  And who can say that this attraction
was powerful enough to alter the motion of the moon at that
period when the earth was still fluid?"

"Just so," replied Nicholl; "and who can say that the moon has
always been a satellite of the earth?"

"And who can say," exclaimed Michel Ardan, "that the moon did
not exist before the earth?"

Their imaginations carried them away into an indefinite field
of hypothesis.  Barbicane sought to restrain them.

"Those speculations are too high," said he; "problems
utterly insoluble.  Do not let us enter upon them.  Let us only
admit the insufficiency of the primordial attraction; and then
by the inequality of the two motions of rotation and revolution,
the days and nights could have succeeded each other on the moon
as they succeed each other on the earth.  Besides, even without
these conditions, life was possible."

"And so," asked Michel Ardan, "humanity has disappeared from
the moon?"

"Yes," replied Barbicane, "after having doubtless remained
persistently for millions of centuries; by degrees the
atmosphere becoming rarefied, the disc became uninhabitable, as
the terrestrial globe will one day become by cooling."

"By cooling?"

"Certainly," replied Barbicane; "as the internal fires became
extinguished, and the incandescent matter concentrated itself,
the lunar crust cooled.  By degrees the consequences of these
phenomena showed themselves in the disappearance of organized
beings, and by the disappearance of vegetation.  Soon the
atmosphere was rarefied, probably withdrawn by terrestrial
attraction; then aerial departure of respirable air, and
disappearance of water by means of evaporation.  At this period
the moon becoming uninhabitable, was no longer inhabited.
It was a dead world, such as we see it to-day."

"And you say that the same fate is in store for the earth?"

"Most probably."

"But when?"

"When the cooling of its crust shall have made it uninhabitable."

"And have they calculated the time which our unfortunate sphere
will take to cool?"

"Certainly."

"And you know these calculations?"

"Perfectly."

"But speak, then, my clumsy savant," exclaimed Michel Ardan,
"for you make me boil with impatience!"

"Very well, my good Michel," replied Barbicane quietly; "we know
what diminution of temperature the earth undergoes in the lapse
of a century.  And according to certain calculations, this mean
temperature will after a period of 400,000 years, be brought
down to zero!"

"Four hundred thousand years!" exclaimed Michel.  "Ah!  I
breathe again.  Really I was frightened to hear you; I imagined
that we had not more than 50,000 years to live."

Barbicane and Nicholl could not help laughing at their
companion's uneasiness.  Then Nicholl, who wished to end the
discussion, put the second question, which had just been
considered again.

"Has the moon been inhabited?" he asked.

The answer was unanimously in the affirmative.  But during this
discussion, fruitful in somewhat hazardous theories, the
projectile was rapidly leaving the moon: the lineaments faded
away from the travelers' eyes, mountains were confused in the
distance; and of all the wonderful, strange, and fantastical
form of the earth's satellite, there soon remained nothing but
the imperishable remembrance.





CHAPTER XIX


A STRUGGLE AGAINST THE IMPOSSIBLE


For a long time Barbicane and his companions looked silently and
sadly upon that world which they had only seen from a distance,
as Moses saw the land of Canaan, and which they were leaving
without a possibility of ever returning to it.  The projectile's
position with regard to the moon had altered, and the base was
now turned to the earth.

This change, which Barbicane verified, did not fail to surprise them.
If the projectile was to gravitate round the satellite in an
elliptical orbit, why was not its heaviest part turned toward it,
as the moon turns hers to the earth?  That was a difficult point.

In watching the course of the projectile they could see that on
leaving the moon it followed a course analogous to that traced
in approaching her.  It was describing a very long ellipse,
which would most likely extend to the point of equal attraction,
where the influences of the earth and its satellite are neutralized.

Such was the conclusion which Barbicane very justly drew from
facts already observed, a conviction which his two friends
shared with him.

"And when arrived at this dead point, what will become of us?"
asked Michel Ardan.

"We don't know," replied Barbicane.

"But one can draw some hypotheses, I suppose?"

"Two," answered Barbicane; "either the projectile's speed will
be insufficient, and it will remain forever immovable on this
line of double attraction----"

"I prefer the other hypothesis, whatever it may be," interrupted Michel.

"Or," continued Barbicane, "its speed will be sufficient, and it
will continue its elliptical course, to gravitate forever around
the orb of night."

"A revolution not at all consoling," said Michel, "to pass to
the state of humble servants to a moon whom we are accustomed to
look upon as our own handmaid.  So that is the fate in store for us?"

Neither Barbicane nor Nicholl answered.

"You do not answer," continued Michel impatiently.

"There is nothing to answer," said Nicholl.

"Is there nothing to try?"

"No," answered Barbicane.  "Do you pretend to fight against
the impossible?"

"Why not?  Do one Frenchman and two Americans shrink from such
a word?"

"But what would you do?"

"Subdue this motion which is bearing us away."

"Subdue it?"

"Yes," continued Michel, getting animated, "or else alter it,
and employ it to the accomplishment of our own ends."

"And how?"

"That is your affair.  If artillerymen are not masters of their
projectile they are not artillerymen.  If the projectile is to
command the gunner, we had better ram the gunner into the gun.
My faith! fine savants! who do not know what is to become of us
after inducing me----"

"Inducing you!" cried Barbicane and Nicholl.  "Inducing you!
What do you mean by that?"

"No recrimination," said Michel.  "I do not complain, the trip
has pleased me, and the projectile agrees with me; but let us do
all that is humanly possible to do the fall somewhere, even if
only on the moon."

"We ask no better, my worthy Michel," replied Barbicane, "but
means fail us."

"We cannot alter the motion of the projectile?"

"No."

"Nor diminish its speed?"

"No."

"Not even by lightening it, as they lighten an overloaded vessel?"

"What would you throw out?" said Nicholl.  "We have no ballast
on board; and indeed it seems to me that if lightened it would
go much quicker."

"Slower."

"Quicker."

"Neither slower nor quicker," said Barbicane, wishing to make
his two friends agree; "for we float is space, and must no
longer consider specific weight."

"Very well," cried Michel Ardan in a decided voice; "then their
remains but one thing to do."

"What is it?" asked Nicholl.

"Breakfast," answered the cool, audacious Frenchman, who always
brought up this solution at the most difficult juncture.

In any case, if this operation had no influence on the
projectile's course, it could at least be tried without
inconvenience, and even with success from a stomachic point
of view.  Certainly Michel had none but good ideas.

They breakfasted then at two in the morning; the hour mattered little.
Michel served his usual repast, crowned by a glorious bottle drawn
from his private cellar.  If ideas did not crowd on their brains,
we must despair of the Chambertin of 1853.  The repast finished,
observation began again.  Around the projectile, at an invariable
distance, were the objects which had been thrown out.  Evidently, in
its translatory motion round the moon, it had not passed through
any atmosphere, for the specific weight of these different objects
would have checked their relative speed.

On the side of the terrestrial sphere nothing was to be seen.
The earth was but a day old, having been new the night before at
twelve; and two days must elapse before its crescent, freed from
the solar rays, would serve as a clock to the Selenites, as in
its rotary movement each of its points after twenty-four hours
repasses the same lunar meridian.

On the moon's side the sight was different; the orb shone in all
her splendor amid innumerable constellations, whose purity could
not be troubled by her rays.  On the disc, the plains were
already returning to the dark tint which is seen from the earth.
The other part of the nimbus remained brilliant, and in the midst
of this general brilliancy Tycho shone prominently like a sun.

Barbicane had no means of estimating the projectile's speed, but
reasoning showed that it must uniformly decrease, according to
the laws of mechanical reasoning.  Having admitted that the
projectile was describing an orbit around the moon, this orbit
must necessarily be elliptical; science proves that it must be so.
No motive body circulating round an attracting body fails in
this law.  Every orbit described in space is elliptical.  And why
should the projectile of the Gun Club escape this natural arrangement?
In elliptical orbits, the attracting body always occupies one of
the foci; so that at one moment the satellite is nearer, and at
another farther from the orb around which it gravitates.  When the
earth is nearest the sun she is in her perihelion; and in her
aphelion at the farthest point.  Speaking of the moon, she is
nearest to the earth in her perigee, and farthest from it in
her apogee.  To use analogous expressions, with which the
astronomers' language is enriched, if the projectile remains
as a satellite of the moon, we must say that it is in its
"aposelene" at its farthest point, and in its "periselene" at
its nearest.  In the latter case, the projectile would attain
its maximum of speed; and in the former its minimum.  It was
evidently moving toward its aposelenitical point; and Barbicane
had reason to think that its speed would decrease up to this
point, and then increase by degrees as it neared the moon.
This speed would even become _nil_, if this point joined that of
equal attraction.  Barbicane studied the consequences of these
different situations, and thinking what inference he could draw
from them, when he was roughly disturbed by a cry from Michel Ardan.

"By Jove!" he exclaimed, "I must admit we are down-right simpletons!"

"I do not say we are not," replied Barbicane; "but why?"

"Because we have a very simple means of checking this speed
which is bearing us from the moon, and we do not use it!"

"And what is the means?"

"To use the recoil contained in our rockets."

"Done!" said Nicholl.

"We have not used this force yet," said Barbicane, "it is true,
but we will do so."

"When?" asked Michel.

"When the time comes.  Observe, my friends, that in the position
occupied by the projectile, an oblique position with regard to
the lunar disc, our rockets, in slightly altering its direction,
might turn it from the moon instead of drawing it nearer?"

"Just so," replied Michel.

"Let us wait, then.  By some inexplicable influence, the
projectile is turning its base toward the earth.  It is probable
that at the point of equal attraction, its conical cap will be
directed rigidly toward the moon; at that moment we may hope
that its speed will be _nil_; then will be the moment to act,
and with the influence of our rockets we may perhaps
provoke a fall directly on the surface of the lunar disc."

"Bravo!" said Michel.  "What we did not do, what we could not do
on our first passage at the dead point, because the projectile
was then endowed with too great a speed."

"Very well reasoned," said Nicholl.

"Let us wait patiently," continued Barbicane.  "Putting every
chance on our side, and after having so much despaired, I may
say I think we shall gain our end."

This conclusion was a signal for Michel Ardan's hips and hurrahs.
And none of the audacious boobies remembered the question that
they themselves had solved in the negative.  No! the moon is not
inhabited; no! the moon is probably not habitable.  And yet they
were going to try everything to reach her.

One single question remained to be solved.  At what precise
moment the projectile would reach the point of equal attraction,
on which the travelers must play their last card. In order to
calculate this to within a few seconds, Barbicane had only to
refer to his notes, and to reckon the different heights taken on
the lunar parallels.  Thus the time necessary to travel over the
distance between the dead point and the south pole would be equal
to the distance separating the north pole from the dead point.
The hours representing the time traveled over were carefully
noted, and the calculation was easy.  Barbicane found that this
point would be reached at one in the morning on the night of the
7th-8th of December.  So that, if nothing interfered with its
course, it would reach the given point in twenty-two hours.

The rockets had primarily been placed to check the fall of the
projectile upon the moon, and now they were going to employ them
for a directly contrary purpose.  In any case they were ready,
and they had only to wait for the moment to set fire to them.

"Since there is nothing else to be done," said Nicholl, "I make
a proposition."

"What is it?" asked Barbicane.

"I propose to go to sleep."

"What a motion!" exclaimed Michel Ardan.

"It is forty hours since we closed our eyes," said Nicholl.
"Some hours of sleep will restore our strength."

"Never," interrupted Michel.

"Well," continued Nicholl, "every one to his taste; I shall go
to sleep."  And stretching himself on the divan, he soon snored
like a forty-eight pounder.

"That Nicholl has a good deal of sense," said Barbicane;
"presently I shall follow his example."  Some moments after his
continued bass supported the captain's baritone.

"Certainly," said Michel Ardan, finding himself alone, "these
practical people have sometimes most opportune ideas."

And with his long legs stretched out, and his great arms folded
under his head, Michel slept in his turn.

But this sleep could be neither peaceful nor lasting, the minds
of these three men were too much occupied, and some hours after,
about seven in the morning, all three were on foot at the same instant.

The projectile was still leaving the moon, and turning its
conical part more and more toward her.

An explicable phenomenon, but one which happily served
Barbicane's ends.

Seventeen hours more, and the moment for action would have arrived.

The day seemed long.  However bold the travelers might be, they
were greatly impressed by the approach of that moment which
would decide all-- either precipitate their fall on to the moon,
or forever chain them in an immutable orbit.  They counted the
hours as they passed too slow for their wish; Barbicane and
Nicholl were obstinately plunged in their calculations, Michel
going and coming between the narrow walls, and watching that
impassive moon with a longing eye.

At times recollections of the earth crossed their minds.  They saw
once more their friends of the Gun Club, and the dearest of all,
J. T. Maston.  At that moment, the honorable secretary must be
filling his post on the Rocky Mountains.  If he could see the
projectile through the glass of his gigantic telescope, what
would he think?  After seeing it disappear behind the moon's
south pole, he would see them reappear by the north pole!
They must therefore be a satellite of a satellite!  Had J. T.
Maston given this unexpected news to the world?  Was this the
_denouement_ of this great enterprise?

But the day passed without incident.  The terrestrial
midnight arrived.  The 8th of December was beginning.
One hour more, and the point of equal attraction would
be reached.  What speed would then animate the projectile?
They could not estimate it.  But no error could vitiate
Barbicane's calculations.  At one in the morning this speed
ought to be and would be _nil_.

Besides, another phenomenon would mark the projectile's
stopping-point on the neutral line.  At that spot the two
attractions, lunar and terrestrial, would be annulled.
Objects would "weigh" no more.  This singular fact, which had
surprised Barbicane and his companions so much in going, would
be repeated on their return under the very same conditions.
At this precise moment they must act.

Already the projectile's conical top was sensibly turned toward
the lunar disc, presented in such a way as to utilize the whole
of the recoil produced by the pressure of the rocket apparatus.
The chances were in favor of the travelers.  If its speed was
utterly annulled on this dead point, a decided movement toward
the moon would suffice, however slight, to determine its fall.

"Five minutes to one," said Nicholl.

"All is ready," replied Michel Ardan, directing a lighted match
to the flame of the gas.

"Wait!" said Barbicane, holding his chronometer in his hand.

At that moment weight had no effect.  The travelers felt in
themselves the entire disappearance of it.  They were very near
the neutral point, if they did not touch it.

"One o'clock," said Barbicane.

Michel Ardan applied the lighted match to a train in
communication with the rockets.  No detonation was heard in
the inside, for there was no air.  But, through the scuttles,
Barbicane saw a prolonged smoke, the flames of which were
immediately extinguished.

The projectile sustained a certain shock, which was sensibly
felt in the interior.

The three friends looked and listened without speaking, and
scarcely breathing.  One might have heard the beating of their
hearts amid this perfect silence.

"Are we falling?" asked Michel Ardan, at length.

"No," said Nicholl, "since the bottom of the projectile is not
turning to the lunar disc!"

At this moment, Barbicane, quitting his scuttle, turned to his
two companions.  He was frightfully pale, his forehead wrinkled,
and his lips contracted.

"We are falling!" said he.

"Ah!" cried Michel Ardan, "on to the moon?"

"On to the earth!"

"The devil!" exclaimed Michel Ardan, adding philosophically,
"well, when we came into this projectile we were very doubtful
as to the ease with which we should get out of it!"

And now this fearful fall had begun.  The speed retained had
borne the projectile beyond the dead point.  The explosion of
the rockets could not divert its course.  This speed in going
had carried it over the neutral line, and in returning had done
the same thing.  The laws of physics condemned it _to pass
through every point which it had already gone through_.  It was
a terrible fall, from a height of 160,000 miles, and no springs
to break it.  According to the laws of gunnery, the projectile
must strike the earth with a speed equal to that with which it
left the mouth of the Columbiad, a speed of 16,000 yards in the
last second.

But to give some figures of comparison, it has been reckoned
that an object thrown from the top of the towers of Notre Dame,
the height of which is only 200 feet, will arrive on the
pavement at a speed of 240 miles per hour.  Here the projectile
must strike the earth with a speed of 115,200 miles per hour.

"We are lost!" said Michel coolly.

"Very well! if we die," answered Barbicane, with a sort of
religious enthusiasm, "the results of our travels will be
magnificently spread. It is His own secret that God will
tell us!  In the other life the soul will want to know nothing,
either of machines or engines!  It will be identified with
eternal wisdom!"

"In fact," interrupted Michel Ardan, "the whole of the other
world may well console us for the loss of that inferior orb
called the moon!"

Barbicane crossed his arms on his breast, with a motion of
sublime resignation, saying at the same time:

"The will of heaven be done!"





CHAPTER XX


THE SOUNDINGS OF THE SUSQUEHANNA


Well, lieutenant, and our soundings?"

"I think, sir, that the operation is nearing its completion,"
replied Lieutenant Bronsfield.  "But who would have thought of
finding such a depth so near in shore, and only 200 miles from
the American coast?"

"Certainly, Bronsfield, there is a great depression," said
Captain Blomsberry.  "In this spot there is a submarine valley
worn by Humboldt's current, which skirts the coast of America as
far as the Straits of Magellan."

"These great depths," continued the lieutenant, "are not
favorable for laying telegraphic cables.  A level bottom, like
that supporting the American cable between Valentia and
Newfoundland, is much better."

"I agree with you, Bronsfield.  With your permission,
lieutenant, where are we now?"

"Sir, at this moment we have 3,508 fathoms of line out, and the
ball which draws the sounding lead has not yet touched the
bottom; for if so, it would have come up of itself."

"Brook's apparatus is very ingenious," said Captain Blomsberry;
"it gives us very exact soundings."

"Touch!" cried at this moment one of the men at the forewheel,
who was superintending the operation.

The captain and the lieutenant mounted the quarterdeck.

"What depth have we?" asked the captain.

"Three thousand six hundred and twenty-seven fathoms," replied
the lieutenant, entering it in his notebook.

"Well, Bronsfield," said the captain, "I will take down
the result.  Now haul in the sounding line.  It will be the
work of some hours.  In that time the engineer can light the
furnaces, and we shall be ready to start as soon as you
have finished.  It is ten o'clock, and with your permission,
lieutenant, I will turn in."

"Do so, sir; do so!" replied the lieutenant obligingly.

The captain of the Susquehanna, as brave a man as need be, and
the humble servant of his officers, returned to his cabin, took
a brandy-grog, which earned for the steward no end of praise,
and turned in, not without having complimented his servant upon
his making beds, and slept a peaceful sleep.

It was then ten at night.  The eleventh day of the month of
December was drawing to a close in a magnificent night.

The Susquehanna, a corvette of 500 horse-power, of the United
States navy, was occupied in taking soundings in the Pacific
Ocean about 200 miles off the American coast, following that
long peninsula which stretches down the coast of Mexico.

The wind had dropped by degrees.  There was no disturbance in
the air.  The pennant hung motionless from the maintop-gallant-
mast truck.

Captain Jonathan Blomsberry (cousin-german of Colonel
Blomsberry, one of the most ardent supporters of the Gun Club,
who had married an aunt of the captain and daughter of an
honorable Kentucky merchant)-- Captain Blomsberry could not have
wished for finer weather in which to bring to a close his
delicate operations of sounding.  His corvette had not even felt
the great tempest, which by sweeping away the groups of clouds
on the Rocky Mountains, had allowed them to observe the course
of the famous projectile.

Everything went well, and with all the fervor of a Presbyterian,
he did not forget to thank heaven for it.  The series of
soundings taken by the Susquehanna, had for its aim the finding
of a favorable spot for the laying of a submarine cable to
connect the Hawaiian Islands with the coast of America.

It was a great undertaking, due to the instigation of a
powerful company.  Its managing director, the intelligent Cyrus
Field, purposed even covering all the islands of Oceanica with
a vast electrical network, an immense enterprise, and one worthy
of American genius.

To the corvette Susquehanna had been confided the first
operations of sounding.  It was on the night of the 11th-12th of
December, she was in exactly 27@ 7' north latitude, and 41@ 37'
west longitude, on the meridian of Washington.

The moon, then in her last quarter, was beginning to rise above
the horizon.

After the departure of Captain Blomsberry, the lieutenant and
some officers were standing together on the poop.  On the
appearance of the moon, their thoughts turned to that orb which
the eyes of a whole hemisphere were contemplating.  The best
naval glasses could not have discovered the projectile wandering
around its hemisphere, and yet all were pointed toward that
brilliant disc which millions of eyes were looking at at the
same moment.

"They have been gone ten days," said Lieutenant Bronsfield
at last.  "What has become of them?"

"They have arrived, lieutenant," exclaimed a young midshipman,
"and they are doing what all travelers do when they arrive in a
new country, taking a walk!"

"Oh!  I am sure of that, if you tell me so, my young friend,"
said Lieutenant Bronsfield, smiling.

"But," continued another officer, "their arrival cannot
be doubted.  The projectile was to reach the moon when full
on the 5th at midnight.  We are now at the 11th of December, which
makes six days.  And in six times twenty-four hours, without
darkness, one would have time to settle comfortably.  I fancy I
see my brave countrymen encamped at the bottom of some valley,
on the borders of a Selenite stream, near a projectile half-buried
by its fall amid volcanic rubbish, Captain Nicholl beginning his
leveling operations, President Barbicane writing out his notes,
and Michel Ardan embalming the lunar solitudes with the perfume
of his----"

"Yes! it must be so, it is so!" exclaimed the young midshipman,
worked up to a pitch of enthusiasm by this ideal description of
his superior officer.

"I should like to believe it," replied the lieutenant, who was
quite unmoved.  "Unfortunately direct news from the lunar world
is still wanting."

"Beg pardon, lieutenant," said the midshipman, "but cannot
President Barbicane write?"

A burst of laughter greeted this answer.

"No letters!" continued the young man quickly.  "The postal
administration has something to see to there."

"Might it not be the telegraphic service that is at fault?"
asked one of the officers ironically.

"Not necessarily," replied the midshipman, not at all confused.
"But it is very easy to set up a graphic communication with
the earth."

"And how?"

"By means of the telescope at Long's Peak.  You know it brings
the moon to within four miles of the Rocky Mountains, and that
it shows objects on its surface of only nine feet in diameter.
Very well; let our industrious friends construct a giant
alphabet; let them write words three fathoms long, and sentences
three miles long, and then they can send us news of themselves."

The young midshipman, who had a certain amount of imagination,
was loudly applauded; Lieutenant Bronsfield allowing that the
idea was possible, but observing that if by these means they
could receive news from the lunar world they could not send any
from the terrestrial, unless the Selenites had instruments fit
for taking distant observations at their disposal.

"Evidently," said one of the officers; "but what has become of
the travelers? what they have done, what they have seen, that
above all must interest us.  Besides, if the experiment has
succeeded (which I do not doubt), they will try it again.
The Columbiad is still sunk in the soil of Florida.  It is now
only a question of powder and shot; and every time the moon is
at her zenith a cargo of visitors may be sent to her."

"It is clear," replied Lieutenant Bronsfield, "that J. T. Maston
will one day join his friends."

"If he will have me," cried the midshipman, "I am ready!"

"Oh! volunteers will not be wanting," answered Bronsfield; "and
if it were allowed, half of the earth's inhabitants would
emigrate to the moon!"

This conversation between the officers of the Susquehanna was
kept up until nearly one in the morning.  We cannot say what
blundering systems were broached, what inconsistent theories
advanced by these bold spirits.  Since Barbicane's attempt,
nothing seemed impossible to the Americans.  They had already
designed an expedition, not only of savants, but of a whole
colony toward the Selenite borders, and a complete army,
consisting of infantry, artillery, and cavalry, to conquer the
lunar world.

At one in the morning, the hauling in of the sounding-line was
not yet completed; 1,670 fathoms were still out, which would
entail some hours' work.  According to the commander's orders,
the fires had been lighted, and steam was being got up.
The Susquehanna could have started that very instant.

At that moment (it was seventeen minutes past one in the
morning) Lieutenant Bronsfield was preparing to leave the watch
and return to his cabin, when his attention was attracted by a
distant hissing noise.  His comrades and himself first thought
that this hissing was caused by the letting off of steam; but
lifting their heads, they found that the noise was produced in
the highest regions of the air.  They had not time to question
each other before the hissing became frightfully intense, and
suddenly there appeared to their dazzled eyes an enormous
meteor, ignited by the rapidity of its course and its friction
through the atmospheric strata.

This fiery mass grew larger to their eyes, and fell, with
the noise of thunder, upon the bowsprit, which it smashed close
to the stem, and buried itself in the waves with a deafening roar!

A few feet nearer, and the Susquehanna would have foundered with
all on board!

At this instant Captain Blomsberry appeared, half-dressed, and
rushing on to the forecastle-deck, whither all the officers had
hurried, exclaimed, "With your permission, gentlemen, what
has happened?"

And the midshipman, making himself as it were the echo of the
body, cried, "Commander, it is `they' come back again!"





CHAPTER XXI


J. T. MASTON RECALLED


"It is `they' come back again!" the young midshipman had said,
and every one had understood him.  No one doubted but that the
meteor was the projectile of the Gun Club.  As to the travelers
which it enclosed, opinions were divided regarding their fate.

"They are dead!" said one.

"They are alive!" said another; "the crater is deep, and the
shock was deadened."

"But they must have wanted air," continued a third speaker;
"they must have died of suffocation."

"Burned!" replied a fourth; "the projectile was nothing but an
incandescent mass as it crossed the atmosphere."

"What does it matter!" they exclaimed unanimously; "living or
dead, we must pull them out!"

But Captain Blomsberry had assembled his officers, and "with
their permission," was holding a council.  They must decide upon
something to be done immediately.  The more hasty ones were for
fishing up the projectile.  A difficult operation, though not an
impossible one.  But the corvette had no proper machinery, which
must be both fixed and powerful; so it was resolved that they
should put in at the nearest port, and give information to the
Gun Club of the projectile's fall.

This determination was unanimous.  The choice of the port had
to be discussed.  The neighboring coast had no anchorage on
27@ latitude.  Higher up, above the peninsula of Monterey, stands
the important town from which it takes its name; but, seated on
the borders of a perfect desert, it was not connected with the
interior by a network of telegraphic wires, and electricity
alone could spread these important news fast enough.

Some degrees above opened the bay of San Francisco.  Through the
capital of the gold country communication would be easy with the
heart of the Union.  And in less than two days the Susquehanna,
by putting on high pressure, could arrive in that port.  She must
therefore start at once.

The fires were made up; they could set off immediately.
Two thousand fathoms of line were still out, which Captain
Blomsberry, not wishing to lose precious time in hauling in,
resolved to cut.

"we will fasten the end to a buoy," said he, "and that buoy will
show us the exact spot where the projectile fell."

"Besides," replied Lieutenant Bronsfield, "we have our situation
exact-- 27@ 7' north latitude and 41@ 37' west longitude."

"Well, Mr. Bronsfield," replied the captain, "now, with your
permission, we will have the line cut."

A strong buoy, strengthened by a couple of spars, was thrown
into the ocean.  The end of the rope was carefully lashed to it;
and, left solely to the rise and fall of the billows, the buoy
would not sensibly deviate from the spot.

At this moment the engineer sent to inform the captain that
steam was up and they could start, for which agreeable
communication the captain thanked him.  The course was then
given north-northeast, and the corvette, wearing, steered at
full steam direct for San Francisco.  It was three in the morning.

Four hundred and fifty miles to cross; it was nothing for a good
vessel like the Susquehanna.  In thirty-six hours she had covered
that distance; and on the 14th of December, at twenty-seven
minutes past one at night, she entered the bay of San Francisco.

At the sight of a ship of the national navy arriving at full speed,
with her bowsprit broken, public curiosity was greatly roused.
A dense crowd soon assembled on the quay, waiting for them
to disembark.

After casting anchor, Captain Blomsberry and Lieutenant
Bronsfield entered an eight-pared cutter, which soon brought
them to land.

They jumped on to the quay.

"The telegraph?" they asked, without answering one of the
thousand questions addressed to them.

The officer of the port conducted them to the telegraph office
through a concourse of spectators.  Blomsberry and Bronsfield
entered, while the crowd crushed each other at the door.

Some minutes later a fourfold telegram was sent out--the first
to the Naval Secretary at Washington; the second to the
vice-president of the Gun Club, Baltimore; the third to the Hon.
J. T. Maston, Long's Peak, Rocky Mountains; and the fourth to
the sub-director of the Cambridge Observatory, Massachusetts.

It was worded as follows:


In 20@ 7' north latitude, and 41@ 37' west longitude, on the
12th of December, at seventeen minutes past one in the morning,
the projectile of the Columbiad fell into the Pacific.
Send instructions.-- BLOMSBERRY, Commander Susquehanna.


Five minutes afterward the whole town of San Francisco learned
the news.  Before six in the evening the different States of the
Union had heard the great catastrophe; and after midnight, by
the cable, the whole of Europe knew the result of the great
American experiment.  We will not attempt to picture the effect
produced on the entire world by that unexpected denouement.

On receipt of the telegram the Naval Secretary telegraphed to
the Susquehanna to wait in the bay of San Francisco without
extinguishing her fires.  Day and night she must be ready
to put to sea.

The Cambridge observatory called a special meeting; and, with
that composure which distinguishes learned bodies in general,
peacefully discussed the scientific bearings of the question.
At the Gun Club there was an explosion.  All the gunners
were assembled.  Vice-President the Hon. Wilcome was in the
act of reading the premature dispatch, in which J. T. Maston
and Belfast announced that the projectile had just been seen in
the gigantic reflector of Long's Peak, and also that it was held
by lunar attraction, and was playing the part of under satellite
to the lunar world.

We know the truth on that point.

But on the arrival of Blomsberry's dispatch, so decidely
contradicting J. T. Maston's telegram, two parties were formed
in the bosom of the Gun Club.  On one side were those who
admitted the fall of the projectile, and consequently the return
of the travelers; on the other, those who believed in the
observations of Long's Peak, concluded that the commander of the
Susquehanna had made a mistake.  To the latter the pretended
projectile was nothing but a meteor! nothing but a meteor, a
shooting globe, which in its fall had smashed the bows of
the corvette.  It was difficult to answer this argument, for
the speed with which it was animated must have made observation
very difficult.  The commander of the Susquehanna and her
officers might have made a mistake in all good faith; one argument
however, was in their favor, namely, that if the projectile had
fallen on the earth, its place of meeting with the terrestrial
globe could only take place on this 27@ north latitude, and
(taking into consideration the time that had elapsed, and the
rotary motion of the earth) between the 41@ and the 42@ of
west longitude.  In any case, it was decided in the Gun Club
that Blomsberry brothers, Bilsby, and Major Elphinstone should
go straight to San Francisco, and consult as to the means of
raising the projectile from the depths of the ocean.

These devoted men set off at once; and the railroad, which will
soon cross the whole of Central America, took them as far as St.
Louis, where the swift mail-coaches awaited them.  Almost at the
same moment in which the Secretary of Marine, the vice-president
of the Gun Club, and the sub-director of the Observatory received
the dispatch from San Francisco, the Honorable J. T. Maston was
undergoing the greatest excitement he had ever experienced in his
life, an excitement which even the bursting of his pet gun, which
had more than once nearly cost him his life, had not caused him.
We may remember that the secretary of the Gun Club had started
soon after the projectile (and almost as quickly) for the station
on Long's Peak, in the Rocky Mountains, J. Belfast, director of the
Cambridge Observatory, accompanying him.  Arrived there, the two
friends had installed themselves at once, never quitting the
summit of their enormous telescope.  We know that this gigantic
instrument had been set up according to the reflecting system,
called by the English "front view."  This arrangement subjected
all objects to but one reflection, making the view consequently
much clearer; the result was that, when they were taking
observation, J. T. Maston and Belfast were placed in the _upper_
part of the instrument and not in the lower, which they reached
by a circular staircase, a masterpiece of lightness, while below
them opened a metal well terminated by the metallic mirror,
which measured two hundred and eighty feet in depth.

It was on a narrow platform placed above the telescope that the
two savants passed their existence, execrating the day which hid
the moon from their eyes, and the clouds which obstinately
veiled her during the night.

What, then, was their delight when, after some days of waiting,
on the night of the 5th of December, they saw the vehicle which
was bearing their friends into space!  To this delight succeeded
a great deception, when, trusting to a cursory observation, they
launched their first telegram to the world, erroneously
affirming that the projectile had become a satellite of the
moon, gravitating in an immutable orbit.

From that moment it had never shown itself to their eyes-- a
disappearance all the more easily explained, as it was then
passing behind the moon's invisible disc; but when it was time
for it to reappear on the visible disc, one may imagine the
impatience of the fuming J. T. Maston and his not less
impatient companion.  Each minute of the night they thought
they saw the projectile once more, and they did not see it.
Hence constant discussions and violent disputes between them,
Belfast affirming that the projectile could not be seen, J. T.
Maston maintaining that "it had put his eyes out."

"It is the projectile!" repeated J. T. Maston.

"No," answered Belfast; "it is an avalanche detached from a
lunar mountain."

"Well, we shall see it to-morrow."

"No, we shall not see it any more.  It is carried into space."

"Yes!"

"No!"

And at these moments, when contradictions rained like hail, the
well-known irritability of the secretary of the Gun Club
constituted a permanent danger for the Honorable Belfast.
The existence of these two together would soon have become
impossible; but an unforseen event cut short their
everlasting discussions.

During the night, from the 14th to the 15th of December, the two
irreconcilable friends were busy observing the lunar disc, J. T.
Maston abusing the learned Belfast as usual, who was by his
side; the secretary of the Gun Club maintaining for the
thousandth time that he had just seen the projectile, and adding
that he could see Michel Ardan's face looking through one of the
scuttles, at the same time enforcing his argument by a series of
gestures which his formidable hook rendered very unpleasant.

At this moment Belfast's servant appeared on the platform (it
was ten at night) and gave him a dispatch.  It was the commander
of the Susquehanna's telegram.

Belfast tore the envelope and read, and uttered a cry.

"What!" said J. T. Maston.

"The projectile!"

"Well!"

"Has fallen to the earth!"

Another cry, this time a perfect howl, answered him.  He turned
toward J. T. Maston.  The unfortunate man, imprudently leaning
over the metal tube, had disappeared in the immense telescope.
A fall of two hundred and eighty feet!  Belfast, dismayed,
rushed to the orifice of the reflector.

He breathed.  J. T. Maston, caught by his metal hook, was
holding on by one of the rings which bound the telescope
together, uttering fearful cries.

Belfast called.  Help was brought, tackle was let down, and they
hoisted up, not without some trouble, the imprudent secretary of
the Gun Club.

He reappeared at the upper orifice without hurt.

"Ah!" said he, "if I had broken the mirror?"

"You would have paid for it," replied Belfast severely.

"And that cursed projectile has fallen?" asked J. T. Maston.

"Into the Pacific!"

"Let us go!"

A quarter of an hour after the two savants were descending the
declivity of the Rocky Mountains; and two days after, at the
same time as their friends of the Gun Club, they arrived at San
Francisco, having killed five horses on the road.

Elphinstone, the brothers Blomsberry, and Bilsby rushed toward
them on their arrival.

"What shall we do?" they exclaimed.

"Fish up the projectile," replied J. T. Maston, "and the sooner
the better."




CHAPTER XXII


RECOVERED FROM THE SEA


The spot where the projectile sank under the waves was exactly
known; but the machinery to grasp it and bring it to the surface
of the ocean was still wanting.  It must first be invented,
then made.  American engineers could not be troubled with
such trifles.  The grappling-irons once fixed, by their help
they were sure to raise it in spite of its weight, which was
lessened by the density of the liquid in which it was plunged.

But fishing-up the projectile was not the only thing to be thought of.
They must act promptly in the interest of the travelers.  No one
doubted that they were still living.

"Yes," repeated J. T. Maston incessantly, whose confidence
gained over everybody, "our friends are clever people, and they
cannot have fallen like simpletons.  They are alive, quite alive;
but we must make haste if we wish to find them so.  Food and
water do not trouble me; they have enough for a long while.
But air, air, that is what they will soon want; so quick, quick!"

And they did go quick.  They fitted up the Susquehanna for her
new destination.  Her powerful machinery was brought to bear
upon the hauling-chains.  The aluminum projectile only weighed
19,250 pounds, a weight very inferior to that of the transatlantic
cable which had been drawn up under similar conditions.  The only
difficulty was in fishing up a cylindro-conical projectile, the
walls of which were so smooth as to offer no hold for the hooks.
On that account Engineer Murchison hastened to San Francisco,
and had some enormous grappling-irons fixed on an automatic
system, which would never let the projectile go if it once
succeeded in seizing it in its powerful claws.  Diving-dresses
were also prepared, which through this impervious covering allowed
the divers to observe the bottom of the sea.  He also had put on
board an apparatus of compressed air very cleverly designed.
There were perfect chambers pierced with scuttles, which, with
water let into certain compartments, could draw it down into
great depths.  These apparatuses were at San Francisco, where
they had been used in the construction of a submarine breakwater;
and very fortunately it was so, for there was no time to
construct any.  But in spite of the perfection of the machinery,
in spite of the ingenuity of the savants entrusted with the use
of them, the success of the operation was far from being certain.
How great were the chances against them, the projectile being
20,000 feet under the water!  And if even it was brought to the
surface, how would the travelers have borne the terrible shock
which 20,000 feet of water had perhaps not sufficiently broken?
At any rate they must act quickly.  J. T. Maston hurried the
workmen day and night.  He was ready to don the diving-dress
himself, or try the air apparatus, in order to reconnoiter the
situation of his courageous friends.

But in spite of all the diligence displayed in preparing the
different engines, in spite of the considerable sum placed at
the disposal of the Gun Club by the Government of the Union,
five long days (five centuries!) elapsed before the preparations
were complete.  During this time public opinion was excited to
the highest pitch.  Telegrams were exchanged incessantly
throughout the entire world by means of wires and electric cables.
The saving of Barbicane, Nicholl, and Michel Ardan was an
international affair.  Every one who had subscribed to the Gun
Club was directly interested in the welfare of the travelers.

At length the hauling-chains, the air-chambers, and the
automatic grappling-irons were put on board.  J. T. Maston,
Engineer Murchison, and the delegates of the Gun Club, were
already in their cabins.  They had but to start, which they did
on the 21st of December, at eight o'clock at night, the corvette
meeting with a beautiful sea, a northeasterly wind, and rather
sharp cold.  The whole population of San Francisco was gathered
on the quay, greatly excited but silent, reserving their hurrahs
for the return.  Steam was fully up, and the screw of the
Susquehanna carried them briskly out of the bay.

It is needless to relate the conversations on board between
the officers, sailors, and passengers.  All these men had but
one thought.  All these hearts beat under the same emotion.
While they were hastening to help them, what were Barbicane and
his companions doing?  What had become of them?  Were they able to
attempt any bold maneuver to regain their liberty?  None could say.
The truth is that every attempt must have failed!  Immersed nearly
four miles under the ocean, this metal prison defied every effort
of its prisoners.

On the 23rd inst., at eight in the morning, after a rapid
passage, the Susquehanna was due at the fatal spot.  They must
wait till twelve to take the reckoning exactly.  The buoy
to which the sounding line had been lashed had not yet
been recognized.

At twelve, Captain Blomsberry, assisted by his officers who
superintended the observations, took the reckoning in the
presence of the delegates of the Gun Club.  Then there was a
moment of anxiety.  Her position decided, the Susquehanna was
found to be some minutes westward of the spot where the
projectile had disappeared beneath the waves.

The ship's course was then changed so as to reach this exact point.

At forty-seven minutes past twelve they reached the buoy; it was
in perfect condition, and must have shifted but little.

"At last!" exclaimed J. T. Maston.

"Shall we begin?" asked Captain Blomsberry.

"Without losing a second."

Every precaution was taken to keep the corvette almost
completely motionless.  Before trying to seize the projectile,
Engineer Murchison wanted to find its exact position at the
bottom of the ocean.  The submarine apparatus destined for this
expedition was supplied with air.  The working of these engines
was not without danger, for at 20,000 feet below the surface of
the water, and under such great pressure, they were exposed to
fracture, the consequences of which would be dreadful.

J. T. Maston, the brothers Blomsberry, and Engineer Murchison,
without heeding these dangers, took their places in the
air-chamber.  The commander, posted on his bridge, superintended
the operation, ready to stop or haul in the chains on the
slightest signal.  The screw had been shipped, and the whole
power of the machinery collected on the capstan would have
quickly drawn the apparatus on board.  The descent began at
twenty-five minutes past one at night, and the chamber,
drawn under by the reservoirs full of water, disappeared
from the surface of the ocean.

The emotion of the officers and sailors on board was now
divided between the prisoners in the projectile and the
prisoners in the submarine apparatus.  As to the latter, they
forgot themselves, and, glued to the windows of the scuttles,
attentively watched the liquid mass through which they were passing.

The descent was rapid.  At seventeen minutes past two, J. T.
Maston and his companions had reached the bottom of the Pacific;
but they saw nothing but an arid desert, no longer animated by
either fauna or flora.  By the light of their lamps, furnished
with powerful reflectors, they could see the dark beds of the
ocean for a considerable extent of view, but the projectile was
nowhere to be seen.

The impatience of these bold divers cannot be described, and
having an electrical communication with the corvette, they made
a signal already agreed upon, and for the space of a mile the
Susquehanna moved their chamber along some yards above the bottom.

Thus they explored the whole submarine plain, deceived at every
turn by optical illusions which almost broke their hearts.
Here a rock, there a projection from the ground, seemed to be
the much-sought-for projectile; but their mistake was soon
discovered, and then they were in despair.

"But where are they? where are they?" cried J. T. Maston.  And the
poor man called loudly upon Nicholl, Barbicane, and Michel Ardan,
as if his unfortunate friends could either hear or answer him
through such an impenetrable medium!  The search continued under
these conditions until the vitiated air compelled the divers to ascend.

The hauling in began about six in the evening, and was not ended
before midnight.

"To-morrow," said J. T. Maston, as he set foot on the bridge of
the corvette.

"Yes," answered Captain Blomsberry.

"And on another spot?"

"Yes."

J. T. Maston did not doubt of their final success, but his
companions, no longer upheld by the excitement of the first
hours, understood all the difficulty of the enterprise.
What seemed easy at San Francisco, seemed here in the wide
ocean almost impossible.  The chances of success diminished in
rapid proportion; and it was from chance alone that the meeting
with the projectile might be expected.

The next day, the 24th, in spite of the fatigue of the previous
day, the operation was renewed.  The corvette advanced some
minutes to westward, and the apparatus, provided with air, bore
the same explorers to the depths of the ocean.

The whole day passed in fruitless research; the bed of the sea
was a desert.  The 25th brought no other result, nor the 26th.

It was disheartening.  They thought of those unfortunates shut
up in the projectile for twenty-six days.  Perhaps at that
moment they were experiencing the first approach of suffocation;
that is, if they had escaped the dangers of their fall.  The air
was spent, and doubtless with the air all their _morale_.

"The air, possibly," answered J. T. Maston resolutely, "but
their _morale_ never!"

On the 28th, after two more days of search, all hope was gone.
This projectile was but an atom in the immensity of the ocean.
They must give up all idea of finding it.

But J. T. Maston would not hear of going away.  He would not
abandon the place without at least discovering the tomb of
his friends.  But Commander Blomsberry could no longer persist,
and in spite of the exclamations of the worthy secretary, was
obliged to give the order to sail.

On the 29th of December, at nine A.M., the Susquehanna, heading
northeast, resumed her course to the bay of San Francisco.

It was ten in the morning; the corvette was under half-steam, as
it was regretting to leave the spot where the catastrophe had
taken place, when a sailor, perched on the main-top-gallant
crosstrees, watching the sea, cried suddenly:

"A buoy on the lee bow!"

The officers looked in the direction indicated, and by the help
of their glasses saw that the object signalled had the
appearance of one of those buoys which are used to mark the
passages of bays or rivers.  But, singularly to say, a flag
floating on the wind surmounted its cone, which emerged five
or six feet out of water.  This buoy shone under the rays
of the sun as if it had been made of plates of silver.
Commander Blomsberry, J. T. Maston, and the delegates of the Gun
Club were mounted on the bridge, examining this object straying
at random on the waves.

All looked with feverish anxiety, but in silence.  None dared
give expression to the thoughts which came to the minds of all.

The corvette approached to within two cables' lengths of the object.

A shudder ran through the whole crew.  That flag was the
American flag!

At this moment a perfect howling was heard; it was the brave J.
T. Maston who had just fallen all in a heap.  Forgetting on the
one hand that his right arm had been replaced by an iron hook,
and on the other that a simple gutta-percha cap covered his
brain-box, he had given himself a formidable blow.

They hurried toward him, picked him up, restored him to life.
And what were his first words?

"Ah! trebly brutes! quadruply idiots! quintuply boobies that we are!"

"What is it?" exclaimed everyone around him.

"What is it?"

"Come, speak!"

"It is, simpletons," howled the terrible secretary, "it is that
the projectile only weighs 19,250 pounds!"

"Well?"

"And that it displaces twenty-eight tons, or in other words
56,000 pounds, and that consequently _it floats_!"

Ah! what stress the worthy man had laid on the verb "float!"
And it was true!  All, yes! all these savants had forgotten
this fundamental law, namely, that on account of its specific
lightness, the projectile, after having been drawn by its fall
to the greatest depths of the ocean, must naturally return to
the surface.  And now it was floating quietly at the mercy of
the waves.

The boats were put to sea.  J. T. Maston and his friends had
rushed into them!  Excitement was at its height!  Every heart
beat loudly while they advanced to the projectile.  What did
it contain?  Living or dead?

Living, yes! living, at least unless death had struck
Barbicane and his two friends since they had hoisted the flag.
Profound silence reigned on the boats.  All were breathless.
Eyes no longer saw.  One of the scuttles of the projectile was open.
Some pieces of glass remained in the frame, showing that it had
been broken.  This scuttle was actually five feet above the water.

A boat came alongside, that of J. T. Maston, and J. T. Maston
rushed to the broken window.

At that moment they heard a clear and merry voice, the voice of
Michel Ardan, exclaiming in an accent of triumph:

"White all, Barbicane, white all!"

Barbicane, Michel Ardan, and Nicholl were playing at dominoes!





CHAPTER XXIII


THE END


We may remember the intense sympathy which had accompanied the
travelers on their departure.  If at the beginning of the
enterprise they had excited such emotion both in the old and
new world, with what enthusiasm would they be received on
their return!  The millions of spectators which had beset
the peninsula of Florida, would they not rush to meet these
sublime adventurers?  Those legions of strangers, hurrying from
all parts of the globe toward the American shores, would they
leave the Union without having seen Barbicane, Nicholl, and
Michel Ardan?  No! and the ardent passion of the public was
bound to respond worthily to the greatness of the enterprise.
Human creatures who had left the terrestrial sphere, and returned
after this strange voyage into celestial space, could not fail
to be received as the prophet Elias would be if he came back
to earth.  To see them first, and then to hear them, such was
the universal longing.

Barbicane, Michel Ardan, Nicholl, and the delegates of the Gun
Club, returning without delay to Baltimore, were received with
indescribable enthusiasm.  The notes of President Barbicane's
voyage were ready to be given to the public.  The New York
_Herald_ bought the manuscript at a price not yet known, but
which must have been very high.  Indeed, during the publication
of "A Journey to the Moon," the sale of this paper amounted to
five millions of copies.  Three days after the return of
the travelers to the earth, the slightest detail of their
expedition was known.  There remained nothing more but to see
the heroes of this superhuman enterprise.

The expedition of Barbicane and his friends round the moon had
enabled them to correct the many admitted theories regarding the
terrestrial satellite.  These savants had observed _de visu_,
and under particular circumstances.  They knew what systems
should be rejected, what retained with regard to the formation
of that orb, its origin, its habitability.  Its past, present,
and future had even given up their last secrets.  Who could
advance objections against conscientious observers, who at less
than twenty-four miles distance had marked that curious mountain
of Tycho, the strangest system of lunar orography?  How answer
those savants whose sight had penetrated the abyss of
Pluto's circle?  How contradict those bold ones whom the chances
of their enterprise had borne over that invisible face of the
disc, which no human eye until then had ever seen?  It was now
their turn to impose some limit on that selenographic science,
which had reconstructed the lunar world as Cuvier did the
skeleton of a fossil, and say, "The moon _was_ this, a habitable
world, inhabited before the earth.  The moon _is_ that, a world
uninhabitable, and now uninhabited."

To celebrate the return of its most illustrious member and his
two companions, the Gun Club decided upon giving a banquet, but
a banquet worthy of the conquerors, worthy of the American
people, and under such conditions that all the inhabitants of
the Union could directly take part in it.

All the head lines of railroads in the States were joined by
flying rails; and on all the platforms, lined with the same
flags, and decorated with the same ornaments, were tables laid
and all served alike.  At certain hours, successively
calculated, marked by electric clocks which beat the seconds at
the same time, the population were invited to take their places
at the banquet tables.  For four days, from the 5th to the 9th
of January, the trains were stopped as they are on Sundays on
the railways of the United States, and every road was open.
One engine only at full speed, drawing a triumphal carriage, had
the right of traveling for those four days on the railroads of
the United States.

The engine was manned by a driver and a stoker, and bore, by
special favor, the Hon. J. T. Maston, secretary of the Gun Club.
The carriage was reserved for President Barbicane, Colonel
Nicholl, and Michel Ardan.  At the whistle of the driver, amid
the hurrahs, and all the admiring vociferations of the American
language, the train left the platform of Baltimore.  It traveled
at a speed of one hundred and sixty miles in the hour.  But what
was this speed compared with that which had carried the three
heroes from the mouth of the Columbiad?

Thus they sped from one town to the other, finding whole
populations at table on their road, saluting them with the same
acclamations, lavishing the same bravos!  They traveled in this
way through the east of the Union, Pennsylvania, Connecticut,
Massachusetts, Vermont, Maine, and New Hampshire; the north and
west by New York, Ohio, Michigan, and Wisconsin; returning to
the south by Illinois, Missouri, Arkansas, Texas, and Louisiana;
they went to the southeast by Alabama and Florida, going up by
Georgia and the Carolinas, visiting the center by Tennessee,
Kentucky, Virginia, and Indiana, and, after quitting the
Washington station, re-entered Baltimore, where for four days
one would have thought that the United States of America were
seated at one immense banquet, saluting them simultaneously with
the same hurrahs!  The apotheosis was worthy of these three
heroes whom fable would have placed in the rank of demigods.

And now will this attempt, unprecedented in the annals of
travels, lead to any practical result?  Will direct
communication with the moon ever be established?  Will they
ever lay the foundation of a traveling service through the
solar world?  Will they go from one planet to another, from
Jupiter to Mercury, and after awhile from one star to another,
from the Polar to Sirius?  Will this means of locomotion allow
us to visit those suns which swarm in the firmament?

To such questions no answer can be given.  But knowing the bold
ingenuity of the Anglo-Saxon race, no one would be astonished if
the Americans seek to make some use of President Barbicane's attempt.

Thus, some time after the return of the travelers, the public
received with marked favor the announcement of a company,
limited, with a capital of a hundred million of dollars, divided
into a hundred thousand shares of a thousand dollars each, under
the name of the "National Company of Interstellary Communication."
President, Barbicane; vice-president, Captain Nicholl; secretary,
J. T. Maston; director of movements, Michel Ardan.

And as it is part of the American temperament to foresee
everything in business, even failure, the Honorable Harry
Trolloppe, judge commissioner, and Francis Drayton, magistrate,
were nominated beforehand!

###################################################################################

